THE HORROR AT 
CAMP JELLY JAM 

1 

Mom pointed excitedly out the car window. “Look! A cow!” 

My brother, Elliot, and I both groaned. We had been driving through 
farmland for four hours, and Mom had pointed out every single cow and horse. 

“Look out your side, Wendy!” Mom cried from the front seat. “Sheep!” 

I stared out the window and saw about a dozen gray sheep—fat, woolly 
ones—grazing on a grassy green hill. “Nice sheep, Mom,” I said, rolling my 
eyes. 

“There’s a cow!” Elliot exclaimed. 

Now he was doing it! 

I reached across the backseat and gave him a hard shove. “Mom, is it 
possible to explode from boredom?” I moaned. 

“BOOOOOOM!” Elliot shouted. The kid is a riot, isn’t he? 

“I told you,” Dad muttered to Mom. “A twelve-year-old is too old to go on 
a long car trip.” 

“So is an eleven-year-old!” Elliot protested. 

I’m twelve. Elliot is eleven. 

“How can you two be bored?” Mom asked. “Look—horses!” 

Dad sped up to pass a huge yellow truck. The road curved through high, 
sloping hills. In the far distance, I could see gray mountains, rising up in a heavy 
mist. 

“There’s so much beautiful scenery to admire,” Mom gushed. 

“After a while, it all looks like some boring old calendar,” I complained. 

Elliot pointed out of his window. “Look! No horses!” 

He doubled over, laughing. He thought that was the funniest thing anyone 
had ever said. Elliot really cracks himself up. 

Mom turned in the front seat. She narrowed her eyes at my brother. “Are 
you making fun of me?” she demanded. 

“Yes!” Elliot replied. 

“Of course not,” I chimed in. “Who would ever make fun of you, Mom?” 

“When do you ever stop?” Mom complained. 

“We’re leaving Idaho,” Dad announced. “That’s Wyoming up ahead. We’ll 

be up in those mountains soon.” 

“Maybe we’ll see Mountain Cows!” I exclaimed sarcastically. 

Elliot laughed. 

Mom sighed. “Go ahead. Ruin our first family vacation in three years.” 

We hit a bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us. Dad had hooked one of 
those big, old-fashioned trailers to the back of our car. We had dragged it all over 
the West. 

The trailer was actually kind of fun. It had four narrow beds built into the 
sides. And it had a table we could sit around to eat or play cards. It even had a 
small kitchen. 

At night, we’d pull into a trailer camp. Dad would hook the trailer up to 
water and electricity. And we spent the night inside, in our own private little 
house. 

We hit another bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us again. The car 
lurched forward as we started to climb into the mountains. 

“Mom, how do I know if I’m getting carsick or not?” Elliot asked. 

Mom turned back to us, frowning. “Elliot, you never get carsick,” she said 
in a low voice. “Did you forget?” 

“Oh. Right,” Elliot replied. “I just thought it might be something to do.” 

“Elliot!” Mom screamed. “If you’re so bored, take a nap!” 

“That’s boring,” my brother muttered. 

I could see Mom’s face turning an angry red. Mom doesn’t look like Dad, 
Elliot, and me. She is blond and has blue eyes and very fair skin, which turns red 
very easily. And she’s kind of plump. 

My dad, brother, and I are skinny and sort of dark. The three of us have 
brown hair and brown eyes. 

“You kids don’t know how lucky you are,” Dad said. “You’re getting to see 
some amazing sights.” 

“Bobby Harrison got to go to baseball camp,” Elliot grumbled. “And Jay 
Thurman went to sleepaway camp for eight weeks!” 

“I wanted to go to sleepaway camp, too!” I protested. 

“You’ll go to camp next summer,” Mom replied sharply. “This is the chance 
of a lifetime!” 

“But the chance of a lifetime is so boring!” Elliot complained. 

“Wendy, entertain your brother,” Dad ordered. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “How am I supposed to entertain him?” 

“Play Car Geography,” Mom suggested. 

“Oh, no! Not again!” Elliot wailed. 

“Go ahead. I’ll start,” Mom said. “Atlanta.” 

Atlanta ends with an A. So I had to think of a city that starts with an A. 
“Albany,” I said. “Your turn, Elliot.” 

“Hmmmmm. A city that starts with a Y...” My brother thought for a 
moment. Then he twisted up his face. “I quit!” 

My brother is such a bad sport. He takes games too seriously, and he really 
hates to lose. Sometimes he gets so intense when he’s playing soccer or softball, 
I really worry about him. 

Sometimes when he thinks he can’t win, he just quits. Like now. 

“What about Youngstown?” Mom asked. 

“What about it?” Elliot grumbled. 

“I have an idea!” I said. “How about letting Elliot and me ride in the trailer 
for a while?” 

“Yeah! Cool!” Elliot cried. 

“I don’t think so,” Mom replied. She turned to Dad. “It’s against the law to 
ride in a trailer, isn’t it?” 

“I don’t know,” Dad said, slowing the car. We were climbing through thick 
pine woods now. The air smelled so fresh and sweet. 

“Let us!” Elliot pleaded. “Come on—let us!” 

“I don’t see any harm in letting them ride back there for a while,” Dad told 
Mom. “As long as they’re careful.” 

“We’ll be careful!” Elliot promised. 

“Are you sure it’s safe?” Mom asked Dad. 

Dad nodded. “What could happen?” 

He pulled the car to the side of the highway. Elliot and I slid out. We ran to 
the trailer, pulled open the door, and hurried inside. 

A few seconds later, the car pulled back onto the highway. We bounced 
along behind it in the big trailer. 

“This is so cool!” Elliot declared, making his way to the back window. 

“Do I have good ideas or what?” I asked, following him. He slapped me a 
high five. 

We stared out the back window. The highway seemed to tilt down as we 
headed up to the mountains. 

The trailer bounced and swayed as the car tugged it. 

The road tilted up steeper. And steeper. 
And that’s when all our troubles began. 

2 

“I win!” Elliot cried. He jumped up and raised both fists in triumph. 

“Three out of five!” I demanded, rubbing my wrist. “Come on—three out of 
five. Unless you’re chicken.” 

I knew that would get him. Elliot can’t stand to be called a chicken. He 
settled back in the seat. 

We leaned over the narrow table and clasped hands. We had been arm 
wrestling for about ten minutes. It was kind of fun because the table bounced 
every time the trailer rolled over a bump in the road. 

I am as strong as Elliot. But he’s more determined. A lot more determined. 
You never saw anyone groan and sweat and strain so much in arm wrestling! 

To me, a game is just a game. But to Elliot, every game is life or death. 

He had won two out of three about five times. 

My wrist was sore, and my hand ached. But I really wanted to beat him in 
this final match. 

I leaned over the table and squeezed his hand harder. I gritted my teeth and 
stared menacingly into his dark brown eyes. 

“Go!” he cried. 

We both strained against each other. I pushed hard. Elliot’s hand started to 
bend back. 

I pushed harder. I nearly had him. Just a little harder. 

He let out a groan and pushed back. He shut his eyes. His face turned beet- 
red. I could see the veins push out at the sides of his neck. 

My brother just can’t stand to lose. 

SLAM! 

The back of my hand hit the table hard. 

Elliot had won again. 

Actually, I let him win. I didn’t want to see his whole head explode because 
of a stupid arm-wrestling match. 

He jumped up and pumped his fists, cheering for himself. 

“Hey—!” he cried out as the trailer swayed hard, and he went crashing into 
the wall. 

The trailer lurched again. I grabbed the table to keep from falling off my 
seat. “What’s going on?” 

“We changed direction. We’re heading down now,” Elliot replied. He edged 
his way back toward the table. 

But we bumped hard, and he toppled to the floor. “Hey—we’re going 
backwards!” 

“I’ll bet Mom’s driving,” I said, holding on to the table edge with both 
hands. 

Mom always drives like a crazy person. When you warn her that she’s 
going eighty, she always says, “That can’t be right. It feels as if I’m going thirty- 
five!” 

The trailer was bouncing and bumping, rolling downhill. Elliot and I were 
bouncing and bumping with the trailer. 

“What is their problem?” Elliot cried, grabbing on to one of the beds, 
struggling to keep his balance. “Are they backing up? Why are we going 
backwards?” 

The trailer roared downhill. I pushed myself up from the table and stumbled 
to the front to see the car. Shoving aside the red plaid curtain, I peered out 
through the small window. 

“Uh... Elliot...” I choked out. “We’ve got a problem.” 

“Huh? A problem?” he replied, bouncing harder as the trailer picked up 
speed. 

“Mom and Dad aren’t pulling us anymore,” I told him. “The car is gone.” 

3

Elliot’s face filled with confusion. He didn’t understand me. Or maybe he didn’t 
believe me! 

“The trailer has come loose!” I screamed, staring out the bouncing window. 
“We’re rolling downhill—on our own!” 

“N-n-n-no!” Elliot chattered. He wasn’t stuttering. He was bouncing so 
hard, he could barely speak. His sneakers hopped so hard on the trailer floor, he 
seemed to be tap dancing. 

“OW!” I let out a pained shriek as my head bounced against the ceiling. 
Elliot and I stumbled to the back. Gripping the windowsill tightly, I struggled to 
see where we were heading. 

The road curved steeply downhill, through thick pine woods on both sides. 
The trees were a bouncing blur of greens and browns as we hurtled past. 

Picking up speed. Bouncing and tumbling. 

Faster. 

Faster. 

The tires roared beneath us. The trailer tilted and dipped. 

I fell to the floor. Landed hard on my knees. Reached to pull myself up. But 
the trailer swayed, and I went sprawling on my back. 

Pulling myself to my knees, I saw Elliot bouncing around on the floor like a 
soccer ball. I threw myself at the back of the trailer and peered out the window. 

The trailer bumped hard. The road curved sharply—but we didn’t curve 
with it! 

We shot off the side of the road. Swerved into the trees. 

“Elliot!” I shrieked. “We’re going to crash!” 

4 

The trailer jolted hard. I heard a cracking sound. 

It’s going to break in half! I thought. 

I pressed both hands against the front and stared out the window. Dark trees 
flew past. 

A hard bump sent me sprawling to the floor. 

I heard Elliot calling my name. “Wendy! Wendy! Wendy!” 

I shut my eyes and tensed every muscle. And waited for the crash. 

Waited... 

Waited... 

Silence. 

I opened my eyes. It took me a few seconds to realize that we were no 
longer moving. I took a deep breath and climbed to my feet. 

“Wendy?” I heard Elliot’s weak cry from the back of the trailer. 

My legs were trembling as I turned around. My whole body felt weird. As if 
we were still bouncing. “Elliot—are you okay?” 

He had been thrown into one of the bottom bunks. “Yeah. I guess,” he 
replied. He lowered his feet to the floor and shook his head. “I’m kind of dizzy.” 

“Me, too,” I confessed. “What a ride!” 

“Better than Space Mountain!” Elliot exclaimed. He climbed to his feet. 
“Let’s get out of this thing!” 

We both started to the door at the front. It was an uphill climb. The trailer 
tilted up. 

I reached the door first. I grabbed the handle. 

A loud knock on the door made me jump back. “Hey... !” I cried. 

Three more knocks. 

“It’s Mom and Dad!” Elliot cried. “They found us! Open it up! Hurry!” 

He didn’t have to tell me to hurry. My heart skipped. I was so glad to see 
them! 

I turned the handle, pushed open the trailer door— 

—and gasped. 

5 

I stared into the face of a blond-haired man. His blue eyes sparkled in the bright 
sunlight. 

He was dressed all in white. He wore a crisp white T-shirt tucked into 
baggy white shorts. A small round button pinned to his T-shirt read ONLY THE 
BEST in bold black letters. 

“Uh... hi,” I finally managed to choke out. 

He flashed me a gleaming smile. He seemed to have about two thousand 
teeth. “Hey, guys—everyone okay in there?” he asked. His blue eyes sparkled 
even brighter. 

“Yeah. We’re okay,” I told him. “A little shaken up, but—” 

“Who are you?” Elliot cried, poking his head out the door. 

The guy’s smile didn’t fade. “My name is Buddy.” 

“I’m Wendy. He’s Elliot. We thought you were our parents,” I explained. I 
hopped down to the ground. 

Elliot followed me. “Where are Mom and Dad?” he asked, frowning. 

“I haven’t seen anyone, guy,” Buddy told him. He studied the trailer. “What 
happened here? You came unhitched?” 

I nodded, brushing my dark hair off my face. “Yeah. On the steep hills, I 
guess.” 

“Dangerous,” Buddy muttered. “You must have been really scared.” 

“Not me!” Elliot declared. 

What a kid. First, he’s shaking in terror and calling out my name over and 
over. Now he’s Mister Macho. 

“I’ve never been so scared in all my life!” I admitted. 

I took a few steps away from the trailer and searched the woods. The trees 
creaked and swayed in a light breeze. The sun beamed down brightly. I shielded 
my eyes with one hand as I peered around. 

No sign of Mom and Dad. I couldn’t see the highway through the thick 
trees. 

I could see the tire tracks our trailer had made through the soft dirt. 
Somehow we had shot through a clear path between the trees. The trailer had 
come to rest at the foot of a sharp, sloping hill. 

“Wow. We were lucky,” I muttered. 

“You’re very lucky,” Buddy declared cheerfully. He stepped up beside me, 
placed his hands on my shoulders, and turned me around. “Check it out. Look 
where you guys landed!” 

Gazing up the hill, I saw a wide clearing between the trees. And then I saw 
a huge, red-and-white banner, stretched high on two poles. I had to squint to read 
the words on the banner. 

Elliot read them aloud: “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp.” 

“The, camp is on the other side of the hill,” Buddy told us, flashing us both 
a friendly smile. “Come on! Follow me!” 

“But—but—” my brother sputtered. “We have to find our parents!” 

“Hey—no problem, guy. You can wait for them at the camp,” Buddy 
assured him. 

“But how will they know where to find us?” I protested. “Should we leave a 
note?” 

Buddy flashed me another dazzling smile. “No. I’ll take care of it,” he told 
me. “No problem.” 

He stepped past the trailer and started up the hill. His white T-shirt and 
white shorts gleamed in the sunlight. I saw that his socks and high-tops were 
sparkling white, too. 

That’s his uniform. He must work at the camp, I decided. 

Buddy turned back. “You guys coming?” He motioned with both hands. 
“Come on. You’re going to like it!” 

Elliot and I hurried to catch up to him. My legs trembled as I ran. I could 
still feel the trailer floor bouncing and jolting beneath me. I wondered if I would 
ever feel normal again. 

As we made our way up the grassy hill, the red-and-white banner came into 
clearer view. “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp,” I read the words aloud. 

A funny, purple cartoon character had been drawn beside the words on the 
banner. He looked like a blob of grape bubble gum. He had a big smile on his 
face. He wore a gold crown on his head. 

“Who’s that?” I asked Buddy. 

Buddy glanced up at the banner. “That’s King Jellyjam,” he replied. “He’s 
our little mascot.” 

“Weird-looking mascot for a sports camp,” I declared, staring up at the 
purple, blobby king. 

Buddy didn’t reply. 

“Do you work at the camp?” Elliot asked. 

Buddy nodded. “It’s a great place to work. I’m the head counselor, guys. So 
—welcome!” 

“But we can’t go to your camp,” I protested. “We have to find our parents. 
We have to...” 

Buddy put a hand on my shoulder and a hand on Elliot’s shoulder. He 
guided us up the hill. “You guys have had a close call. You might as well stay 
and have some fun. Enjoy the camp. Until I can hook up with your parents.” 

As we neared the top of the hill, I heard voices. Kids’ voices. Shouting and 
laughing. 

The clearing narrowed. Tall pine trees, birch trees, and maples clustered 
over the hill. 

“What kind of sports camp is it?” Elliot asked Buddy. 

“We play all kinds of sports,” Buddy replied. “From Ping-Pong to football. 
From croquet to soccer. We have swimming. We have tennis. We have archery. 
We even have a marbles tournament!” 

“Sounds like a cool place!” my brother declared, grinning at me. 

“Only the best!” Buddy said, slapping Elliot on the shoulder. 

I reached the top of the hill first and peered down through the trees to the 
camp. It seemed to stretch for miles! 

I could see two long, white, two-story buildings on either side. Between 
them, I saw several playing fields, a baseball diamond, a long row of tennis 
courts, and two enormous swimming pools. 

“Those long, white buildings are the dorms,” Buddy explained, pointing. 
“That’s the girls’ dorm, and that’s the boys’. You guys can stay in them while 
you’re here.” 

“Wow! It looks awesome!” Elliot exclaimed. “Two swimming pools!” 

“Olympic size,” Buddy told him. “We have diving competitions, too. Are 
you into diving?” 

“Only inside the trailer!” I joked. 

“Wendy is into swimming,” Elliot told Buddy. 

“I think there’s a four-lap swim race this afternoon,” Buddy told me. “I’ll 
check the schedule for you.” 

The sun beamed on us as we followed the path down the hill. The back of 
my neck started to prickle. A cool swim sounded pretty good to me. 

“Can anyone sign up for baseball?” Elliot asked Buddy. “I mean, do you 
have to be on a team or something?” 

“You can play any sport you want,” Buddy told him. “The only rule at King 
Jellyjam’s Sports Camp is to try hard.” Buddy tapped the button on his T-shirt. 
“Only The Best,” he said. 

The breeze blew my hair back over my face. I knew I should have had it cut 
before vacation! I decided I’d have to find something to tie it back with as soon 
as I got into the dorm. 

A soccer match was under way on the nearest field. Whistles blew. Kids 
shouted. I saw a long row of archery targets at the far end of the soccer field. 

Buddy started jogging toward the field. Elliot stepped up beside me. “Hey 
—we wanted to go to camp, right?” he said, grinning. “Well? We made it!” 

Before I could reply, he trotted after Buddy. 

I brushed back my hair one more time, then followed. But I stopped when I 
saw a little girl poke her head out from behind a wide tree trunk. 

She appeared to be about six or seven. She had bright red hair and a face 
full of freckles. She wore a pale blue T-shirt pulled down over black tights. 

“Hey—” she called in a loud whisper. “Hey—!” 

I turned toward her, startled. 

“Don’t come in!” she called. “Run away! Don’t come in!” 

6 

Buddy turned back quickly. “What’s the problem, Wendy?” he called. 

When I returned my eyes to the tree, the red-haired girl had vanished. I 
blinked a couple of times. No trace of her. 

What was that girl doing out here? I wondered. Did she hide behind that 
tree just to scare people? 

“Uh... no problem,” I called to Buddy. I followed Elliot and the counselor 
into the camp. 

I quickly forgot all about the girl as we made our way around the soccer 
field and past a long row of fenced-in tennis courts. The thwack of tennis balls 
followed us as we turned on to the main path that led through the camp. 

So many sports! So much activity! 

We pushed our way through kids of all ages, eagerly hurrying to the 
swimming pools, to the baseball diamond, to the bowling lanes! 

“Awesome!” Elliot kept repeating. “Totally awesome!” 

And for once, he was right. 

We passed several other camp counselors. They were all young men and 
women, dressed completely in white, all of them good-looking and smiling 
cheerfully. 

And we passed dozens of little triangular signs showing the purple, blobby 
face of King Jellyjam, smiling out from under his shiny gold crown. Under each 
face was the camp slogan: Only The Best. 

He’s kind of cute, I decided. I realized I was starting to like everything 
about this amazing sports camp. 

And I have to confess I found myself secretly hoping that Mom and Dad 
wouldn’t be able to find Elliot and me for at least a day or two. 

Isn’t that terrible? 

I felt really guilty about it. But I couldn’t help thinking it. This camp was 
just too exciting. Especially after days of riding in the backseat of the car, staring 
out at cows! 

We dropped my brother off at the boys’ dorm first. Another counselor, a 
tall, dark-haired guy named Scooter, greeted Elliot and took my brother off to 
find a dorm room. 

Then Buddy led me to the girls’ dorm on the other side of the camp. We 
passed a gymnastics competition being held in an outdoor arena. Beyond that, 
one of the swimming pools was jammed with kids watching a diving contest off 
the high board. 

Buddy and I chatted as we walked. I told him about my school and about 
how my favorite sports are swimming and biking. 

We stopped at the white double-door entrance to the dorm. “Where are you 
from?” I asked him. 

Buddy stared back at me. He had such a confused expression on his face. 
For a moment, I thought he didn’t understand the question. 

“Do you come from around here?” I asked. 

He swallowed hard. He squinted his blue eyes. “Weird...” he muttered 
finally. 

“What’s weird?” I demanded. 

“I... I don’t remember,” he stammered. “I don’t remember where I’m from. 
Is that weird or what?” He raised his right hand to his mouth and nibbled his 
pointer finger. 

“Hey, I forget stuff all the time,” I told him, seeing how upset he was. 

I didn’t get a chance to say anything else. A young woman counselor with 
very short, straight black hair and bright purple-lipsticked lips came trotting up 
to us. “Hello. I’m Holly. Are you ready for some sports?” 

“I guess,” I replied uncertainly. 

“This is Wendy,” Buddy told her, his expression still troubled. “She needs a 
room.” 

“No problem!” Holly declared cheerfully. “Only The Best!” 

“Only The Best,” Buddy repeated quietly. He flashed me a smile. But I 
could see he was still struggling to remember where his home was. Weird, huh? 

Holly led the way into the dorm. I followed her down a long, white-tiled 
hall. Several girls came running past, on their way to different sports. They were 
all shouting and laughing excitedly. 

I peeked into some of the open rooms as we passed by them. Wow! I 
thought. This place is so modern and luxurious! It’s not exactly your basic, rustic 
summer camp. 

“We don’t stay in the rooms much at all,” Holly told me. “Everyone is 
always outdoors, competing.” 

She pushed open a white door and motioned for me to step in. Bright 

sunlight flooded the room from a wide window on the opposite wall. 

I saw two bright blue bunk beds against each wall. A sleek white dresser 
between them. Two white leather armchairs. 

The walls were white. They were bare except for a small, framed drawing 
of King Jellyjam above the dresser. 

“Nice room!” I exclaimed, squinting against the bright sunlight. 

Holly smiled. Her bright purple lips made the rest of her features seem to 
disappear. “Glad you like it, Wendy. You can take that bottom bunk over there.” 
She pointed. She had purple fingernails that matched her lipstick. 

“Do I have roommates?” I asked. 

Holly nodded. “You’ll meet them soon. They’ll get you started with some 
activities. I think they’re playing soccer on the lower field. I’m not sure.” 

She started out of the room, but turned at the doorway. “You’ll like Dierdre. 
I think she’s about your age.” 

“Thanks,” I said, gazing around the room. 

“Catch you later,” Holly replied. She vanished into the hall. 

I stood in the center of the sunlit room, thinking hard. What am I supposed 
to do for clothes? I wondered. What about swimsuits? Sweats? 

A11 I had were the denim short-shorts and pink-and-blue-striped T-shirt I 
was wearing. 

And why didn’t Holly tell me where to go next? I asked myself. Why did 
she just leave me by myself in this empty room? 

I didn’t have long to ask myself questions. 

I started to cross to the window when I heard voices. Whispered voices 
outside the door. 

I turned to the door. Were my roommates returning? 

I listened to the excited buzz of whispers. 

Then I heard a girl loudly instruct the others. “Come on. We’ve got her 
trapped in there. Let’s get her!” 

7 

I gasped and searched frantically for a place to hide. 

No time. 

Three girls burst into the room, their eyes narrowed, their mouths twisted 
into menacing sneers. They formed a line and moved toward me quickly. 

“Whoa! Wait!” I cried. I raised both hands as if to shield myself from their 
attack. 

The tall girl with streaky blond hair was the first to laugh. Then the other 
two joined in. 

“Gotcha,” the blond girl declared, tossing back her long hair triumphantly. 

I glared back at her, my mouth hanging open. 

“Did you really think we were going to attack?” one of the others asked. 
She was thin and wiry, with very short black hair cut into bangs. She wore gray 
sweats and a torn gray T-shirt. 

“Well...” I started. I could feel my face growing hot. Their little joke had 
really fooled me. I felt like a total jerk. 

“Don’t look at me,” the third girl said, shaking her head. She had frizzy 
blond hair tumbling out from beneath a blue and red Chicago Cubs cap. “It was 
all Dierdre’s idea.” She pointed to the girl with streaky blond hair. 

“Don’t feel bad,” Dierdre told me, grinning. Her green eyes flashed. 
“You’re the third girl this week.” 

The other two snickered. 

“And did the others think you were attacking?” I asked. 

Dierdre nodded, very pleased with herself. “It’s kind of a mean joke,” she 
admitted. “But it’s funny.” 

This time I joined in the laughter. 

“I have a younger brother. I’m used to dumb jokes,” I told Dierdre. 

She swept back her hair again. Rummaged around on the dresser top. Found 
a hair scrunchy to hold it back. “This is Jan and this is Ivy,” she said, motioning 
to the other girls. 

Jan was the one with the short black bangs. She slumped on to a lower 
bunk. “I’m whipped,” she sighed. “What a workout. Look at me. I’m sweating 
like a pig.” 

“Ever hear of deodorant?” Ivy cracked. 

Jan stuck out her tongue at Ivy in reply. 

“Get changed,” Dierdre instructed them both. “We’ve only got ten 
minutes.” 

“Ten minutes till what?” Jan demanded, bending down and rubbing her calf 
muscles. 

“Did you forget the four-lap race?” Dierdre replied. 

“Oh, wow!” Jan cried, jumping up. “I did forget.” She hurried to the 
dresser. “Where’s my swimsuit?” 

Ivy followed her. They began frantically sifting through the drawers. 

Dierdre turned to me. “Do you want to enter the race?” she asked. 

“I—I don’t have a swimsuit,” I replied. 

She shrugged. “No problem. I have about a dozen.” She studied me. “We’re 
about the same size. I’m just a little taller.” 

“Well, I’d love a swim,” I told her. “Maybe I’ll just go to the pool and 
splash around for a while.” 

“Huh? Not compete?” Dierdre cried. 

All three girls turned to me, stunned expressions on their faces. 

“I’ll do some sports later,” I said. “Right now, I just want to dive in and 
swim a little. You know. Cool off.” 

“But—you can’t!” Jan cried. She gaped at me as if I had suddenly grown a 
second head. 

“No way,” Ivy said, shaking her head. 

“You have to compete,” Dierdre added. “You can’t just swim.” 

“Only The Best,” Ivy recited. 

“Right. Only The Best,” Jan agreed. 

I felt totally confused. “What do you mean?” I demanded. “Why do you 
keep saying that?” 

Dierdre tossed me a blue swimsuit. “Put it on. We’re going to be late.” 
“But... but—” I sputtered. 

The three girls hurried to get into their swimsuits. 

I saw that I had no choice. I went into the bathroom and started to change. 
But my questions repeated in my mind. I really wanted them answered. 

Why did I have to compete in the race? Why couldn’t I just have a swim? 
And why did everyone keep repeating “Only The Best”? 

What did they mean? 

8 

The enormous blue pool sparkled under the bright sunlight. The sun hovered 
high overhead. The concrete burned the soles of my bare feet. I couldn’t wait to 
get into the water. 

Shielding my eyes with one hand, I searched for Elliot. But I couldn’t find 
him in the crowd of kids who were waiting to watch the race. 

Elliot has probably already played three sports, I told myself. This had to be 
the perfect camp for my brother! 

I gazed down the line of girls waiting to compete in the four-lap race. We 
all stood on the edge of the deep end of the pool, waiting to jump in. 

I silently counted. There were at least two dozen girls in this race. And the 
pool was wide enough for all of us to have a lane to swim in. 

“Hey, you look terrific in my suit,” Dierdre said. Her green eyes studied me. 
“You should have tied your hair back, Wendy. It’s going to slow you down.” 

Wow, I thought. Dierdre really cares about winning. 

“Are you a good swimmer?” I asked her. 

She swatted a fly on the back of her calf. “The best,” she replied, grinning. 
“How about you?” 

“I’ve never really raced,” I told her. 

The pool counselors were all young women. They wore white two-piece 
swimsuits. Across the pool, I saw Holly sitting on the edge of the diving board, 
talking to another counselor. 

A tall, red-haired counselor moved to the edge of the pool and blew her 
whistle. “Everyone ready?” she called. 

We all shouted back that we were ready. Then the long line of girls grew 
silent. We turned to the pool, leaned forward, and prepared to dive in. 

The water shimmered beneath me. The sun burned down on my back and 
shoulders. I felt about to melt. I couldn’t wait to jump in. 

The whistle blew. I sprang forward and hit the water hard. 

I gasped from the shock of the cold against my hot skin. My arms churned 
hard as I pulled myself forward. 

The splash of thrashing arms and kicking feet sounded like the roar of a 
waterfall. I dipped my face into the water, feeling the refreshing coldness. 

Turning my head, I glimpsed Dierdre a few lengths behind me. She swam 
in a steady rhythm, her arms and legs moving smoothly, gracefully. 

I’m ahead of everyone, I realized, glancing across the pool. I’m winning the 

race! 

With a hard kick, I reached the other end of the pool. I made a sharp turn 
and pushed off. As I started back to the deep end, the other girls were still 
approaching the shallow end wall. 

I pulled myself harder. My heart started to pound. 

I knew I’d win the first lap easily. Then there were three laps to go. 

Three laps... 

I suddenly realized how dumb I was. The other girls were pacing 
themselves. They weren’t swimming full speed because they knew it was a four- 
lap race. 

If I kept swimming this hard, I wouldn’t survive two laps! 

I sucked in a deep breath, then let it out slowly. 

Slowly... slowly... 

That was the word of the day. 

I slowed my kicking. Shot my arms out and pulled them back slowly. Took 
long breaths. Long, slow breaths. 

As I made my turn and started the second lap, several other swimmers had 
moved beside me. I caught Dierdre’s eye as she swam past. 

She never broke her steady rhythm. Stroke. Stroke. Breath. Stroke. 

On the other side of Dierdre, I saw Jan swimming comfortably, easily. Jan 
was so small and light. She seemed to float over the water. 

Into the third lap. I kept a few lengths behind Dierdre. I had to concentrate 
on keeping a slow, even pace. I pretended I was a robot, programmed to swim 
slowly. 

Dierdre turned into the fourth lap a few seconds ahead of me. I saw her 
expression change as she made her turn. She narrowed her eyes. Her entire face 
grew tight and tense. 

Dierdre really wants to win, I saw. 

I wondered if I could catch her. I wondered if I could beat her. 

I made my turn and put on the speed. 

I ignored the aching in my arms. 

I ignored the cramp in my left foot. 

I thrust myself forward, kicking hard from the waist. My hands cut through 

the water. 

Faster. 

I glimpsed Jan fall behind. I saw the disappointment on her face as I passed 

by. 

Pounding, thrusting arms and legs churned the water to froth. The splashing 
became a roar. The roar nearly drowned out the cheers of the kids watching from 
around the pool. 

My heart thudded so hard, I thought my chest might explode. 

My arms ached. They felt as if they each weighed a thousand pounds. 

Faster... 

I pulled up beside Dierdre. Close. So close, I could hear her gasping 
breaths. 

I glimpsed her face, tight with concentration. 

She’s just like Elliot, I decided. She wants to win so badly. 

Lots of times I let Elliot win a game. Because he cared about it so much 
more than I did. And so did Dierdre. 

As we neared the wall at the deep end, I let Dierdre pull ahead. 

I saw how much it meant to her. I saw how desperate she was to finish first. 

What the heck, I thought. There’s nothing wrong with coming in second. 

I heard the cheers ring out as Dierdre won the race. 

I touched the wall, then dipped below the surface. I pulled myself up and 
grabbed the wall. 

My entire body ached and throbbed. I gasped in breath after breath. I shut 
my eyes and pulled my hair back with both hands, squeezing the water out of it. 

My arms were so tired, I could barely pull myself out of the pool. I was one 
of the last swimmers out. 

The others had all formed a circle around Dierdre. I pushed my way into the 
crowd of girls to see what was happening. 

My eyes burned. I brushed water out of them. 

I saw the red-haired counselor hand something to Dierdre. Something gold 
and shiny. 

Everyone cheered. Then the circle broke, and the girls all headed in 
different directions. 

I made my way up to Dierdre. “Way to go!” I exclaimed. “I came close. But 
you’re really fast.” 

“I’m on the swim team at school,” she replied. She held up the gold object 

the counselor had given her. 

I could see it clearly now. A shiny gold coin. It had a smiling King Jellyjam 
engraved on it. I couldn’t read the words around the edge of the coin. But I could 
guess what they were. 

“It’s my fifth King Coin!” Dierdre declared proudly. 

Why is she so excited about it? I wondered. It wasn’t a real coin. It 
probably wasn’t even real gold! 

“What’s a King Coin?” I asked. The coin gleamed in the sunlight. 

“If I win one more King Coin, I can walk in the Winners Walk,” Dierdre 
explained. 

I started to ask what the Winners Walk was. But Jan and Ivy came running 
up to congratulate Dierdre. And the three of them all started talking at once. 

I suddenly remembered my brother. Where is Elliot? I wondered. What has 
he been doing? 

I turned away from Dierdre and the other girls and started toward the pool 
exit. But I had only taken a few steps when I heard someone calling my name. 

I spun around to see Holly jogging toward me. Her purple-lipsticked lips 
were knotted in a fretful expression. “Wendy, you’d better come with me,” the 
counselor told me. 

My heart skipped. “Huh? What’s wrong?” I asked. 

“I’m afraid there’s a problem,” Holly said softly. 

9 

Something happened to Mom and Dad! 

That’s the first thought that burst into my head. 

“What’s wrong?” I cried. “My parents! Are they okay? Are they—” 

“We haven’t found your parents yet,” Holly said. She wrapped a towel 
around my trembling shoulders. Then she led me to a bench at the side of the 
pool. 

“Is it Elliot?” I cried, dropping down beside her. “What is wrong?” 

Holly kept one arm around my shoulders. She leaned close. Her brown eyes 
stared into mine. 

“Wendy, the problem is that you didn’t really try very hard to win the race,” 
she said. 

I swallowed hard. “Excuse me?” 

“I watched you,” Holly continued. “I saw you slow your strokes in the last 
lap. I don’t think you tried your best to win.” 

“But—but—I—” I sputtered. 

Holly continued to stare at me without blinking. “Am I right?” she 
demanded softly. 

“I—I’m not used to swimming that far,” I stammered. “It was my first race. 
I didn’t think—” 

“I know you’re new at camp,” Holly said, brushing a fly off my leg. “But 
you know the camp slogan, right?” 

“For sure,” I replied. “It’s everywhere I look! But what does it mean? ‘Only 
The Best!”’ 

“I guess it’s kind of a warning,” Holly replied thoughtfully. “That’s why I 
decided to talk to you now, Wendy.” 

“A warning?” I cried. I felt more confused than ever. “A warning about 
what?” 

Holly didn’t reply. She forced a smile to her face and stood up. “Catch you 
later, okay?” 

She turned and hurried away. 

I wrapped the towel tighter around my shoulders and started back to the dorm to 

change. As I walked past the tennis courts, I thought hard about Holly’s warning. 

Why was it so important for me to win the race? 

So that I could be awarded, one of those gold coins with the blobby purple 
king on it? 

Why should I care about winning coins? Why couldn’t I just play some 
games, make new friends, and have fun? 

Why did Holly say she was giving me a warning? A warning about what? 

I shook my head, trying to shake away all these puzzling questions. I’d 
heard about sports camps from some of my friends back home. Some camps, 
they said, were really tough. The kids were all serious jock types who wanted to 
win, win, win. 

I guessed this was one of those camps. 

Oh, well, I thought, sighing. I don’t have to love this camp. Mom and Dad 
will be here soon to take Elliot and me away. 

I glanced up—and saw Elliot. 

Sprawled face down on the ground. His arms and legs spread out 
awkwardly. His eyes closed. 

Unconscious. 

10 

“Ooooh!” I let out a frightened wail. 

“Elliot! Elliot!” I dropped down beside him. 

He sat up and grinned at me. “How many times are you going to fall for 
that?” he asked. He started to laugh. 

I slugged him in the shoulder as hard as I could. “You creep!” 

That made him laugh even harder. It really cracks him up when he makes 
me look like a jerk. 

Why do I always fall for the stupid joke? Elliot pulls it on me all the time. 
And I always believe he’s been knocked out cold. 

“I’m never falling for that again. Never!” I cried. 

Elliot pulled himself to his feet. “Come watch me play Ping-Pong,” he said, 
tugging my hand. “I’m in the tournament. I’m beating this kid Jeff. He thinks 
he’s good because he puts a spin on his serve. But he’s pitiful.” 

“I can’t,” I replied. I pulled out of his grasp. “I’m dripping wet. I have to 
change.” 

“Come watch,” he insisted. “It won’t take long. I’ll beat him really fast, 
okay?” 

“Elliot—” He certainly was excited. 

“If I beat Jeff, I win a King Coin,” he announced. “Then I’m going to win 
five more. I want to win six so I can walk in the Winners Walk before Mom and 
Dad come for us.” 

“Good luck,” I mumbled, rubbing my wet hair with the towel. 

“Were you in a swim race? Did you win?” Elliot asked, tugging my hand 
again. 

“No. I came in second,” I told him. 

He snickered. “You’re a loser. Come watch me beat this kid.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Okay, okay.” 

Elliot pulled me to a row of outdoor Ping-Pong tables. They were shielded 
from the sun by a broad, white canvas awning. 

He hurried up to the table on the end. Jeff was waiting for him there, softly 
bouncing a Ping-Pong ball in the air with his paddle. 

I had pictured a little shrimpy guy that Elliot could beat easily. But Jeff was 

a big, red-faced, blond kid with bulging muscles. He had to be twice the size of 
my brother! 

I took a seat on a white wooden bench across from the tables. Elliot can’t 
beat this big guy, I thought. My poor brother is in for a major defeat. 

As they started to play, Buddy came walking over and sat down beside me. 
He flashed me a smile. “No word from your parents yet,” he said. “But we’ll 
find them.” 

We watched the Ping-Pong match. Jeff did his serve with the special spin. 
Elliot slammed it back at him. 

To my surprise, the match was really even. I think Jeff was surprised, too. 
His returns became more and more wild. And a lot of his special serves missed 
the table entirely! 

They had already played two games, Buddy told me. Jeff had won the first, 
Elliot the second. This was the third and deciding match. 

The game was a tie at sixteen, then a tie at seventeen and eighteen. 

I watched Elliot become more and more intense. He wanted desperately to 
win. He leaned stiffly over the table, gripping the paddle so tightly, his hand was 
white. 

Sweat poured off his forehead. He began ducking and dodging, groaning 
with each hit, trying to slam every ball. 

The more frantic and wild Elliot became, the calmer Jeff appeared. 

The game was a tie at nineteen. 

Elliot missed a shot and angrily slammed his paddle against the table. 

I could see that he was losing it. I’d seen this happen to my brother many 
times before. He could never win if he stayed this intense. 

As he held the ball and prepared to serve, I raised two fingers to the sides of 
my mouth and blew hard. He lowered the paddle when he heard my loud 
whistle. 

That was my signal. I’d used it many times before. It meant, “Cool it, 
Elliot. Calm down.” 

Elliot turned and gave me a quick thumbs-up. 

I saw him take a deep breath. Then another. 

My whistle signal always helped him. 

He raised the ball and served it to Jeff. Jeff sent back a weak return. Elliot 
smacked it back into the right corner. Jeff swung off balance and missed. 

Jeff served the next one. Elliot backhanded it. Very soft. The ball tipped 

over the net and dribbled several times on Jeff’s side. 

Elliot had won! 

He let out a gleeful cheer and raised his fists in victory. 

Jeff angrily heaved his paddle to the ground and stomped away. 

“Your brother is good,” Buddy said, climbing to his feet. “I like his style. 
He’s intense.” 

“For sure,” I muttered. 

Buddy hurried over to award Elliot his King Coin. “Hey, guy—you only 
need five more,” Buddy said, slapping Elliot a high five, then a low five. 

“No problem,” Elliot bragged. He held the coin up so I could see it. King 
Jellyjam smiled out at me, engraved on the coin. 

Why did the camp pick this silly little blob for a mascot? I wondered again. 
He looked like a fat hunk of pudding wearing a crown. 

“I’ve got to get changed,” I told Elliot. 

He slid the gold coin into the pocket of his shorts. “I’m going to find 
another sport!” he declared. “I want to win another King Coin before tonight!” 

I waved good-bye, then started toward the dorm. 

I had walked only a few steps when I heard a low rumbling. 

Then the ground started to shake. 

I froze. Every muscle in my body locked as the rumbling grew louder. 
“Earthquake!” I cried. 

11 

The ground shook hard. The awning over the Ping-Pong tables shook. The tables 
bounced on the ground. 

My knees buckled. I struggled to stay on my feet. 

“Earthquake!” I choked out again. 

“It’s okay!” Buddy called, running toward me. 

He was right. The rumbling sound faded quickly. The ground stopped 
shaking. 

“That happens sometimes,” Buddy explained. “It’s no problem.” 

My heart still thudded in my chest. My legs wobbled as if they were rubber 
bands. “No problem?” 

“See?” Buddy motioned around the crowded camp. “No one pays any 
attention. It lasts only a few seconds.” 

I gazed around quickly. Buddy was right again. The kids in the chess 
tournament in front of the lodge didn’t glance up from their chessboards. The 
kickball game on the field across from the pool continued without a pause. 

“It usually happens once or twice a day,” Buddy told me. 

“But what causes it?” I demanded. 

He shrugged. “Beats me.” 

“But—everything shook so hard! Isn’t it dangerous?” I asked. 

Buddy didn’t hear me. He was already jogging over to watch the kickball 
game. 

I turned and started walking to the dorm. I felt kind of shaky. I could still 
hear that strange rumbling sound in my ears. 

As I pulled open the door to the dorm, I bumped into Jan and Ivy. They 
both had changed into white tennis outfits, and they both carried tennis rackets 
over their shoulders. 

“What sports have you been playing?” 

“Did you win a King Coin?” 

“Wasn’t that a great swim race?” 

“Are you having fun, Wendy?” 

“Do you play tennis?” 

They both talked at once and shot out half a dozen questions. They seemed 
really excited. They didn’t give me a chance to answer. 

“We need more girls for the tennis tournament,” Ivy said. “We’re having a 
two-day tournament. Come to the courts after lunch, okay?” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I’m not that good, but—” 

“See you later!” Jan cried. They both hurried away. 

Actually, I am a pretty good tennis player. I have a decent serve. And I do 
all right with my two-handed backhand. 

But I’m not great. 

Back home, my friend Allison and I always play for fun. We don’t try to 
kill each other. Sometimes we just keep volleying back and forth. We don’t even 
keep score. 

I’ll enter the tennis tournament, I decided. And if I lose in the first round, 
it’s no big deal. 

Besides, I told myself, Mom and Dad will be here any minute. And Elliot 
and I will have to leave. 

Mom and Dad... their faces flashed into my mind. 

They must be frantic, I realized. They must be worried sick. I hoped they 
were okay. 

I suddenly had an idea. 

I’ll call home, I decided. I should have thought of this before. I’ll call home 
and leave a message on our answering machine. I’ll tell Mom and Dad on the 
machine where Elliot and I are. 

No matter where he goes, Dad checks for phone messages every hour. Mom 
always makes fun of him for being so nervous about missing a call. 

But they’ll both be glad to get this message! I told myself. 

What a good idea! I congratulated myself. 

Now all I needed was a phone. 

There have to be phones in the dorm, I decided. I searched the small front 
lobby. But I didn’t see any pay phones. 

No one at the front desk. No one I could ask. 

I peered down a long hallway. Rooms on both sides. No phones. 

I tried the other hallway. No pay phones there, either. 

Eager to make my call, I turned and hurried back outside. I let out a long 
sigh of relief when I spotted two pay phones beside the long white dorm 
building. 

My heart pounding, I jogged over to them. 

I picked up the phone closest to me. And I started to raise the receiver to 
ear— 

—when two strong hands grabbed me from behind. 

“Get off the phone!” a voice demanded. 

12 

“Huh?” I shrieked in surprise and dropped the phone. It spun crazily on its cord. 

I turned around. “Dierdre! You scared me to death!” I cried. 

Her green eyes flashed excitedly. “Sorry, Wendy. I just had to tell you my 
news! Look!” 

She held out her hand. I saw a stack of gold King Coins. 

“I just won my sixth coin!” Dierdre declared breathlessly. “Isn’t that 
awesome?” 

“I—I guess,” I replied uncertainly. I still couldn’t figure out why it was 
such a big deal. 

“I’ll be in the Winners Walk tonight!” Dierdre exclaimed. “I can’t believe I 
made it!” 

“That’s great,” I told her. “Congratulations.” 

“Have you won any King Coins yet?” Dierdre asked, still holding out her 
hand. 

“Uh... not yet,” I replied. 

“Well, get going!” Dierdre urged. “Show them what you’ve got, Wendy. 
Only The Best!” She flashed me a thumbs-up with her free hand. 

“Right. Only The Best,” I repeated. 

“We’ll have a party,” Dierdre continued. “In our room. Right after the 
Winners Walk. Okay? We’ll celebrate.” 

“Great!” I replied. “Maybe we can get a pizza from the mess hall or 
something.” 

“Tell Jan and Ivy,” Dierdre instructed. “Or I’ll tell them. Whoever sees 
them first! See you later!” 

She ran off, holding the six gold coins tightly in her fist. 

I realized I was smiling. Dierdre had been so excited, she’d gotten me 
excited. So excited, I forgot about my phone call. 

I have to give this camp a chance, I decided. I have to get into the spirit of 
things and start having some fun. Only The Best! I’m going to win that tennis 
tournament! 

We all ate dinner at long wooden tables in the huge mess hall inside the main 

camp lodge. The long, high-ceilinged room seemed to stretch on forever. 

Loud voices and laughter echoed off the walls over the clatter of plates and 
silverware. Everyone had a story to tell. Everyone wanted to talk about the 
games of the day. 

After dinner, the counselors led us all to the running track. I searched for 
Elliot. But I couldn’t find him in the crowd. 

It was a warm, clear night. A pale sliver of a moon floated low over the 
darkening trees. As the sun set, the sky faded from pink to purple to gray. 

When darkness fell, I saw two flickering yellow lights at the far end of the 
track, moving toward me. As they came near, I could see that they were torches, 
carried by two counselors. 

A blaring trumpet fanfare made us all grow quiet. 

I stepped closer to Jan, who stood at my side. “They sure make a big deal of 
this,” I whispered. 

“It is a big deal,” Jan replied, her eyes straight ahead as the torches 
approached. 

“Do we have any food for the party later?” I whispered. 

Jan raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhhh.” 

Several more torches had been lit. The yellow balls of light glowed like tiny 

suns. 

I heard a drumroll. Then a loud march blared from the loudspeaker, all 
trumpets and pounding drums. 

We stood in silence as the parade of torches passed by. And, then, in the 
flickering yellow light, I saw faces. The smiling faces of the kids who had won 
their sixth King Coin that day. 

I counted eight kids. Five boys and three girls. 

Their gold coins had been strung as necklaces around their necks. The coins 
caught the light of the torches and made the faces of the winners appear to glow 
as they marched by. 

Dierdre marched second in line. She seemed so happy and excited! Her 
coins jangled at her throat. Her smile never faded. 

Jan and I waved and called to her, but she marched right past. 

A counselor’s voice suddenly boomed over the loudspeaker: “Let’s hear it 
for our winners who are taking the Winners Walk tonight!” 

A deafening cheer rose up from the kids watching the parade. We all 
clapped and shouted and whistled until the winners had marched past and the 

final torches had floated out of sight. 

“Only The Best!” the voice shouted over the loudspeaker. 

“Only The Best!” we all chanted back. “Only The Best!” 

That ended the Winners Walk parade. The lights came on. We all scrambled 
toward the dorms. The boys ran in one direction, the girls in the other. 

“The torches were really cool,” I said to Jan as we followed the crowd of 
girls down the path to the dorm. 

“I only need two more King Coins,” Jan replied. 

“Maybe I can win them tomorrow. Are you playing in the softball 
tournament?” 

“No. Tennis,” I told her. 

“There are too many good tennis players,” Jan replied. “It’ll be too hard to 
win a coin. You should play softball, too.” 

“Well... maybe,” I replied. 

Ivy was already waiting for us in the room. “Where’s Dierdre?” she 
demanded as Jan and I entered. 

“We didn’t see her,” Jan replied. 

“Probably hanging out with the other winners,” I added. 

“I found two bags of tortilla chips, but I couldn’t find any salsa,” Ivy 
reported, holding up the bags. 

“Do we have anything to drink?” I asked. 

Ivy held up two cans of diet Coke. 

“Wow! Great party!” Jan exclaimed, laughing. 

“Maybe we should invite some girls in from other rooms,” I suggested. 

“No way! Then we’d have to share the Cokes!” Jan protested. 

We all laughed. 

The three of us joked and kidded around for about half an hour, waiting for 
Dierdre. We sat down on the floor and opened one of the bags of tortilla chips. 

Without realizing it, we finished off the whole bag. Then we passed around 
one of the cans of soda. 

“Where is she?” Jan demanded, glancing at her watch. 

“It’s nearly time for lights-out,” Ivy sighed. “We won’t have much time for 
a party.” 

“Maybe Dierdre forgot we were having a party,” I suggested, crinkling up 
the tortilla chip bag and tossing it toward the trash basket. 

I missed. Basketball is definitely not my sport. 

“But the party was her idea!” Ivy replied. She climbed to her feet and 
started pacing back and forth. “Where can she be? Everyone is inside by now.” 

“Let’s go find her,” I said. The words just popped out of my mouth. That 
happens to me sometimes. I get a bright idea before I know what I’m saying. 

“Yes! Let’s go!” Ivy eagerly agreed. 

“Whoa. Hold it,” Jan said, stepping in front of us, blocking our way to the 
door. “We’re not allowed. You know the rules, Ivy. We’re not allowed outside 
after ten.” 

“We’ll sneak out, find Dierdre, and sneak back in,” Ivy replied. “Come on, 
Jan. What could happen?” 

“Right. What could happen?” I chimed in. 

Jan was outnumbered. “Okay, okay. But I hope we don’t get caught,” she 
muttered. She followed Ivy and me to the door. 

“What could happen?” I asked myself, leading the way into the empty hall. 

“What could happen?” I repeated as we sneaked out the door, into the night. 

“What could happen?” 

I didn’t know it. But the answer to the question was: A LOT! 

13 

The night had grown warmer. And steamier. As I crept out the door, I felt as if I 
were stepping into a hot shower. 

A mosquito buzzed around my head. I tried to clap it between my hands. 
Missed. 

Jan, Ivy, and I edged our way around the side of the building. My shoes slid 
on the dew-wet grass. Bright spotlights shone down from the trees, lighting the 
path. 

We crept in the shadows. 

“Where should we look first?” Ivy whispered. 

“Let’s start at the lodge,” I suggested. “Maybe all of tonight’s winners are 
partying there.” 

“I don’t hear any partying,” Jan whispered. “It’s so quiet out here!” 

She was right. The only sounds I could hear were the steady chirp of 
crickets and the whisper of the warm wind through the trees. 

Keeping in the shadows, we followed the path toward the lodge. We passed 
the swimming pool, empty and silent. The water shimmered like silver under the 
bright spotlights. 

It was such a hot, wet night, I imagined myself jumping into the pool with 
all of my clothes on. 

But we were on a mission: To find Dierdre. No time to think about late- 
night swims. 

Staying close together, we passed the row of Ping-Pong tables. They made 
me think of Elliot. I wondered what he was doing. Probably tucked into bed. 

Like any sensible person. 

We were approaching the first row of tennis courts when Ivy suddenly cried 
out, “Whoa! Get back!” She grabbed me and shoved me hard against the fence. 

I heard soft footsteps on the path. Someone humming. 

The three of us held our breath as a counselor walked past. He had curly 
black hair and wore dark blue sunglasses even though it was night. He wore the 
white T-shirt and white shorts that made up the counselor’s uniform. 

We pressed our backs against the tennis court fence. “That’s Billy,” Jan 
whispered. “He’s kind of cute. He’s always so happy.” 

“He won’t be too happy if he catches us,” Ivy whispered. “We’ll be in 
major trouble.” 

Humming to himself, snapping his fingers, Billy walked past us. The path 
curved around the other side of the tennis courts. I watched him until he 
disappeared. 

I took a deep breath. I hadn’t been breathing the whole time! 

“Where’s he going?” Ivy wondered. 

“Maybe he’s going to the party at the lodge,” I suggested. 

“Why don’t we ask him?” Jan joked. 

“For sure,” I muttered. 

We checked out the path in both directions. Then we started walking again. 

We made our way past the tennis courts. The spotlights in the trees cast 
long shadows across the path. The shadows shifted and moved as the tree limbs 
bobbed in the wind. They looked like dark creatures crawling and slithering over 
the ground. 

Despite the heat of the night, I shivered. 

It was kind of creepy walking over these moving shadows. I had the feeling 
one of them might reach up, grab me, and pull me down. 

Weird thought, huh? 

I turned back in time to see the lights in the dorm windows start to go out. 
Lights-out. 

I tapped Jan on the shoulder. She turned and watched the dorm, too. As the 
lights all went out, the building seemed to disappear in front of our eyes. It faded 
into the black of the night sky. 

“M-maybe this wasn’t such a good idea,” I whispered. 

Ivy didn’t reply. She bit her lower lip. Her eyes were darting around the 
darkness. 

Jan laughed. “Don’t wimp out now,” she scolded. “We’re almost to the 
lodge.” 

We cut through the soccer field. The main lodge stood on a low, sloping 
hill, hidden by wide, old maple and sassafras trees. 

We didn’t have to climb very far up the hill to see that the lodge was as dark 
as the dorm. 

“No party up there,” I whispered. 

Ivy sighed, disappointed. “Well, where could Dierdre be?” 

“We could try the boys’ dorm!” I joked. 

They both laughed. 

Our laughter was cut short by a loud fluttering sound, very close by. 

“What’s that?” Ivy cried. 

“Ohhh!” I let out a low moan as I raised my eyes and saw them. 

The sky was thick with bats. Dozens of black bats. 

Fluttering over the spotlights in the old trees. And, then—swooping down 
to get us! 

14 

I couldn’t help myself. I let out a scream. Then I shielded my face with both 
hands. 

I heard Jan and Ivy gasp. 

The fluttering grew louder. Closer. 

I could feel the bats’ hot breath on the back of my neck. Then I could feel 
them clawing at my hair, tearing at my face. 

I’ve got a real good imagination when it comes to bats. 

“Wendy, it’s okay,” Jan whispered. She tugged my hands from my face. She 
pointed. “Look.” 

I followed her gaze up to the fluttering black wings. The bats were 
swooping low. But they weren’t swooping at us. They were swooping down and 
landing on the swimming pool at the bottom of the hill. 

In the bright spotlights, I could see them dart into the water—for less than a 
second. Then sweep back up to the sky. 

“I—I don’t like bats,” I whispered. 

“Neither do I,” Ivy confessed. “I know they’re supposed to be good. I know 
they eat insects and stuff. But I still think they’re creepy.” 

“Well, they won’t bother us,” Jan said. “They’re just taking a drink.” She 
gave Ivy and me a push to get us started down the hill. 

We were lucky. Nobody had heard me scream. But we had walked only a 
few steps when we spotted another counselor coming down the path. I 
recognized her. She had straight white-blond hair that tumbled down to her waist 
from under a blue baseball cap. 

Without making a sound, all three of us dove behind a tall evergreen shrub 
and crouched down. 

Did she see us? 

I held my breath again. 

She kept walking. 

“Where are these counselors going?” Ivy whispered. 

“Let’s follow her,” I suggested. 

“Stay far back,” Jan instructed. 

We slowly climbed back to our feet. And stepped out from behind the 

shrub. 

And stopped when we heard the low, rumbling sound. 

As the rumbling grew louder, the ground began to shake. 

I caught the frightened expressions on my two friends’ faces. Ivy and Jan 
were just as scared as I was. 

The ground shook harder, so hard that we dropped to our knees. I leaned on 
all fours, holding on to the grass. The ground trembled and shook. The rumbling 
became a roar. 

I shut my eyes. 

The sound slowly faded. 

The ground gave a final tremble, then remained still. 

I opened my eyes and turned to Ivy and Jan. They started to stand. Slowly. 

“I hate when that happens!” Jan muttered. 

“What is it?” I whispered. I stood up on shaky legs. 

“Nobody knows,” Jan replied, brushing grass stains off her knees. “It just 
happens. A few times a day.” 

“I think we should give up on Dierdre,” Ivy said quietly. “I want to go back. 
To the dorm.” 

“Yeah. I’m with you,” I replied wearily. “We can have our celebration with 
Dierdre tomorrow.” 

“She can tell us all about where she was tonight and what she did,” Jan 

said. 

“This was a crazy idea,” I muttered. 

“It was your idea!” Jan exclaimed. 

“Most of my ideas are crazy!” I replied. 

Hiding in the shadows, we made our way down to the path. I gazed toward 
the pool. The bats had disappeared. Maybe the rumbling sound had scared them 
back into the woods. 

The crickets had stopped chirping. The air remained hot, but silent and still. 

The only sound was the scrape of our sneakers on the soft dirt path. 

And, then—before we could move or hide—we heard someone else’s 
footsteps. 

Rapid footsteps. Running hard. Running toward us. 

I stopped short when I heard a girl’s desperate cry. “Help me! Please— 
somebody! Help me!” 

15 

A hot gust of wind shook the trees, making their eerie dark shadows dance. 

I leaped back, startled by the girl’s terrified cries. 

“Help me! Please—!” 

She came running around from the side of the tennis courts. She wore tight 
blue short-shorts and a magenta midriff top. 

Her arms were stretched out in front of her. Her long hair flew wildly 
behind her head. 

I recognized her as soon as she burst into view. 

The little red-haired girl with all the freckles. The one who had hidden in 
the woods and warned Elliot and me not to come into the camp. 

“Help me!” 

She ran right into me, sobbing hard. I threw my arms around her tiny 
shoulders and held her. “You’re okay,” I whispered. “You’re okay.” 

“No!” she shrieked. She tugged away from me. 

“What’s wrong?” Jan demanded. “Why are you out here?” 

“Why aren’t you in bed?” Ivy added, stepping up beside me. 

The little girl didn’t answer. Her entire body trembled. 

She grabbed my hand and pulled me behind the bushes beside the path. Jan 
and Ivy followed. 

“I’m not okay,” she started, wiping the tears off her freckled cheeks with 
both hands. “I’m not. I—I—” 

“What’s your name?” Jan asked in a whisper. 

“Why are you out here?” Ivy repeated. 

I heard the flutter of bat wings again, low overhead. But I stared at the little 
girl and forced myself to ignore them. 

“My name—it’s Alicia,” the girl replied, sobbing. “We’ve got to go. Fast!” 

“Huh?” I cried. “Take a deep breath, Alicia. You’re okay. Really.” 

“No!” she cried again, shaking her head. 

“You’re safe now. You’re with us,” I insisted. 

“We’re not safe,” she cried. “No one. No one here. I tried to warn people. I 
tried to tell you...” Her words were cut off once again by her loud sobs. 

“What is it?” Ivy demanded. 

“What did you try to warn us about?” Jan asked, leaning down to the crying 

girl. 

“I—I saw something terrible !” Alicia stammered. “I—” 

“What did you see?” I asked impatiently. 

“I followed them,” Alicia replied. “And I saw it. Something horrible. I—I 
can’t talk about it. We just have to run. We have to tell the others. Everyone. We 
have to run. We have to get away from here!” 

She let out a long breath. Her entire body trembled again. 

“But why do we have to run?” I asked, placing my hands gently on her 
shoulders. 

I felt so bad. I wanted to calm her. I wanted to tell her that everything would 
be okay. But I didn’t know how to convince her. 

What had she seen? What had frightened her so much? 

Had she had a bad dream? 

“We have to go now!” she repeated shrilly. Her red hair was matted to her 
face by her tears. She grabbed my arm and pulled hard. “Hurry! We’ve got to 
mn! I saw it!” 

“Saw what?” I cried. 

Alicia had no time to reply. 

A dark-haired counselor stepped up in front of the bushes. “Caught you!” 
he cried. 

16 

I froze. My entire body went cold. 

The counselor’s dark eyes flashed in the light of a spotlight. “What are you 
doing out here?” he demanded. 

I sucked in a deep breath and started to answer. 

But another voice replied before I could. “Kind of nosy, aren’t you?” It was 
another counselor. A woman with short, black hair. 

Breathing hard, trying not to make a sound, I ducked lower behind the 
bushes. My two friends dropped to their knees. 

“You aren’t following me—are you?” the first counselor teased. 

“Why would I follow you? Maybe you’re following me!” the woman teased 
back. 

They didn’t see us, I realized happily. We were two feet away from them. 
But they didn’t see us behind the bushes. 

A few seconds later, the two counselors strolled off together. My friends 
and I waited a long while, listening hard until we could no longer hear their 
voices. Then we climbed slowly to our feet. 

“Alicia?” I asked. “Are you okay?” 

“Alicia?” Ivy and Jan cried. 

The little girl had vanished. 

We sneaked back into the dorm through a side door. Luckily, there were no 
counselors patrolling the halls. No one in sight. 

“Dierdre—are you back?” Jan called as we stepped into our room. 

No reply. 

I clicked on the light. Dierdre’s bunk remained empty. 

“Better turn off the light,” Ivy warned. “It’s after lights-out.” 

I clicked the light back off. Then I stumbled toward my bunk, waiting for 
my eyes to adjust to the darkness. 

“Where is Dierdre?” Ivy asked. “I’m a little worried about her. Maybe we 
should tell a counselor that she’s missing.” 

“What counselor?” Jan asked, slumping onto her bed. “There’s no one 
around. The counselors are all out somewhere.” 

“I’m sure she’s partying somewhere and forgot all about us,” I said, 
yawning. I bent to pull down the covers on my bed. 

“What do you think that little girl saw?” Ivy asked, peering out the window. 

“Alicia? I think she had a bad dream,” I replied. 

“But she was so frightened!” Jan said, shaking her head. “And what was 
she doing outside?” 

“And why did she run away from us like that?” Ivy added. 

“Weird,” I mumbled. 

“Weird is right,” Jan agreed. Weird is the word of the night. She made her 
way to the dresser. “I’m getting changed for bed. Big day tomorrow. I’ve got to 
win two more King Coins.” 

“Me, too,” Ivy said, yawning. 

Jan pulled out a dresser drawer. “Oh, no!” she shrieked. “No! I don’t 
believe it!” 

17 

“Jan—what is it?” I cried. 

Ivy and I tore across the room to the dresser. 

Jan continued to stare down into the open drawer. “It’s so dark,” she said. “I 
opened Dierdre’s drawer by mistake. And—and—it’s empty !” 

“Huh?” Ivy and I both uttered our surprise. 

Squinting through the dim gray light, I studied the dresser drawer. Totally 
empty. “Check the closet,” I suggested. 

Ivy crossed the room in three or four quick strides. She pulled open the 
closet door. 

“Dierdre’s stuff—it’s all gone!” Ivy declared. 

“Weird,” I muttered. It was still the word of the night. 

“Why would she move out and not tell us?” Jan demanded. 

“Where did she go?” Ivy added. 

Good question, I thought, staring at the empty closet. 

Where did Dierdre go? 

* * * 

Breakfast was the noisiest meal of the day. Spoons clattered against cereal 
bowls. Orange juice pitchers banged on the long wooden tables. 

Voices rang out as if someone had turned up the volume all the way. 
Everyone talked excitedly about the sports they planned to play today, the games 
they planned to win. 

I had taken the last shower. So Jan and Ivy were already eating breakfast 
when I made my way into the mess hall. 

As I pushed through the narrow aisle between the tables, I searched for 
Dierdre. No sign of her. 

I hadn’t slept very well, even though I was really tired. I kept thinking 
about Dierdre—and about Alicia. And I kept wondering what was taking Mom 
and Dad so long to get in touch with us. 

I spotted Elliot at the end of a table filled with boys about his age. He had a 
stack of waffles in front of him, and he was pouring dark syrup over them. 

“Elliot—what’s up?” I called, squeezing through the aisle to get over to 

him. 

My brother didn’t bother saying good morning. “I’ve got a one-on-one 
tournament this morning,” he reported excitedly. “I could win my third King 
Coin!” 

“Thrills and chills,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “You haven’t heard anything 
about Mom and Dad, have you?” 

He stared at me as if he didn’t remember who they were. Then he shook his 
head. “Not yet. Isn’t this a great camp? Did we luck out, or what?” 

I didn’t reply. My eyes were on the next table. I thought I had spotted 
Dierdre. But it was just another girl with streaky blond hair. 

“Have you won any coins yet?” Elliot asked. He had a mouth full of waffle. 
Syrup dripped down his chin. 

“Not yet,” I replied. 

He snickered. “They should change the camp slogan for you, Wendy. Only 
The Worst!” 

Elliot laughed. The other boys at the table laughed, too. 

As I said, Elliot really cracks himself up. 

I wasn’t in the mood for his lame jokes. My mind was still on Dierdre. 
“Catch you later,” I said. 

I squeezed past the table and headed toward the girls’ side of the room. 
Cheers and laughter rang out at a table near the wall. A scrambled-egg tossing 
battle had broken out. Three counselors rushed to stop it. 

Jan and Ivy’s table was full. I found an empty space at the next table. I 
poured myself a glass of juice and a bowl of cornflakes. But I didn’t feel too 
hungry. 

“Hey—!” I called out when I saw Buddy walk by. He didn’t hear me over 
the noise, so I jumped up and ran after him. 

“Hi. What’s up?” He greeted me with a smile. 

His blond hair was still wet from the shower. He smelled kind of flowery. 
Aftershave, I guessed. 

“Do you know where Dierdre went?” I demanded. 

He narrowed his eyes in surprise. “Dierdre?” 

“A girl in my dorm room,” I explained. “She didn’t come back to the room 
last night. Her closet is empty.” 

“Dierdre,” he repeated, thinking hard. He raised his clipboard to his face 

and ran his finger down it slowly. “Oh, yeah. She’s gone.” His cheeks turned 
bright pink. 

“Excuse me?” I stared up at him. “Dierdre is gone? Where did she go? 
Home?” 

He studied the sheet on his clipboard. “I guess. It just says she’s gone.” His 
cheeks darkened from pink to red. 

“That’s so weird,” I told him. “She didn’t say good-bye or anything.” 

Buddy shrugged. A smile spread over his face. “Have a nice day!” 

He started toward the counselors’ table at the front of the huge room. But I 
ran after him. I grabbed his arm. 

“Buddy, one more question,” I said. “Do you know where I can find a little 
girl named Alicia?” 

Buddy waved to some boys across the room. “Go get ’em, guys! Only The 
Best!” he shouted to them. Then he turned back to me. “Alicia?” 

“I don’t know her last name. She’s probably six or seven,” I told him. “She 
has beautiful, long red hair and a face full of freckles.” 

“Alicia...” He chewed his bottom lip. Then he raised the clipboard again. 

I watched as he ran his finger down the list of names. When his finger 
stopped, his cheeks turned pink again. 

“Oh, yeah. Alicia,” he said, lowering the clipboard. He grinned at me. A 
strange grin. A chilling grin. “She’s gone, too.” 

18 

“Jan! Ivy!” I saw them hurrying from the mess hall, and I chased after them. 
“We’ve got to talk!” I cried breathlessly. 

“We can’t. We’re late.” Jan straightened her bangs with one hand. “If we 
don’t get to the volleyball nets in time, we can’t be in the tournament.” 

“But it’s important !” I called as they jogged to the doors. 

They didn’t seem to hear me. I watched them disappear into the morning 
sunlight. 

My heart pounded in my chest. I suddenly felt cold all over. 

I caught up with my brother, who was playfully boxing a tall, skinny boy 
with short blond hair. “Elliot—come here,” I instructed. “Just for a minute.” 

“I can’t,” he called. “Remember? My one-on-one contest?” 

The tall, skinny boy hurried out the door. I stepped in front of Elliot, 
blocking his path. 

“Give me a break!” he cried. “I don’t want to be late. I’m going against Jeff. 
Remember him? I can beat him. He’s big, but he’s real slow.” 

“Elliot, something strange is going on here,” I said, backing him against the 
wall. Kids were staring at us as they made their way outside. But I didn’t care. 

“You’re the only one who’s strange!” Elliot shot back. “Are you going to let 
me go to the basketball court or not?” 

He started to push past me. I pinned his shoulders to the wall with both 
hands. 

“Just give me one second!” I insisted. “There’s something wrong with this 
camp, Elliot.” I let go of him. 

“You mean the rumbling noises?” he asked, brushing back his dark hair 
with one hand. “That’s just gas under the ground or something. A counselor 
explained it to me.” 

“That’s not what I’m talking about,” I replied. “Kids are disappearing.” 

He laughed. “Invisible kids? You mean like a magic trick?” 

“Stop making fun of me!” I snapped. “It isn’t funny, Elliot. Kids are 
disappearing. Dierdre from my dorm room? She was in the Winners Walk last 
night. Then she didn’t come back to the room.” 

Elliot’s grin faded. 

“This morning, Buddy told me she was gone,” I continued. I snapped my 
fingers. “Just like that. And a little girl named Alicia—she disappeared, too.” 

Elliot’s brown eyes studied me. “Kids have to go home sometime ,” he 
insisted. “What’s the big deal?” 

“And what about Mom and Dad?” I demanded. “They couldn’t have driven 
very far before they realized the trailer had come loose. Why haven’t they found 
us? Why hasn’t the camp found them?” 

Elliot shrugged. “Beats me,” he replied casually. He dodged past me and 
started to the door. “Wendy, you’re just unhappy because you stink at sports. But 
I’m having a great time here. Don’t mess it up for me—okay?” 

“But—but—Elliot—!” I sputtered. 

Shaking his head, he pushed the door open with both hands and escaped 
into the sunlight. 

I balled both hands into tight fists. I really wanted to pound him. Why 
wouldn’t he listen to me? Couldn’t he see how upset and frightened I was? 

Elliot is the kind of kid who never worries about anything. Everything 
always seems to go his way. So why should he sweat it? 

But you’d think he’d be just a little worried about Mom and Dad. 

Mom and Dad... 

I had a heavy feeling in my stomach as I made my way slowly out the door. 
Had they been in a car accident or something? Is that why they hadn’t found 
Elliot and me yet? 

No. Stop making things worse, I scolded myself. Don’t let your imagination 
mn away with you, Wendy. 

I suddenly remembered my plan to call home. Yes, I decided, I will do that 
right now. I will call home and leave a message for Mom and Dad on the 
answering machine. 

I stopped in the middle of the path and searched for a pay phone. A group 
of girls carrying hockey sticks passed by. I heard a long whistle coming from the 
pool across from the tennis courts. Then I heard the splash of kids diving into the 
water. 

Everyone is having fun, I thought—except me. 

I decided to make the call, then find a sport to play. Something to take my 
mind off all my crazy worries. 

I returned to the row of blue and white pay phones at the side of the lodge. I 
ran full speed and picked up the nearest phone. 

I raised the receiver to my ear and started to punch in our number. 
Then I cried out in surprise. 

19 

“Hi there, Camper!” boomed a cheerful, deep voice. “Have a wonderful day at 
camp. This is King Jellyjam greeting you. Work hard. Play hard. And win. And 
always remember—Only The Best! ” 

“Oh, no!” I cried. “A stupid message—!” 

“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day —” The tape started to repeat in 
my ear. 

I slammed the receiver down and picked up the next phone. 

“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day at camp.” The same jolly, 
booming voice. The same recorded message. 

I tried every phone in the row. They all played the same message. None of 
the phones were real. 

Where are the real phones? I wondered. There have to be phones that 
actually work. 

I turned away from the lodge and wandered down the dirt path. As I passed 
the bushes where Jan, Ivy, and I had hid last night, I felt a chill. And thought 
about Alicia. 

Bright sunlight washed over the sloping, grassy hill. I shielded my eyes and 
watched a black-and-gold monarch butterfly. It fluttered toward a patch of red 
and pink geraniums. 

I walked aimlessly, searching for a telephone. All around, kids were 
shouting, laughing, playing hard. I didn’t really hear them. I was deep into my 
own troubled thoughts. 

“Hey! Hey! Hey!” 

My brother’s voice startled me into stopping. I blinked several times, 
struggling to focus. 

I saw that I had wandered down to the basketball court. Elliot and Jeff were 
having their one-on-one basketball competition. 

Jeff dribbled the ball. It thudded loudly on the asphalt court. My brother 
waved both arms in Jeff’s face. Made a grab for the ball. 

Missed. 

Jeff lowered his shoulder. Bumped Elliot out of the way. Dribbled to the 
basket—and shot. 

“Two points!” he cried, grinning. 

Elliot scowled and shook his head. “You fouled me.” 

Jeff pretended not to hear. He was twice as big as Elliot. A big hulk. He 
could push Elliot all over the court, if he wanted to. 

Whatever made Elliot think he could win? 

“What’s the score?” Jeff demanded, wiping sweat off his forehead with the 
back of one hand. 

“Eighteen to ten,” Elliot reported unhappily. I didn’t need twenty guesses to 
figure out that my brother was losing. 

The basketball court was closed off by a mesh-wire fence. I grabbed the 
fence with both hands, pressed my face up against it, and watched. 

Elliot dribbled, moving back, back, giving himself some space. Jeff moved 
with him, leaning forward, adjusting his basketball shorts with one hand as he 
moved. 

Suddenly, Elliot burst forward, his eyes on the basket. He started his jump, 
raised his right hand to shoot—and Jeff grabbed the ball away. 

Elliot jumped and shot nothing but air. 

Jeff dribbled twice. Put up a two-handed layup. 

Swish. The score was twenty to ten. 

Jeff won the game a few seconds later. He let out a cheer and slapped Elliot 
a high five. 

Elliot frowned and shook his head. “Lucky shots,” he muttered. 

“Yeah. For sure,” Jeff replied, using the front of his sleeveless blue T-shirt 
to mop his sweating face. “Hey, congratulate me, man. You’re my sixth victim!” 

“Huh?” Elliot stared at him, hands pressed against his knees, struggling to 
catch his breath. “You mean—?” 

“Yeah.” Jeff grinned. “My sixth King Coin. I get to march in the Winners 
Walk tonight!” 

“Wow. That’s cool,” Elliot replied without enthusiasm. “I still have three 
coins to go.” 

I had the sudden feeling that I was being watched. I let go of the wire fence 
and took a step back. 

Buddy had been staring at me from the path. His eyes were narrowed, and 
his mouth was set in a stern, unhappy expression. 

How long had he been standing there? 

Why did he look so unhappy? His grim expression gave me a chill. 

As I turned to him, he stepped forward. His blue eyes stared hard into mine. 
“I’m sorry, Wendy,” the counselor said softly. “But you have to go.” 

20 

“Excuse me?” I gaped at him. My mouth dropped open. 

What was he saying? Where did I have to go? 

Did he mean I had to go —like Dierdre and Alicia? 

“You have to go find a sport,” Buddy repeated, still speaking softly. His 
solemn expression didn’t change. “You can’t stand around watching other kids 
play. King Jellyjam would never approve of that.” 

I’d like to step on that ugly little blob! I thought angrily. What a stupid 
name. King Jellyjam. Yuck! 

Buddy had just scared me to death. Was he trying to frighten me? I 
wondered. 

No, I quickly decided. Buddy doesn’t know that I’m upset about things. 
How could he know? 

Buddy hurried on to the basketball court. He slapped Jeff on the back and 
handed him a gold King Coin. “Way to go, guy!” he cried, flashing Jeff a 
thumbs-up. “I’ll see you in the Winners Walk tonight. Only The Best!” 

Buddy said a few words to my brother. Elliot shrugged a few times. Then 
he said something that made Buddy laugh. I couldn’t hear their words. 

When Elliot trotted off to find his next sport, Buddy strode quickly back to 
me. He put an arm around my shoulders and guided me away from the 
basketball court. 

“I guess you’re just not a self-starter, Wendy,” he said. 

“I guess,” I replied. What was I supposed to say? 

“Well, I’m going to give you a schedule for today. See if you like it,” 
Buddy said. “First, I have a tennis match fined up for you. You play tennis, 
right?” 

“A little,” I told him. “I’m not that great, but—” 

“After tennis, come down to the softball diamond, okay?” Buddy 
continued. “We’ll get you on one of the softball teams.” 

He flashed me a warm smile. “I think you’ll have a lot more fun if you join 
in—don’t you?” 

“Yeah. Probably,” I replied. I wanted to sound more enthusiastic. But I just 
couldn’t. 

Buddy led me onto one of the back tennis courts. An African-American girl 
about my age was warming up by hitting a tennis ball against a backboard. 

She turned and greeted me as I approached. “How’s it going?” 

“Fine,” I replied. We introduced ourselves. 

Her name was Rose. She was tall and pretty. She wore a purple tank top 
over black shorts. I saw a silver ring dangling from one ear. 

Buddy handed me a racket. “Have fun,” he said. “And watch out, Wendy. 
Rose already has five King Coins!” 

“Are you a good tennis player?” I asked, twirling the racket in my hand. 

Rose nodded. “Yeah. Pretty good. How about you?” 

“I don’t know,” I told her honestly. “My friend and I always play just for 

fun.” 

Rose laughed. She had a deep, throaty laugh that I liked. It made me want 
to laugh, too. “I never play for fun!” she declared. 

She told the truth. 

We volleyed back and forth for a while, to get warmed up. Rose leaned 
forward, tensed her body, narrowed her dark eyes—then started slamming the 
ball back at me as if we were playing the final set of a championship! 

She played even harder once we started our match. 

I found out very quickly that I was no match for her. I was lucky to return a 
few of her serves! 

Rose was a good sport about it. I caught her snickering a few times at my 
two-handed backhand. But she didn’t make fun of my pitiful game. And she 
gave me some really helpful tips as the match continued. 

She won in straight sets. 

I congratulated her. She seemed really excited about winning her sixth King 
Coin. 

A woman counselor I hadn’t seen before appeared on the court and 
presented the coin to Rose. “See you at the Winners Walk tonight,” she said, 
grinning. 

Then the counselor turned to me. “The softball diamond is right over that 
hill, Wendy.” She pointed. 

I thanked her and began walking in that direction. “Don’t walk—run!” she 
called. “Let’s see some spirit! Only The Best!” 

I let out an unhappy groan. I don’t think she heard me. Then I obediently 
started to run. 

Why was everyone always rushing me around here? I complained silently. 
Why can’t I go lie down by the pool and work on my tan? 

As the softball diamond came into view, I started to cheer up a little. I 
actually like softball. I’m not much of a fielder. But I’m a pretty good slugger. 

The teams, I saw, had boys and girls on them. 

I recognized two of the girls from my breakfast table this morning. 

One of them tossed me a bat. “Hi. I’m Ronni. You can be on our team,” she 
said. “Can you pitch?” 

“I guess,” I replied, wrapping my hands around the bat. “Sometimes I pitch 
after school on the playground.” 

She nodded. “Okay. You can pitch the first couple of innings.” 

Ronni called the other kids together and we huddled. We went around the 
circle, giving our names. Then the kids who didn’t have fielding positions chose 
their spots. 

“If we win, do we all get King Coins?” a boy with a fake tattoo of an eagle 
on his shoulder asked. 

“Yes. All of us,” Ronni told him. 

Everyone cheered. 

“Don’t start cheering yet. We’ve got to win first!” Ronni exclaimed. 

She went around the circle, giving the batting order. Since I was the pitcher, 
I batted ninth. 

But since I had a bat, I decided to take a few practice swings. I stepped 
away from the others, behind the third base line. 

Easing my hands up on the bat, I took a soft swing. I like to choke up pretty 
high. I’m not very strong, and it gives me a harder swing. 

The bat felt pretty good. I took a few more soft swings. 

Then I pulled it behind my shoulder—and swung as hard as I could. 

I didn’t see Buddy standing there. 

The bat smacked him hard in the chest. 

It made a sickening thocccck as it crashed into his ribs. 

I let the bat fall from my hands. Then I staggered back. Stunned. Horrified. 

21 

Buddy’s smile faded. He narrowed his blue eyes at me. 

He raised a hand and pointed a finger at me. 

“I like the way you choke up,” he said. “But maybe we could find you a 
lighter bat.” 

“Huh?” My mouth hung open. I couldn’t move. I stood there, gaping at 
him. “Buddy—?” 

He picked up the bat from the ground. “Does it feel comfortable? Let me 
see you swing again, Wendy.” He handed the bat to me. 

My hands trembled as I took it from him. I kept my eyes on him. Waited for 
him to cry out. To grab his chest and collapse in a heap on the ground. 

“Some of the aluminum bats are lighter,” he said. He brushed back his 
blond hair with one hand. “Go ahead. Swing again.” 

I took a few shaky steps away from him. I wanted to make sure I didn’t hit 
him again. Then I choked up on the bat and swung. 

“How is it?” he asked. 

“F-fine,” I stammered. 

He flashed me a thumbs-up and went to talk to Ronni. 

Whoa! I thought. What is the story here? 

I swung that bat into his chest, hard enough to break a few ribs. Or at least 
knock his breath out. 

But Buddy didn’t even seem to notice! 

What is the story here? 

I told Jan and Ivy about it at dinner. 

Jan snickered. “I guess your swing isn’t as hard as you think.” 

“But it made a horrible sound! Like eggs breaking or something!” I 
exclaimed. “And he just went on smiling and talking.” 

“He probably waited until he was out of sight. Then he screamed his head 
off!” Ivy suggested. 

I forced myself to laugh along with my two friends. But I didn’t feel like 
laughing. 

It was all too strange. 

I mean, no one could take a blow like that right in the chest and not even 
say “Ouch!” 

Our team lost by ten points. But after that thocccck, who could think about 
the game? 

I glanced across the room to the counselors’ table. Buddy sat at one end, 
talking and laughing with Holly. He seemed perfectly okay. 

I kept glancing at him all through dinner. Again and again, I heard the 
sickening thocccck the bat made as it smashed into his chest. I just couldn’t get it 
out of my mind. 

I kept thinking about it as we trooped out to the track after dinner for the 
Winners Walk. It was a windy night. The torches flickered and nearly went out. 

The trees around the track shivered and bent. Their branches seemed to 
reach down for the ground. 

The marching music started, and the winners paraded by. Rose waved to me 
as she passed. I saw Jeff walking proudly near the back of the line, his gold coins 
jangling around his neck. 

After the ceremony, I hurried back to the room and climbed into bed. Too 
many troubling thoughts whirred around in my brain. I wanted to go to sleep and 
shut them out. 

The next morning at breakfast, Rose and Jeff were gone. 

22 

I searched for Rose and Jeff. And I searched for my brother all morning. I knew 
he’d be playing hard at one of the sports. But I walked from the soccer field at 
one end of the camp to the driving range at the other end, and I didn’t see him. 

Had Elliot disappeared, too? 

The frightening thought kept tugging at my mind. 

We’ve got to get out of this camp! 

I kept repeating those words to myself as I made my way along the 
crisscrossing dirt paths. 

King Jellyjam, the little purple blob, grinned at me from the signs posted 
everywhere. Even his cartoon smile gave me the creeps. 

Something was terribly wrong at King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp. And the 
more I walked, my eyes searching every face for my brother, the more frightened 
I became. 

Buddy caught up to me after lunch. He led me back to the Softball 
diamond. “Wendy, you can’t leave your team,” he said sternly. “Forget 
yesterday. You still have a chance. If you win today, you guys all win King 
Coins.” 

I didn’t want any King Coins. I wanted to see my parents. I wanted to see 
my brother. And I wanted to get out of there! 

I didn’t pitch today. I played left field, which gave me plenty of time to 
think. 

I planned our escape. 

It won’t be that hard, I decided. Elliot and I will sneak out after dinner when 
everyone is watching the Winners Walk. We’ll make our way down the hill, back 
to the highway. Then we’ll walk or hitchhike to the nearest town with a police 
station. 

I knew the police would find Mom and Dad for us easily. 

A simple plan, right? Now all I had to do was find Elliot. 

Our team lost the game seven to nine. 

I grounded out to end the game. The other kids were disappointed that the 
team lost, but I didn’t really care. 

I still hadn’t won a single King Coin. As we trotted toward our dorms, I saw 
Buddy watching me. He had a fretful expression on his face. 

“Wendy—what’s your next sport?” he called to me. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him and trotted away. 

My next sport is running, I thought unhappily. Running away from this 
horrible place. 

The ground began to rumble and shake as I passed the main lodge. This 
time, I ignored it and kept walking to the dorm. 

I didn’t find Elliot until after dinner. I saw him heading out the mess-hall door 
with two buddies. They were laughing, talking loudly, and bumping each other 
with their chests as they walked. 

“Elliot!” I called, chasing after him. “Hey, Elliot—wait up!” 

He turned away from his two friends. “Oh. Hi,” he said. “How’s it going?” 
“Did you forget you have a sister?” I demanded angrily. 

He narrowed his eyes at me. “Excuse me?” 

“Where have you been?” I asked. 

A grin spread over his face. “Winning these,” he said. He raised the chain 
around his neck to show off the gold King Coins he was wearing. “I’ve got five.” 
“Awesome,” I said sarcastically. “Elliot—we’ve got to get out of here!” 
“Huh? Get out?” He twisted up his face, confused. 

“Yes,” I insisted. “We have to get away from this camp—tonight!” 

“I can’t,” Elliot replied. “No way.” 

Kids pushed past us, on their way to watch the Winners Walk. I followed 
Elliot out the mess-hall door. Then I pulled him off the path, onto the grass at the 
side of the building. 

“You can’t leave? Why not?” I demanded. 

“Not till I win my sixth coin,” he said. He jangled the coin necklace in my 

face. 

“Elliot—this place is dangerous!” I cried. “And Mom and Dad must be—” 
“You’re just jealous,” he interrupted. He jangled the coins again. “You 
haven’t won any—have you!” 

I balled my hands into fists. I wanted to strangle him. I really did. 

He was such a competitive jerk. He always had to win everything. 

I took a deep breath and tried to speak calmly. “Elliot, aren’t you at all 
worried about Mom and Dad?” 

He lowered his eyes for a moment. “A little.” 

“Well, we have to get out of here and find them!” I declared. 

“Tomorrow,” he replied. “After the track meet in the morning. After I win 
my sixth coin.” 

I opened my mouth to argue with him. But what was the point? 

I knew how stubborn my brother can be. If he wanted to win that sixth coin, 
he wouldn’t leave till he won it. 

I couldn’t argue with him. And I couldn’t drag him away. “Right after the 
track meet tomorrow morning,” I told him, “we’re out of here! Whether you win 
or lose. Agreed?” 

He thought about it. “Okay. Agreed,” he said finally. Then he trotted off to 
find his friends. 

Four kids marched in the Winners Walk. As I watched from the sidelines, I 
thought about the kids I knew who had marched before. 

Dierdre. Rose. Jeff... 

Had they all gone home? Were they picked up by their parents? Were they 
back home now safe and sound? 

Maybe I’m frightening myself for no reason, I thought. 

Everyone else in camp seems to be having a great time. Why am I the only 
worrier? 

And then I remembered that I wasn ’t the only worrier. 

Alicia’s tear-stained face floated into my mind. 

What had Alicia seen that had frightened her so much? Why was she 
desperately trying to warn us to get away? 

I’ll probably never find out, I told myself. 

When the Winners Walk ceremony ended, I didn’t feel like going back to 
the dorm. I knew I couldn’t get to sleep. Too many thoughts troubled my mind. 

As the other kids made their way to their rooms, I ducked into the deep 
shadows. Then I sneaked along the path to the sloping hill that led up to the main 
lodge. 

Hiding behind a wide evergreen shrub, I dropped down onto the grass. It 
was a cool, cloudy night. The air felt heavy and damp. 

I raised my eyes to the sky. Clouds covered the stars and the moon. Far in 
the distance, I could see tiny red lights moving slowly against the blackness. An 
airplane. I wondered where it was headed. 

Crickets began to chirp. The wind rustled my hair. 

I gazed up at the starless sky. Trying to relax. Trying to calm myself down. 

After a few minutes, I heard voices. Footsteps. 

I pulled myself up to my knees and ducked low behind the shrub. 

The voices grew louder. A girl laughed. 

Carefully, I peered out from between the piney branches. I saw two 
counselors, walking rapidly along the path that led up the hill. 

Behind them, I spotted another group of counselors making their way 
quickly up the hill. They all seemed to be in a hurry. 

I lowered myself behind the shrub and hid in the darkness. 

They’re heading to the lodge, I decided. Must be some kind of counselors’ 
meeting. 

Their white shorts and T-shirts were easy to see, even on such a dark night. 
Keeping out of sight, I watched them make their way up the path. 

But to my surprise, they didn’t go to the lodge. Several yards from the 
lodge entrance, they turned off the path and ducked into the woods. 

Where were they going? 

I saw two more groups of counselors make their way into the trees. There 
must be a hundred counselors at this camp, I realized. And they’re all going into 
the woods tonight. 

I waited until I thought all of the counselors had passed by. Then I slowly 
pulled myself to my feet. 

I stared into the woods. But I could see only darkness. Shadows upon 
shadows. 

I ducked back down when I heard two more voices. 

Peering through the evergreen branches, I spied Holly and Buddy. They 
were taking long strides, walking side by side. 

I waited till they passed by. Then I jumped up. 

Creeping in the deep shadows, I followed them into the woods. 

I didn’t stop to worry about getting caught. I had to know where the 
counselors were all going. 

Buddy and Holly moved quickly through the woods, pushing tall weeds out 
of their way, stepping over fallen tree limbs. 

To my surprise, a low, white structure came into view. It appeared to glow 
dully in the dim light. 

The building was built low to the ground. The top was curved. 

I squinted at it through the trees. It looks like an igloo, I thought. 

What is this strange building? I wondered. Why is it hidden away in the 
trees? 

A dark opening had been cut into the side. Holly ducked into the low 
entrance. Buddy followed her in. 

I waited nearly a minute. Then I stepped up to the opening. 

My heart pounded. Such a strange, little building. Round and smooth as ice. 

I hesitated. I peered into the entrance, but couldn’t see anything inside. I 
didn’t hear any voices. 

What should I do? I asked myself. 

Should I go in? 

Yes. 

I took a deep breath and lowered myself into the opening. 

23 

Three steep steps led down to a dim entryway. A single red light down near the 
floor gave off the only light. 

I stepped into the dark red glow, then stopped and listened. 

I could hear voices speaking softly in the next room. 

Trailing my hand along the bare, concrete wall, I moved slowly toward the 
voices. An open doorway came up on my right. 

I stopped outside it. Then I slowly, carefully peered in. 

I stared into a large, square room. Four torches hanging at the front of the 
room sent out flickering orange light. 

The counselors sat on long wooden benches, facing a low stage. A purple 
banner hung over the stage. It proclaimed: ONLY THE BEST. 

It’s a little theater, I realized. Some kind of meeting hall. 

But why is it hidden away in the woods? And why are the counselors all 
meeting here tonight? 

I didn’t have to wait long for my answer. 

Buddy stepped on to the small stage. He walked quickly into the flickering 
orange torchlight. Then he turned to face the audience of counselors. 

I crept into the doorway. There were no torches in the back of the hall. It 
was pitch-black back there. 

Walking on tiptoe, I edged my way along the back wall. 

The door to a closet of some kind stood open. I ducked into it. 

Buddy raised both hands. The counselors instantly stopped talking. They all 
sat up straight and stared forward at him. 

“Time to refresh ourselves,” Buddy called out. His voice echoed off the 
concrete walls. 

The counselors sat stiffly. No one moved. No one made a sound. 

Buddy pulled a gold coin from his pocket. A King Coin, I figured. It 
dangled on a long gold chain. 

“Time to refresh our minds,” Buddy said. “Time to refresh our mission.” 

He raised the gold coin high. It glowed in the torchlight as he began to 
swing it. Back and forth. Slowly. 

“Clear your minds,” he instructed them, speaking softly now. “Clear your 
minds, as I have cleared mine.” 

The gleaming gold coin swung slowly back and forth. Back and forth. 

“Clear... clear... clear your minds,” Buddy chanted. 

He is hypnotizing them! I realized. 

Buddy is hypnotizing all the counselors. And he’s been hypnotized, too! 

I took a step forward. I couldn’t believe what I was seeing and hearing! 

“Clear your minds to serve the master!” Buddy declared. “For that is why 
we are here. To serve the master in all his glory!” 

“To serve the master!” the counselors all chanted back together. 

Who is the master? I asked myself. 

What are they talking about? 

Buddy continued chanting out slogans to the crowd of counselors. His eyes 
were wide. He never blinked. 

“We do not think!” he shouted. “We do not feel! We give ourselves up to 
serve the master!” 

And suddenly I had an answer to some of my questions. 

Now I knew why Buddy hadn’t cried out, hadn’t collapsed to the ground 
when I swung the bat into his chest. 

He had hypnotized away all feeling. 

He was in some kind of trance. He couldn’t feel the bat. He couldn’t feel 
anything. 

“Only The Best!” Buddy cried, raising both fists into the air. 

“Only The Best!” the counselors all repeated. Their unblinking faces 
appeared strange, frozen in the flickering orange light. 

“Only The Best! Only The Best!” 

They all chanted the slogan over and over. Their voices echoed loudly off 
the walls. Only their mouths moved. Like puppets. 

“Only The Best can serve the master!” Buddy shouted. 

“Only The Best!” the counselors chanted one more time. 

Buddy had been swinging the gold coin over his head during the entire 
performance. Now he lowered it back into the pocket of his shorts. 

The room grew silent. 

A heavy silence. An eerie silence. 

And then I sneezed. 

24 

I cupped my hand over my mouth. 

Too late. 

I sneezed again. 

Buddy’s mouth opened wide in surprise. He jabbed a finger in the air, 
pointing at me. 

Several counselors jumped to their feet and spun around. 

I turned to the door. Could I escape through it before one of them caught 

me? 

No. 

No way I could get over there. 

My legs were shaking. But I forced myself to move. I backed against the 

wall. 

Why had I stepped so far into the room? Why hadn’t I stayed in the safety 
of the doorway? 

“Who’s there?” I heard Buddy call. “It’s so dark. Who is it?” 

Good! I thought. He didn’t know it was me. 

But in seconds, they’d grab me and drag me into the light. 

I took another step back. Another. 

Darkness fell over me. 

I spun around. “Ohh!” I cried out when I saw that I had nearly toppled 
down a steep stairway. 

It wasn’t a closet after all. 

Black stone steps curved sharply down. Where did they lead? 

I couldn’t guess. But I had no choice. The steps were my only chance of 
escape. 

I leaned against the wall and plunged down the stairs. My shoes slid on the 
smooth stones. 

I nearly tripped and went sailing head first. But I grabbed the wall and 
steadied myself as I started to fall. 

The stairs curved down. Down. 

The air grew hot and sour. I held my breath. The air smelled like sour milk. 

A strange, deep moan rumbled up from down below. 

I stopped to catch my breath. 

Listened hard. 

The low moan rolled up the stairway again. A whiff of sour air invaded my 
nostrils. 

I turned back. Was I being followed? Had the counselors seen me escape 
through the open door? 

No. It had been too dark. I didn’t hear anyone on the stairs. They weren’t 
following me. 

What smelled so bad down below? 

I wanted to stop right there. I didn’t want to climb down any farther. 

But what choice did I have? I knew they’d be searching for me upstairs. 

Leaning a hand against the stone wall, I made my way down. 

The stairway led into a long, narrow tunnel. I could see pale light at the end 
of it. Another deep moan rumbled in the distance. The floor shook. 

I took a long breath and passed quickly through the tunnel. The air grew hot 
and damp. My shoes splashed through puddles on the tunnel floor. 

Where does this lead? I wondered. Will it take me back outside? 

As I neared the end of the tunnel, a whiff of sour air made me choke. I 
coughed and struggled to stop my stomach from heaving. 

What a disgusting smell! 

Like decayed meat and rotten eggs. Like garbage left out in the sun for days 
and days. 

I pressed both hands over my mouth. The odor was so strong, I could taste 
it! 

I gagged. Once. Twice. 

Don’t think about the smell! I ordered myself. Think about something else. 
Think about fresh flowers. Think about sweet-smelling perfume. 

Somehow, I calmed my stomach. 

Then, pinching two fingers over my nose to keep the odor out, I stumbled to 
the end of the tunnel. 

I stopped as the tunnel gave way to a huge, brightly lit chamber. 

I stopped and stared—at the ugliest, most frightening thing I had ever seen 
in my life! 

25 

Squinting into the bright light, I saw dozens of kids with mops, and buckets, and 
water hoses. 

At first, I thought they were cleaning off a giant, purple balloon. Bigger 
than any balloon in the Thanksgiving Day parade! 

But as the water sprayed over it and the mops soaped its sides, the balloon 
let out a loud groan. 

And I realized I wasn’t staring at a balloon. It was a creature. And the 
creature was alive. I was staring at a monster. 

I was staring at King Jellyjam. 

Not a cute little mascot. But a fat, gross, purple mound of slime, nearly as 
big as a house. Wearing a gold crown. 

Two enormous, watery yellow eyes rolled around in his head. He smacked 
his fat purple lips and groaned again. Hunks of thick, white goo dripped from his 
huge, hairy nostrils. 

The disgusting odor rolled off his body. Even holding my nose couldn’t 
keep out the sour stench. 

He smelled like dead fish, rotting garbage, sour milk, and burning rubber— 
all at once! 

The gold crown bounced on top of his slimy, wet head. His purple stomach 
heaved, as if an ocean wave was breaking inside him. And he let out a putrid 
burp that shook the walls. 

The kids—dozens of them—worked frantically. They circled the ugly 
monster. They hosed him down. Scrubbed his body with mops and sponges and 
brushes. 

And as they worked, little round objects rained down on them. Click. Click. 
Click. The little round things clattered to the floor. 

Snails! 

Snails popping out through King Jellyjam’s skin. 

I started to gag again when I realized the hideous creature was sweating 
snails ! 

I staggered back into the tunnel, pressing my hands over my mouth. 

How could those kids stand the horrible, sour stench? 

Why were they washing him? Why were they working so hard? 

I gasped when I recognized some of the kids. 

Alicia! 

She held a hose with both hands and sprayed King Jellyjam’s bulging, 
heaving stomach. Her red hair was soaked and matted to her forehead. She cried 
as she worked, bawling loudly. 

I saw Jeff. Rubbing a mop up and down on the monster’s side. 

I opened my mouth to call to Alicia and Jeff. But my breath caught in my 
throat, and no sound came out. 

And then someone came running toward me. Stumbling and staggering. 
Into the tunnel. Out of the bright light. 

Dierdre! 

A dripping sponge in one fist. Her streaky blond hair drenched. Her clothes 
wrinkled and soaked. 

“Dierdre!” I managed to choke out. 

“Get away from here!” she cried. “Wendy—run!” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “What is happening? Why are you doing this?” 

Dierdre uttered a sob. “Only The Best!” she whispered. “Only The Best get 
to be King Jellyjam’s slaves!” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her as she trembled in front of me, shivering from the 
cold water that had drenched her. 

“Don’t you see?” Dierdre cried. “These are all winners. All six-coin 
winners. He gets the strongest kids. The best workers.” 

“But—why?” I demanded. 

Snails popped through the creature’s skin and clicked as they hit the hard 
floor. A wave of sour stench blew over us as another rumbling burp escaped his 
swollen lips. 

“Why are you all washing him?” I asked Dierdre. 

“He—he has to be washed all the time!” Dierdre exclaimed with a sob. “He 
has to be kept wet. And he can’t stand his own smell. So he gets the strongest 
kids down here. And makes us wash him night and day.” 

“But, Dierdre—” I started. 

“If we stop washing,” she continued. “If we try to take a rest, he—he’ll eat 
us!” Her entire body shook. “He—he ate three kids today!” 

“No!” I cried, gasping in horror. 

“He’s so disgusting!” Dierdre wailed. “Those horrible snails popping out of 

his body... that putrid smell.” 

She grabbed my arm. Her hand was wet and cold. “The counselors are all 
hypnotized,” she whispered. “King Jellyjam has total control over them.” 

“I—I know,” I told her. 

“Get out of here! Hurry!” Dierdre pleaded, squeezing my arm. “Get help, 
Wendy. Please—” 

An angry roar made us both jump. 

“Oh, no!” Dierdre wailed. “He’s seen us! It’s too late!” 

26 

The monster let out another roar. 

Dierdre loosened her grip on my arm. We both turned toward him, shaking 
with fright. 

He was bellowing at the ceiling, roaring just to keep everyone terrified. His 
watery yellow eyes were shut. He hadn’t seen Dierdre and me—yet. 

“Get help!” Dierdre whispered to me. Then she raised the sponge and ran 
back to her place at King Jellyjam’s side. 

I froze for a moment. Froze in horror. In disbelief. 

Another rumbling burp jolted me from my thoughts and sent me scurrying 
through the tunnel. At least now I knew why the camp ground shook so often! 

The sour stench followed me through the tunnel and back up the curving, 
stone steps. I wondered if I could ever get rid of it. I wondered if I could ever 
breathe freely again. 

How can I help those kids? I asked myself. What can I do? 

I was too terrified to think clearly. 

As I ran through the darkness, I could picture King Jellyjam smacking his 
gross purple lips. I could see him rolling his yellow eyes. And the ugly black 
snails squeezing out through his skin. 

I felt sick as I reached the top of the stairs. But I knew I didn’t have time to 
worry about myself. I had to save the kids who had been forced to be the 
monster’s slaves. And I had to save the rest of the kids in camp—before they 
became slaves, too. 

I poked my head out of the closet door. The four torches still burned at the 
front of the small theater. But the room was empty. 

Where were the counselors? Out searching for me? 

Probably. 

Where can I go? I asked myself. I can’t spend the night in this closet. I have 
to breathe some fresh air. I have to go somewhere where I can think. 

Carefully, I made my way out of the low igloo. Into the starless night. 
Hiding behind a wide tree trunk, my eyes searched the woods. 

Narrow beams of white light from flashlights darted through the trees, over 
the ground. 

Yes, I told myself. The counselors are searching for me. 

I backed up, away from the crisscrossing lights. Trying not to make a 
sound, I crept between the trees and tall weeds, toward the path that led to the 
lodge. 

Can I get to the dorms and warn everyone? I wondered. Will anyone believe 
me? Will there be counselors guarding the dorms? Waiting for me to show up? 

I heard voices on the path. I ducked behind a tree and let two counselors 
pass. Their flashlights made wide circles over the sloping hill. 

As soon as they were out of sight, I darted out from the trees. I ran down 
the hill. Keeping in deep shadows, I made my way past the swimming pool. Past 
the tennis courts. All dark and silent now. 

A clump of tall hedges beside the track would hide me from all sides, I 
realized. I ducked behind the hedges, gasping for breath. Dropping to my knees, 
I crawled into their shelter. 

I settled myself on the prickly pine needles beneath the hedges. And peered 
out. Only darkness now. 

I took a deep breath. Then another. Such sweet-smelling air. 

I’ve got to think, I told myself. Got to think... 

Shouting voices startled me awake. 

When had I fallen asleep? Where was I? 

I blinked several times. Sat up and stretched. 

My body felt stiff. My back ached. Every muscle ached. 

I gazed around. Discovered I was still hidden inside the hedges. A gray, 
cloudy morning. The sun trying to burn through the high clouds. 

And the voices? 

Cheers? 

I raised myself up and peered through the hedges. 

The track competition! It had just begun. I saw six boys in shorts and T- 
shirts, leaning forward as they ran around the track. A crowd of kids and 
counselors cheering them on. 

And in the lead? 

Elliot! 

“No!” I cried hoarsely, my voice still choked with sleep. 

I stepped out from the hedges. Made my way across the grass toward the 
track. 

I knew I had to stop him. I couldn’t let him win the race. I couldn’t let him 
win his sixth coin. If he did, they’d make Elliot a slave, too! 

He ran hard. He pulled far out in front of the other five. 

What could I do? What? 

In my panic, I remembered our signal. 

My two-fingered whistle. My signal for Elliot to take it easy. 

He’ll hear the whistle and slow down, I told myself. 

I raised two fingers to my mouth. I blew. 

No sound came out. My mouth was too dry. My heart thudded in my chest. 
I tried again. No. No whistle. 

Elliot turned into the last lap. There was no way to stop him from winning 

now. 

27 

No way to stop him—unless I beat him there! 

With a desperate cry, I plunged forward and started to run to the track. 

My shoes pounded the grass. I kept my eyes on Elliot and the finishing line 
as I ran. Faster. Faster. 

If only I could fly! 

Foud cheers rang out as Elliot neared the finish. The other five boys were 
miles behind! 

My shoes thudded onto the asphalt track. My chest felt about to burst. It 
hurt to breathe. My breath came in loud wheezes. 

Faster. Faster. 

I heard cries of surprise as I raced over the track. I plunged up behind 
Elliot, reached out both hands—and tackled him from behind. 

We both toppled in a heap, rolling over the hard track, onto the grass. The 
other boys raced past us to the finish line. 

“Wendy, you jerk!” Elliot screamed, jumping to his feet. 

“I—can’t explain now!” I shouted back, struggling to breathe, struggling to 
stop the aching in my chest. 

I scrambled to my feet and pulled Elliot up. He angrily tried to jerk free. 
“Why’d you do that, Wendy? Why?” 

I saw three counselors running toward me. 

“Hurry—!” I ordered my brother. I pulled him away. “Just hurry!” 

I think he saw the terror in my eyes. I think he realized that tackling him 
was a desperate act. I think he saw how serious I was. 

Elliot stopped protesting and started to run. 

I led him over the grass. Up the sloping hill by the lodge. Into the woods. 

“Where are we going?” he called breathlessly. “Tell me what’s happening!” 

“You’ll see in a minute!” I called back. “Get ready for a really bad smell!” 

“Huh? Wendy—have you totally lost it?” 

I didn’t answer. I kept running. I led the way into the woods. To the igloo¬ 
shaped building. 

At the low entrance, I turned back to see if we were being followed. I didn’t 

see anyone. 

Elliot followed me into the theater. The torches weren’t lit. It was pitch- 
black inside. 

Feeling my way along the back wall, I found the closet door. I pulled it 
open and led the way down the curving stairs. 

Halfway down, the sour odor floated up to greet us. Elliot cried out and 
cupped both hands over his nose and mouth. “It stinks!” His cry was muffled by 
his hands. 

“It gets worse,” I told him. “Try not to think about it.” 

We jogged side by side through the long tunnel. I wished I had time to warn 
Elliot. I wished I could tell him what he was about to see. 

But I was desperate to save Dierdre, Alicia, and the others. 

Gasping from the smell, I burst into King Jellyjam’s brightly lit chamber. 
Water from a dozen hoses splashed over the monster’s purple body. Kids 
scrubbed furiously as he sighed and groaned. 

I saw the startled horror on my brother’s face. But I couldn’t worry about 
Elliot now. 

“Hit the floor! ” I screamed at the top of my lungs, cupping my hands into a 
megaphone. “EVERYBODY—HIT THE FLOOR! NOW!” 

I had a plan. 

Would it work? 

28 

The monster’s watery yellow eyes grew wide with surprise. His bloated lips 
parted. I could see two pink tongues dart and coil inside his mouth. 

A few of the kids dropped their hoses and mops and flattened themselves on 
the floor. Others turned to stare at me. 

“Stop washing him!” I cried. “Put down your hoses and brushes! Stop 
working! And hit the floor!” 

Beside me, Elliot uttered gasping sounds. I glimpsed him struggling to keep 
the sick smell from overpowering him. 

King Jellyjam let out a furious roar as the rest of the kids obeyed my 
instructions. Thick, white slime dripped from his nose. His two tongues flicked 
out between his purple lips. 

“Get flat!” I screamed to the kids. “Stay down!” 

And then I saw the monster raise a fat purple arm. With a disgusting groan, 
he leaned over. His slimy flesh rippled all over his body as he reached out. 

Reached out to grab Alicia! 

“Help! He’s going to eat me!” Alicia shrieked. She started to get up. 

“No!” I shrieked. “Stay down! Stay flat!” 

With a terrified cry, Alicia dropped back to the floor. 

King Jellyjam swung his fat hand down. Fumbled it over her. Tried to lift 
the little girl up. Tried again. Again. 

But I had figured right! The monster’s fingers were too big, too clumsy to 
pick up anyone who lay flat on the floor. 

King Jellyjam tilted his head back and uttered a roar of disgust. 

I cupped my hand over my nose as the disgusting odor grew more intense. 
Snails pop-pop-popped out of his skin. Rolled down his slimy body. Bounced 
noisily onto the floor. 

The monster flailed his arms. He leaned down again and struggled to pick 
up some other kids. 

But they pressed themselves flat on the floor. He couldn’t lift them. 

He roared again, weaker this time. His eyes rolled wildly in his enormous 
head. 

The smell burned my eyes. It swirled around me, surrounded me in its sour 

stench. 

King Jellyjam grabbed for a hose. Couldn’t pick it up. He slammed his hand 
into a bucket. Struggled frantically to splash water on himself. 

I stood trembling. Watching every move. 

My plan was working. I knew it would work. It had to work! 

The stench grew even stronger. I could taste it. I could smell it on my skin. 

King Jellyjam flailed both arms. Frantically, he struggled to wash himself. 

His roars became groans. His body began to shake. 

I gasped as he narrowed his eyes at me. He raised a swollen purple finger 
and pointed. Accusing me! 

He leaned forward. Reached out. 

Swiped out his enormous hand. 

I couldn’t move. I was too stunned. 

I shuddered. 

His hand slid over me. And before I could struggle, he began to tighten his 
slimy, stinking fingers around my body. 

29 

“Ohhh.” I uttered a horrified moan. 

The fat, wet fingers tightened. Waves of odor rose up around me. 

I held my breath. But the smell was everywhere. 

The fingers wrapped themselves tighter. 

The monster began to lift me off the ground. Raise me toward his gaping 
mouth. The two tongues darted and flicked. 

And then the tongues drooped over his purple lips. 

The fingers loosened their grip. 

I slid free as King Jellyjam groaned and fell forward. Kids rolled quickly 
out of the way. King Jellyjam toppled over headfirst. 

The gold crown bounced away. The monster’s body made a loud splat as it 
spread over the floor. 

“Yes!” I choked out happily. I was still shaking, still trying to forget the 
slimy feel of his fingers against my skin. “Yes!” 

My plan had worked perfectly. 

The kids stopped washing—and King Jellyjam suffocated from his own 
foul smell! 

“Are you okay?” Elliot asked in a trembling voice. 

I nodded. “Yes. I think I’m going to be fine.” 

Elliot held his nose. “I’ll never complain about Dad’s garden fertilizer 
again!” he declared. 

Cheering and shouting, the other kids climbed to their feet. 

“Thank you!” Alicia cried, wrapping me in a hug. The others rushed 
forward to thank me, too. 

There were lots of hugs, lots of tears as we made our way up to the theater 
and then out into the woods. 

“We are out of here!” I cried happily to Elliot. 

But we all stopped at the edge of the woods when we saw the counselors. 

They all stood in front of us, dozens of them, side by side in their white 
shirts and shorts. They had formed a line along the path. 

And I could see from the hard expressions set on their faces that they had 

not come to welcome everyone back. 

As I stared from face to face, Buddy stepped forward. He gave a signal to 
the other counselors. “Don’t let them get away!” he cried. 

30 

The counselors stepped forward, moving in a line. Their expressions remained 
hard and threatening. They kept their arms at their sides. 

They moved stiffly. Like robots. In a trance. 

They took two more steps. 

Then a shrill whistle broke the silence. 

“Stop right there! Everybody freeze!” a man’s voice boomed. 

I heard another shrill whistle. 

I turned to see several blue-uniformed police officers running up the hill. 
The counselors shook their heads, blinked, uttered soft cries. They made no 
attempt to run. 

“Where are we?” I heard Holly mutter. 

“What’s happening?” another counselor asked. 

They all appeared dazed and confused. The police whistles seemed to have 
broken the trance that held them. 

The other kids and I all cheered happily as the officers swarmed up the hill. 
“How did you know we needed help?” I called. 

“We didn’t,” an officer replied. “A horrible smell floated into town. We 
wanted to find out what was causing it. We followed it here!” 

I had to laugh. The same smell that had killed the monster had actually 
saved us kids. 

“We didn’t know there was a problem at this camp,” an officer announced. 
“We’ll contact your parents as soon as we can.” 

Elliot and I led the way down the hill. We were so eager to see Mom and 

Dad! 

The counselors muttered to themselves, gazing around, trying to figure out 
what had happened. 

I turned to Buddy as Elliot and I walked past him. “Are you feeling better?” 
I asked. 

He narrowed his blue eyes at me and squinted hard. He didn’t seem to be 
able to focus. “Only The Best,” he murmured. “Only The Best.” 

Elliot and I were never so glad to be home! 

“What took you so long to find us?” Elliot demanded. 

Mom and Dad shook their heads. “The police checked everywhere, trying 
to find you two,” Dad replied. “They called the camp several times. The 
counselor who answered the phone told the police that you weren’t there.” 

“We were so worried,” Mom said, biting her bottom lip. “So terribly 
worried. When we found the trailer empty, we didn’t know what to think!” 

“Well, we’re home safe and sound now,” I replied with a grin. 

“Maybe you two would like to go away to a real camp next summer,” Dad 

said. 

“Uh... no way!” Elliot and I answered together. 

Two weeks later, we had a surprise visitor. 

I opened the door to find Buddy on the front stoop. His blond hair was 
neatly brushed. He wore chinos, a blue-and-white-striped sportshirt, and a dark 
blue tie. 

“I’m so sorry about what happened at camp,” Buddy said. 

I was still too shocked at seeing him to reply. I just held on to the door and 
gaped at him. 

“Is Elliot home?” Buddy asked. 

“Hi.” Elliot stepped up beside me. “Buddy! What’s up?” 

“I brought you this,” Buddy replied. He reached into his pants pocket and 
pulled out a gold coin. 

“It’s a King Coin,” he told Elliot. “You earned it, remember? You actually 
won the race.” 

Elliot reached out for it. Then stopped. His hand hung in midair. 

I knew what my brother was thinking. This would be his sixth King Coin. 
Should he take it? 

Finally, he grabbed it. “Thanks, Buddy,” Elliot said. 

Buddy said good-bye and gave us a wave. Elliot and I watched him get into 
a car and drive away. Then we closed the door behind us. 

“Are you sure you should’ve taken that?” I asked Elliot. 

“Why not?” he replied. “That purple monster is dead—right? What could 
happen?” 

Five minutes later, we both smelled the horrible odor at the same time. 
“Yuck!” Elliot groaned. He swallowed hard. “Wendy, wh-what’s that 

smell?” he stammered. 

“I—I don’t know,” I replied in a shaky voice. 

I heard Mom laugh behind us. We turned to see her standing in the doorway 
to the kitchen. “What’s wrong?” she asked. “I have a pot of brussels sprouts 
boiling on the stove!” 



REVENGE OF THE 
LAWN GNOMES 

1 

Clack, Clack, Clack. 

The Ping-Pong ball clattered over the basement floor. “Yes!” I cried as I 
watched Mindy chase after it. 

It was a hot, sticky June afternoon. The first Monday of summer vacation. 
And Joe Burton had just made another excellent shot. 

That’s me. Joe Burton. I’m twelve. And there is nothing I love better than 
slamming the ball in my older sister’s face and making her chase after it. 

I’m not a bad sport. I just like to show Mindy that she’s not as great as she 
thinks she is. 

You might guess that Mindy and I do not always agree on things. The fact 
is, I’m really not like anyone else in my family. 

Mindy, Mom, and Dad are all blond, skinny, and tall. I have brown hair. 
And I’m kind of pudgy and short. Mom says I haven’t had my growth spurt yet. 

So I’m a shrimp. And it’s hard for me to see over the Ping-Pong net. But I 
can still beat Mindy with one hand tied behind my back. 

As much as I love to win, Mindy hates to lose. And she doesn’t play fair at 
all. Every time I make a great move, she says it doesn’t count. 

“Joe, kicking the ball over the net is not legal,” she whined as she scooped 
out the ball from under the couch. 

“Give me a break!” I cried. “All the Ping-Pong champions do it. They call it 
the Soccer Slam.” 

Mindy rolled her huge green eyes. “Oh, puh-lease!” she muttered. “My 
serve.” 

Mindy is weird. She’s probably the weirdest fourteen-year-old in town. 

Why? I’ll tell you why. 

Take her room. Mindy arranges all her books in alphabetical order—by 
author. Do you believe it? 

And she fills out a card for each one. She files them in the top drawer of her 
desk. Her own private card catalog. 

If she could, she’d probably cut the tops off the books so they’d be all the 
same size. 

She is so organized. Her closet is organized by color. All the reds come 



first. Then the oranges. Then the yellows. Then come the greens, blues, and 
purples. She hangs her clothes in the same order as the rainbow. 

And at dinner, she eats around her plate clockwise. Really! I’ve watched 
her. First her mashed potatoes. Then all her peas. And then her meat loaf. If she 
finds one pea in her mashed potatoes, she totally loses it! 

Weird. Really weird. 

Me? I’m not organized. I’m cool. I’m not serious like my sister. I can be 
pretty funny. My friends think I’m a riot. Everyone does. Except Mindy. 

“Come on, serve already,” I called out. “Before the end of the century.” 

Mindy stood on her side of the table, carefully lining up her shot. She 
stands in exactly the same place every time. With her feet exactly the same space 
apart. Her footprints are worn into the carpet. 

“Ten-eight and serving,” Mindy finally called out. She always calls out the 
score before she serves. Then she swung her arm back. 

I held the paddle up to my mouth like a microphone. “She pulls her arm 
back,” I announced. “The crowd is hushed. It’s a tense moment.” 

“Joe, stop acting like a jerk,” she snapped. “I have to concentrate.” 

I love pretending I’m a sports announcer. It drives Mindy nuts. 

Mindy pulled her arm back again. She tossed the Ping-Pong ball up into the 
air. And... 

“A spider!” I screamed. “On your shoulder!” 

“Yaaaiiii!” Mindy dropped the paddle and began slapping her shoulder 
furiously. The ball clattered onto the table. 

“Gotcha!” I cried. “My point.” 

“No way!” Mindy shouted angrily. “You’re just a cheater, Joe.” She 
smoothed the shoulders of her pink T-shirt carefully. She picked up the ball and 
swatted it over the net. 

“At least I’m a funny cheater!” I replied. I twirled around in a complete 
circle and belted the ball. It bounced once on my side before sailing over the net. 

“Foul,” Mindy announced. “You’re always fouling.” 

I waved my paddle at her. “Get a life,” I said. “It’s a game. It’s supposed to 
be fun.” 

“I’m beating you,” Mindy replied. “That’s fun.” 

I shrugged. “Who cares? Winning isn’t everything.” 

“Where did you read that?” she asked. “In a bubble gum comic?” Then she 
rolled her eyes again. I think someday her eyes are going to roll right out of her 

head! 

I rolled my eyes, too—back into my head until only the whites showed. 
“Neat trick, huh?” 

“Cute, Joe,” Mindy muttered. “Really cute. You’d better watch out. One 
day your eyes might not come back down. Which would be an improvement!” 

“Lame joke,” I replied. “Very lame.” 

Mindy lined up her feet carefully again. 

“She’s in her serve position,” I spoke into my paddle. “She’s nervous. 
She’s...” 

“Joe!” Mindy whined. “Quit it!” 

She tossed the Ping-Pong ball into the air. She swung the paddle, and— 

“Gross!” I shouted. “What’s that big green glob hanging out of your nose?” 

Mindy ignored me this time. She tapped the ball over the net. 

I dove forward and whacked it with the tip of my paddle. It spun high over 
the net and landed in the corner of the basement. Between the washing machine 
and the dryer. 

Mindy jogged after the ball on her long, thin legs. “Hey, where’s Buster?” 
she called out. “Wasn’t he sleeping next to the dryer?” 

Buster is our dog. A giant black Rottweiler with a head the size of a 
basketball. He loves snoozing on the old sleeping bag we keep in the corner of 
the basement. Especially when we’re down here playing Ping-Pong. 

Everyone is afraid of Buster. For about three seconds. Then he starts licking 
them with his long, wet tongue. Or rolls onto his back and begs to have his belly 
scratched. 

“Where is he, Joe?” Mindy bit her lip. 

“He’s around here somewhere,” I replied. “Why are you always worrying 
about Buster? He weighs over a hundred pounds. He can take care of himself.” 

Mindy frowned. “Not if Mr. McCall catches him. Remember what he said 
the last time Buster chomped on his tomato plants?” 

Mr. McCall is our next-door neighbor. Buster loves the McCalls’ yard. He 
likes to nap under their huge, shady elm tree. 

And dig little holes all over their lawn. And sometimes big holes. 

And snack in their vegetable garden. 

Last year, Buster dug up every head of Mr. McCall’s lettuce. And ate his 
biggest zucchini plant for dessert. 

I guess that’s why Mr. McCall hates Buster. He said the next time he 

catches him in his garden, he’s going to turn him into fertilizer. 

My dad and Mr. McCall are the two best gardeners in town. They’re nuts 
about gardening. Totally nuts. 

I think working in a garden is kind of fun, too. But I don’t let that get 
around. My friends think gardening is for nerds. 

Dad and Mr. McCall are always battling it out at the annual garden show. 
Mr. McCall usually takes first place. But last year, Dad and I won the blue 
ribbon for our tomatoes. 

That drove Mr. McCall crazy. When Dad’s name was announced, Mr. 
McCall’s face turned as red as our tomatoes. 

So Mr. McCall is desperate to win this year. He started stocking up on plant 
food and bug spray months ago. 

And he planted something that nobody else in North Bay grows. Strange 
orange-green melons called casabas. 

Dad says that Mr. McCall has made a big mistake. He says the casabas will 
never grow any bigger than tennis balls. The growing season in Minnesota is too 
short. 

“McCall’s garden loses,” I declared. “Our tomatoes are definitely going to 
win again this year. And thanks to my special soil, they’ll grow as big as beach 
balls!” 

“So will your head,” Mindy shot back. 

I stuck out my tongue and crossed my eyes. It seemed like a good reply. 

“Whose serve is it?” I asked. Mindy was taking so long, I lost track. 

“It’s still my serve,” she replied, carefully placing her feet. 

We were interrupted by footsteps. Heavy, booming footsteps on the stairs 
behind Mindy. 

“Who is that?” Mindy cried. 

And then he appeared behind her. And my eyes nearly bulged right out of 
my head. 

“Oh, no!” I screamed. “It’s... McCall!” 

2 

“Joe!” he roared. The floor shook as he stomped toward Mindy. 

All the color drained from Mindy’s face. Her hand grasped her paddle so 
tightly that her knuckles turned white. She tried to swing around to look behind 
her, but she couldn’t. Her feet were frozen in her Ping-Pong-ball footprints. 

McCall’s hands balled into two huge fists, and he looked really, really 
angry. 

“I’m going to get you. And this time I’m going to win. Throw me a 
paddle.” 

“You jerk!” Mindy sputtered. “I-I knew it wasn’t Mr. McCall. I knew it was 
Moose.” 

Moose is Mr. McCall’s son and my best friend. His real name is Michael, 
but everyone calls him Moose. Even his parents. 

Moose is the biggest kid in the whole sixth grade. And the strongest. His 
legs are as thick as tree trunks. And so is his neck. And he’s very, very loud. Just 
like his dad. 

Mindy can’t stand Moose. She says he’s a gross slob. 

I think he’s cool. 

“Yo, Joe!” Moose bellowed. “Where’s my paddle?” His big arm muscles 
bulged as he reached out to grab mine. 

I pulled my hand back. But his beefy hand slapped my shoulder so hard that 
my head nearly rolled off. 

“Whoaaa!” I yelped. 

Moose let out a deep laugh that shook the basement walls. And then he 
ended it with a burp. 

“Moose, you’re disgusting,” Mindy groaned. 

Moose scratched his dark brown crew cut. “Gee, thanks, Mindy.” 

“Thanks for what?” she demanded. 

“For this.” He reached out and snatched the paddle right out of her hand. 

Moose swung Mindy’s paddle around wildly in the air. He missed a 
hanging lamp by an inch. “Ready for a real game, Joe?” 

He threw the Ping-Pong ball into the air and drew his powerful arm back. 
Wham! The ball rocketed across the room. It bounced off two walls and flew 

back over the net toward me. 

“Foul!” Mindy cried. “That’s not allowed.” 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. I dove for the ball and missed. Moose has an amazing 
serve. 

Moose slammed the ball again. It shot over the net and whacked me in the 
chest. 

Thwock! 

“Hey!” I cried. I rubbed the stinging spot. 

“Good shot, huh?” He grinned. 

“Yeah. But you’re supposed to hit the table,” I told him. 

Moose pumped his fat fists into the air. “Super Moose!” he bellowed. 
“Strong as a superhero!” 

My friend Moose is a pretty wild guy. Mindy says he’s a total animal. I 
think he’s just got a lot of enthusiasm. 

I served while he was still throwing his arms around. 

“Hey! No fair!” he declared. Moose charged the table and clobbered the 
ball. And flattened it into a tiny white pancake. 

I groaned. “That’s ball number fifteen for this month,” I announced. 

I grabbed the little pancake and tossed it into a blue plastic milk crate on the 
floor. The crate was piled high with dozens of flattened Ping-Pong balls. 

“Hey! I think you broke your record!” I declared. 

“All right!” Moose exclaimed. He leaped on top of the Ping-Pong table and 
began jumping up and down. “Super Moose!” he yelled. 

“Stop it, you jerk!” Mindy screamed. “You’re going to break the table.” She 
covered her face with her hands. 

“Super Moose! Super Moose!” he chanted. 

The Ping-Pong table swayed. Then it sagged under his weight. He was even 
starting to get on my nerves now. “Moose, get off! Get off!” I wailed. 

“Who’s going to make me?” he demanded. 

Then we all heard a loud, sharp craaaaack. 

“You’re breaking it!” Mindy shrieked. “Get off!” 

Moose scrambled off the table. He lurched toward me, holding his hands 
straight out like the zombie monster we’d seen in Killer Zombie from Planet 
Zero on TV. “Now I’m going to destroy you!” 

Then he hurled himself at me. 

As he smashed into me, I staggered back and fell onto the dusty cement 

floor. 

Moose jumped onto my stomach and pinned me down. “Say ‘Moose’s 
tomatoes are the best!’ ” he ordered. He bounced up and down on my chest. 

“Moo... Moose’s,” I wheezed. “Tomat... I can’t... breathe... really... 
help.” 

“Say it!” Moose insisted. He placed his powerful hands around my neck. 
And squeezed. 

“Ugggggh,” I gagged. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move. 

My head rolled to the side. 

“Moose!” I heard Mindy shriek. “Let him go! Let him go! What have you 
done to him?” 

3 

“M-Miiindy,” I moaned. 

Moose pulled his hands from my throat and lifted his powerful body off my 
chest. 

“What did you do to him—you big monster?” Mindy shrieked. She knelt 
down by my side and bent over me. She brushed my hair from my eyes. 

“Y-you’re a... a...” I stopped and coughed weakly. 

“What, Joe? What is it?” Mindy demanded softly. 

“You’re a SUCKER!” I exclaimed. And burst out laughing. 

Mindy jerked her head back. “You little weasel!” 

“Tricked you! Tricked you!” I cheered. 

“Way to go, dude!” Moose grinned. 

I scrambled to my feet and slapped Moose a high five. “Suc-ker! Suc-ker!” 
we chanted over and over. 

Mindy folded her skinny arms in front of her and glared at us. “Not funny,” 
she snapped. “I’m never going to believe another word you say! Never!” 

“Oh, I’m sooooo scared!” I said. I knocked my knees together. “See? My 
knees are trembling.” 

“I’m shaking, too,” Moose joined in, wiggling his whole body. 

“You guys are totally juvenile,” she announced. “I’m out of here.” 

She slid her hands into the pockets of her white shorts and stomped away. 
But then she suddenly stopped a few feet from the stairs. 

In front of the high basement window. 

The window that looked out onto Mr. McCall’s front yard. 

She stared up through the window’s sheer white curtain for a second. She 
squinted her eyes. Then she cried out, “No! Oh, no!” 

“Nice try,” I replied, flicking a dust ball from the carpet in her direction. 
“There’s nothing out there. I’m not falling for your lame trick!” 

“No! It’s Buster!” Mindy cried. “He’s next door again!” 

“Huh?” I sprinted to the window. And jumped onto a chair. I yanked the 
filmy curtain aside. 

Yes. There sat Buster. In the middle of the vegetable patch that covered Mr. 

McCall’s front yard. “Oh, wow. He’s in the garden again,” I murmured. 

“My garden! He’d better not be!” Moose declared, stomping up behind me. 
He shoved me off the chair to take a look. “If my dad catches Buster in his 
vegetables, he’ll turn that big mutt into mulch!” 

“Come on! Hurry!” Mindy pleaded, tugging on my arm. “We have to get 
Buster out of there. Right away. Before Moose’s dad catches him!” 

Moose, Mindy, and I raced upstairs and out the front door. We charged 
across our front lawn, toward the McCalls’ house. 

At the edge of our lawn, we leaped across the line of yellow and white 
petunias that Dad had planted. It separates our yard from the McCalls’ garden. 

Mindy squeezed her fingernails deep into my arm. “Buster’s digging!” she 
cried. “He’s going to destroy—the melons!” 

Buster’s powerful front paws worked hard. He scraped at the dirt and green 
plants. Mud and leaves flew everywhere. 

“Stop that, Buster!” Mindy pleaded. “Stop that—now!” 

Buster kept digging. 

Moose glanced at his plastic wristwatch. “You’d better get that dog out of 
there fast,” he warned. “It’s almost six o’clock. My dad comes out to water the 
garden at six sharp.” 

I’m terrified of Mr. McCall. I admit it. He’s so big, he makes Moose look 
like a shrimp! And he’s mean. 

“Buster, get over here!” I begged. Mindy and I both shouted to the dog. 

But Buster ignored our cries. 

“Don’t just stand there. Why don’t you pull that dumb mutt out of there?” 
Moose demanded. 

I shook my head. “We can’t! He’s too big. And stubborn. He won’t budge.” 

I reached under my T-shirt and searched for the shiny metal dog whistle I 
wear on a cord around my neck. I wear it day and night. Even under my 
pajamas. It’s the only thing Buster will obey. 

“It’s two minutes to six,” Moose warned, checking his watch. “Dad will be 
out here any second!” 

“Blow the whistle, Joe!” Mindy cried. 

I brought the whistle up to my mouth. And gave a long, hard blow. 

Moose snickered. “That whistle’s broken,” he said. “It didn’t make a 
sound.” 

“It’s a dog whistle,” Mindy replied in a superior tone. “It makes a really 

high-pitched sound. Dogs can hear them, but people can’t. See?” 

She pointed to Buster. He had lifted his nose out of the dirt and pricked up 
his ears. 

I blew the whistle again. Buster shook the dirt from his fur. 

“Thirty seconds and counting,” Moose told us. 

I blew the silent dog whistle one more time. 

Yes! 

Buster came trotting slowly toward us, wagging his stumpy tail. 

“Hurry, Buster!” I pleaded. “Hurry!” I held my arms open wide. 

“Buster—run—don’t trot!” Mindy begged. 

Too late. 

We heard a loud slam. 

Moose’s front door flew open. 

And Mr. McCall stepped out. 

4 

“Joe! Come over here. Now!” Moose’s dad barked at me. 

He lumbered toward his garden, his big belly bouncing in front of him 
under his blue T-shirt. “Get over here, boy—on the double!” 

Mr. McCall is retired from the army. He’s used to barking out orders. And 
having them obeyed. 

I obeyed. Buster trotted by my side. 

“Was that dog in my garden again?” Mr. McCall demanded, eyeing me 
coldly. His cold stare could make your blood freeze. 

“No, s-sir! ” I stammered. Buster settled down beside me with a loud yawn. 

I usually don’t tell lies. Except to Mindy. But Buster’s life was on the line. I 
had to save Buster. Didn’t I? 

Mr. McCall bounced up to his vegetable patch. He circled his tomatoes, his 
corn, his zucchini, his casaba melons. He examined each stalk and leaf carefully. 

Oh, wow, I thought. We’re in major trouble now. 

Finally, he gazed up at us. His eyes narrowed. “If that mutt wasn’t in here, 
why is the dirt all pawed up?” 

“Maybe it was the wind?” I replied softly. It was worth a try. Maybe he’d 
believe it. 

Moose stood silently next to me. The only time he’s quiet is when his dad is 
around. 

“Um, Mr. McCall,” Mindy began. “We’ll make sure Buster stays out of 
your yard. We promise!” Then she smiled her sweetest smile. 

Mr. McCall scowled. “All right. But if I catch him even sniffing at my 
melons, I’m calling the police and having that dog hauled off to the pound. And I 
mean it.” 

I gulped. I knew he meant it. Mr. McCall doesn’t kid around. 

“Moose!” Mr. McCall snapped. “Bring the hose out here and water these 
casabas! I told you they need to be watered at least five times a day.” 

“See you later,” Moose muttered. He ducked his head and ran toward the 
back of his house for the hose. 

Mr. McCall shot one more dark glance at us. Then he lumbered up his front 
steps and slammed the door. 

“Maybe it was the wind?” Mindy rolled her eyes again. “Wow, that was fast 
thinking, Joe!” She laughed. 

“Oh, yeah? Well, at least I had an answer,” I replied. “And remember, it 
was my whistle that saved Buster. All you did was smile that phony smile.” 

Mindy and I headed toward our house, arguing all the way. But we stopped 
when we heard a low moan. A frightening sound. Buster cocked his ears. 

“Who’s that?” I whispered. 

A second later, we found out. Dad lurched around the side of the house, 
carrying a big watering can. 

He was wearing his favorite gardening outfit—sneakers with holes in both 
toes, baggy plaid shorts, and a red T-shirt that said “I’m All Thumbs in the 
Garden.” 

And he was moaning and groaning. Which was really weird. Because Dad 
is always in an excellent mood when he’s gardening. Whistling. Smiling. 
Cracking lame jokes. 

But not today. 

Today something was wrong. Really wrong. 

“Kids... kids,” he moaned, staggering toward us. “I’ve been looking for 
you.” 

“Dad—what is it? What’s wrong?” Mindy demanded. 

Dad clutched his head and swayed from side to side. He took a deep breath. 
“I-I have something terrible to tell you.” 

5 

“What, Dad?” I cried. “Tell us.” 

Dad spoke in a hoarse whisper. “I found a... a fruit fly on our tomatoes! On 
our biggest tomato. The Red Queen!” 

He wiped his sweaty forehead. “How could this happen? I misted. I 
sprayed. I pruned. Twice this week alone.” 

Dad shook his head in sorrow. “My poor tomatoes. If that fruit fly ruins my 
Red Queen, I-IT1 have to pull out of the garden show!” 

Mindy and I glanced at each other. I knew we were thinking the same thing. 
The adults around here were getting a little weird. 

“Dad, it’s only one fruit fly,” I pointed out. 

“It only takes one, Joe. Just one fruit fly. And our chances for a blue ribbon 
—destroyed. We have to do something. Right away.” 

“What about that new bug spray?” I reminded him. “The stuff that came 
last week from the Green Thumb catalog.” 

Dad’s eyes lit up. He ran a hand through his flat, rumpled hair. “The Bug Be 
Gone!” he exclaimed. 

He jogged up the driveway to the garage. “Come on, kids!” he sang out. 
“Let’s give it a try!” Dad was cheering up. 

Mindy and I raced after him. 

Dad pulled out three spray cans from a carton in the back of the garage. The 
words “Wave Bye-Bye to Bugs with Bug Be Gone!” were printed on the labels. 
A drawing showed a tearful bug carrying a suitcase. Waving bye-bye. 

Dad handed one can to Mindy and one to me. “Let’s get that fruit fly!” he 
cried, as we headed back to our garden. 

We ripped the caps off the cans of Bug Be Gone. “One, two, three... spray!” 
Dad commanded. 

Dad and I showered the two dozen tomato plants tied to wooden stakes in 
the middle of the garden. 

Mindy hadn’t started yet. She was probably reading the ingredients on the 

can. 

“What’s all the fuss about?” my mother called, stepping out the back door. 
Mom was wearing one of her around-the-house outfits. A pair of Dad’s old 

baggy plaid shorts. And an old blue T-shirt he gave her when he came back from 
a business trip a few years ago. The T-shirt said “I Mist You!” One of Dad’s 
lame garden jokes. 

“Hi, honey,” Dad called. “We’re about to destroy a fruit fly. Want to 
watch?” 

Mom laughed, crinkling up the corners of her green eyes. “Pretty tempting. 
But I have to finish a greeting card design.” 

Mom is a graphic artist. She has an office on the second floor of our house. 
She can draw the most incredible pictures on her computer. Amazing sunsets, 
mountains, and flowers. 

“Dinner at seven-thirty, everybody. Okay?” 

“Sounds good,” Dad called as Mom disappeared into the house. “Okay, 
kids. Let’s finish spraying!” 

Dad and I showered the tomato plants one more time. We even sprayed the 
yellow squash plants nearby. Mindy squinted. Aimed the nozzle of her can 
directly at the Red Queen. And let out a single neat drizzle. 

One tiny fruit fly flapped its wings weakly and fell to the ground. Mindy 
smiled in satisfaction. 

“Good work!” Dad exclaimed. 

He clapped us both on the back. “I think this calls for a celebration!” he 
declared. “I have the perfect idea! A quick visit to Lawn Lovely!” 

“Oh, nooooo,” Mindy and I groaned together. 

Lawn Lovely is a store two blocks from our house. It’s the place where Dad 
buys his lawn ornaments. A lot of lawn ornaments. 

Dad is as nuts about lawn ornaments as he is about gardening. We have so 
many lawn ornaments in our front yard, it’s impossible to mow the lawn! 

What a crowd scene! We have two pink plastic flamingos. A cement angel 
with huge white wings. A chrome ball on a silver platform. A whole family of 
plaster skunks. A fountain with two kissing swans. A seal that balances a beach 
ball on its nose. And a chipped plaster deer. 

Weird, huh? 

But Dad really loves them. He thinks they’re art or something. 

And do you know what he does? He dresses them up on holidays. Pilgrim 
hats for the skunks on Thanksgiving. Pirate costumes for the flamingos on 
Halloween. Stove-pipe hats and little black beards for the swans on Lincoln’s 
birthday. 

Of course, neat and tidy Mindy can’t stand the lawn ornaments. Neither can 
Mom. Every time Dad brings a new one home, Mom threatens to toss it into the 
garbage. 

“Dad, these lawn ornaments are totally embarrassing!” Mindy complained. 
“People gawk from their cars and take pictures of our front yard. We’re a tourist 
attraction!” 

“Oh, please,” Dad groaned. “One person took a picture.” 

That was last Christmas. When Dad dressed all the ornaments as Santa’s 
helpers. 

“Yeah. And that picture ended up in the newspaper!” Mindy moaned. “It 
was soooo embarrassing.” 

“Well, I think the ornaments are cool,” I replied. Someone had to defend 
poor Dad. 

Mindy just wrinkled her nose in disgust. 

I know what really bugs Mindy about the ornaments. It’s the way Dad 
sticks them in the yard. Without any order. If Mindy had her way, they would be 
lined up like her shoes. In nice neat rows. 

“Come on, guys,” Dad urged, starting down the driveway. “Let’s go see if a 
new shipment of ornaments has come in.” 

We had no choice. 

Mindy and I trudged down the sidewalk after Dad. As we followed him, we 
thought—no big deal. It’s almost dinnertime. We’ll just glance over the 
ornaments at the store. Then we’ll go home. 

We had no idea we were about to start the most horrifying adventure of our 
lives. 

6 

“Can’t we drive, Dad?” Mindy complained as the three of us hiked up the steep 
Summit Avenue hill toward Lawn Lovely. “It’s too hot to walk.” 

“Oh, come on, Mindy. It’s only a couple of blocks. And it’s good exercise,” 
Dad replied, taking long, brisk strides. 

“But it’s sooooo hot,” Mindy whined. She brushed her bangs away from her 
face and blotted her forehead with her hand. 

Mindy was right. It was hot. But get serious. It was only a two-block walk. 

“I’m hotter than you are,” I teased. Then I leaned into Mindy and shook my 
sweaty head at her. “See?” 

A few small beads of sweat flew onto Mindy’s T-shirt. 

“You are so gross!” she shrieked, drawing back. “Dad! Tell him to stop 
being so disgusting.” 

“We’re almost there,” Dad replied. His voice sounded as if he were a 
million miles away. He was probably dreaming about buying his next lawn 
ornament. 

Just up the block, I spotted the tall, pointy roof of Lawn Lovely. It jutted 
into the sky, towering over all the houses around it. 

What a weird place, I thought. Lawn Lovely is in an old, raggedy three- 
story house, set back from the street. The whole building is painted pink. Bright 
pink. The windows are covered with brightly colored shutters. But none of the 
colors match. 

I think that’s another reason why Mindy hates this place. 

The old house is not in good shape. The wooden floorboards on the front 
porch are all sagging. And there is a hole in the porch where Mr. McCall fell 
through last summer. 

As we marched past the flagpole in the front yard, I spotted Mrs. Anderson 
in the driveway. She owns Lawn Lovely. She lives there, too. On the second and 
third floors. 

Mrs. Anderson kneeled over a flock of pink plastic flamingos. She was 
ripping off their plastic wrap and setting them in crooked rows on her lawn. 

Mrs. Anderson reminds me of a flamingo. She’s real skinny and wears pink 
all the time. Even her hair is sort of pink. Like cotton candy. 

Lawn ornaments are the only things Mrs. Anderson sells. Plaster squirrels. 
Kissing angels. Pink rabbits with wire whiskers. Long green worms wearing 
little black hats. A whole flock of white geese. She has hundreds of ornaments. 
Scattered all over her yard. Up the front steps to the porch. And right through the 
door into the entire first floor of the house. 

Mrs. Anderson carefully unwrapped another flamingo and set it down next 
to a deer. She studied this arrangement, then moved the deer about an inch to the 
left. 

“Hello, Lilah!” my dad called out. 

Mrs. Anderson didn’t answer. She’s a little hard of hearing. 

“Hello, Lilah!” Dad repeated, cupping his hands around his mouth like a 
megaphone. 

Mrs. Anderson raised her head from the flamingos. And beamed at my dad. 
“Jeffrey!” she cried. “How nice to see you.” 

Mrs. Anderson is always friendly to Dad. Mom says he’s her best customer. 

Maybe her only customer! 

“It’s nice to see you, too,” Dad replied. He rubbed his hands together 
eagerly and gazed around the lawn. 

Mrs. Anderson stuck one last flamingo into the ground. She made her way 
over to us, wiping her hands on her pink T-shirt. 

“Do you have something special in mind today?” she asked my father. 

“Our deer is a little lonesome,” he explained, shouting so that she could 
hear him. “I think it needs company.” 

“Really, Dad. We don’t need any more lawn ornaments,” Mindy begged. 
“Mom will be furious.” 

Mrs. Anderson smiled. “Oh, a Lawn Lovely lawn always has room for one 
more! Right, Jeffrey?” 

“Right!” Dad declared. 

Mindy pressed her lips together tightly. She rolled her eyes for the 
hundredth time that day. 

Dad hurried over to a herd of wide-eyed plaster deer, standing in the corner 
of the yard. We followed him. 

The deer stood about four feet tall. White spots dotted their reddish-brown 
bodies. 

Very lifelike. Very boring. 

He studied the deer for a few seconds. Then something caught his eye. 

Two squat gnomes standing in the middle of the lawn. 

“Well, well, what have we here?” Dad murmured, smiling. I could see his 
eyes light up. He bent down to examine the gnomes. 

Mrs. Anderson clapped her hands together. “Jeffrey, you have a wonderful 
eye for lawn ornaments!” she exclaimed. “I knew you’d appreciate the gnomes! 
They were carved in Europe. Very fine work.” 

I stared at the gnomes. They looked like little old men. They were about 
three feet tall and very chubby. With piercing red eyes and large pointy ears. 

Their mouths curved up in wide, silly grins. And coarse brown hair 
sprouted from their heads. 

Each gnome wore a bright green short-sleeved shirt, brown leggings, and a 
tall, pointy orange hat. Both wore black belts tied tightly around their chubby 
waists. 

“They’re terrific!” Dad gushed. “Oh, kids. Aren’t they wonderful?” 

“They’re okay, Dad,” I said. 

“Okay?” Mindy shouted. “They’re horrible ! They’re so gross! They look 
so... so evil. I hate them!” 

“Hey, you’re right, Mindy,” I said. “They are pretty gross. They look just 
like you!” 

“Joe, you are the biggest—” Mindy started. But Dad interrupted her. 

“We’ll take them!” he cried. 

“Dad—no!” Mindy howled. “They’re hideous! Buy a deer. Buy another 
flamingo. But not these ugly old gnomes. Look at the awful colors. Look at 
those evil grins. They’re too creepy!” 

“Oh, Mindy. Don’t be silly. They’re perfect!” Dad exclaimed. “We’ll have 
so much fun with them. We’ll dress them as ghosts for Halloween. In Santa suits 
at Christmas. They look just like Santa’s elves.” 

Dad pulled out his credit card. He and Mrs. Anderson started toward the 
pink house to complete the sale. “I’ll be back in a minute,” he called. 

“These are the ugliest yet,” Mindy groaned, turning to me. “They’re 
completely embarrassing. I’ll never be able to bring any of my friends over 
again.” 

Then she stomped off toward the sidewalk. 

I couldn’t take my eyes away from the gnomes. They were kind of ugly. 
And even though they were smiling, there was something unfriendly about their 
smiles. Something cold about their glassy red eyes. 

“Whoa! Mindy! Look!” I cried. “One of the gnomes just moved!” 

Mindy slowly turned to face me. 

My wrist was held tightly in the chubby hand. I twisted and squirmed. Tried 
to tug free. 

“Let go!” I squealed. “Let go of me! Mindy—hurry!” 

“I—I’m coming!” she cried. 

7 

Mindy came racing across the yard. 

She leaped over the flamingos and sprinted around the deer. 

“Hurry!” I moaned, stretching my left arm out toward her. “He’s hurting 

me!” 

But as my sister came near, her face twisted in fright, I couldn’t keep a 
straight face any longer. I burst out laughing. 

“Gotcha! Gotcha!” I shrieked. I danced away from the plaster gnome. 

Mindy swung around to slug me. Swung and missed. 

“Did you really believe that gnome grabbed me?” I cried. “Are you totally 
losing it?” 

She didn’t have time to reply. Dad came jogging down the pink porch steps. 
“Time to bring our little guys home,” he announced, grinning. 

He stopped and stared down happily at the ugly gnomes. “But let’s name 
them first.” Dad names all of our lawn ornaments. 

Mindy let out a loud groan. Dad ignored her. 

He patted one of the gnomes on the head. “Let’s call this one Hap. Because 
he looks so happy! I’ll carry Hap. You kids take...” 

He stopped and squinted at the other gnome. There was a small chip on the 
gnome’s front tooth. “Chip. Yep, we’ll call this one Chip.” 

Dad hoisted Hap into his arms. “Whoaaa. He’s an armful!” He made his 
way toward the driveway, staggering under the gnome’s weight. 

Mindy studied Chip. “You take the feet. I’ll grab the top,” she ordered. 
“Come on. One, two, three... lift!” 

I stooped down and grabbed the gnome by its legs. Its heavy red boot 
scraped my arm. I let out a cry. 

“Quit complaining,” Mindy ordered. “At least you don’t have this stupid 
pointy hat sticking in your face.” 

We struggled down the hill, following Dad. 

Mindy and I inched forward, struggling side by side. “Everyone in the 
neighborhood is gawking at us,” Mindy moaned. 

They were. Two girls from Mindy’s school, wheeling their bikes up the hill, 
stopped and stared. Then they burst out laughing. 

Mindy’s pale face grew as red as one of Dad’s tomatoes. “I’ll never live this 
down,” she grumbled. “Come on, Joe. Walk faster.” 

I jiggled Chip’s legs to make Mindy lose her grip. But the only thing she 
lost was her temper. “Quit it, Joe,” she snapped. “And hold your end up higher.” 

As we neared our house, Mr. McCall spotted us trudging up the block. He 
stopped pruning his shrubs to admire our little parade. 

“More lawn ornaments, Jeffrey?” he called out to Dad. I could hear him 
chuckling. 

Mr. McCall is mean to Mindy and me. But he and Dad get along fine. 
They’re always kidding each other about their gardens. 

Mrs. McCall poked her head out the front door. “Cute!” she called out, 
smiling at us from under her white baseball cap. “Come on in, Bill. Your brother 
is on the phone.” 

Mr. McCall set his pruning sheers down and went inside. 

We lugged Chip past the McCall driveway and followed Dad into our front 

yard. 

“Over here!” Dad instructed as he set Hap down in the far corner of the 
yard. Next to Deer-lilah. Deer-lilah is the deer. Dad named her after Lilah from 
Lawn Lovely. 

With our last bit of strength, we dragged Chip over to Dad. These gnomes 
were heavy. They weighed a lot more than our other ornaments. 

Mindy and I plopped the gnome down on the grass and collapsed in the dirt 
next to him. 

Whistling happily, Dad set Chip on one side of the deer. And Hap on the 
other. 

He stepped back to study them. “What cheerful little guys!” he declared. 
“I’ve got to show your mom. She won’t be able to resist them! They’re too cute 
to hate!” 

He hurried across the lawn and into the house. 

“Yo!” I heard a familiar cry from next door. Moose jogged across his 
driveway. “I hear you have some ugly new lawn things.” 

He charged up to the gnomes and stared. “Way ugly,” he boomed. 

Moose leaned down and stuck his tongue out at Hap. “You want to fight, 
shrimp?” he asked the little statue. “Take that!” He pretended to punch Hap in 
his chubby chest. 

“Wreck the runt!” I cried. 

Moose grabbed the gnome around his waist and gave him a dozen quick 
punches. 

I scrambled to my feet. “I’ll wipe that ugly grin off your face!” I yelled at 
Chip. I closed my hands around the gnome’s neck and pretended to choke him. 

“Watch this!” Moose shot out a thick leg and karate-kicked Hap in his small 
pointy hat. The squat figure wobbled. 

“Careful! Stop messing around!” Mindy warned. “You’re going to break 
them.” 

“Okay,” I said. “Let’s tickle them!” 

“Tickle, tickle!” Moose squeaked as he tickled Hap under the armpits. 

“You’re a riot, Moose,” Mindy declared. “Areal—” 

Moose and I waited for Mindy to finish insulting us. But instead, she 
pointed to the McCalls’ garden and screamed, “Oh, no! Buster!” 

Moose and I spun around and spied Buster. In the middle of Mr. McCall’s 
garden, pawing away at the green stalks. 

“Buster! No!” I screamed. 

I grabbed the dog whistle and raised it to my mouth. But before I could 
blow, Mr. McCall exploded out of his front door! 

“That stupid mutt again!” he shouted, waving his arms wildly. “Get out of 
here! Shoo!” 

Buster whimpered, turned, and trotted back to our yard, head down, stumpy 
tail between his legs. 

Uh-oh, I thought, studying Mr. McCall’s angry face. We’re in for trouble 

now. 

But before Mr. McCall could start lecturing us, Dad pushed the front door 
open. “Kids, your mother says that dinner is almost ready.” 

“Jeffrey, are you deliberately sending that mutt over to ruin my melons?” 
Mr. McCall called. 

Dad grinned. “Buster can’t help it,” he replied. “He keeps mistaking your 
melons for golf balls! ” 

“Are those tomatoes you’re growing?” Moose’s dad shot back. “Or are they 
olives?” 

“Didn’t you see the tomato I rolled into the house yesterday?” Dad replied. 
“I had to use a wheelbarrow!” 

Buster danced around the yard. I think somehow he knew he had escaped 
big trouble. 

We started for the house. But I stopped when I heard a heavy thud. 

I whirled around to discover Hap lying face down in the grass. 

Buster busily licked his face. 

“Bad dog,” Dad scolded. I don’t think Dad likes Buster any more than Mr. 
McCall does. “Did you knock that gnome over? Get away from there!” 

“Buster—come here, boy!” I called. But he ignored me and licked at the 
face more furiously than ever. 

I brought my dog whistle to my lips and gave one quick short blow. Buster 
raised his head, alert to the sound. He forgot about the plaster gnome and trotted 
over to me. 

“Joe, pick Hap up, will you?” Dad demanded, annoyed. 

Mindy held onto Buster. I grabbed the gnome by his shoulders and slowly 
heaved him to his feet. Then I checked for damage. 

Legs. Arms. Neck. Everything seemed okay. 

I raised my eyes to Hap’s face. 

And jumped back in surprise. 

I blinked a few times. And stared at the gnome again. 

“I—I don’t believe it!” I murmured. 

8 

The gnome’s smile had vanished. 

Its mouth stood open wide, as if trying to scream. 

“Hey—!” I choked out. 

“What’s wrong?” Dad called. “Is it broken?” 

“Its smile!” I cried. “Its smile is gone! It looks scared or something!” 

Dad jumped down the steps and ran over. Moose and Mr. McCall joined 

him. 

Mindy walked slowly in my direction, with a suspicious scowl on her face. 
She probably thought I was playing another joke. 

“See?” I cried as everyone gathered around me. “It’s unbelievable!” 

“Ha-ha! Good one, Joe!” Moose burst out. He punched me in the shoulder. 
“Pretty funny.” 

“Huh?” I lowered my eyes to the little figure. 

Hap’s lips were curved up in a grin. The same silly grin he always wore. 
The terrified expression had disappeared. 

Dad let out a hearty laugh. “Good acting job, Joe,” he said. “You really 
fooled us all.” 

“Maybe your son should be an actor,” Mr. McCall said, scratching his head. 
“He didn’t fool me,” Mindy bragged. “That one was lame. Really lame.” 
What had happened? Had I imagined that open mouth? 

Mr. McCall turned to Buster. “Listen, Jeffrey,” he started. “I’m serious 
about that dog of yours. If he comes into my garden again...” 

“If Buster goes over there again, I promise we’ll tie him up,” Dad replied. 
“Aw, Dad,” I said. “You know Buster hates to be tied up. He hates it!” 
“Sorry, kids,” Dad said, turning to go inside. “That’s it. Buster gets one 
more chance.” 

I bent down to pet Buster’s head. “Only one more chance, boy,” I 
whispered in his ear. “Did you hear that? You only get one more chance.” 

I woke up the next morning and squinted at the clock radio on my night table. 
Eight A.M. Tuesday. The second day of summer vacation. Excellent! 

I threw on my purple-and-white Vikings jersey and my gym shorts and ran 
downstairs. Time to mow the lawn. 

Dad and I had an agreement. If I mowed the lawn once a week all summer, 
Dad would buy me a new bike. 

I knew exactly which model I wanted, too. Twenty-one gears and really fat 
tires. The coolest mountain bike ever. I’d be able to fly over boulders! 

I let myself out the front door and raised my face to the warm morning sun. 
It felt pretty good. The grass shimmered, still covered with dew. 

“Joe!” I heard a loud bellow. 

Mr. McCall’s bellow. “Get over here!” 

Mr. McCall leaned over his vegetable patch. An angry red vein throbbed in 
his forehead. 

Oh, no, I thought as I edged toward him. What now? 

“I’ve had it,” he roared. “If you don’t tie that dog up, I’m calling the police! 
I mean it!” 

Mr. McCall pointed to the ground. One of his casaba melons lay in the dirt, 
broken into jagged pieces. Melon seeds were scattered everywhere. And most of 
the orange fruit had been eaten away. 

I opened my mouth, but no sound came out. I didn’t know what to say. 
Lucky for me, Dad showed up just in time. He was on his way to work. 

“Is my son giving you some gardening advice, Bill?” he asked. 

“No jokes today!” Mr. McCall snapped. He scooped up the broken pieces of 
melon and shoved them in my dad’s face. “See what your wild dog has done! 
Now I have only four melons left!” 

Dad turned to me. His expression grew stern. “I warned you, Joe! I told you 
to keep the dog in our yard.” 

“But Buster didn’t do this,” I protested. “He doesn’t even like melons!” 

Buster skulked around behind the flamingos. His ears drooped flat against 
his head. His tail hung low between his legs. He looked really guilty. 

“Well, who else could have done it?” Mr. McCall demanded. 

Dad shook his head. “Joe, I want you to tie Buster up in the back. Now!” 

I saw that I had no choice. No way I could argue. 

“Okay, Dad,” I mumbled. I shuffled across the lawn and grabbed Buster’s 
collar. I hauled him to the corner of the back yard and sat him next to his red 
cedar doghouse. “Stay!” I commanded. 

I rummaged through the garage until I found a long piece of rope. Then I 

tied Buster to the tall oak tree next to his doghouse. 

Buster whimpered. He really hates being tied up. 

“I’m sorry, boy,” I whispered. “I know you didn’t eat that melon.” 

Buster pricked up his ears as Dad came around back to make sure I had tied 
the dog up. “It’s just as well that Buster is tied up today,” he said. “The painters 
are starting on the house this afternoon. Buster would only be in their way.” 

“Painters?” I asked in surprise. Nobody told me that painters were coming. 
I hate the smell of paint! 

Dad nodded. “They’re going to paint over that faded yellow,” he said, 
pointing to the house. “We’re having the house painted white with black trim.” 

“Dad, about Buster...” I started. 

Dad held up a hand to silence me. “I have to get to work. Keep him tied up. 
We’ll talk later.” I watched him make his way to the garage. 

This is all Mr. McCall’s fault, I thought. All of it! After Dad drove away, I 
stamped angrily into the garage and grabbed the lawn mower. I pushed the 
mower around the side of the house and into the front yard. Mindy sat on the 
front steps, reading. I rammed the mower forward. 

“I hate Mr. McCall!” I exclaimed. I shoved the mower around a flamingo. I 
felt like slicing off its skinny legs. “He is such a jerk. I’d like to smash the other 
four stupid melons!” I cried. “I’d love to wreck them all so Mr. McCall will 
leave us alone!” 

“Joe, get a grip,” Mindy called, peering up from her book. 

After I finished mowing, I ran into the house and grabbed a large plastic 
bag for the grass clippings. When I came back out, Moose was sprawled on our 
lawn. Several brightly colored plastic rings lay scattered on the grass around 
him. 

“Think fast!” he cried. He hurled a blue plastic ring at me. I dropped the 
bag and leaped for it. 

“Nice catch!” he said, scrambling to his feet. “How about a game of ring 
toss? We’ll use the gnomes’ pointy hats.” 

“How about using Mindy’s pointy head?” I replied. 

“You are so immature,” Mindy said. She stood and walked to the door. “I’m 
going to find some place quiet to read.” 

Moose handed me a few rings. He flung a purple one toward Hap. The ring 
slid neatly around the gnome’s hat. 

“What a throw!” he exclaimed. 

I took a ring and spun around like a discus thrower. I tossed two yellow 
rings at Chip. They slapped against the gnome’s fat face and slipped to the grass. 

Moose chuckled. “You throw like Mindy. Watch me!” He leaned forward 
and hurled two rings. They settled neatly around Chip’s pointy hat. 

“Yes!” Moose cried. He flexed his bulging muscles. “Super Moose rules 
again!” 

We tossed the rest of the rings. Moose beat me. But only by two points— 
ten to eight. 

“Rematch!” I cried. “Let’s play again!” 

I dashed over to the gnomes and gathered up the rings. As I pulled a 
handful from Chip’s hat, I stared into his face. 

And gasped. 

What was that? 

A seed. 

An orange seed about half an inch long. 

Stuck between the gnome’s fat lips. 

9 

“Is that a melon seed?” I asked, my voice trembling. 

“A what?” Moose stomped up behind me. 

“A melon seed,” I repeated. 

Moose shook his head. He clapped a big hand against my shoulder. “You’re 
seeing things,” he declared. “Come on, let’s play!” 

I pointed to Chip’s mouth. “I’m not seeing things. There! Right there! Don’t 
you see it?” 

Moose’s gaze followed my finger. “Yeah. I see a seed. So what?” 

“It’s a casaba melon seed, Moose. Like the ones scattered on the ground.” 

How could a casaba seed find its way into Chip’s mouth? 

There had to be an explanation. A simple explanation. 

I thought hard. I couldn’t think of one. 

I brushed the seed from the gnome’s lips and watched it flutter to the grass. 

Then I stared at the gnome’s grinning face. Into those cold, flat eyes. 

And the gnome stared back at me. I shivered in the heat. 

How did that seed get there? I wondered. How? 

I dreamed about melons that night. I dreamed that a casaba melon grew in our 
front yard. Grew and grew and grew. Bigger than our house. 

Something startled me out of my melon dream. I fumbled for my alarm 
clock. One A.M. 

Then I heard a howl. Alow, mournful howl. Outside the house. 

I jumped out of bed and hurried to the window. I peered into the shadowy 
front yard. The lawn ornaments stood in silence. 

I heard the howl again. Louder. Longer. 

It was Buster. My poor dog. Tied up in the back yard. 

I crept out of my room and down the dark hall. The house was quiet. I 
started down the carpeted stairs. 

A step squeaked under my foot. I jumped, startled. 

A second later, I heard another creak. 

My legs were shaking. 

Cool it, Joe, I told myself. It’s only the steps. 

I tiptoed through the darkened living room and into the kitchen. I heard 
low, rustling sound behind me. My heart started to pound. 

I whirled around. 

Nothing there. 

You’re hearing things, I told myself. 

I stumbled forward in the dark. Closed my hand around the doorknob. 

And two powerful hands grabbed me from behind! 

10 

“Where do you think you’re going?” 

Mindy! 

I breathed a sigh of relief. And yanked myself away from her grasp. 

“I’m going for a midnight snack,” I whispered, rubbing my neck. “I’m 
going to eat the rest of Mr. McCall’s stupid melons.” 

I pretended to cram my mouth full and chew. “Yum! Casabas. I need more 
casabas!” 

“Joe! You’d better not!” Mindy whispered in alarm. 

“Hey, I’m kidding,” I said. “Buster is howling like crazy. I’m going out to 
calm him down.” 

Mindy yawned. “If Mom and Dad catch you sneaking out in the middle of 
the night...” 

“It’ll just take a few minutes.” I stepped outside. The damp night air sent a 
small chill down my back. I gazed up at the starless night sky. 

Buster’s pitiful howls rose from the back. 

“I’m coming,” I called in a loud whisper. “It’s okay, boy.” 

Buster’s howls dropped to quiet whimpers. 

I took a step forward. Something rustled through the grass. I froze in place. 
And squinted into the darkness. Two small figures scampered by the side of the 
house. They scraped across the yard and disappeared into the night. 

Probably raccoons. 

Raccoons? 

That’s the answer! The raccoons must have eaten Mr. McCall’s melon. I 
wanted to wake up Dad and tell him. But I decided to wait till morning. 

I felt much better. That meant that Buster could be set free. I made my way 
over to Buster and sat next to him on the dew-wet grass. 

“Buster,” I whispered. “I’m here.” 

His big brown eyes drooped sadly. I threw my arms around his furry neck. 
“You won’t be tied up for long, Buster,” I promised. “You’ll see. I’ll tell Dad 
about the raccoons first thing in the morning.” 

Buster licked my hand gratefully. “And tomorrow I’ll take you for a long 
walk,” I whispered. “How’s that, boy? Now go to sleep.” 

I slipped back inside the house and jumped into bed. I felt good. I had 
solved the mystery of the melon. Our troubles with Mr. McCall were over, I 
thought. 

But I thought wrong. 

Our troubles were just beginning. 

“I don’t believe it! I don’t believe it!” Mr. McCall’s cries cut through the quiet 
morning, waking me from my heavy sleep. 

I rubbed my eyes and glanced at the clock radio. Six-thirty A.M. 

What’s all the screaming about? 

I hopped out of bed and hurried downstairs, yawning and stretching. Mom, 
Dad, and Mindy were at the front door, still in pajamas and robes. 

“What’s happening?” I asked. 

“It’s Bill!” Dad cried. “Come on!” 

We piled outside and stared into our neighbors’ garden. 

Mr. McCall hung over his vegetable patch in a tattered blue-and-white- 
checkered robe. He grabbed frantically at his casaba melons, screaming. 

Moose and his mother stood behind Mr. McCall in their robes, wide-eyed 
and silent. Instead of her usual friendly smile, Moose’s mom wore a grim frown. 

Mr. McCall lifted his head from the garden. “Ruined!” he roared. “They’re 
totally ruined!” 

“Oh, boy,” Dad muttered. “We’d better get over there, Marion.” He started 
across our front lawn. Mom, Mindy, and I followed. 

“Take it easy, Bill,” my dad said calmly as he stepped into the McCalls’ 
front yard. “Nothing is worth getting so upset about.” 

“Easy? Take it easy?” Mr. McCall shrieked. The vein in his forehead 
throbbed. 

The raccoons, I thought. They attacked the casabas again. I’ve got to tell 
Dad. Now. Before Buster gets blamed for this, too. 

Mr. McCall cradled his four casaba melons in his hands. They were still 
attached to the vine. 

“I came out to water my casabas and I found this... this...” He was too 
upset to finish. He held the melons out to us. 

“Whoa!” I cried in amazement. 

No raccoon could have done this. 

No way. 

Someone had taken a black marker and drawn big, sloppy smiley faces on 
each melon! 

My sister shoved me aside to get a good look. 

“Joe!” she shrieked. “That’s horrible. How could you!” 

11 

“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall demanded. 

“Yes, Mindy, what are you talking about?” Mom asked. 

“I caught Joe sneaking outside last night,” Mindy replied. “In the middle of 
the night. He told me he wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.” 

Everyone turned to stare at me in horror. Even Moose, my best friend. Mr. 
McCall’s face was as red as a tomato again. I saw him clenching and 
unclenching his fists. 

Everyone stared at me in shocked silence. The smiley faces on the melons 
stared at me, too. 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

Before I could explain, Dad exploded. “Joe, I think you owe us an 
explanation. What were you doing outside in the middle of the night?” 

I felt my face grow red-hot with anger. “I went out to calm Buster down,” I 
insisted. “He was howling. I didn’t touch the melons. I would never do anything 
like that. I was only joking when I told Mindy I wanted to wreck them!” 

“Well, this is no joke!” Dad exclaimed angrily. “You are grounded for the 
week!” 

“But, Dad—!” I pleaded. “I didn’t draw on those melons!” 

“Make that two weeks!” he snapped. “And I think you should mow Mr. 
McCall’s grass and water his garden all month. As an apology.” 

“Whoa, Jeffrey,” Mr. McCall interrupted. “I don’t want your son—or your 
dog—in my garden again. Ever.” 

He rubbed the casaba melons with his huge fingers, trying to erase the ugly 
black stains. “I hope this comes off,” he muttered. “Because if it doesn’t, Jeffrey, 
I’ll sue. Believe me, I will!” 

Two hours after the melon disaster, I sprawled on the floor of my room. 
Grounded. With nothing to do. 

I couldn’t play with Buster in the yard. Because the painters were outside. 

So I stayed in my room and reread all of my Super Gamma Man comic 
books. 

I ordered a glob of rubber vomit from the Joker’s Wild catalog for five 

dollars. That’s most of my weekly allowance. Then I sneaked into Mindy’s room 
and mixed up all the clothes in her closet. No more colors in rainbow order. 

When I had finished, it still wasn’t even noon. 

What a totally boring day, I thought, as I wandered downstairs. 

“Hand me the yellow, please,” Mindy’s voice rang out from the den. 

I crept toward the door and peeked in. Mindy and her best friend, Heidi, sat 
cross-legged on the floor. They were decorating T-shirts with fabric paint. 

Heidi is almost as annoying as Mindy. Something is always bothering her. 
She’s too cold. Or too hot. Or her stomach hurts. Or her shoelaces are too tight. 

I watched silently as the two girls worked. Heidi drew a silver collar on a 
large purple cat. 

Mindy hunched over in concentration and slowly outlined a large yellow 
flower. 

I leaped into the den. “Boo!” I screamed. 

“Yaii!” Heidi shrieked. 

Mindy jumped up, smearing a big yellow blotch on her red shorts. “You 
jerk!” she cried. “See what you made me do!” 

She scraped at the paint with her fingernails. “Beat it, Joe,” she ordered. 
“We’re busy.” 

“Well, I’m not,” I replied. “Thanks to you, Miss Snitch.” 

“It was your bright idea to draw faces on those melons,” she snarled. “Not 
mine.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” I insisted. 

Mindy counted off the evidence on her fingers. 

“You were up in the middle of the night. You went out in the yard. And you 
told me you wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.” 

“I was joking!” I exclaimed. “Don’t you know what a joke is? You should 
try making one sometime.” 

Heidi stretched out her arms. “I’m hot,” she said. “Why don’t we go to the 
pool? We can finish our shirts later.” 

Mindy fixed her eyes on me. “Joe, do you want to go with us?” she asked in 
a sweet voice. “Whoops. I forgot. You’re grounded.” Then she burst out 
laughing. 

I turned and left the two girls in the den. I have to get out of this house, I 
thought. 

I headed for the kitchen. Mom and the painter huddled together at the 

counter, checking paint swatches. 

“We want the onyx black for the trim. Not the pitch black,” she instructed, 
tapping the swatches. “I think you brought the wrong paint.” 

I tugged on her sleeve. “Mom. Buster’s really bored. Can I take him for a 
walk?” 

“Of course not,” she replied quickly. “You’re grounded.” 

“Please,” I begged. “Buster needs a walk. And that paint smell is making 
me sick.” I held my stomach and made gagging sounds. 

The painter shifted impatiently from foot to foot. “Okay, okay,” Mom said. 
“Take the dog.” 

“Excellent! Thanks, Mom!” I cried. I darted through the kitchen and into 
the back yard. “Good news, Buster,” I exclaimed. “We’re free!” 

Buster wagged his stumpy tail. I untied the long rope and clipped a short 
leash to his collar. 

We walked about two miles. All the way down to Buttermilk Pond. That’s 
our favorite stick-chasing spot. 

I tossed a fat stick into the water. Buster plunged into the cold pond and 
fetched it. We did that over and over until it was three o’clock. Time to go home. 

On the way back to the house, we stopped at the Creamy Cow. They have 
the best ice cream in town. 

I used the last bit of my allowance to treat us both to double-dip chocolate- 
chip cookie dough cones. Buster liked the cookie dough, but he left all the 
chocolate chips on the ground. 

After we finished our ice cream, we continued home. Buster pulled at his 
leash excitedly as we strolled up the driveway. He seemed really happy to be 
back. 

He dragged me into the front yard and sniffed everything. The evergreen 
bushes. The flamingos. The deer. The gnomes. 

The gnomes. 

Was something different about the gnomes? 

I dropped Buster’s leash and bent down for a closer look. 

I studied their fat little hands. What were those dark smudges on their 
fingertips. Dirt? 

I rubbed their chubby fingers. But the smudges remained. 

No. Not dirt. 

I leaned in closer. 

Paint. Black paint. 

12 

Black paint. The same color as the smiley faces on Mr. McCall’s casabas! 

I swallowed hard. What’s going on here? I wondered. How could the 
gnomes’ hands be covered in paint? 

I’ve got to show someone, I decided. 

Mom! She’s in the house. She’ll help me figure this out. 

As I reached our front door, I heard a scraping sound coming from the 
McCalls’ yard. 

“Buster! No!” I shouted. 

Buster circled Mr. McCall’s vegetable patch, his leash dragging behind him. 

I quickly shoved my hand under my T-shirt and yanked out my dog whistle. 
I blew it hard. 

Buster trotted right back to me. 

“Good boy!” I cried in relief. I shook my finger in his face. I tried to be 
stern. “Buster, if you don’t want to be tied up, you have to stay out of that 
garden!” 

Buster licked my finger with his long, sticky tongue. Then he turned to lick 
the gnomes. 

I watched Buster slobber all over them. 

“Oh, no!” I cried. “Not again!” 

Chip’s and Hap’s mouths gaped wide open. In the same terrified 
expressions I had seen before. As if they were trying to scream. 

I slammed my eyes shut. I opened one slowly. 

The terrified expressions remained. 

What was going on here? Were the gnomes afraid of Buster? Was I going 
crazy? 

My hands trembled as I quickly tied Buster to the tree. Then I ran into the 
house to search for Mom. 

“Mom! Mom!” I panted breathlessly. I found her upstairs, working in her 
office. “You’ve got to come outside! Now!” 

Mom whirled around from her computer. “What’s wrong?” she demanded. 

“It’s the gnomes!” I cried. “There’s black paint on their hands. And they’re 

not grinning anymore. Come out. You’ll see!” 

Mom slowly shoved her chair away from the computer. “Joe, if this is 
another joke...” 

“Please, Mom. It will just take a second. It’s not a joke. Really!” 

Mom led the way downstairs. She gazed at the gnomes from the front door. 

“See?” I cried, standing behind her. “I told you! Look at their faces. They 
look like they’re screaming!” 

Mom narrowed her eyes. “Joe, give me a break. Why did you get me away 
from my work? They have the same dumb grins they always have.” 

“What?” I gasped. I ran outside. I stared at the gnomes. 

They stared back at me. Grinning. 

“Joe, I really wish you’d stop the dumb gnome jokes,” Mom said sharply. 
“They’re not funny. Not funny at all.” 

“But look at the paint on their fingers!” 

“That’s just dirt,” she said impatiently. “Please, go read a book. Or clean 
your room. Find something to do. You’re driving me crazy!” 

I sat down on the grass. Alone. To think. 

I thought about the casaba seed on one of the gnome’s lips. I remembered 
the first time their mouths had twisted in horror. That was the first time Buster 
had licked them. 

And now they had paint on their fingers. 

It all added up. 

The gnomes are alive, I decided. 

And they’re doing horrible things in the McCalls’ garden. 

The gnomes? Doing horrible things? I must be losing my mind! 

Suddenly, I didn’t feel too well. Nothing made any sense. 

I stood up to go inside. 

And heard whispers. 

Gruff whispers. Down at my feet. 

“Not funny, Joe,” Hap whispered. 

“Not funny at all,” Chip rasped. 

13 

Should I tell Mom and Dad what I heard? I wondered as we ate dinner that 
night. 

“How was everyone’s day?” Dad asked cheerfully. He spooned some peas 
onto his dinner plate. 

They’ll never believe me. 

“Heidi and I rode our bikes to the pool,” Mindy piped up. She arranged a 
mound of tuna casserole on her plate into a neat square. Then she flicked a stray 
pea away. “But she got a cramp in her leg, so we mostly sunbathed.” 

I have to tell. 

“I heard something really weird this afternoon,” I burst out. “Really, really 
weird.” 

“You interrupted me!” Mindy said sharply. She blotted her mouth carefully 
with her napkin. 

“But this is important!” I exclaimed. I started shredding my napkin 
nervously. “I was in the front yard. All alone. And I heard whispers.” 

I made my voice low and gruff. “The voices said, ‘Not funny, Joe. Not 
funny.’ I don’t know who it was. Nobody was there. I... uh... think it was the 
gnomes.” 

Mom banged her glass of lemonade down on the table. “Enough with these 
gnome jokes!” she declared. “No one thinks they’re funny, Joe.” 

“But it’s true!” I cried, crushing my shredded napkin into a ball. “I heard 
the voices!” 

Mindy uttered a scornful laugh. “You are so lame,” she said. “Please pass 
the bread, Dad.” 

“Sure, honey,” Dad replied, handing her the wooden tray of dinner rolls. 

And that was the end of that. 

After dinner, Dad suggested that we water the tomatoes. 

“Okay,” I replied with a shrug. Anything to get out of the house. 

“Want me to get the Bug Be Gone?” I asked as we stepped outside. 

“No! No!” he gasped. His face turned ghostly pale. 

“What’s wrong, Dad? What is it?” 

He pointed silently at the tomato patch. 

“Ohhh,” I moaned. “Oh, no!” 

Our beautiful red tomatoes had been crushed, mangled, and maimed—seeds 
and pulpy red tomato flesh everywhere. 

Dad stared openmouthed, his hands balled into fists. “Who would do such a 
terrible thing?” he sighed. 

My heart began to throb. My pulse raced. 

I knew the truth. And now everyone would have to believe me. 

“The gnomes did it, Dad!” I grabbed the sleeve of his shirt and began 
tugging him to the front yard. “You’ll see. I’ll prove it!” 

“Joe, let go of me. This is no time for jokes. Don’t you realize that we’re 
out of the garden show? We’ve lost our chance for a blue ribbon! Or any ribbon, 
for that matter.” 

“You have to believe me, Dad. Come on.” I held tightly onto Dad’s sleeve. 
And I wouldn’t let go. 

As I dragged him out front, I wondered what we would find. 

Blood-red tomato juice smeared all over their ugly faces? 

Squishy pulp hanging from their tiny fat fingers? 

Hundreds of seeds stuck to their creepy little feet? 

We approached the gnomes. 

My eyes narrowed on the hideous creatures. 

And finally we stood right before them. 

And I couldn’t believe what we found. 

14 

Nothing. 

No juice. 

No pulp. 

Not a single seed. Not one. 

I searched their bodies. Frantically. From their ugly, grinning faces to their 
creepy, stubby toes. 

No clues. Nothing. 

How could I have been wrong? My stomach lurched as I turned to face my 

dad. 

“Dad...” I started in a shaky voice. 

Dad cut me off with an angry wave of his hand. “There’s nothing to see 
here, Joe,” he muttered. “I don’t want to hear another word about the gnomes. 
Understand? Not one!” 

His brown eyes flashed with fury. “I know who’s responsible for this!” he 
said bitterly. “And he’s not going to get away with it!” 

He whirled around and trotted into the back yard. He scooped up a handful 
of smashed tomato. 

The juice oozed between his fingers as he circled the house and charged 
next door. 

I watched Dad march up the McCalls’ steps and jab at the doorbell. He 
began howling before anyone answered the ring. “Bill! Come out here. Now!” 

I crouched behind Dad. I’d never seen him this angry before. 

I heard the lock turn. The door swung open. And there stood Mr. McCall. In 
a white jogging outfit. Holding a half-eaten pork chop in one hand. 

“Jeffrey, what are you yelling about? It’s difficult to digest with all this 
noise.” He chuckled. 

“Well, digest this!” Dad screamed. Then he brought his hand up and hurled 
the smashed tomatoes. 

They splattered against Mr. McCall’s white T-shirt and dribbled down his 
white sweatpants. Some of the mushy pulp landed on his clean white sneakers. 

Mr. McCall stared down at his clothes in total disbelief. “Are you nuts?” he 
bellowed. 

“No. You are!” my father shrieked. “How could you do this? For a stupid 
blue ribbon!” 

“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall shouted. 

“Oh, I see. Now you’re going to play innocent. You’re going to pretend you 
don’t know anything. Well, you’re not going to get away with this.” 

Mr. McCall stomped down the steps and planted himself about an inch 
away from my dad. He puffed out his broad chest and hung over my father 
menacingly. 

“I didn’t touch your lousy tomatoes!” he roared. “You wimp! You probably 
bought your blue-ribbon tomatoes last year.” 

Dad shook an angry fist in Mr. McCall’s glaring face. “My tomatoes were 
the best at the show! Yours looked like raisins next to mine! And whoever heard 
of growing casabas in Minnesota, anyway? You’re going to be the joke of the 
garden show!” 

My whole body shuddered. They’re going to get into a fist fight, I realized. 
And Mr. McCall will squash my dad. 

“Joke?” Mr. McCall growled. “You’re the joke. You and your sour 
tomatoes. And those stupid lawn ornaments! Now leave before I really lose 
control!” 

Mr. McCall stomped up to his front door. Then he spun around and said, “I 
don’t want my son hanging around with Joe anymore! Your son probably 
wrecked your tomatoes. Just as he wrecked my melons!” 

He disappeared into the house, slamming the door so hard, the porch shook. 

That night I tossed and turned in bed for hours. Faces painted on melons. 
Crushed tomatoes. 

Whispering lawn gnomes. I couldn’t think of anything else. 

It was way after midnight, but I couldn’t sleep. The gnomes with their 
leering smiles danced before my closed eyes. 

Those grinning faces. Laughing. Laughing at me. 

Suddenly the room felt hot and stuffy. I kicked off the thin sheet that 
covered my legs. Still too hot. 

I jumped out of bed and headed for my window. I threw it wide open. 
Warm, wet air rushed in. 

I rested my arms on the windowsill and peered out into the darkness. It was 
a foggy night. A thick gray mist swirled over the front yard. Despite the heat, I 

felt a chill down my back. I had never seen it this foggy before. 

The fog shifted slightly. The angel slowly came into view as the fog moved 
away. Then the seal. The skunks. The swans. A flash of pink—the flamingos. 
And there stood the deer. 

Alone. 

All alone. 

The gnomes were gone. 

15 

“Mom! Dad!” I cried. Racing to their bedroom. “Wake up! Wake up! The 
gnomes are gone!” 

Mom bolted straight up. “What? What’s wrong?” 

Dad didn’t budge. 

“It’s the gnomes!” I shouted, shaking Dad’s shoulder. “Wake up!” 

My father opened one eye and squinted up at me. “What time is it?” he 
mumbled. 

“Get up, Dad!” I pleaded. 

Mom groaned as she snapped on the light next to her bed. “Joe. It’s so late. 
Why did you wake us up?” 

“They’re—they’re gone!” I stammered. “They disappeared. I’m not 
kidding. I’m really not.” 

My parents glanced at each other. Then they glared at me. “Enough!” Mom 
cried. “We’re tired of your jokes. And it’s the middle of the night! Get to bed!” 

“Right now!” Dad added sternly. “We’ve had just about enough of this 
nonsense. We’re going to have a serious talk about this. In the morning.” 

“But—but—but—” I stammered. 

“Go!” Dad shouted. 

I backed out of the room slowly, stumbling over someone’s slipper. 

I should have realized that they wouldn’t believe me. But someone had to 
believe me. Someone had to. 

I raced down the dark hall to Mindy’s room. As I neared her bed, I could 
hear the whistling sounds she always makes when she lies on her back. She was 
fast asleep. 

I stared down at her for a moment. Should I wake her? Would she believe 

me? 

I patted her on the cheek. “Mindy. Wake up,” I whispered. 

Nothing. 

I called her name again. A little louder. 

Her eyes fluttered open. “Joe?” she asked drowsily. 

“Get up. Quick!” I whispered. “You have to see this!” 

“Have to see what?” she groaned. 

“The gnomes. The gnomes have disappeared!” I exclaimed. “I think they 
ran away! Please, get up. Please.” 

“The gnomes?” she mumbled. 

“Come on, Mindy. Get up,” I pleaded. “It’s an emergency!” 

Mindy’s eyes shot wide open. “Emergency? What? What emergency?” 

“It’s the gnomes. They’ve really disappeared. You have to come outside 
with me.” 

“That’s the emergency?” she screeched. “Are you crazy? I’m not going 
anywhere with you. You’ve totally lost it, Joe. Totally.” 

“But, Mindy—” 

“Quit bugging me. I’m going back to sleep.” 

Then she closed her eyes and pulled the sheet over her head. 

I stood in her dark, silent room. 

No one would believe me. No one would come with me. What should I do 
now? What? 

I imagined the gnomes ripping up every last vegetable in our garden. 
Yanking out the yams and smashing the squash. And for dessert, chomping on 
the rest of Mr. McCall’s casabas! 

I knew I had to do something. Fast! 

I ran from Mindy’s room and raced down the stairs. I jerked the front door 
open and sprinted outside. 

Outside into the murky fog. 

Swallowed up inside the thick blanket of mist. 

So dark and foggy. I could barely see. I felt as if I were moving through a 
dark dream. A nightmare of grays and blacks. All shadows. Nothing but 
shadows. 

I inched forward slowly, moving as if I were underwater. The grass felt so 
wet against my bare feet. But I couldn’t even see my own feet through the thick 
carpet of fog. 

Like a dream. Like a heavy, dark dream. So many shifting shadows. So 
silent. Eerily silent. 

I pushed on into the haze. I had lost all sense of direction. Was I heading 
toward the street? 

“Ohhh!” I cried out when something grabbed my ankle. 

Frantically, I shook my leg. Tried to break free. 

But it held on. 

And pulled me down. 

Down into the whirling darkness. 

A snake. 

No. Not a snake. The garden hose. The garden hose that I had forgotten to 
roll up after watering the lawn that night. 

Get a grip, Joe. I told myself. You have to calm down. 

I pulled myself up and staggered forward. Squinting hard. Trying to see my 
way. Shadowy figures seemed to reach for me, bend toward me. 

I wanted to turn back. And go inside. And climb into my nice, dry bed. 

Yes. That’s what I should do, I decided. 

I turned slowly. 

And heard a shuffling sound. The soft thud of footsteps. Nearby. 

I listened closely. 

And heard the sounds again. Footsteps as light as the mist. 

I was breathing hard now. My heart pounding. My bare feet chilled and wet. 
The dampness creeping up my legs. My entire body shuddered. 

I heard a raspy cackle. A gnome? 

I tried to turn. Tried to see it in the billowing blackness. 

But it grabbed me from behind. Hard around the waist. 

And with a dry, evil laugh, it threw me to the ground! 

16 

As I hit the wet ground, I heard the low, evil laugh again. 

And recognized it. 

“Moose?” 

“Scared you big time!” he muttered. He helped me to my feet. Even in the 
fog, I could see the big grin on his face. 

“Moose—what are you doing out here?” I managed to cry. 

“I couldn’t sleep. I kept hearing weird sounds. I was staring out into the fog 
—and I saw you. What are you doing out here, Joe? Causing more trouble?” 

I wiped wet blades of grass from my hands. “I haven’t been causing the 
trouble,” I told him. “You’ve got to believe me. Look—the two lawn gnomes— 
they’re gone.” 

I pointed to the deer. Moose could see that the gnomes weren’t standing in 
their spots. 

He stared for a long time. “This is a trick—right?” 

“No. It’s for real. I’ve got to find them.” 

Moose frowned at me. “What did you do, hide the ugly little creeps? Where 
are they? Come on, tell me!” 

“I didn’t hide them,” I insisted. 

“Tell me,” he repeated, leaning over me, bringing his face an inch from 
mine. “Or suffer the Ten Tortures!” 

Moose shoved his huge hands hard against my chest. I fell back and landed 
in the wet grass again. He thumped down on my stomach and pinned my arms to 
the ground. 

“Tell me!” Moose insisted. “Tell me where they are!” Then he bounced up 
and down on top of me. 

“Stop!” I gasped. “Stop!” 

He stopped because lights flashed on in both of our houses. 

“Oh, wow,” I whispered. “We’re in major trouble now.” 

I heard my front door bang open. A second later, Moose’s door opened, too. 

We froze. “Keep quiet,” I whispered. “Maybe they won’t see us.” 

“Who’s out here?” my father called. 

“What’s going on, Jeffrey?” I heard Mr. McCall shout. “What’s all the noise 
out here?” 

“I don’t know,” my dad replied. “I thought maybe Joe...” His voice trailed 
off. 

We’re safe, I thought. We’re hidden by the fog. 

Then I heard a low click. The long, thin beam of a flashlight swept across 
the yard. It settled on Moose and me. 

“Joe!” Dad screamed. “What are you doing out there? Why didn’t you 
answer me?” 

“Moose!” Mr. McCall shouted in a deep, angry voice. “Get in here. Move 
it!” 

Moose climbed up and raced into his house. 

I hoisted myself up from the grass for the second time that night and slowly 
made my way inside. 

Dad crossed his arms tightly across his chest. “You woke us up twice 
tonight! And you’re outside in the middle of the night again! What’s wrong with 
you?” 

“Listen, Dad, I only went outside because the gnomes are missing! Check,” 
I begged. “You’ll see!” 

My father glared at me with narrowed eyes. “These gnome stories are 
getting out of hand!” he snapped. “I’ve had it! Now go upstairs. Before I ground 
you for the entire summer!” 

“Dad, I’m begging you. I’ve never been so serious in my life. Please look,” 
I pleaded. “Please. Please. Please!” And then I added, “I’ll never ask you for 
anything else again.” 

I guess that’s what convinced him. 

“Okay,” he said, sighing wearily. “But if this is another joke...” 

My father stepped over to the living room window and peered out into the 
swirling fog. 

“Please let the gnomes still be gone! ” I prayed silently. “Please let Dad see 
that I’m telling the truth. Please...” 

17 

“Joe, you’re right!” my father declared. “The gnomes aren’t out there.” 

He believed me! Finally! I jumped up and shot a fist into the air. “Yes!” I 
cheered. 

Dad wiped at the moist glass pane with his pajama sleeve and squinted out 
the window again. 

“See, Dad! See!” I cried happily. “I was telling the truth. I wasn’t joking.” 

“Hmmm. Deer-lilah’s not there, either,” he said softly. 

“What?” I gasped, feeling my stomach churn. “No. The deer is there! I saw 
it!” 

“Hold on a minute,” Dad murmured. “Ahhh. There she is. She was hidden 
in the fog. And the gnomes! There they are! They’re right there, too. They were 
hidden in the fog. See?” 

I stared out the window. Two pointy hats broke through the mist. The two 
gnomes stood dark and still, in their places beside the deer. 

“Noooooo!” I moaned. “I know they weren’t there. I’m not playing tricks, 
Dad. I’m not!” 

“Fog can do funny things,” Dad said. “One time I was driving through a 
real pea soup of a fog. I spotted something strange through the windshield. It 
was shiny and round and it sort of hovered in the air. Oh, boy, I thought. A UFO! 
A flying saucer! I couldn’t believe it!” 

Dad patted me on the back. “Well, my UFO turned out to be a silver balloon 
tied to a parking meter. Now, Joe. Back to this gnome problem.” Dad’s face 
turned stern. “I don’t want to hear any more crazy stories. They’re only lawn 
ornaments. Nothing more. Okay? Not another word. Promise?” 

What choice did I have? “Promise,” I muttered. 

Then I dragged myself up the stairs to bed. 

What a horrible day—and night. My father thinks I’m a liar. Our tomatoes 
are ruined. And Moose isn’t allowed to hang out with me anymore. 

What else could possibly go wrong? 

I woke up the following morning with a heavy feeling in my stomach. As if I 
had swallowed a bowl of cement. 

All I could think about were the gnomes. 

Those horrible gnomes. They were destroying my summer. They were 
destroying my life! 

Forget about them, Joe, I told myself. Just forget about them. 

Anyway, today had to be better than yesterday. It sure couldn’t be worse. 

I peered out my bedroom window. All traces of the fog had been burned 
away by a bright yellow sun. Buster slept peacefully in the grass, his long white 
rope snaking through the garden. 

I glanced over at the McCalls’ house. Maybe Moose is outside helping his 
dad in the garden, I thought. 

I leaned farther out the window to get a better look. 

“Oh, noooo!” I moaned. “No!” 

18 

Globs of white paint splattered over Mr. McCall’s red Jeep! 

The roof. The hood. The windows. The whole Jeep covered in paint. 

This meant major trouble, I knew. 

I pulled on a pair of jeans and yesterday’s T-shirt and hurried outside. I 
found Moose in his driveway, his jaw clenched, shaking his head as he circled 
the Jeep. 

“Unbelievable, huh?” he said, turning to me. “When my dad saw this, he 
had a cow!” 

“Why didn’t he park in the garage?” I asked. Mr. McCall always parks the 
Jeep in their two-car garage. 

Moose shrugged. “Mom’s been cleaning out the basement and attic for a 
yard sale. She stuck about a million boxes of junk in the garage. So Dad had to 
park in the driveway last night.” 

Moose patted the roof of the Jeep. “The paint is still sticky. Touch it.” 

I touched it. Sticky. 

“My dad is steaming!” Moose declared. “At first he thought your dad did it. 
You know. Because of the tomatoes. But Mom told him that that was ridiculous. 
So he called the police. He said he won’t rest until whoever did it is thrown in 
jail!” 

“He said that?” I asked. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. “Moose, 
once the police start to check things out, they’re going to blame you and me!” 

“Blame us? Are you nuts? Why would they blame us?” he demanded. 

“Because we were both outside last night!” I said. “And everybody knows 
it.” 

Moose’s dark brown eyes flickered with fear. “You’re right,” he said. “What 
are we going to do?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied sadly. I paced back and forth in the McCalls’ 
driveway, thinking hard. The asphalt felt warm and sticky on my bare feet. 

I moved to the grass. And noticed a line of small white paint spots. 

“Hey, what’s this?” I cried. 

I followed the paint trail across the grass. 

Over the petunias. 

To the corner of my yard. 

The paint drips ended where the gnomes stood, grinning at me. 

“I knew it! I knew it!” I cried out. “Moose, come look at this trail. The 
gnomes splashed your car! And did all the other bad things around here.” 

“Lawn gnomes?” Moose sputtered. “Joe, give up. No one will believe that. 
Why don’t you give it a rest?” 

“Check out the evidence!” I demanded. “The melon seed on the gnome’s 
lips. This trail of white paint. I even found black paint on their fingers. Right 
after your dad found the smiley faces on his casabas!” 

“Weird,” Moose muttered. “Very weird. But lawn gnomes are lawn gnomes, 
Joe. They don’t run around doing mischief.” 

“What if we prove they’re guilty?” I suggested. 

“Excuse me? How would we do that?” 

“Catch them in the act,” I replied. 

“Huh? This is nuts, Joe.” 

“Come on, Moose. We’ll do it tonight. We’ll sneak out, hide around the side 
of the house, and watch them.” 

Moose shook his head. “No way,” he answered. “I’m in big trouble after 
last night.” 

“And after the police finish, what kind of trouble will you be in then?” 

“Okay. Okay. I’ll do it,” he muttered. “But I think this whole thing is a big 
waste of time.” 

“We’re going to trap these gnomes, Moose,” I told him. “If it’s the last thing 
we do.” 

Ahhh! 

My alarm clock! It didn’t go off! 

And now it was nearly midnight. And I was late. I’d promised to meet 
Moose outside at eleven-thirty. 

I leaped out of bed, still dressed in my jeans and T-shirt. I grabbed my 
sneakers and ran outside. 

No moon. No stars. The front lawn lay blanketed in darkness. 

The yard was silent. Too silent. 

I glanced around for Moose. No sign of him. He probably went back inside 
when I didn’t show. 

What should I do now? Stay out by myself? Or go back to bed? 

Something rustled in the bushes. I gasped. 

“Joe. Joe. Over here,” Moose whispered loudly. 

He popped his head out from behind the evergreen shrubs in front of my 
house. And waved me over. 

I slid down next to him. 

Moose punched me hard on the arm. “I thought you chickened out.” 

“No way!” I whispered back. “This was my idea!” 

“Yeah, your crazy idea,” Moose replied. “I can’t believe I’m hiding behind 
a bush. In the middle of the night. Spying on lawn ornaments.” 

“I know it sounds crazy, but—” 

“Shhh. Did you hear something?” Moose interrupted. 

I heard it. A scraping sound. 

I reached into the shrub and parted the thick green branches. The needles 
clawed at my hands and arms. I jerked my arms out quickly. Too quickly. Blood 
dripped from my fingers where two needles had pierced right through my skin. 

The scraping sound came closer. 

My heart pounded in my chest. 

Closer. 

Moose and I sat there. We exchanged frightened glances. 

I had to look. I had to see what was making those sounds. 

I parted the needles once again. And stared through the mass of needled 
branches. Two small, glowing eyes met mine! 

“Get it, Moose! Get it!” I cried. 

Moose jumped up from behind the bush. Just in time—to see it scamper 
away. 

“A raccoon! It was only a raccoon!” 

I let out a long sigh. “Sorry, Moose.” 

We sat there a while longer. We parted the branches every few minutes to 
check on the gnomes. My arms were scratched raw from the rough needles. 

But the gnomes hadn’t budged. They stood grinning into the night in their 
silly suits and caps. 

I groaned. My legs felt stiff and cramped. 

Moose checked his watch. “We’ve been out here for over two hours,” he 
whispered. “Those gnomes aren’t going anywhere. I’m going home.” 

“Wait a little longer,” I begged him. “We’ll catch them. I know we will.” 

“You’re a pretty good guy,” Moose said as he parted the bushes for the 

millionth time. “So I hate to tell you this, Joe. But you’re as crazy as—” 

He didn’t finish his sentence. His mouth dropped open, and his eyes nearly 
popped out of his pudgy head. 

I peered into the shrubs—in time to see the gnomes come to life. They 
stretched their arms over their heads. And stroked their chins. 

They shook out their legs. And smoothed out their shirts. 

“They—they’re moving !” Moose cried. 

Too loudly. 

And then I lost my balance and fell. Right into the bush. 

They’ve seen us, I realized. 

Now what? 

19 

“No. Oh, man. No!” Moose whispered. He tugged me to my feet. “They’re 
moving. They’re really moving!” 

Squinting through the branches, we both stared in horror at Hap and Chip. 

The gnomes bent their knees, limbering up. Then they each took one stiff 
step. Then another. 

I was right. They are alive, I thought. Very alive. 

And they’re coming for Moose and me. 

We have to run, I told myself. We have to get out of here. 

But neither of us could take our eyes off the living lawn gnomes! 

The full moon suddenly appeared low over the trees. The front lawn lit as if 
someone had turned on a spotlight. The stocky figures swung their short, fat 
arms and began to run. Their pointed hats cut through the air like sharks’ fins. 

They scrambled toward us on their stumpy legs. 

Moose and I dropped to our knees and tried to hide. My whole body was 
trembling so hard, I was making the bush shake! 

The gnomes ran closer. So close that I could see the dark red of their evil 
eyes and the white gleam of their grins. 

I clenched my fists so tightly, my hands ached. 

What were they going to do to us? 

I shut my eyes—and heard them run past. I heard thudding footsteps. 
Whistling breaths. 

I opened my eyes to see them racing across the cement walk and around the 
side of the house. 

“Moose—they didn’t see us!” I whispered happily. 

We helped each other to our feet. I felt dizzy. The dark ground tilted. My 
legs felt soft and rubbery like Jell-O. 

Moose wiped his sweaty brow. “Where are they going?” he whispered. 

I shook my head. “I don’t know. But we have to follow them. Come on.” 

We gave each other a quick thumbs-up and stepped out from our hiding 
place. I led the way. We moved across the cement walk and past the front porch. 
Toward the side of the house. 

I stopped when I heard their raspy voices, talking low. Just up ahead. 

Moose grabbed my shoulder, his eyes wide open in alarm. “I’m getting out 
of here. Now!” 

I turned around. “No!” I pleaded. “You’ve got to stay and help me catch 
them. We have to show our parents what’s been going on here.” 

He heaved a long sigh. It made me feel a little better to know that a big, 
tough guy like Moose was as frightened as I was. Finally, he nodded. “Okay. 
Let’s go get them.” 

Keeping in the dark shadow of the house, we made our way around to the 
back. I saw Buster, sound asleep beside his dog house in the center of the yard. 

And then I saw the two lawn gnomes. They were bent over the pile of paint 
and brushes and drop cloths the painters had left beside the garage. 

Moose and I hung back as Hap and Chip picked up two cans of black paint. 
They pried the cans open with their thick fingers. 

Giggling, the two gnomes swung back the open cans, then hurled the black 
paint at the side of my house. The black paint spattered the fresh white paint, 
then dripped down in long, thick streaks. 

I clapped a hand over my mouth to keep from screaming. 

I knew it. I’d know it all along. But no one would believe me. The gnomes 
were behind all the trouble around here. 

The gnomes returned to the pile for more paint. “We’ve got to stop them,” I 
whispered to Moose. “But how?” 

“Let’s just tackle them,” Moose suggested. “Tackle them from behind and 
pin them down.” 

It sounded simple enough. They were little, after all. Smaller than us. 
“Okay,” I whispered, my stomach fluttering. “Then we’ll drag them into the 
house and show my parents.” 

I took a deep breath and held it. Moose and I started to inch forward. 

Closer. Closer. 

If only my legs weren’t wobbling like rubber bands! 

Closer. 

And then I saw Moose go down. 

He toppled forward—and hit the ground hard, letting out a loud “Oooof! ” 

It took me a second to see that he had tripped over Buster’s rope. 

He struggled to get to his feet. But the rope had tangled around his ankle. 

He reached down with both hands. Gave it a hard tug. 

And woke up Buster! 

“Rrrrrrowwwwwf! Rrrrrrowwwwwf!” Buster must have seen the gnomes 
because he started barking his head off. 

The gnomes spun around. 

And fixed their eyes on us. In the bright moonlight, their faces turned hard 
and angry. 

“Get them!” Chip growled. “Don’t let them escape!” 

20 

“Run!” I screamed. 

Moose and I bolted toward the front of the house. 

Buster was still barking his head off. 

And over the barking, I heard shrill giggles. The gnomes giggled as they 
chased after us. 

Their feet slapped sharply on the grass. I glanced back, saw their stubby 
legs moving fast, a blur of motion. 

I pumped my legs, gasping for breath, and rounded the side of the house. 

I could hear the high-pitched giggles of the two gnomes close behind us. 
“Help!” Moose cried. “Somebody—help us!” 

My mouth hung open. I struggled to breathe. They were gaining on us. 

I knew I had to run faster. But my legs suddenly felt as heavy as bricks. 
“Hellllp!” Moose called. 

I glanced at the house. Why wasn’t anyone waking up in there? 

We ran around the house and kept running. 

Why were Hap and Chip giggling like that? 

Because they knew they were going to catch us? 

I felt a stab of pain in my side. “Oh, no!” A cramp. 

I felt Moose tugging me. “Don’t slow down, Joe. Keep going!” 

The pain sharpened, like a knife in my side. “Can’t run...” I choked out. 
“Joe—keep going! Don’t stop!” Moose cried, frantically pulling my arm. 
But I doubled over, holding my side. 

It’s all over, I thought. They’ve got me. 

And then the front door swung open. The porch light flashed on. 

“What’s going on out here?” a familiar voice called. 

Mindy! 

She stepped out, pulling at the belt of her pink bathrobe. I saw her squint 
into the darkness. 

“Mindy!” I called. “Mindy—watch out!” 

Too late. 

The gnomes grabbed her. 

Giggling loudly, they pinned her arms back. Dragged her down the porch 
steps. Carried her to the street. 

21 

Mindy thrashed her arms and kicked her legs. But the giggling gnomes had 
surprising strength. 

“Help me!” Mindy called back to Moose and me. “Don’t just stand there— 
help me! ” 

I swallowed hard. The pain in my side faded. 

Moose and I didn’t say a word. We just started chasing after them. 

They had already carried Mindy to the street. Their feet slapped on the 
pavement. In the light from the street lamp, I saw Mindy struggling to free 
herself. 

Moose and I hurtled down the driveway. “Put her down!” I shouted 
breathlessly. “Put my sister down—now!” 

More giggles. They scurried past the McCalls’ house. Past the next two 
houses. 

Moose and I ran after them, shouting, begging them to stop. 

And then—to our shock—they did stop. 

In the shadow of a tall hedge, they set Mindy down. And turned to us. “We 
mean you no harm,” Chip said. 

The gnomes’ expressions were serious now. Their eyes peered at us through 
the darkness. 

“I don’t believe this!” Mindy cried, straightening her robe. “This is crazy! 
Crazy!” 

“Tell me about it,” I muttered. 

“Please listen to us,” Hap rasped. 

“We mean you no harm,” Chip repeated. 

“No harm!” Mindy shrieked. “No harm! You just dragged me from my 
home! You—you—” 

“We only wanted to get your attention,” Hap said softly. 

“Well, you’ve got it!” Mindy exclaimed. 

“We mean you no harm,” Chip said once again. “Please believe us.” 

“How can we believe you?” I demanded, finally finding my voice. “Look at 
all the trouble you’ve caused. You’ve ruined the gardens! You splashed paint 
everywhere! You—” 

“We can’t help it,” Hap interrupted. 

“We really can’t,” Chip echoed. “You see, we’re Mischief Elves.” 

“You’re what?” Mindy cried. 

“We’re Mischief Elves. We do mischief. That’s our mission in life,” Hap 
explained. 

“Wherever there is mischief in the world, we’re there,” Chip added. 
“Mischief is our job. We can’t help ourselves.” 

He bent down and broke off a chunk of the concrete curb. Then he pulled 
open the mailbox across from us and shoved the piece of concrete inside. 

“See? I can’t help myself. I have to do mischief wherever I go.” 

Hap giggled. “Without us, the world would be a pretty dull place— 
wouldn’t it?” 

“It would be a much better place,” Mindy insisted, crossing her arms in 
front of her. 

Moose still hadn’t said a word. He just stood and stared at the two talking 
lawn gnomes. 

Hap and Chip made pouty faces. “Please don’t hurt our feelings,” Chip 
rasped. “Our life isn’t easy.” 

“We need your help,” Hap added. 

“You want us to help you do mischief?” I cried. “No way! You’ve already 
gotten me into major trouble.” 

“No. We need you to help get us our freedom,” Chip said solemnly. “Please 
—listen and believe.” 

“Listen and believe,” Hap echoed. 

“We lived in a land far from here,” Chip began. “In a forest deep and green. 
We guarded the mines and protected the trees. We performed our mischief 
innocently. But we also did a lot of good.” 

“We were hard-working people,” Hap told us, scratching his head. “And we 
were happy in our forest home.” 

“But then the mines were closed and the forests were cut down,” Chip 
continued. “We were captured. Kidnapped. And taken far from home. We were 
shipped to your country and forced to work as lawn ornaments.” 

“Slaves,” Hap said, shaking his head sadly. “Forced to stand all day and 
night.” 

“That’s impossible!” Mindy cried. “Don’t you get bored? How do you stand 
so still?” 

“We go into a trance,” Chip explained. “Time passes without our realizing 
it. We come out of the trance at night and go about doing our job.” 

“You mean mischief!” I declared. 

They both nodded. 

“But we want to be free,” Hap continued. “To go where we want. To live 
where we choose. We want to find another forest where we can live in freedom.” 
Two tiny gnome tears rolled down his fat cheeks. 

Chip sighed and raised his eyes to me. “Will you help us?” 

“Help you do what?” I demanded. 

“Help our friends and us escape?” Chip replied. 

“There are six others,” Hap explained. “They’re locked in the basement. At 
the store where you bought us. We need your help to set them free.” 

“We can climb into the basement window,” his friend continued. “But we 
are too short to climb back out. And too short to reach the doorknob to let 
ourselves out through the door.” 

“Will you help us escape?” Hap pleaded, tugging the bottom of my T-shirt. 
“You just have to climb down into the basement. Then help our six friends out 
the basement door.” 

“Please help us,” Chip begged, tears in his eyes. “Then we’ll be gone. To a 
deep forest. And we will never cause you any more mischief.” 

“That sounds good to me!” Mindy exclaimed. 

“So you’ll do it?” Hap squealed. 

They both began tugging at us, chirping, “Please? Please? Please? Please? 
Please?” 

Moose, Mindy, and I exchanged troubled glances. 

What should we do? 

22 

“Please? Please? Please? Please?” 

“Let’s help them,” Moose said, finally finding his voice. 

I turned to Mindy. I didn’t usually ask her advice. But she was the oldest. 
“What do you think?” 

Mindy bit her lower lip. “Well, look how much Buster hates to be tied up,” 
she said. “He only wants to be free. I guess everything deserves to be free. Even 
lawn gnomes.” 

I turned back to the gnomes. “We’ll do it!” I declared. “We’ll help you.” 

“Thank you! Thank you!” Chip cried happily. He threw his arms around 
Hap. “You don’t know what this means to us!” 

“Thank you! Thank you! Thank you!” Hap squealed. He leaped into the air 
and clicked the heels of his boots together. “Hurry! Let’s go!” 

“Now?” Mindy cried. “It’s the middle of the night! Can’t we wait until 
tomorrow?” 

“No. Please. Now,” Hap insisted. 

“In the darkness,” Chip added. “While the store is closed. Please. Let’s 
hurry.” 

“I’m not dressed,” Mindy replied. “I really don’t think we can go now. I 
think—” 

“If we stay here longer, we’ll have to do more mischief,” Chip said with a 
wink. 

I sure didn’t want that to happen. “Let’s do it now!” I agreed. 

And so the five of us crept along the dark street and up the steep hill toward 
Lawn Lovely. Wow, did I feel weird! Here we were, walking around in the 
middle of the night with a couple of lawn ornaments! About to break into the 
store and set six more lawn ornaments free! 

The old pink house was a strange enough place during the day. But at night, 
it was totally creepy. All those lawn animals—deer and seals and flamingos— 
stared at us through the darkness, with blank, lifeless eyes. 

Were they alive, too? I wondered. 

Hap seemed to read my mind. “They’re only for decoration,” he sneered. 
“Nothing more.” 

The two excited gnomes made their way quickly across the wide lawn and 
around the side of Mrs. Anderson’s house. Moose, Mindy, and I followed 
behind. 

Mindy clutched my arm with an ice-cold hand. My legs still felt wobbly. 
But my heart was pounding with excitement—not fear. 

Hap and Chip pointed to the long, low window that led down to the 
basement. I knelt down and peered inside. Total darkness. 

“You’re sure the other gnomes are down there?” I asked. 

“Oh, yes,” Chip declared eagerly. “All six. They’re waiting for you to 
rescue them.” 

“Please hurry,” Hap pleaded, shoving me gently to the window. “Before the 
old woman hears us and wakes up.” 

I lowered myself to the edge of the open window. And turned back to my 
sister and Moose. 

“We’re coming right behind you,” Moose whispered. 

“Let’s rescue them and get out of here,” Mindy urged. 

“Here goes,” I said softly. 

I crossed my fingers and slid down into the darkness. 

23 

I bumped over the window frame and landed on my feet. A few seconds later, I 
heard Moose and Mindy slide in after me. 

I squinted into the blackness that surrounded us. I couldn’t see a thing. I 
licked my dry lips and sniffed the air. A sharp smell, like vinegar, filled the hot, 
damp basement. Sweat, I thought. Gnome sweat. 

I heard a low giggle from outside. Chip and Hap hurtled over the window 
ledge and thudded to the floor. 

“Hey, guys—” I whispered. 

But they scampered off into the darkness. 

“What’s going on here?” Moose demanded. 

“We’ve got to find the light switch,” Mindy whispered. 

But before we could move, the ceiling lights all flashed on. I blinked in the 
sudden blaze of brightness. 

And then gasped as I stared across the vast basement—at a sea of lawn 
gnomes! 

Not six! Six hundred ! Row after row of them, jammed against each other, 
staring at the three of us. 

“Whoa!” Moose cried. “It’s a mob!” 

“Hap and Chip lied to us!” I cried. 

Their shirts were different colors. But the lawn gnomes all looked exactly 
alike. They all wore pointed caps and black belts. They all had staring red eyes, 
wide noses, grinning lips, and large pointy ears. 

I was so startled to see so many of the ugly creatures, it took me a while to 
spot Hap and Chip. Finally, I saw them at the side of the room. 

Hap clapped his hands three times. 

And three more times. Short, sharp claps that echoed off the basement 
walls. 

And then the crowd of gnomes came to life, stretching and bending, 
grinning and giggling, chattering in shrill, excited voices. 

Mindy grabbed my arm. “We’ve got to get out of here.” 

I could barely hear her over the chattering, giggling mob of gnomes. I 
glanced up at the basement window. It suddenly seemed so high, so far away. 

When I turned back, Hap and Chip had moved in front of us. They clapped 
their hands for attention. 

The hundreds of gnomes instantly fell silent. 

“We have brought the young humans!” Hap announced, grinning happily. 

“We have kept our promise!” Chip declared. 

Giggles and cheering. 

And then, to my horror, the gnomes began moving forward. Their eyes 
flashed excitedly. They reached out their stubby arms toward us. The pointed 
hats bobbed and slid forward, like sharks on the attack. 

Mindy, Moose, and I backed up. Backed up to the wall. 

The gnomes crowded up against us. Their little hands plucked at my 
clothes, slapped my face, pulled my hair. 

“Stop!” I shrieked. “Get back! Get back!” 

“We came to help you!” I heard Mindy scream. “Please—we came to help 
you escape!” 

Loud giggling. 

“But we don’t want to escape!” a grinning gnome declared. “Now that 
you’re here, it’s going to be so much fun!” 

24 

Fun? 

What did he mean by fun ? 

Hap and Chip pushed their way back to the front and stepped up beside us. 
They clapped their hands together to silence the giggling, chattering crowd. 

The basement instantly turned silent. 

“You tricked us!” Mindy screamed at the two gnomes. “You lied to us!” 
They giggled in reply and slapped each other’s shoulders gleefully. 

“I can’t believe you fell for our sad story,” Hap said, shaking his head. 

“We told you we’re Mischief Gnomes,” Chip sneered. “You should have 
known we were playing mischief!” 

“Great joke, guys,” I said, forcing a hoarse laugh. “You fooled us. Way to 
go. So now let us go home, okay?” 

“Yeah. Let us go home!” Moose insisted. 

The whole room erupted in laughter. 

Hap shook his head. “But the mischief has just begun!” he declared. 

Cheers and giggles. 

Chip turned to the crowd of excited gnomes. “So what shall we do with our 
lovely prisoners? Any ideas?” 

“Let’s see if they bounce!” a gnome called from near the back of the room. 
“Yeah! Dribble them!” 

“A dribbling contest!” 

“No—bounce them against the wall. Bounce and catch!” 

More cheers. 

“No! Fold them into tiny squares! I love it when we fold humans into 
squares!” 

“Yes! A folding contest!” another gnome cried. 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” several gnomes began to chant. 

“Tickle them!” a gnome in front suggested. 

“Tickle them for hours!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

The room rang out with their excited chants. 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!” 

I turned to Moose. He stared out at the crowd of chanting gnomes, dazed 
and frightened. His eyes bulged and his chin quivered. 

Mindy had her back pressed up against the basement wall. Her blond hair 
was matted to her forehead. Her hands were jammed into the pockets of her 
bathrobe. 

“What are we going to do?” she asked me, shouting over the excited chants. 

Suddenly I had an idea. 

I raised my arms high over my head. “Quiet! ” I screamed. 

The room instantly grew silent. Hundreds of red eyes glared at me. 

“Let us go!” I demanded. “Or the three of us will scream at the top of our 
lungs. We will wake up Mrs. Anderson. And she will be down here in a second 
to rescue us!” 

Silence. 

Had I frightened them? 

No. The gnomes burst into loud, scornful laughter. They slapped each 
other’s shoulders, hooted, and giggled. 

“You’ll have to do better than that!” Hap grinned up at me. “We all know 
that Mrs. Anderson can’t hear a thing.” 

“Go ahead and shout,” Chip urged. “Shout all you want. We like it when 
humans shout.” He turned to Hap, and the two of them slapped each other’s 
shoulders and fell on the floor, giggling gleefully, kicking their feet in the air. 

Over the vast basement, the chants started up again. 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!” 

With a long sigh, I turned to my frightened sister and friend. “We’re 
doomed,” I muttered. “We don’t have a chance.” 

25 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

A new chant started in the back of the room and swept up toward the front. 

“Yes!” Hap and Chip declared happily. 

“Excellent mischief!” Hap cried. 

“A Tug of War! We’ll tug them till they stretch!” Chip shouted. 

“Stretch them! Stretch them!” 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

“Joe—what are we going to do?” I heard Mindy’s frightened voice over the 
enthusiastic chants. 

Think, Joe, I urged myself. Think! There has to be a way out of this 
basement. 

But I felt so dazed. The chants rang in my ears. The grinning faces leered 
up at us. My thoughts were a jumbled mess. 

“Stretch them! Stretch them!” 

“Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

Suddenly, over the shrill gnome voices, I heard a familiar sound. 

A dog’s bark. 

Buster’s bark. 

“Buster!” Mindy cried. “I hear him!” 

“I—I did too!” I exclaimed, turning and raising my eyes to the window 
above our heads. “He followed us! He must be right outside!” 

I desperately wished Buster could talk. Could run home and tell Mom and 
Dad that we were in terrible trouble. 

But he could only bark. Or... could he do more? 

I suddenly remembered how frightened Hap and Chip appeared whenever 
Buster came around. The terrified expressions on their faces. 

My heart fluttered with hope. Maybe the gnomes are afraid of dogs. Maybe 
Buster can scare them into letting us go. Maybe he can even frighten them back 
into their trance. 

I edged closer to my sister, my back pressed against the wall. “Mindy, I 

think the gnomes are afraid of Buster. If we get him down here, I think he can 
save us.” 

We didn’t hesitate. All three of us started shouting up to the window. 
“Buster! Buster! Come here, boy!” 

Could he hear us over the chanting gnomes? 

Yes! 

His big head peered down at us through the window. 

“Good boy!” I cried. “Now, come here. Come down here, Buster!” 

Buster’s mouth opened. His pink tongue drooped from his mouth, and he 
started to pant. 

“Good doggie!” I crooned. “Good doggie—come down here. Fast! Come, 
boy! Come, Buster!” 

Buster poked his head into the window. And yawned. 

“Down, Buster!” Mindy ordered. “Come down here, boy!” 

He pulled his head out of the window. And settled down on the ground 
outside. I could see his head resting on his paws. 

“No, Buster!” I shrieked, shouting over the chants. “Come, boy! Don’t lie 
down! Come! Buster, come!” 

“Rowf?” He pushed his head back into the window. Farther. Farther. 

“That a boy! Come on!” I pleaded. “A little more... a little more. If you 
come down here, I’ll feed you doggie treats five times a day.” 

Buster cocked his head to the side and sniffed at the damp, sweaty air of the 
basement. 

I held my arms out to the dog. “Please, Buster. You’re our last chance. 
Please—hurry! Come down here.” 

To my dismay, Buster pulled his head out of the window. 

Turned. 

And trotted away. 

26 

Mindy and Moose let out long, disappointed sighs. “Buster deserted us,” Mindy 
said softly. Her shoulders sagged. Moose dropped to his knees on the floor, 
shaking his head. 

“Trampoline! Trampoline!” 

The chant had changed. 

Hap grinned up at us. “Maybe we’ll use you for trampolines! That would be 
fun!” 

“It’s almost time for a vote!” Chip added, rubbing his hands together 
eagerly. 

“Trampoline! Trampoline!” 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

I held my hands over my ears, trying to block out the sound of their shrill 
voices. 

Silence. Please let me have silence, I thought. 

Silence. 

The word gave me an idea. 

Silence. Buster’s dog whistle was silent! 

Suddenly, I knew how to bring Buster back! 

“Mindy!” I cried “The dog whistle! Buster always comes when I blow the 
dog whistle!” 

Mindy raised her head and brightened. “That’s right!” she cried. “Hurry, 
Joe!” 

I grabbed for the shiny metal whistle under my T-shirt. It felt slippery with 
sweat. This has to work, I thought to myself. It has to bring Buster back. 

I pulled the whistle out. 

“The whistle!” several gnomes shrieked. 

The room instantly grew silent. 

I raised the whistle to my lips. 

“Quick—blow it!” Mindy screeched. 

To my surprise, Hap and Chip both dove at me. 

They leaped up and slapped at the whistle. 

The whistle spun out of my hands. 

“Noooo!” I cried in despair. 

I grabbed frantically for it. 

But it rolled and tumbled away, sliding across the basement floor. 

27 

Mindy, Moose, and I all dove for it. 

But the gnomes were quicker. 

A gnome in a bright blue shirt raised the whistle, clutched tightly in his 
little fist. “I’ve got it!” 

“No, you don’t!” Moose cried. He leaped at the gnome. Tackled him around 
the knees. 

The gnome let out a yelp as he went toppling to the floor. 

The dog whistle fell from his hand. 

And bounced across the hard floor toward me. 

I scooped it up. Started to raise it to my lips. 

Three gnomes leaped onto my shoulders, giggling and grunting. 

“Noooo!” I uttered a cry as they batted the whistle from my hand. I dropped 
to the floor, three gnomes on top of me. 

I finally shook them off and jumped to my feet. My eyes searched for the 
whistle. 

I saw a bunch of gnomes diving for the floor, scrambling for it. A few feet 
away, Moose struggled against four or five gnomes who had formed a line to 
block him. Mindy was battling another group of gnomes, who held her back, 
their tiny hands around her legs and waist. 

And then I saw Hap raise the whistle high. 

The gnomes stepped back, clearing a circle around him. 

Hap set the whistle in front of him on the floor. Then he raised his foot 

high. 

He was about to crush it! 

“Noooooo!” Another long cry escaped my throat. I scrambled over the 
floor, half-crawling, half-flying. 

As Hap’s heavy plaster foot came down, I stretched out my hand. 

Fumbled for the whistle. 

Grabbed it. 

Rolled away as the gnome’s foot tromped down heavily. It thudded inches 
from my head. 

I sat up. Raised the whistle to my lips. 
And blew as hard as I could. 

Now what? 

Would the whistle work? 

Would Buster come running to rescue us? 

28 

I blew the silent whistle again. 

And turned to the window. Buster, where are you? 

The gnomes must have been asking the same question. Because they froze 
in place, too. The excited chattering, giggling, and chanting stopped. 

The only sound I could hear was my own shallow breathing. 

I stared up at the window. A rectangle of blackness. No sign of Buster. 

“Hey—!” Moose’s cry made me turn around. 

“Look at them!” Moose’s voice echoed through the silence. 

“Look—they all froze!” Mindy declared. She placed both hands on the red 
cap of a gnome—and pushed the gnome over. 

It clattered to the floor. And didn’t move. A hunk of plaster. 

“I don’t get it!” Moose scratched his crew cut. 

Still gripping the dog whistle tightly, I moved around the room, examining 
the frozen gnomes, pushing them over. Enjoying the silence. 

“Back in their trance state,” Mindy murmured. 

“But how?” Moose demanded. “Buster never showed up. If they weren’t 
terrified of the dog, why did they all freeze up again?” 

I suddenly knew the answer. I raised the whistle and blew it again. “It was 
the whistle,” I explained. “It wasn’t Buster. I had it wrong. They were afraid of 
the whistle. Not the dog.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” Mindy said softly. “I never want to see another lawn 
gnome as long as I live.” 

“Wait till I tell my parents about this!” Moose declared. 

“Whoa!” I cried, grabbing his shoulder. “We can’t tell anyone about this. 
No way!” 

“Why not?” he demanded. 

“Because no one will believe it,” I replied. 

Moose stared at me for a long moment. “You’re right,” he agreed finally. 
“You’re definitely right.” 

Mindy moved to the wall and stared up at the window. “How do we get out 
of here?” 

“I know how,” I told her. I picked up Hap and Chip and stood them beneath 
the window. Then I climbed onto their caps, lifted my hands to the window, and 
pulled myself up. “Thanks for the boost, guys!” I called down. 

They didn’t reply. 

I hoped they were frozen for good. 

Mindy and Moose followed me out. Of course, Buster was waiting for us in 
the yard. His stubby tail began to wag as soon as I appeared. He came running 
over and licked my face till I was sopping wet and sticky. 

“Sorry, fella. You’re a little late,” I told him. “You weren’t much help— 
were you!” 

He licked me some more. Then he greeted Mindy and Moose. 

“Yaaaay! We’re out! We’re out!” Moose cried. He slapped me so hard on 
the back, I thought my teeth were going to fly out! 

I turned to my sister. “Tickle! Tickle! Tickle! ” I chanted. 

“Give me a break!” Mindy cried, rolling her eyes for the thousandth time 
that day. 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” I made tickling motions with my hands and started 
to chase her down the street. 

“Joe—stop it! Don’t tickle me! I’m warning you!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

I knew I’d never forget those high-pitched chants. I knew I’d hear them in 
my dreams for a long, long time. 

The next evening, Mindy and I were watching MTV in the den when Dad came 
home. “Be nice to your dad,” Mom had warned us earlier. “He’s very upset that 
somebody stole his two lawn gnomes.” 

Yes, the two gnomes were missing when he woke up. 

Big surprise. 

Mindy and I were so happy, we didn’t have a single argument all day. 

And now we were happy to see Dad—except that he had a strange 
expression on his face. “Uh... I’ve brought home a little surprise,” he 
announced, glancing guiltily at Mom. 

“Now what?” she demanded. 

“Come and see.” Dad led us out to the front lawn. 

The sun was disappearing behind the trees, and the sky was gray. But I 
could still see clearly what Dad had purchased at Lawn Lovely this time. 

An enormous, brown plaster gorilla! 

At least eight feet tall, with gigantic black eyes and a bright purple chest. 
The gorilla had paws the size of baseball mitts and a head as big as a basketball. 

“It’s the ugliest thing I ever saw!” Mom cried, both hands pressed to her 
face. “You’re not really going to put that horrible monster on our front lawn— 
are you, dear?” 

Anything is better than those lawn gnomes, I thought. Anything is better 
than lawn gnomes who come alive and do terrible mischief. 

I glanced at Mindy. I had a feeling she was thinking the same thing. 

“I think it’s a beauty, Dad,” I said. “It’s the best-looking lawn gorilla I ever 
saw!” 

“It’s great, Dad,” Mindy agreed. 

Dad smiled. 

Mom turned and hurried back to the house, shaking her head. 

I glanced up at the gorilla’s enormous purple-and-brown painted face. “Be a 
good gorilla,” I murmured. “Don’t be like those awful gnomes.” 

Then, as I started to turn away, the gorilla winked at me. 


A SHOCKER ON 
SHOCK STREET 

1 

“This is creepy, Erin.” My friend Marty grabbed my sleeve. 

“Let go!” I whispered. “You’re hurting me!” 

Marty didn’t seem to hear. He stared straight ahead into the darkness, 
gripping my arm. 

“Marty, please—” I whispered. I shook my arm free. I was scared, too. But 
I didn’t want to admit it. 

It was darker than the darkest night. I squinted hard, trying to see. And then 
a gray light glowed dimly in front of us. 

Marty ducked low. Even in the foggy light, I could see the fear in his eyes. 

He grabbed my arm again. His mouth dropped open. I could hear him 
breathing hard and fast. 

Even though I was frightened, a smile crossed my face. I liked seeing Marty 
scared. 

I really enjoyed it. 

I know, I know. That’s terrible. I admit it. Erin Wright is a bad person. What 
kind of a friend am I? 

But Marty always brags that he is braver than me. And he is usually right. 
He usually is the brave one, and I’m the wimp. 

But not today. 

That’s why seeing Marty gasp in fright and grab my arm made me smile. 

The gray light ahead of us slowly grew brighter. I heard crunching sounds 
on both sides of us. Close behind me, someone coughed. But Marty and I didn’t 
turn around. We kept our eyes straight ahead. 

Waiting. Watching.... 

As I squinted into the gray light, a fence came into view. A long wooden 
fence, its paint faded and peeling. A hand-lettered sign appeared on the fence: 
DANGER. KEEP OUT. THIS MEANS YOU. 

Marty and I both gasped when we heard the scraping sounds. Soft at first. 
Then louder. Like giant claws scraping against the other side of the fence. 

I tried to swallow, but my mouth suddenly felt dry. I had the urge to run. 
Just turn and run as fast as I could. 

But I couldn’t leave Marty there all alone. And besides, if I ran away now, 

he would never let me forget it. He’d tease me about it forever. 

So I stayed beside him, listening as the scraping, clawing sounds turned into 
banging. Loud crashes. 

Was someone trying to break through the fence? 

We moved quickly along the fence. Faster, faster—until the tall, peeling 
fence pickets became a gray blur. 

But the sound followed us. Heavy footsteps on the other side of the fence. 

We stared straight ahead. We were on an empty street. A familiar street. 

Yes, we had been here before. 

The pavement was puddled with rainwater. The puddles glowed in the pale 
light from the streetlamps. 

I took a deep breath. Marty gripped my arm harder. Our mouths gaped 
open. 

To our horror, the fence began to shake. The whole street shook. The rain 
puddles splashed against the curb. 

The footsteps thundered closer. 

“Marty—!” I gasped in a choked whisper. 

Before I could say another word, the fence crumbled to the ground, and the 
monster came bursting out. 

It had a head like a wolf—snapping jaws of gleaming white teeth—and a 
body like a giant crab. It swung four huge claws in front of it, clicking them at us 
as its snout pulled open in a throaty growl. 

“NOOOOOOO!” Marty and I both let out howls of terror. 

We jumped to our feet. 

But there was nowhere to run. 

2 

We stood and stared as the wolf-crab crawled toward us. 

“Please sit down, kids,” a voice called out behind us. “I can’t see the 
screen.” 

“Ssshhhh!” someone else whispered. 

Marty and I glanced at each other. I guess we both felt like jerks. I know I 
did. We dropped back into our seats. 

And watched the wolf-crab scamper across the street, chasing after a little 
boy on a tricycle. 

“What’s your problem, Erin?” Marty whispered, shaking his head. “It’s 
only a movie. Why did you scream like that?” 

“You screamed too!” I replied sharply. 

“I only screamed because you screamed!” he insisted. 

“Sssshhh!” someone pleaded. I sank low in the seat. I heard crunching 
sounds all around me. People eating popcorn. Someone behind me coughed. 

On the screen, the wolf-crab reached out his big, red claws and grabbed the 
kid on the trike. SNAP. SNAP. Good-bye, kid. 

Some people in the theater laughed. It was pretty funny. 

That’s the great thing about the Shocker on Shock Street movies. They make 
you scream and laugh at the same time. 

Marty and I sat back and enjoyed the rest of the movie. We love scary 
movies, but the Shock Street films are our favorites. 

In the end, the police caught the wolf-crab. They boiled him in a big pot of 
water. Then they served steamed crab to the whole town. Everyone sat around 
dipping him in butter sauce. They all said he was delicious. 

It was the perfect ending. Marty and I clapped and cheered. Marty put two 
fingers in his mouth and whistled through his teeth the way he always does. 

We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI, and it was definitely the best 
one of the series. 

The theater lights came on. We turned up the aisle and started to make our 
way through the crowd. 

“Great special effects,” a man told his friend. 

“Special effects?” the friend replied. “I thought it was all real!” 

They both laughed. 

Marty bumped me hard from behind. He thinks it’s funny to try and knock 
me over. “Pretty good movie,” he said. 

I turned back to him. “Huh? Pretty good?” 

“Well, it wasn’t scary enough,” he replied. “Actually, it was kind of 
babyish. Shocker V was a lot scarier.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Marty, you screamed your head off—remember? You 
jumped out of your seat. You grabbed my arm and—” 

“I only did that because I saw how scared you were,” he said, grinning. 
What a liar! Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared? 

He stuck his sneaker out and tried to trip me. 

I dodged to the left, stumbled—and bumped hard into a young woman. 

“Hey—look out!” she cried. “You twins should be more careful.” 

“We’re not twins!” Marty and I cried in unison. 

We’re not even brother and sister. We’re not related in any way. But people 
always think that Marty and I are twins. 

I guess we do look a lot alike. We’re both twelve years old. And we’re both 
pretty short and kind of chubby. We both have round faces, short black hair, and 
blue eyes. And we both have little noses that sort of turn up. 

But we’re not twins! We’re only friends. 

I apologized to the woman. When I turned back to Marty, he stuck out his 
shoe and tried to trip me again. 

I stumbled, but quickly caught my balance. Then I stuck out my shoe—and 
tripped him. 

We kept tripping each other through the long lobby. People were staring at 
us, but we didn’t care. We were laughing too hard. 

“Do you know the coolest thing about this movie?” I asked. 

“No. What?” 

“That we’re the first kids in the world to see it!” I exclaimed. 

“Yeah!” Marty and I slapped each other a high five. 

We had just seen Shocker on Shock Street VI at a special sneak preview. My 
dad works with a lot of movie people, and he got us tickets for it. The others in 
the theater were all adults. Marty and I were the only kids. 

“Know what else was really cool?” I asked. “The monsters. All of them. 
They looked so incredibly real. It didn’t look like special effects at all.” 

Marty frowned. “Well, I thought the Electric Eel Woman was pretty phony- 

looking. She didn’t look like an eel—she looked like a big worm!” 

I laughed. “Then why did you jump out of your seat when she shot a bolt of 
electricity and fried that gang of teenagers?” 

“I didn’t jump,” Marty insisted. “You did!” 

“Did not! You jumped because it looked so real,” I insisted. “And I heard 
you choke when the Toxic Creep leaped out of the nuclear waste pit.” 

“I choked on a Milk Dud, that’s all.” 

“You were scared, Marty, because it was so real.” 

“Hey—what if they are real?!” Marty exclaimed. “What if it isn’t special 
effects? What if they’re all real monsters ?” 

“Don’t be dumb,” I said. 

We turned the corner into another hall. 

The wolf-crab stood waiting for me there. 

I didn’t even have time to scream. 

He opened his toothy jaws in a long wolf howl—and wrapped two giant red 
claws around my waist. 

3 

I opened my mouth to scream, but only a squeak came out. 

I heard people laughing. 

The big claws slid off my waist. Plastic claws. 

I saw two dark eyes staring out at me from behind the wolf mask. I should 
have known that it was a man in a costume. But I didn’t expect him to be 
standing there. 

I was surprised, that’s all. 

I blinked at a white flash of light. A man had just taken a picture of the 
creature. I saw a big red and yellow sign against the wall: SEE THE MOVIE— 
THEN PLAY THE GAME ON CD-ROM. 

“Sorry if I scared you,” the man inside the wolf-crab costume said softly. 

“She scares easily!” Marty declared. 

I gave Marty a hard shove, and we hurried away. I turned back to see the 
creature waving a claw at me. “We’ve got to go upstairs and see my dad,” I told 
Marty. 

“Tell me something I don’t know.” 

He thinks he’s so funny. 

Dad’s office is upstairs from the theater, on the twenty-ninth floor. We 
jogged to the elevators at the end of the hall and took one up. 

Dad has a really cool job. He builds theme parks. And he designs all kinds 
of rides. 

Dad was one of the designers of Prehistoric Park. That’s the big theme park 
where you go back to prehistoric times. It has all kinds of neat rides and shows 
—and dozens of huge dinosaur robots wandering around. 

And Dad worked on the Fantasy Films Studio Tour. Everyone who comes 
to Hollywood goes on that tour. 

Dad’s idea was the part where you walk through a huge movie screen and 
find yourself in a world of movie characters. You can star in any kind of movie 
you want to be in! 

I know it sounds as if I’m bragging, but Dad is really smart, and he’s an 
engineering genius! I think he is the world expert on robots. He can build robots 
that will do anything! And he uses them in all his parks and studio tours. 

Marty and I stepped off the elevator on the twenty-ninth floor. We waved to 
the woman at the front desk. Then we hurried to Dad’s office at the end of the 
hall. 

It looks more like a playroom than an office. It’s a big room. Huge, really. 
Filled with toys, and stuffed cartoon characters, movie posters, and models of 
monsters. 

Marty and I love to roam around the office, staring at all the neat stuff. On 
the walls, Dad has great posters from a dozen different movies. On a long table, 
he has a model of The Tumbler, the upside-down roller coaster he designed. The 
model has little cars that really screech around the tracks. 

And he has a lot of cool stuff from Shock Street —like one of the original 
furry paws that Wolf Girl wore in Nightmare on Shock Street. He keeps it in a 
glass case on the windowsill. 

He has models of tramcars and little trains and planes and rockets. Even a 
big, silver plastic blimp. It’s radio-controlled, and he can make it float round and 
around his office. 

What a great place! I always think of Dad’s office as the happiest place in 
the world. 

But today, as Marty and I stepped inside, Dad didn’t look too happy. He 
hunched over his desk with the telephone to his ear. His head was lowered, his 
eyes down. He kept a hand pressed against his forehead as he mumbled into the 
phone. 

Dad and I don’t look at all alike. I’m short and dark. He’s tall and thin. And 
he has blond hair, although there’s not much left of it. He’s pretty bald. 

He has the kind of skin that turns red easily. 

His cheeks get real pink when he talks. And he wears big, round glasses 
with dark frames that hide his brown eyes. 

Marty and I stopped at the doorway. I don’t think Dad saw us. He stared 
down at the desk. He had his tie pulled down and his shirt collar open. 

He muttered for a short while longer. Marty and I crept into the office. 

Finally, Dad set down the phone. He raised his eyes and saw us. “Oh, hi, 
you two,” he said softly. His cheeks turned bright pink. 

“Dad—what’s wrong?” I asked. 

He sighed. Then he pulled off his glasses and pinched the bridge of his 
nose. “I have very bad news, Erin. Very bad news.” 

4 

“Dad—what is it? What?” I cried. 

Then I saw the grin slowly spread across his face. I knew I’d been tricked 
again. 

“Gotcha!” he declared. His brown eyes flashed gleefully. His cheeks were 
bright pink. “Gotcha again. You fall for that gag every time.” 

“Dad—!” I let out an angry cry. Then I rushed up to the desk, wrapped my 
hands around his neck, and pretended to strangle him. 

We both collapsed against each other, laughing. Marty still stood in the 
doorway, shaking his head. “Mr. Wright, that is so lame,” he muttered. 

Dad struggled to slip his glasses back on. “I’m sorry. You kids are just too 
easy to fool. I couldn’t resist.” He smiled at me. “Actually, I’ve got good news.” 

“Good news? Is this another joke?” I demanded suspiciously. 

He shook his head. He picked up something from his desk. “Check this out, 
guys. Do you know what this is?” He held it in his palm. 

Marty and I came closer to examine it. It was a little, white plastic vehicle 
with four wheels. “Some kind of train car?” I guessed. 

“It’s a tramcar,” Dad explained. “See? People sit on long benches inside it. 
Here. It’s motor-driven.” He pointed to the front of the model to show where the 
engine went. “But do you know where this tramcar will be used?” 

“Dad, we give up. Just tell us,” I insisted impatiently. “Stop keeping us in 
suspense.” 

“Okay, okay.” His cheeks reddened. His smile grew wider. “This is a model 
of the tram that will be used at the Shocker Studio Tour.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Do you mean the tour is finally going to open?” 
I knew that Dad had been working on it for years. 

Dad nodded. “Yes. We’re finally about to open it to the public. But before 
we do, I want you two to test it out.” 

“Huh? You mean it?” I shrieked. I was so excited, I felt as if I’d burst out of 
my skin! 

I turned to Marty. He was leaping up and down, shooting both fists into the 
air. “Yes! Yes! Yes!” 

“I built this whole tour,” Dad said, “and I want you two to be the first kids 

in the world to go on it. I want to know your opinion. What you like and what 
you don’t like.” 

“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty kept leaping into the air. I thought I might have to 
tie a rope around his waist and hold onto it to keep him from floating away! 

“Dad—the Shock Street movies are the bestl” I cried. “This is awesome!” 
And then I added, “Is the tour very scary?” 

Dad rested a hand on my shoulder. “I hope so,” he replied. “I tried to make 
it as scary and real as I could. You get on the tram and you ride through the 
whole movie studio. You get to meet all of the characters from the horror 
movies. And then the tram takes you on a slow ride down Shock Street.” 

“The real Shock Street?” Marty cried. “Do you mean it? You get to ride 
down the real street where they make the movies?” 

Dad nodded. “Yes. The real Shock Street.” 

“Yes! Yes! Yes!” Marty started pumping his fists in the air again, shouting 
like a maniac. 

“Awesome!” I cried. “Totally awesome!” I was as excited as Marty. 

Suddenly Marty stopped leaping. His expression turned serious. “Maybe 
Erin shouldn’t go,” he told my dad. “She gets too scared.” 

“Huh?” I cried. 

“She was so scared during the movie sneak preview, I had to hold her 
hand,” Marty told Dad. 

What a liar! 

“Give me a break!” I cried angrily. “If anyone was a scaredy-cat wimp, it 
was you, Marty!” 

Dad raised both hands to signal halt. “Calm down, guys,” he said softly. 
“No arguing. You have to keep together. You know, you two will be the only 
ones on the tour tomorrow. The only ones.” 

“Yes!” Marty cheered happily. “Yes! Yes!” 

“Wow! That’s great!” I cried. “It’s totally great. It’s going to be the best!” 
Then I had an idea. “Can Mom come too? I bet she would really enjoy it.” 

“Excuse me?” Dad squinted at me through his glasses. His whole face 
turned bright red. “What did you say?” 

“I asked if Mom could come too,” I repeated. 

Dad kept staring at me for a long time, studying me. “Are you feeling okay, 
Erin?” he asked finally. 

“Yes. Fine,” I replied meekly. 

I suddenly felt very confused and upset. What had I done wrong? 
Was something wrong with Mom? 

Why was Dad staring at me like that? 

5 

Dad came around the desk and put an arm around my shoulder. “I think you and 
Marty will have a better time if you go by yourselves,” he said softly. “Don’t you 
agree?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” 

I still wondered why he was staring at me so suspiciously. But I decided not 
to ask him. I didn’t want him to get angry or something and change his mind 
about us going on the tour. 

“Do you mean you’re not coming with us?” Marty asked Dad. “We’re 
really going by ourselves?” 

“I want you to go by yourselves,” Dad replied. “I think that will make it 
more exciting for you.” 

Marty grinned at me. “I hope it’s really scary!” he declared. 

“Don’t worry,” Dad replied. A strange smile spread over his face. “You 
won’t be disappointed.” 

The next afternoon, a gray haze hung in the air as Dad drove Marty and me 
to Shocker Studios. 

I sat up front with Dad, peering out the car window at the smog. “It’s so 
gloomy out,” I murmured. 

“Perfect for a horror movie tour,” Marty chimed in from the backseat. He 
was so excited, he could barely sit still. He kept bouncing his legs up and down 
and tapping his hands on the leather seat. 

I had never seen Marty so crazed. If he didn’t have his seat belt to hold him 
down, he’d probably bounce right out of the car! 

The car climbed up the Hollywood hills. The narrow road curved past 
redwood houses and tree-filled yards cut into the sides of the hills. 

As we climbed, the sky turned even darker. We’re driving up into a cloud of 
fog, I thought. Far in the distance, I could see the HOLLYWOOD sign, 
stretching in the haze across a dark peak. 

“Hope it doesn’t rain,” I muttered, watching the fog roll over the sign. 

Dad chuckled. “You know it never rains in Los Angeles!” 

“Which monsters are we going to see?” Marty asked, bouncing in the 
backseat. “Is Shockro on the tour? Do we really get to walk on Shock Street?” 

Dad squinted hard through his glasses, turning the wheel as the road curved 
and twisted. “I’m not telling,” he replied. “I don’t want to spoil it for you. I want 
it all to be a surprise.” 

“I just wanted to know so I could warn Erin,” Marty said. “I don’t want her 
to get too scared. She might faint or something.” He laughed. 

I let out an angry growl. Then I turned around and tried to punch him. But I 
couldn’t reach. 

Marty leaned forward and messed up my hair with both hands. “Get off 
me!” I screamed. “I’m warning you—!” 

“Take it easy, guys,” Dad said softly. “We’re here.” 

I turned and stared out the windshield. The road had flattened out. Up 
ahead, an enormous sign proclaimed SHOCKER STUDIOS in scary, blood-red 
letters. 

We drove slowly up to the huge iron gates in the front. The gates were 
closed. A guard in a small black booth sat reading a newspaper. I glimpsed gold 
script letters above the gate. They spelled out one word: BEWARE. 

Dad pulled right up to the gate, and the guard peered up. He gave Dad a big 
smile. Then he pressed a button, and the gates slowly swung open. Dad drove 
the car into the tall white parking garage beside the studio. He parked in the first 
space next to the entrance. The garage seemed to stretch on forever. But I could 
see only three or four other cars inside. 

“When we open next week, this garage will be jammed!” Dad said. “There 
will be thousands of people here. I hope.” 

“And today, we’re the only ones!” Marty cried excitedly, jumping out of the 
car. 

“We’re so lucky!” I agreed. 

A few minutes later, we were standing on the platform outside the main 
building, facing a wide street, waiting for the tram to take us on the tour. The 
street led to dozens of white studio buildings, spread out all the way down the 
hill. 

Dad pointed to two enormous buildings as big as airplane hangars. “Those 
are the soundstages,” he explained. “They film a lot of movie scenes inside those 
buildings.” 

“Does the tour go inside them?” Marty demanded. “Where is Shock Street? 
Where are the monsters? Are they making a movie now? Can we watch them 
making it?” 

“Whoa!” Dad cried. He placed his hands on Marty’s shoulders as if to keep 
him from flying off the ground. I had never seen Marty so totally wired! “Take it 
easy, fella,” Dad warned. “You’ll blow a fuse! You won’t survive the tour!” 

I shook my head. “Maybe we should put him on a leash,” I told Dad. 

“Arf, arf!” Marty barked. Then he snapped his teeth at me, trying to bite 
me. 

I shivered. The fog rolled in from the hills. The air felt damp and cold. The 
sky darkened. 

Two men in business suits came zooming along the street in a golf cart. 
They were both talking at once. One of them waved to Dad. 

“Can we ride in one of those carts?” Marty asked. “Can Erin and I each 
have our own cart?” 

“No way,” Dad told him. “You have to take the automated tram. And 
remember—stay in the tramcar. No matter what.” 

“You mean we can’t walk on Shock Street?” Marty whined. 

Dad shook his head. “Not allowed. You have to stay on the tram.” 

He turned to me. “I’ll be waiting for you here on the platform when you get 
back. I want a full report. I want to know what you like and what you don’t like. 
And don’t worry if things don’t work exactly right. There are still a few bugs to 
work out.” 

“Hey—here comes the tram!” Marty cried, hopping up and down and 
pointing. 

The tram came rolling silently around the corner. I counted six tramcars in 
all. They were shaped like roller-coaster cars, open on top—only much longer 
and wider. The cars were black. A grinning white skull was painted on the front 
of the first car. 

A young, red-haired woman wearing a black uniform was seated on the first 
bench in the front car. She waved to us as the tram rolled up to the platform. She 
was the only passenger. 

She hopped out as the tram stopped. “Hi, I’m Linda. I’m your tour guide.” 
She smiled at my dad. Her red hair fluttered in the wind. 

“Hello, Linda,” Dad said, smiling back at her. He gently shoved Marty and 
me forward. “Here are your first two victims.” 

Linda laughed and asked us our names. We told her. 

“Can we ride in front?” Marty asked eagerly. 

“Yes, of course,” Linda replied. “You can sit anywhere you want. This 

whole ride is just for you.” 

“All right!” Marty cried. He slapped me a high five. 

Dad laughed. “I think Marty is ready to begin,” he told Linda. 

Linda pushed her red hair out of her face. “You can start right away, guys. 
But first, there’s something I have to do.” 

She leaned over the tramcar and tugged out a black canvas bag. “This will 
only take a second, guys.” She pulled a red plastic gun from the bag. “This is a 
Shocker Stun Ray Blaster.” 

She gripped the plastic pistol tightly. It looked like something in a Star Trek 
movie. Her smile faded. Her green eyes narrowed. “Be careful with these 
blasters, guys. They can freeze a monster in its tracks from twenty feet.” 

She handed the blaster to me. Then she reached into her bag to get one for 
Marty. “Don’t fire them unless you have to.” She swallowed hard and bit her 
lower lip. “I sure hope you don’t have to.” 

I laughed. “You’re kidding—right? These are just toys—right?” 

She didn’t answer. She pulled another blaster from her bag and started to 
bring it to Marty. 

But she stumbled over a cord on the platform. “Ohh!” She let out a startled 
cry as the blaster went off in her hand. 

A loud buzz. A bright ray of yellow light. 

And Linda stood frozen on the platform. 

6 

“Linda! Linda!” I screamed. 

Marty’s mouth dropped open. He let out a choked gurgle. 

I turned to Dad. To my surprise, he was laughing. 

“Dad—she’s—she’s frozen!” I cried. But when I turned back to Linda, she 
had a big smile on her face, too. 

It took us both a while, but we soon realized the whole thing was a joke. 

“That’s the first shock on the Shocker tour,” Linda announced, lowering the 
red blaster. She put a hand on Marty’s shoulder. “I think I really shocked you, 
Marty!” 

“No way!” Marty insisted. “I knew it was a joke. I just played along.” 

“Come on, Marty!” I cried, rolling my eyes. “You nearly dropped your 
teeth!” 

“Erin, I wasn’t scared,” Marty insisted sharply. “Really. I just went along 
with the joke. Do you really think I’d fall for a dumb plastic blaster gun?” 

Marty is such a jerk. Why can’t he ever admit it when he’s scared? 

“Climb in, you two,” Dad urged. “Let’s get this show on the road.” 

Marty and I climbed into the front seat of the tram. I looked for a seat belt 
or a safety bar, but there wasn’t one. “Are you coming with us?” I asked Linda. 

She shook her head. “No. You’re on your own. The tram moves 
automatically.” She handed Marty his Stun Blaster. “Hope you don’t need it.” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Marty muttered, rolling his eyes. “This gun is so babyish.” 

“Remember—I’ll meet you back here at the end of the ride,” Dad said. He 
waved. “Enjoy it. I want a full report.” 

“Don’t get out of the tram,” Linda reminded us. “Keep your head and arms 
inside. And don’t stand up while the tram is moving.” 

She stepped on a blue button on the platform. The tram started up with a 
jolt. Marty and I were thrown back against the seat. Then the tram rolled 
smoothly forward. 

“First stop is The Haunted House of Horror!” Linda called after us. “Good 
luck!” 

I turned back to see her waving to us, her long red hair fluttering in the 
wind. A strong breeze blew against us as the tram made its way down the hill. 

The sky was nearly as dark as night. Some of the white studio buildings were 
hidden by the fog. 

“Stupid gun,” Marty muttered, rolling it around in his hands. “Why do we 
need this plastic gun? I hope the whole tour isn’t this babyish.” 

“I hope you don’t complain all afternoon,” I told him, frowning. “Do you 
realize how awesome this is? We’re going to see all the great creatures from the 
Shocker movies.” 

“Think we’ll see Shockro?” he asked. Shockro is his favorite. I guess 
because he’s so totally gross. 

“Probably,” I replied, my eyes on the low buildings we were passing. They 
all stood dark and empty. 

“I want to see Wolf Boy and Wolf Girl,” Marty said, counting the monsters 
off on his fingers. “And... the Piranha People, and Captain Sick, The Great 
Gopher Mutant, and—” 

“Wow! Look!” I cried, pounding his shoulder and pointing. 

As the tram turned a sharp corner, The Haunted House of Horror loomed 
darkly in front of us. The roof and its tall stone turrets were hidden by the fog. 
The rest of the mansion stood gray against the dusky sky. 

The tram took us nearer. Tall weeds choked the front lawn. The weeds bent 
and swayed in the wind. The gray shingles on the house were chipped and 
peeling. Pale green light, dim, eerie light, floated out from the tall window in 
front. 

As we rode closer, I could see a rusty iron porch swing—swinging by itself! 
—on a broken, rotting porch. 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. 

“It looks a lot smaller than in the movie,” Marty grumbled. 

“It’s exactly the same house!” I cried. 

“Then why does it look so much smaller?” he demanded. 

What a complainer. 

I turned away from him and studied The Haunted House. An iron fence 
surrounded the place. As we moved around to the side, the rusty gate swung 
open, squeaking and creaking. 

“Look!” I pointed to the dark windows on the second floor. The shutters all 
flew open at once, then banged shut again. 

Lights came on in the windows. Through the window shades, I could see 
the silhouettes of skeletons hanging, swinging slowly back and forth. 

“That’s kind of cool,” Marty said. “But not too scary.” He raised his plastic 
gun and pretended to shoot at the skeletons. 

We circled The Haunted House of Horrors once. We could hear screams of 
terror from inside. The shutters banged again and again. The porch swing 
continued to creak back and forth, back and forth, as if taken by a ghost. 

“Are we going inside or not?” Marty demanded impatiently. 

“Sit back and stop complaining,” I said sharply. “The ride just started. 
Don’t spoil it for me, okay?” 

He stuck his tongue out at me. But he settled back against the seat. We 
heard a long howl, and then a shrill scream of horror. 

The tram made its way silently to the back of the house. A gate swung open 
and we rolled through it. We moved quickly through the overgrown, weed- 
choked backyard. 

The tram picked up speed. We bounced over the lawn. Up to the back door. 
A wooden sign above the door read: ABANDON ALL HOPE. 

We’re going to crash right into the door! I thought. I ducked and raised my 
hands to shield myself. 

But the door creaked open, and we burst inside. 

The tram slowed. I lowered my hands and sat up. We were in a dark, dust- 
covered kitchen. An invisible ghost cackled, an evil laugh. Battered pots and 
pans covered the wall. As we passed, they clattered to the floor. 

The oven door opened and closed by itself. The teapot on the stove started 
to whistle. Dishes on the shelves rattled. The cackling grew louder. 

“This is pretty creepy,” I whispered. 

“Ooh. Thrills and chills!” Marty replied sarcastically. He crossed his arms 
in front of him. “Bor-ring!” 

“Marty—give me a break.” I shoved him away. “You can be a bad sport if 
you want. But don’t ruin it for me.” 

That seemed to get to him. He muttered, “Sorry,” and scooted back next to 
me. 

The tram moved out of the dark kitchen, into an even darker hallway. 
Paintings of goblins and ugly creatures hung on the hallway walls. 

As we approached a closet door, it sprang open—and a shrieking skeleton 
popped out in front of us, its jaws open, its arms jutting out to grab us. 

I screamed. Marty laughed. 

The skeleton snapped back into the closet. The tram turned a corner. I saw 



flickering light up ahead. 

We rode into a large, round room. “It’s the living room,” I whispered to 
Marty. I raised my eyes to the flickering light and saw a chandelier above our 
heads, with a dozen burning candles. 

The tram stopped beneath it. The chandelier began to shake. Then, with a 
hiss, the candles ah flickered out at once. 

The room plunged into darkness. 

Then a deep laugh echoed all around us. 

I gasped. 

“Welcome to my humble home!” a deep voice suddenly boomed. 

“Who is that?” I whispered to Marty. “Where is it coming from?” No reply. 
“Hey—Marty?” I turned to him. “Marty—?” He was gone. 

7 

“Marty?” 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze, staring into the darkness. 

Where did he go? I asked myself. He knows we aren’t supposed to leave the 
tramcar. Did he climb out? 

No. 

If he had, I would have heard him. 

“Marty?” 

Someone grabbed my arm. 

I heard a soft laugh. Marty’s laugh. 

“Hey—where are you? I can’t see you!” I cried. 

“I can’t see you, either,” he replied. “But I didn’t move. I’m still sitting 
right next to you.” 

“Huh?” I reached out and felt the sleeve of his shirt. 

“This is cool!” Marty declared. “I’m waving my arms, but I can’t see a 
thing. You really can’t see me?” 

“No,” I replied. “I thought—” 

“It’s some kind of trick with the lights,” he said. “Black light or something. 
Some kind of neat movie special effect.” 

“Well, it creeped me out,” I confessed. “I really thought you disappeared.” 

“Sucker,” he sneered. 

And then we both jumped. 

A fire suddenly blazed in the big brick fireplace. Bright orange light filled 
the room. A big black armchair spun around to reveal a grinning skeleton. 

The skeleton raised its bony yellowed head. The jaws moved. “I hope you 
like my house,” its voice boomed. “Becauseyou will never leave!” 

It tossed back its head and let out an evil cackle. 

The tram jolted to a start. We rumbled out of the living room. Into a long, 
dark hallway. The skeleton’s laugh followed us into the hall. 

I fell back against the seat as we picked up speed. 

We whirred around a corner. Down another long hall, so dark I couldn’t see 
the walls. 

Faster. Faster. 

We whipped around another corner. Made another sharp turn. 

We were climbing now. And then we took a sharp dip that made both of us 
throw up our hands and scream. 

Around another sharp turn. Up, up, up. And then we came crashing down. 

A wild roller-coaster ride in total darkness. 

It was awesome. Even better because we didn’t expect it. Marty and I 
screamed our heads off. We bumped hard against each other as the tram whirled 
around in the black halls of The Haunted House of Horrors. Up, up, again—then 
we tilted sharply down. 

I hung on to the front of the car for dear life. I gripped it so hard, both hands 
ached. There was no seat belt, no safety bar. 

What if we tumbled out? I wondered. 

The car tilted sharply sideways, as if reading my frightened thoughts. I let 
out a shriek and lost my grip. I slid against the side of the car. Marty fell on top 
of me. 

I frantically reached out for something to hold on to. 

The car tilted back rightside up. I took a deep breath, slid back into place on 
the long seat. 

“Whoa! That was excellent !” Marty cried, laughing. “Excellent!” 

Gripping the front of the car, I took another deep breath and held it. I was 
trying to slow my racing heart. 

A door swung open in front of us, and we burst through it. 

The car bounced hard. I saw trees. The gray-fogged sky. 

We were back outside. Racing through the backyard. Both of us were tossed 
from side to side as we roared over the weeds, zigzagging through the dark trees. 

“Whoa! Stop!” I choked out. I couldn’t catch my breath. The wind blew 
hard against my face. The tram clattered and squealed as we bumped over the 
rough ground. 

We were out of control. Something had definitely gone wrong with the 

tram. 

Bouncing hard on the plastic seat, holding on tightly, I searched for 
someone who could help us. 

No one in sight. 

We bumped onto the road. The tram started to slow. I turned to Marty. His 
hair was blown over his face. His mouth hung open. His eyes rolled around in 

his head. He was totally dazed. 

The tram slowed, slowed, slowed, until we were creeping smoothly along. 

“That was great]” Marty declared. He smoothed back his hair with both 
hands and grinned at me. I knew he had been scared, too. But he was pretending 
that he enjoyed the crazy, wild ride. 

“Yeah. Great.” I tried to pretend, too. But my voice came out weak and 
shaky. 

“I’m going to tell your dad that the roller-coaster ride through the halls was 
the best]” Marty declared. 

“It was kind of fun,” I agreed. “And kind of scary.” 

Marty turned away from me. “Hey. Where are we?” 

The tram had come to a stop. I pulled myself up and peered around. We had 
parked between two rows of tall evergreen bushes. The bushes were slender, 
shaped like spears reaching up to the sky. 

Above us, the afternoon sun was trying to break through the fog. Rays of 
pale light beamed down from the gray sky. The tall, thin shadows of the bushes 
fell over our tramcar. 

Marty stood up and turned to the back of the tram. “There’s nothing around 
here,” he said. “We’re in the middle of nowhere. Why did we stop?” 

“Do you think—?” I started. But I stopped talking when I saw the bush 
move. 

It wiggled. Then the bush next to it wiggled, too. 

“Marty—” I whispered, tugging his sleeve. I saw two glowing red circles 
behind the bush. Two glowing red eyes] 

“Marty—there’s someone there.” 

Another pair of eyes. And then another pair of eyes. Staring out at us from 
behind the evergreen bushes. 

And then two dark claws. 

And then rustling sounds. The bush tilted as a dark figure leaped out. 
Followed by another. 

Snarling, growling. 

I gasped. Too late to run. 

We were surrounded by the ugly creatures. Snuffling, wheezing creatures, 
who staggered out from the bushes. Reaching out, reaching out for us, they 
began to climb into the tram. 

8 

Marty and I jumped to our feet. 

“Ohhhhhh.” I heard Marty let out a frightened moan. 

I started to back away. I thought maybe I could scramble out the other side 
of the car. 

But the snarling, growling monsters came at us from both sides. 

“L-leave us alone!” I stammered. 

A monster covered in tangled brown fur opened his jaws to reveal long, 
jagged rows of yellow teeth. His hot breath exploded in my face. He stepped 
closer. Then he swiped at me with a fat paw and uttered a menacing roar. “Would 
you like an autograph?” he growled. 

I gaped at him, my mouth hanging down to my knees. “Huh?” 

“Autographed photo?” he asked. He raised his furry paw again. He held a 
black-and-white snapshot in it. 

“Hey—you’re Ape Face!” Marty cried, pointing. 

The hairy creature nodded his head. He raised the photo to Marty. “Want a 
photo? This is the autographing part of the tour.” 

“Yeah! Okay,” Marty replied. 

The big ape pulled a marker from behind his ear and bent to sign the photo 
for Marty. 

Now that my heartbeat was returning to normal, I began to recognize some 
of the other creatures. The guy covered in purple slime was The Toxic Wild 
Man. And I recognized Sweet Sue, the walking-talking baby doll with real hair 
you can brush. Sweet Sue was really a mutant murderer from Mars. 

The frog-faced guy covered from head to toe with purple and brown warts 
was The Fabulous Frog, also known as The Toadinator. He starred in Pond Scum 
and Pond Scum II, two of the scariest movies ever made. 

“Frog—can I have your autograph?” I asked. 

“Grrrbbit. Grrbit.” He croaked and slipped a pen into his wart-covered 
hand. I leaned forward eagerly and watched him sign his photo. It was hard for 
him to write. The pen kept slipping in his slimy frog hands. 

Marty and I collected a bunch of autographs. Then the creatures went 
snarling and wheezing back into the bushes. 

When they were gone, we both burst out laughing. “That was so dumb!” I 
cried. “When I saw them creeping out from behind the bushes, I thought I’d have 
a cow!” I glanced down at the photos. “But it’s kind of cool to get their 
autographs.” 

Marty made a disgusted face. “It’s just a bunch of actors in costumes,” he 
sneered. “It’s for babies.” 

“But—but—they looked so real,” I stammered. “It didn’t look as if they 
were wearing costumes—did it? I mean, The Toadinator’s hands were really 
slimy. And Ape Face’s fur was so real. The masks were awesome. I couldn’t tell 
they were masks.” 

I brushed the hair out of my eyes. “How do they get into those costumes? I 
didn’t see any buttons or zippers, or anything!” 

“That’s because they’re movie costumes,” Marty explained. “They’re better 
than regular costumes.” 

Mr. Know-It-All. 

The tram started to back out. I settled down into the seat. I watched the two 
rows of evergreen bushes fade into the distance. 

Down the long, sloping hill, I could see the white studio buildings. I 
wondered if they were making a movie on one of the soundstages. I wondered if 
the tram would take us to watch them shoot. 

I could see two golf carts moving along the road. 

They were carrying people down to the sound-stage buildings. 

The sun still struggled to shine through the fog. The tram bounced over the 
grass, up the hill. 

“Whoa!” I cried out as we turned sharply and headed back toward the trees. 

“Please remain in the car at all times.” A woman’s voice burst from a 
speaker in the tram car. “Your next stop will be The Cave of The Living Creeps.” 

“The Cave of The Living Creeps? Wow! That sounds scary!” Marty 
exclaimed. 

“Sure does!” I agreed. 

We had no idea just how scary it would turn out to be. 

9 

The tram zigzagged its way through the trees. Their shadows rolled over us like 
dark ghosts. 

We moved so silently. I tried to imagine what the ride would be like if the 
tram was packed with excited kids and adults. I decided it would be a lot less 
scary with a crowd. 

But I wasn’t complaining. Marty and I were really lucky to be the first kids 
ever to try out this ride. 

“Wow!” Marty grabbed my arm as The Cave of The Living Creeps loomed 
in front of us. The mouth of the cave was a huge dark hole, cut into the side of 
the hill. I could see pale, silvery light flickering past the entrance. 

The tram slowed down as we approached the dark opening. A sign above 
the entrance had one word carved roughly into it: FAREWELL. 

The tramcar lurched forward. “Hey—!” I cried out and ducked my head. 
What a tight squeeze! 

Into the dim, flickering light. 

The air instantly grew colder. And damp. A sour, earthy smell rose to my 
nostrils, making me gasp. 

“Bats!” Marty whispered. “What do you think, Erin? Think there are bats in 
here?” He leaned close and let out an evil laugh in my ear. 

Marty knows that I hate bats! 

I know, I know. Bats aren’t really evil creatures. And they aren’t dangerous. 
Bats eat mosquitoes and other insects. And they don’t attack people or get 
tangled in your hair or try to suck your blood. That’s only in movies. 

I know all that. But I don’t care. 

Bats are ugly and creepy and disgusting. And I hate them. 

One day, I told Marty how much I hate bats. And so he’s been teasing me 
about them ever since. 

The tram moved deeper into the cave. The air grew colder. The sour aroma 
nearly choked me. 

“Look—over there!” Marty screamed. “A vampire bat!” 

“Huh? Where?” I couldn’t help myself. I cried out in alarm. 

Of course it was one of Marty’s dumb jokes. He laughed like a maniac. 

I growled at him and punched him hard on the shoulder. “You’re not funny. 
You’re just dumb.” 

That made him giggle even harder. “I’ll bet there are bats in this cave,” he 
insisted. “You can’t go into a deep, dark cave like this one without seeing bats.” 

I turned away from his grinning face and listened hard. I was listening for 
fluttering bat wings. I didn’t hear any. 

The cave narrowed. The walls seemed to close in on us. The side of the car 
scraped against the dirt wall. I could feel that we were heading down. 

In the dim, silvery light, I saw a long row of pointy icicle-type things 
hanging down from the cave ceiling. I know they have a name, but I can never 
remember which one it is—stalagmites or stalactites. 

I ducked my head again as the tram shot under them. Up close, they looked 
like pointed elephant tusks. 

“We’re getting closer to the bats!” Marty teased. 

I ignored him. I kept my eyes straight ahead. The cave grew wide again. 
Dark shadows shifted and danced over the walls as we rolled past. 

“Ohhh.” I uttered a groan as I felt something cold and slimy drop onto the 
back of my neck. 

I jerked away and turned sharply to Marty. “Cut it out!” I snapped. “Get 
your cold hands off me!” 

“Who—me?” 

He wasn’t touching me. Both of his hands gripped the front of the car. 

Then what was on the back of my neck? So cold and wet. Icy wet. I 
shuddered. My whole body shook. 

“M-Marty!” I stammered. “H-help!” 

Marty stared at me, confused. “Erin—what’s your problem?” 

“The back of my neck—” I choked out. 

I could feel the cold, wet thing start to move. I decided not to wait for 
Marty to help me. 

I reached back and pulled it off. It felt sticky and cold between my fingers. 
It slithered and wriggled, and I dropped it on the seat. 

A worm! 

A huge, long white worm. So cold, so wet and cold. 

“Weird!” Marty exclaimed. He leaned close to examine it. “I’ve never seen 
a worm that big! And it’s white.” 

“It—it dropped from the ceiling,” I said, watching it wiggle next to me. 

“It’s ice-cold.” 

“Huh? Let me touch it,” Marty said. He raised his hand and slowly lowered 
his pointer finger to the worm. 

His finger poked the worm in its middle. 

And then Marty opened his mouth in a scream of horror that echoed 
through the cave. 

10 

“What is it? Marty—what’s wrong?” I shrieked. 

“I—I—I—” He couldn’t speak. He could only utter, “I—I—I—!” His eyes 
bulged. His tongue flopped out. 

He reached up and pulled a white worm off the top of his head. “I—I—I got 
one too!” 

“Yuck!” I cried. His worm was nearly as long as a shoelace! 

We both tossed our worms out of the tram. 

But then I felt a soft, damp plop on my shoulder. And then a cold plop on 
top of my head. Another on my forehead, like a cold slap. 

“Ohhh—help!” I moaned. I started thrashing my arms, grabbing at the 
worms, struggling to pull them off me. 

“Marty—please!” I turned to him for help. 

But he was battling them, too. Twisting and ducking. Trying to dodge, as 
more and more white worms fell from the ceiling. 

I saw one fall on his shoulder. I saw another one begin to wrap itself around 
his ear. 

As fast as I could, I pulled the sticky, wet creatures off me and tossed them 
over the side of the slow-rolling tram. 

Where are they coming from? I wondered. 

I glanced up—and a fat, wet one fell over my eyes. 

“Yeowwww!” I let out a shriek, grabbed it, flung it away. 

The tram turned sharply, sending us both sliding over the seat. The cave 
narrowed again as we entered a different tunnel. The silvery light glowed dimly 
around us as we bounced forward. 

Two white worms, each at least a foot long, wriggled across my lap. I 
tugged them off and heaved them over the tram. 

Breathing hard, I searched for more. My whole body itched. The back of 
my neck tingled. I couldn’t stop shaking. 

“They stopped falling,” Marty announced in a shaky voice. 

Then why did I still itch? 

I rubbed the back of my neck. Stood up and searched the seat, then the 
floor. I found one last worm, climbing over my shoe. I kicked it away, then 

dropped back onto the seat with a loud sigh. 

“That was totally gross!” I wailed. 

Marty scratched his chest, then rubbed his face with both hands. “I guess 
that’s why they call it The Cave of The Living Creeps,” he said. He swept a hand 
back through his black hair. 

I shivered. I couldn’t stop itching. I knew the worms were gone, but I could 
still feel them. “Those disgusting white worms—do you think they were alive?” 

Marty shook his head. “Of course not. They were fakes.” He snickered. “I 
guess they fooled you, huh?” 

“They sure felt real,” I replied. “And the way they wriggled around—” 

“They were robots or something,” Marty said, scratching his knees. 
“Everything here is fake. It has to be.” 

“I’m not so sure,” I said, my whole body still itchy and tingling. 

“Well, just ask your father,” Marty replied grumpily. 

I had to laugh. I knew why Marty was suddenly so grouchy. Whether the 
worms were real or fake, they had scared him. And he knew that I knew that he 
had been frightened. 

“I don’t think little kids will like the worms,” Marty said. “I think they’ll 
get too scared. I’m going to tell that to your dad.” 

I started to reply—and felt something drop over me. Something scratchy 
and dry. 

It covered my face, my shoulders—my entire body. 

I shot both hands up and tried to push it away. It’s some kind of a net, I 
thought. 

I grabbed at it, desperate to get it off my face. As I struggled, I turned and 
saw Marty squirming and batting his arms, caught under the same net. 

The tram bounced through the dim cave tunnel. The sticky net felt like 
cotton candy on my skin. 

Marty let out a yelp. “It—it’s a big spider-web!” he stammered. 

I tugged and grabbed and pulled. But the sticky threads clung to my face, 
my arms, and my clothes. “Yuck! This is so gross!” I choked out. 

And then I saw the black dots scurrying through the net. It took me a few 
seconds to realize what they were. Spiders! Hundreds of them! 

“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat. 

I batted the spiderweb with both hands. I rubbed my cheeks frantically, 
trying to scrape away the sticky threads. I pulled a spider off my forehead. 

Another one off the shoulder of my T-shirt. 

“The spiders—they’re in my hair!” Marty wailed. 

He suddenly forgot about acting cool. He began raking his hair with both 
hands, slapping himself in the head, pinching and swiping at the spiders. 

As the tram rolled silently on, we both twisted and squirmed, struggling to 
flick away the black spiders. I pulled three of them out of my hair. Then I felt 
one climb into my nose! 

I opened my mouth in a horrified scream—and sneezed it out. 

Marty plucked a spider off my neck and sent it soaring through the air. The 
last spider. I couldn’t see—or feel—any more. 

We both dropped down in the seat, breathing hard. My heart pounded in my 
chest. “Still think everything is a fake?” I asked Marty, my voice weak and 
small. 

“I—I don’t know,” he replied softly. “The spiders could be puppets maybe. 
You know. Radio-controlled.” 

“They were realV I cried sharply. “Face it, Marty—they were real! This is 
The Cave of The Living Creeps—and they were living !” 

Marty’s eyes grew wide. “You really think so?” 

I nodded. “They had to be real spiders.” 

A smile spread over Marty’s face. “That’s so coo/!” he declared. “Real 
spiders! That is totally cool!” 

I let out a long sigh and slumped lower in the seat. I didn’t think it was cool 
at all. I thought it was creepy and disgusting. 

These rides are supposed to be fake. That’s what makes them fun. I decided 
to tell my dad that the worms and spiders were too scary. He should get rid of 
them before the studio tour opens to the public. 

I crossed my arms in front of me and kept my eyes straight ahead. I 
wondered what we would mn into next. I hoped there weren’t any other 
disgusting insects waiting to fall on us and climb all over our faces and bodies. 

“I think I hear the bats!” Marty teased. He leaned close to me, grinning. 
“Hear those fluttering sounds? Giant vampire bats!” 

I shoved him back to his side of the seat. I wasn’t in any mood for his 
joking around. 

“When do we get out of this cave?” I asked impatiently. “This isn’t any 

fun.” 

“I think it’s cool,” Marty repeated. “I like exploring caves.” 

The narrow tunnel opened into a wide cavern. The ceiling appeared to be a 
mile high. There were giant rocks scattered over the cavern floor. Rocks piled on 
rocks. Rocks everywhere. 

Somewhere ahead of us, I heard water dripping. Plunk plunk plunk. 

Eerie green light glowed from the cave walls. The tram pulled up to the 
back wall—and then stopped. 

“Now what?” I whispered. 

Marty and I turned in our seat, letting our eyes explore the huge cavern. All 
I could see were rocks. Smooth rocks, some round, some square. 

Plunk plunk plunk. Water dripped somewhere to our right. The air felt cold 
and damp. 

“This is kind of boring,” Marty murmured. “When do we get going?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know. Why did we stop here? It’s just a big empty 
cave.” 

We waited for the tram to back up and take us out of there. 

And waited. 

A minute went by. Then another few minutes. 

We both turned around and got up on our knees, peering to the back of the 
tram. Nothing moved. We listened to the steady drip of water, echoing off the 
high stone walls. No other sound. 

Leaning forward against the seatback, I cupped my hands around my mouth 
and shouted. “Hey—can anybody hear us?” 

I waited, listening. No reply. 

“Can anybody hear us?” I tried again. “I think we’re stuck here!” 

No reply. Just the steady drip drip drip. 

I waited, squinting hard into the glow of green light. 

Why wouldn’t the tram get moving? Had it broken down? Were we really 
stuck here? 

I turned to Marty. “What’s up with this tram? Do you think we’re—HEY!” 

I gasped as I stared at the empty seat beside me. 

I reached both hands out. I grabbed for Marty. 

Another lighting trick? Another optical illusion? 

“Marty? Hey—Marty?” I croaked. 

A cold shiver rolled down my back. 

This time Marty was really gone. 

11 

“Marty—?” 

A scraping sound beside the tram made me jump. 

I spun around and saw Marty grinning at me from the cave floor. “Gotcha.” 

“You creep!” I shouted. I swung my fist, but he dodged away, laughing. 
“You’re The Living Creep!” I cried. “You deliberately tried to scare me.” 

“It isn’t too hard a job!” he shot back. His smile faded. “I climbed down to 
check things out.” 

“But the tram might start up any second!” I told him. “You know what that 
tour guide told us. She said we should never leave the tram.” 

Marty squatted down and studied the tires. “I think the tram is stuck or 
something. Maybe it came off its tracks.” He raised his eyes to me and shook his 
head fretfully. “But there aren’t any tracks.” 

“Marty—get back in,” I pleaded. “If it starts up and leaves you standing 
there—” 

He grabbed the side of the car with both hands and shook it. The tramcar 
bounced on its tires. But it didn’t move. 

“I think it broke down,” Marty said softly. “Your father said that some 
things might not work.” 

I felt a stab of fear in my chest. “You mean we’re stranded here? All by 
ourselves in this creepy cave?” 

He stepped to the front of the car and squeezed between the tram and the 
cave wall. Then he tried to push the tram back, shoving with both hands as hard 
as he could. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

“Oh, wow,” I muttered, shaking my head. “This is horrible. This isn’t any 
fun at all.” 

I got back up on my knees on the seat and tried shouting again, as loud as I 
could: “Is anybody in here? Does anybody work here? The tram is stuck!” 

Plunk plunk plunk. The dripping water was my only reply. 

“Can somebody help us?” I shouted. “Please—can somebody help?” 

No answer. 

“Now what?” I cried. 

Marty was still shoving with all his might against the front of the tram. He 
gave one last hard push, then gave up with a sigh. “You’d better climb down,” he 
said. “We have to walk.” 

“Huh? Walk? In this creepy dark cave? No way, Marty!” 

He came around to my side of the car. “You’re not afraid —are you, Erin?” 

“Yes, I am,” I confessed. “A little.” I glanced around the huge cavern. “I 
don’t see any exits. We’d have to walk back through those tunnels. With all the 
spiders and worms and everything.” 

“We can find a way out,” Marty insisted. “There’s got to be a door 
somewhere. They always build emergency exits in these theme park rides.” 

“I think we should stay in the tram,” I said uncertainly. “If we stay here and 
wait, someone will come and find us.” 

“It could take days,” Marty declared. “Come on, Erin. I’m going to walk. 
Are you coming with me?” 

I shook my head, my arms crossed tightly in front of me. “No way,” I 
insisted. “I’m staying here.” 

I knew he wouldn’t go off by himself. I knew he wouldn’t go unless I 
joined him. 

“Well. ’Bye then,” he said. He turned and started walking quickly across the 
cave floor. 

“Hey, Marty—?” 

“’Bye. I’m not waiting here all day. See you later.” 

He was really leaving. Leaving me alone in the stalled tram, in the scary 
cave. “But, Marty—wait!” 

He turned back to me. “Are you coming or not, Erin?” he called back 
impatiently. 

“Okay, okay,” I murmured. I saw that I had no choice. I climbed over the 
side of the tram and dropped to the cave floor. 

The dirt was smooth and damp. I started walking slowly toward Marty. 

“Hurry it up,” he called. “Let’s get out of here.” He was walking backward 
now, motioning for me to catch up to him. 

But I stopped and my mouth dropped open in horror. 

“Don’t look at me like that!” he shouted. “Don’t stare at me as if I’m doing 
something wrong!” 

But I wasn’t staring at Marty. 

I was staring at the thing creeping up behind Marty. 

12 

“Uh... uh... uh...” I struggled to warn Marty, but only frightened grunts escaped 
my throat. 

He kept backing up, backing right into the enormous creature. 

“Erin, get a move on. What’s your problem ?” he demanded. 

“Uh... uh... uh...” I finally managed to point. 

“Huh?” Marty spun around—and saw it, too. “Whoa!” he screamed. His 
sneakers slid on the soft cave floor as he came running back to me. “What is that 
thing?” 

At first, I thought it was some kind of machine. It looked like one of those 
tall steel cranes you see on construction sites. All silvery and metallic. 

But as it rose up on its wire-thin back legs, I saw that it was alive ! 

It had round black eyes the size of billiard balls. They spun wildly in its 
skinny silver skull. Two slender antennae bobbed at the top of the head. Its 
mouth appeared soft, mushy. A gray tongue darted out between long, bristly 
whiskers. 

Its long body stretched back like a folded-up leaf. As it stood, it waved its 
front legs, short white sticks. 

The whole creature looked like some kind of gross stick figure. Its long 
back legs bent and sprang forward, bent then sprang forward. The thick tongue 
swung from side to side. The black eyes stopped whirling and focused on me. 

“Is it—is it a grasshopper ?” I choked out. 

Marty and I had both backed up to the tram. 

Waving its stick arms, the creature sprang closer, its antennae circling 
slowly on top of its head. 

Marty and I pressed our backs against the cold cave wall. We couldn’t move 
back any farther. 

“I think it’s a praying mantis,” Marty replied, staring up at it. The insect had 
to be at least three times as tall as us. As it moved forward, its head nearly 
scraped the cave ceiling. 

The tongue licked its soft, mushy mouth. The mouth puckered and made 
loud sucking sounds. My stomach lurched. The sound was so sick\ 

The round black eyes stared down at Marty and me. The giant praying 

mantis, its body shining like aluminum, took another hopping step toward us. It 
started to lower its head. 

“Wh-what’s it going to do?” I stammered, pressing my back hard against 
the cave wall. 

To my surprise, Marty suddenly started to laugh. 

I turned to him and grabbed his shoulder. Was he totally losing it? 

“Marty—are you okay?” 

“Of course!” he replied. He pulled away from me and took a step toward 
the towering insect. “Why should we be scared, Erin? It’s a big robot. It’s 
programmed to walk up to the tram.” 

“Huh? But, Marty—” 

“It’s all on a computer,” he continued, staring up as the big head bobbed 
lower on its stick body. “It isn’t real. It’s part of the ride.” 

I stared up at the creature. Big drops of saliva rolled off its fat tongue and 
hit the cave floor with a splat. 

“It’s... uh... really lifelike,” I murmured. 

“Your dad is a genius at this stuff!” Marty declared. “We’ll have to tell him 
what a good job he did on the praying mantis.” He laughed. “Your dad said there 
were still some bugs, remember? This must be one of them!” 

The insect rubbed its front legs together. It made a shrill whistling sound. 

I covered my ears. The high-pitched note made my ears ache! 

I was still holding my ears as a second giant praying mantis hopped out 
from behind a tall rock. 

“Look—another one!” Marty cried, pointing. He tugged my arm. “Wow. 
They move so smoothly. You can’t even tell that they’re machines.” 

The two silvery insects chittered at each other, a sharp shrill, metallic 
sound. Their black eyes twirled. Their antennae rotated rapidly, excitedly. 

Gobs of saliva rolled off their tongues and splattered to the floor. The 
second one flashed silvery wings on its back, then quickly closed them up again. 

“Great-looking robots!” Marty declared. He turned to me. “We’d better get 
back in the tram. It’ll probably start up again now that we’ve seen these giant 
bugs.” 

The two insects chittered to each other. They hopped closer, their sticklike 
legs springing hard, bouncing off the smooth cave floor. 

“I hope you’re right,” I told Marty. “Those insects are too real. I want to get 
out of here!” 

I started to follow him to the tramcar. 

The first mantis leaped forward quickly. It hopped between us and the tram, 
blocking our path. 

“Hey—!” I cried. 

We tried to step around it. But it took a big hop to stay in front of us. 

“It—it won’t let us pass!” I stammered. 

“Ohhh!” I cried out as the big creature suddenly swung down and slammed 
its head against my chest. The powerful head-butt sent me sprawling backward. 

“Hey—stop that!” I heard Marty shout. “That machine must be broken!” 

Its black eyes glowing, the mantis lowered its head again—and gave me 
another hard push toward the center of the cave. 

Its partner moved quickly to trap Marty. It lowered its body and prepared to 
head-butt Marty. But Marty quickly backed away, raising his hands in front of 
him like a shield. He hurried to join me. 

I heard scraping sounds. Shrill chirps and chittering. 

I spun around to discover two more huge, ugly mantises climbing out from 
behind rocks. Then two more, their antennae twisting excitedly. Their fat gray 
tongues rolling around their open mouths. 

Marty and I huddled together in the middle of the cavern as the creatures 
hopped and scraped around us. Then they rose up high on their hind legs, their 
black eyes gleaming, their short stick arms waving. 

“We—we’re surrounded!” I cried. 

13 

The giant insects all began chittering at once. They scraped their front legs 
together excitedly. The shrill whistle rose through the cave, echoing off the stone 
walls. 

They formed a circle around us, leaning back on their spindly hind legs. 
Moving closer. Tightening the circle. Their tongues whipped back and forth. 
Thick gobs of mantis saliva hit the floor. 

“They’re out of control!” Marty shrieked. 

“What are they going to do to us?” I cried, covering my ears against their 
excited chirps and the deafening whistle. 

“Maybe they are voice-controlled,” Marty shouted. He tilted back his head 
and shouted up at them: “Stop! Stop!” 

They didn’t stop. 

One of them tilted its silvery head, opened its ugly mouth wide, and spit out 
a black gob. It splattered onto Marty’s sneaker. 

He jumped back. His sneaker stuck to the floor. 

He struggled to tug it free. “Yuck! Watch out! That black stuff—it’s like 
glue!” he cried. 

THOOOM. 

Another mantis opened its mouth wide and spit out a big black gob of 
sticky goo. It splotched the shoulder of my T-shirt. 

“Oww!” I wailed. It was so hot—it burned me right through my shirt. 

The others chittered shrilly and scraped their hairy stick arms. Their 
tongues darting back and forth, they began to lower their heads to us. 

“The stun guns!” I cried, grabbing Marty’s arm. “Maybe the guns will work 
against these bugs!” 

“Those guns are only toys!” he wailed. 

THUPPP. 

Another black gob missed Marty’s foot by inches. 

“Besides, the guns are in the tram,” Marty continued, staring up at the ugly 
creatures. “No way they’ll let us get to the tram.” 

“Then what are we going to do?” I cried. 

As I asked the question, an idea flashed into my mind. 

“Marty—” I whispered. “How do you normally get rid of bugs?” 

“Huh? Erin—what are you talking about?” 

“You step on them—right? Don’t you usually step on them?” 

“But, Erin—” he protested. “These bugs are big enough to step on us!” 

“It’s worth a try!” I cried. 

I raised my sneaker—and tromped as hard as I could on the foot of the 
nearest mantis. 

The giant insect let out a shrill hiss and hopped backward. 

Beside me, Marty stomped on another insect, bringing the heel of his 
sneaker down hard on its spindly foot. That creature fell back, too, raising its 
head in a shrill hiss of pain. Its eyes spun wildly. Its antennae shot straight up. 

I stomped down hard again. With a hoarse choking sound, the big mantis 
fell onto its side. All four stick legs thrashed the air. 

“Let’s go!” I shouted. 

I turned and burst through the circle of insects. I didn’t know where to run. I 
only knew I had to get away. 

The cave erupted in hisses and shrill whistles, angry cluttering and croaks. I 
glimpsed Marty lurching after me. 

I ignored the echoing, ringing sounds and ran. 

Ran to the tram. 

Leaned over the side and grabbed both plastic stun guns into my arms. 

Then I pushed away from the tram and hurtled along the stone cave wall. 

Where could I go? 

How could I escape? 

The cluttering and hissing grew louder, more frantic. The tall shadows of 
the giant insects danced on the wall as I ran. I had the feeling that the shadows 
could reach out and grab me. 

I glanced back. 

Marty came running behind me at full speed. 

The mantises were hopping, scrabbling, limping across the dirt floor after 
us. 

Where to run? Where? 

And then I saw the narrow opening in the cave wall. Just a crack, really. 

But I dove for it. Slipped into it. Squeezed myself into the dark hole 
between the stone. 

And burst out the other side. Into the misty daylight. 

Outside! 

I could see trees tilting down the hill. The road that led down to the studio 
buildings. 

Yes! Outside! I made it! 

I felt so happy. So safe. 

But I didn’t have long to enjoy the feeling. 

As I started to catch my breath, I heard Marty’s terrified cry: “Erin—help! 
Help! They got me! They’re eating me!” 

14 

With a gasp, I spun around. 

How could I help Marty? How could I get him out of the cave? 

To my surprise, he was leaning against the cave wall, one elbow against the 
rock, his legs crossed. A big grin on his round face. 

“April Fools,” he said. 

“YAAAIIIII!” I let out an angry scream. Then I dropped the two plastic 
pistols and rushed at him, ready to pound him with my fists. “You jerk! You 
scared me to death!” 

He laughed and dodged to the side as I came at him. I swung my fist and hit 
air. 

“Don’t play any more dumb jokes like that!” I cried breathlessly. “This 
place is too scary! Those big insects—” 

“Yeah. They were scary,” he agreed, his smile fading. “They were so real! 
How do you think they made them spit like that?” 

I shook my head. “I don’t know,” I muttered. 

I had a heavy feeling in my stomach. I knew it was a crazy idea. But I was 
beginning to think these creatures we were seeing were real. 

Maybe I’ve seen too many scary movies. But the big praying mantises and 
the white worms and all the other creatures and monsters really seemed to be 
alive. 

They didn’t move like mechanical creatures. They appeared to breathe. And 
their eyes focused on Marty and me as if they could really see us. 

I wanted to tell Marty what I was thinking. But I knew he would only laugh 
at me. 

He was so sure that they were all robots and that we were seeing some 
awesome movie special effects. Of course, that made sense. We were on a movie 
studio tour, after all. 

I hoped Marty was right. I hoped it was all tricks. Movie magic. 

My dad was a genius when it came to designing mechanical creatures and 
building theme park rides. And maybe that’s all we were seeing. Maybe Dad had 
really outdone himself this time. 

But the heavy feeling in my stomach wouldn’t go away. I had the feeling 

that we were in danger. Real danger. 

I had the feeling that something had gone wrong here. That something was 
out of control. 

I suddenly wished we weren’t the first two kids to try out the tour. I knew it 
was supposed to be a thrill to be the only ones here. But it was too quiet. Too 
empty. Too scary. It would be so much more fun if hundreds of other people 
were along with us. 

I wanted to tell Marty all this. But how could I? 

He was so eager to prove that he was braver than me. So eager to prove that 
he wasn’t afraid of anything. 

I couldn’t tell him what I was really thinking. 

I picked up the two plastic stun guns and handed him one. I didn’t want to 
carry them both. 

He tucked the barrel of his gun into his jeans pocket. “Hey, Erin—look 
where we are!” he cried. He jogged past me, his eyes straight ahead. “Check it 
out!” 

He started running across the grass. I turned and started to follow him. I 
didn’t want him to get too far ahead. 

The sky had darkened. The sun had disappeared behind a heavy blanket of 
clouds. Wisps of gray fog hung low in the cool air. It was nearly evening. 

We crossed the road and stepped into a town. I mean, it was a movie set of a 
town. A small town with low, one- and two-story buildings, small shops, a 
country-looking general store. Big, old houses in the block beyond the stores. 

“Do you think this is a set they really use in the movies?” I asked, hurrying 
to catch up to Marty. 

He turned to me, his dark eyes flashing with excitement. “Don’t you 
recognize it? Don’t you know where you are?” 

And then my eyes fell on the crumbling, old mansion half-hidden by the 
twisted trees. And across from it, I saw the crooked picket fence that ran around 
the old cemetery. 

And I knew we were on Shock Street. 

“Wow!” I exclaimed, spinning around, trying to take it all in at once. “This 
really is Shock Street. This is where they filmed all of the movies!” 

“It doesn’t look the way I imagined it,” Marty said. “It looks even scarier!” 

He was right. As the sky darkened to evening, long shadows fell over the 
empty buildings. The wind made a moaning sound as it swept around the corner. 

Marty and I made our way down the street, trying to see everything. We 
kept crossing from side to side, peering into a dark, dust-covered shop window 
—then running to examine the front yard of a rundown, old mansion. 

“Check out that empty lot,” I said, pointing. “That’s where The Mad 
Mangier hung out. Remember? In Shocker III? Remember—he mangled 
everyone who walked by?” 

“Of course I remember,” Marty snapped. He stepped into the empty lot. Tall 
weeds bent low, blown by the moaning wind. Shadows moved against the fence 
at the back. 

I stayed on the sidewalk and squinted hard, trying to see what cast the 
shadows. 

Did The Mad Mangier still lurk back there? 

The lot was totally empty. So how could there be tall, shifting shadows on 
the fence? 

“Marty—come back,” I pleaded. “It’s getting dark.” 

He turned back. “Scared, Erin?” 

“It’s just an empty lot,” I told him. “Let’s keep walking.” 

“People always thought it was just an empty lot,” Marty replied in a low, 
scary voice. “Until The Mad Mangier jumped out and mangled them!” He let out 
a long, evil laugh. 

“Marty—you’re losing it,” I murmured, shaking my head. 

He came trotting out of the lot, and we crossed the street. “I wish I had a 
camera,” he said. “I’d really like a picture of me standing in The Mangler’s lot.” 
His eyes lit up. “Or even better—!” 

He didn’t finish his sentence. Instead, he took off, running full speed. 

“Hey—wait up!” I cried. 

A few seconds later, I saw where he was headed. The old cemetery. 

He ran up to the cracked and peeling wooden gate and turned back to me. 
“Even better, I’d like a photo of me standing in the cemetery. The actual set 
where they filmed Cemetery on Shock Street.” 

“We don’t have a camera,” I called from the street. “Get away from there.” 

He ignored me and started to open the gate. The bottom was stuck in the 
grass. Marty tugged hard. Finally, the gate started to pull open, creaking and 
groaning as it moved. 

“Marty—let’s go,” I insisted. “It’s getting late. Dad is probably waiting for 
us, wondering what happened to us.” 

“But this is part of the tour!” he insisted. He tugged the heavy gate open 
just wide enough to squeeze inside the cemetery. 

“Marty—please! Don’t go in!” I begged. I ran up beside him. 

“Erin, it’s just a movie set,” he replied. “You didn’t used to be such a total 
wimp!” 

“I—I just have a bad feeling about this cemetery,” I stammered. “A very 
bad feeling.” 

“It’s part of the tour,” he repeated. 

“But this gate was c/osed!” I cried. “It was closed so that people don’t go 
in.” I raised my eyes to the cemetery. I saw the old graves tilting up from the 
ground like crooked teeth. “I have such a bad feeling...” 

Marty ignored me. He tugged the gate open a little wider and slipped into 
the cemetery. 

“Marty—please—!” I gripped the low fence tightly with both hands and 
watched him. 

He took three steps toward the old graves. Then his hands shot straight up 
in the air—and he dropped out of sight. 

15 

I stared into the darkness, blinking hard. 

I swallowed. Once. Twice. 

I couldn’t believe that he was gone, that he had vanished so quickly. 

The wind moaned between the jagged, tilting gravestones. 

“Marty—?” My voice came out in a choked whisper. “Marty?” 

I gripped the picket fence so hard, my hands ached. I knew I had no choice. 
I had to go in there and see what had happened to him. 

I took a deep breath and pushed myself through the opening. The ground 
was soft. My sneakers sank into the tall grass. 

I took one step. 

Then another. 

I stopped when I heard Marty’s voice. “Hey—be careful.” 

“Huh?” I gazed around. “Where are you?” 

“Down here.” 

I peered down—into a deep, dark hole. An open grave. Marty stared up at 
me. He had dirt on his cheeks and down the front of his T-shirt. He raised both 
hands. “Help me out. I fell!” 

I had to laugh. He looked ridiculous, standing in that hole, covered in dirt. 

“It’s not funny. Help me out,” he repeated impatiently. 

“I warned you,” I said. “I had a bad feeling.” 

“It smells down here,” Marty complained. 

I leaned down. “What does it smell like?” 

“Like dirt. Get me out!” 

“Okay, okay.” I grabbed his hands and tugged. He kicked his feet, digging 
his toes of his sneakers into the soft dirt. 

A few seconds later, he was back on the ground, frantically brushing 
himself off. “That was cool!” he declared. “Now I can tell people I was in a 
grave in The Shock Street Cemetery.” 

A chill ran down my back as the wind picked up. “Let’s get out of here,” I 
pleaded. 

Something gray floated silently between two old gravestones. A wisp of 

fog? A gray cat? 

“Check out these graves,” Marty said, still brushing dirt off his jeans. 
“They’re all cracked and faded. I can barely read the names. That’s so cool. And 
look how they sprayed cobwebs over that row of stones. Creepy, huh?” 

“Marty—can we go?” I begged again. “Dad is probably worried by now. 
Maybe the tram started up again. Maybe we can find it.” 

He ignored me. I watched him lean over a tombstone to read the words cut 
into it. “Jim Socks,” he read. “Eighteen forty to eighteen eighty-seven.” He 
laughed. “Jim Socks. Get it? And look at the ones next to it. Ben Dover. Sid 
Upp. These are all funny!” 

I laughed. Ben Dover and Sid Upp were pretty funny. 

My laugh was cut short when I heard a soft cry from the back of the 
graveyard. I saw another gray wisp dart behind a tombstone. 

I held my breath and listened hard. The wind whistled through the tall 
grass. 

Rising above the wind came another shrill cry. 

A cat? I wondered. Is the cemetery filled with cats? Or is it a child? 

Marty heard it, too. He moved down the row of stones until he stood beside 
me. His dark eyes glowed excitedly. “This is so cool. Did you hear the sound 
effects? There must be a speaker hidden in the ground.” 

Another shrill cry. 

Definitely human. A girl? 

I shivered. “Marty, I really think we should try to get back to my dad. 
We’ve been here all afternoon. And—” 

“But what about the rest of the tour?” he argued. “We have to see 
everything!” 

I heard another cry. Louder. Closer. A cry of terror. 

I tried to ignore it. Marty was probably right. The cries had to be coming 
from a loudspeaker somewhere. 

“How can we finish the tour?” I demanded. “We were supposed to stay on 
the tram—remember? But the tram—OHH!” 

I cried out as a hand shot up from the ground in front of us. A green hand. 
Its long fingers unfolded, as if reaching for us. 

“Whoa!” Marty cried, stumbling back. 

Another green hand shot up from the dirt. Then two more. 

Hands reaching up from graves. 

I let out a frightened gasp. Hands were bursting up through the grass. Hands 
all around us. Their fingers twisting and arching, reaching out. 

Marty started to laugh. “This is totally awesome! Just like in the movie!” 

He stopped laughing as a hand poked up beside him and grabbed his ankle. 
“Erin—help!” he cried. 

But I couldn’t help. 

Two green hands had wrapped around my ankles and were pulling me 
down, down into the grave. 

16 

“Come dowwwwwnnnnn, ” a soft voice moaned. “Come dowwwwwnnnn with 
us.” 

“Nooo!” I shrieked. 

My arms thrashed the air. I tried to kick, but the hands gripped me so 
tightly, so firmly. 

My whole body frantically jerked and tilted back and forth, as I struggled 
not to fall. If I fell, I knew they would grab my hands, too. And pull me 
facedown into the earth. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us. ” 

This isn’t a joke, I thought. These hands are real. They are really trying to 
pull me underground. 

“Help! Oh, help!” I heard Marty’s cry. Then I saw him fall. He toppled to 
the grass, onto his knees. 

Two hands gripped his ankles. Two more green hands poked up from the 
dirt to grab his wrists. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the sad 
voice moaned. 

“Noooo!” I shrieked, tugging wildly, desperately. 

To my surprise, I pulled free. 

One foot sank into the soft grass. I glanced down. My sneaker had slid off. 
The hand still gripped the sneaker—but my foot was free. 

With a happy cry, I bent down. Pulled off the other sneaker. 

I was free now. Free! 

Breathing hard, I bent and quickly pulled off my socks. I knew it would be 
easier to run barefoot. I tossed the socks away. Then I hurried over to Marty. 

He was flat on his stomach. Six hands held him down, tugging at him, 
tugging hard. His whole body twisted and shook. 

He raised his head when he saw me. “Erin—help me!” he gasped. 

I dropped to my knees. Reached for his sneakers. Tugged them off. 

The green hands gripped the sneakers tightly. Marty kicked his feet free and 
tried to climb to his knees. 

I grabbed a green hand and pulled if off his wrist. The hand slapped at me. 

A cold, hard slap that made my hand ring with pain. 

Ignoring it, I grabbed for another green hand. 

Marty rolled over. Rolled free. Jumped to his feet, gasping, trembling, his 
mouth hanging open, his dark eyes bulging. 

“Your socks—” I cried breathlessly. “Pull them off! Hurry!” 

He clumsily tore them off his feet. 

The hands grabbed wildly for us. Dozens of hands stretching up from the 
dirt. Hundreds of hands reaching up for us from the tall graveyard grass. 

“Come dowwwwwwwnnnnnnn. Come dowwwwwnnnn with us,” the voice 
moaned. 

“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnrm. Come dowwwwwnnnn, ” a dozen other soft 
voices called from beneath the ground. 

Marty and I froze. The soft, sad voices seemed to hypnotize me. My legs 
suddenly felt as if they were made of stone. 

“Come dowwwwurwwnnnnnrm. Come dowwwwwnnnn. ” 

And then I saw a green head pop up from the dirt. And then another head. 
Another. Bald green heads with empty eye sockets and open, toothless mouths. 

I saw shoulders, then arms. More heads poking up. Bright-green bodies 
pulling up from beneath the ground. 

“M-Marty—” I choked out. “They’re coming up after us!” 

17 

The cemetery rang out with grunts and groans as the ugly green figures pulled 
themselves up from the ground. 

I took one last glance at their tattered, shredded clothing, at their blackened 
eye sockets, their toothless, grinning mouths. 

And then I started to run. 

Marty and I both ran without saying a word. Side by side, we darted across 
the tall grass between the rows of crooked tombstones. 

My heart thudded in my chest. My head throbbed. My bare feet sank into 
the cold dirt, slipped on the tall, damp grass. 

Marty reached the wooden gate first. He was running so hard, he banged 
into the fence. He let out a cry—then slipped through the gate onto Shock Street. 

I could hear moans and groans and eerie calls of the disgusting green 
people behind me. But I didn’t look back. I dove for the gate. Squeezed through. 
Then I shoved it shut behind me. 

Running into the street, I stopped to catch my breath. I bent over and 
pressed my hands against my knees. My side ached. I sucked in breath after 
breath. 

“Don’t stop!” Marty cried frantically. “Erin—keep going!” 

I took a deep breath and followed him down the street. Our bare feet 
slapped the pavement. 

I could still hear the moans and calls behind us. But I was too scared to 
glance back. 

“Marty—where is everybody?” I called breathlessly. 

Shock Street was empty, the houses and shops all dark. 

Shouldn’t there be people around? I wondered. This is a big movie studio. 
Where are the people who work for Shocker Studios? Where are the people who 
work on the studio tour? 

Why isn’t anyone around to help us? 

“Something is wrong!” Marty choked out, running at full speed. We passed 
The Horror Hardware Store and Shock City Electronics. “The robots are out of 
control or something!” 

At last! Marty agreed with me. He finally agreed that something was 

terribly wrong. 

“We’ve got to find your dad,” Marty said, running across the street to the 
next block of dark houses. “We’ve got to tell him there’s a problem.” 

“We have to find the tram,” I called, struggling to keep up with him. “Ow!” 

My bare foot came down on something hard. A rock or something. Pain 
shot up my leg. But I hobbled on. 

“If we can get back on the tram, it will take us back to Dad,” I called. 

“There has to be a way out of Shock Street,” Marty said. “It’s only a movie 

set.” 

We ran past a tall mansion with two turrets. It looked like an evil castle. I 
didn’t remember it from any of the Shocker movies. 

Beyond the mansion stretched a big, empty dirt lot. At the back of the lot 
stood a low brick wall, just a foot or two taller than Marty and me. 

“Cut through here!” I told Marty. “If we can climb up on that wall, we can 
probably see the studio road.” 

I was just guessing. But it was worth a try. 

We both turned into the empty lot. 

My bare feet thudded over the soft dirt. 

The dirt felt cold and wet. As we crossed the field, our feet tossed up big 
clumps of mud. 

I pumped my legs harder as the mud grew softer. My bare feet were sinking 
into it. As I ran, the cold mud rose up over my ankles. 

Marty and I were nearly to the brick wall when we ran into the sinkhole. 

“Yaaaaaiiii!” We both uttered hoarse cries as the ground gave way beneath 
us. 

The mud made a sick splussssh as we sank. 

I tossed up both hands. Tried to grab onto something. 

But there was nothing to grab. 

The mud oozed around me. Over my ankles. My legs. Up over my knees. 

It’s sucking me down, I thought. I tried to cry out again—but panic choked 
my throat. 

I glimpsed Marty beside me. His arms were waving wildly. His whole body 
twisted and squirmed as he sank. The mud was up over his waist—and he was 
still sinking fast. 

I kicked hard. Tried to raise my knees. 

But I was trapped. Trapped and dropping down, down into the dark, wet 

ooze. 

My mud-covered arms slapped against the surface. 

I couldn’t stop myself. 

The mud bubbled up over my neck. And I was sinking fast. 

18 

I held my breath. The mud rose up to my chin. 

In a second, it will be over my head, I thought. 

A sob escaped my throat. 

The mud crept higher, up over my chin. I started to spit as it reached my 
mouth. 

And then I felt something grab my arm. Strong hands slipped under my 
arms. I felt the hands slide in the mud. 

They gripped me harder. 

I felt myself being tugged up, tugged by someone very strong. 

The mud made a loud plop as I rose up. I felt the mud roll down my chest, 
my legs, my knees. 

And then I was standing on the surface, still held by the two powerful 
hands. 

“Marty—!” I called, tasting the sour mud on my lips. “Are you—?” 

“I’m up!” I heard his hoarse reply. “Erin, I’m okay!” 

The strong hands finally let go. My legs trembled. I wobbled but remained 
standing. 

I turned to see who had rescued me. 

And stared into the glowing red eyes of a wolf. 

A human with the face of a wolf. Clawed hands covered in black fur. A 
long, brown snout curved in an open, toothy grin. Sharp, pointed ears above a 
thick tuft of black wolf fur. 

A female. She wore a silvery catsuit. Sleek and tight-fitting. As I stared in 
shock, she opened her mouth in a throaty growl. 

I recognized her at once. Wolf Girl! 

I turned to see her companion—Wolf Boy. He had pulled Marty out of the 
mud hole. Marty’s whole body was caked in mud. He tried to wipe his face, but 
only managed to smear more mud over his cheeks. 

“You—saved us! Thank you!” I cried, finally finding my voice. 

The two werewolves uttered low growls in reply. 

“We—we lost the tram,” I explained to Wolf Girl. “We need to get back. 

You know. Back to where the ride began.” 

She let out a sharp growl. Then she snapped her toothy jaw hard. 

“Please—” I begged. “Can you help us get back to the tram? Or can you 
take us to the main building? My dad is waiting for me there.” 

Wolf Girl’s red eyes flashed. She growled again. 

“We know you’re just actors!” Marty blurted out shrilly. “But we don’t 
want to be scared anymore. We’ve had enough scares for today. Okay?” 

The two werewolves growled. A long white string of saliva drooled over 
Wolf Boy’s black lips. 

Something inside me snapped. I totally lost it. “Stop it!” I screamed. “Just 
stop it! Marty is right! We don’t want to be scared now. So stop the werewolf act 
—and help us!” 

The werewolves growled again. Wolf Girl snapped her jaws. A long pink 
tongue slid out, and she licked her jagged teeth hungrily. 

“That’s enough !” I shrieked. “Stop the act! Stop it! Stop it!” 

I was so angry, so furious —I reached up with both hands. I grabbed the fur 
on the sides of Wolf Girl’s mask. 

And I tugged the mask with all my strength. 

Tugged. Tugged with both hands as hard as I could. 

And felt real fur. And warm skin. 

It wasn’t a mask. 

19 

“Ohh.” I let out a gasp, and jerked my hands away. 

The werewolf’s red eyes glowed. Her black lips parted. Once again, her 
tongue flicked hungrily over her yellow, pointed teeth. 

My whole body trembled as I backed up against the brick wall. “M-Marty 
—” I stammered. “It’s not an act.” 

“Huh?” Marty stood stiffly in front of Wolf Boy, his dark eyes wide in his 
mud-caked face. 

“They’re not actors,” I whispered. “Something is wrong here. Something is 
terribly wrong.” 

Marty’s mouth dropped open. He took a step back. 

Both werewolves uttered low growls. They lowered their heads as if 
preparing to attack. 

“Do you believe me?” I cried. “Do you finally believe me?” 

Marty nodded. He didn’t say a word. I think he was too terrified to talk. 

Saliva poured from the werewolves’ mouths. Their eyes glowed like fire in 
the darkness. Their furry chests began to heave in and out. Their breaths came 
loud and hoarse. 

I jumped back against the wall as both werewolves raised their heads and 
let out long, frightening howls. 

What were they going to do to us? 

I grabbed Marty and tugged him to the wall. “Up!” I cried. “Get up! Maybe 
they can’t reach us up there!” 

Marty leaped high, stretching up his arms. His hands slapped the top of the 
wall, then slid back down. He tried again. He bent his knees. Jumped. Grabbed 
for the top of the wall. Slipped back down. 

“I can’t!” he wailed. “It’s too high.” 

“We’ve got to!” I shrieked. 

I turned back and saw the two werewolves lean back on their hind legs and 
then spring up. They were snarling and growling now, thick gobs of saliva 
running over their snapping teeth. 

“Up!” I cried. 

As Marty leaped for the wall again, I reached down and grabbed his muddy 

foot. “Up!” I gave him a hard boost. 

His hands thrashed the air. Caught the top of the brick wall. Held on. 

His bare feet kicked the air. But he held on and tugged himself up. 

On his knees on top of the wall, he turned and grabbed my hands. He pulled 
and I jumped. I struggled to scramble up beside him. 

But I couldn’t get my knees up. Couldn’t get them onto the wall. 

My bare feet thrashed wildly. My knees scraped against the wall as Marty 
tugged. 

“I can’t do it! I can’t!” I gasped. 

The werewolves howled again. 

“Keep trying!” Marty choked out. He tugged my arms. Tugged with all his 
strength. 

I was still struggling as the two werewolves leaped. 

20 

I heard the snap of jaws. 

I felt hot breath on the bottom of my foot. 

The two werewolves thudded against the wall. 

With a desperate cry, I sprang to the top. Gasping for air, I pressed myself 
flat against the bricks. 

I raised my head in time to see the two snarling werewolves leap again. 
Jaws snapped in front of my face. Red eyes gleamed hungrily at me. 

“No!” With a cry, I scrambled to my feet. 

The werewolves raised their heads in angry howls and prepared to attack 
again. 

Marty and I stood pressed close together, staring down at them. 

They jumped. 

Their claws scraped against the bricks. The shrill screech sent chills down 
my back. Their teeth snapped. 

They dropped down. Prepared another leap, snarling excitedly. 

“We can’t stay up here forever!” Marty cried. “What do we do?” 

I squinted into the darkness. Was that the studio road on the other side of 
the wall? 

Too dark to tell. 

The werewolves leaped again. Jagged teeth scraped against my ankle. 

I jumped back. Nearly toppled off the wall. 

Marty and I bumped into each other, our eyes on the two growling creatures 
preparing another leap. 

The gun! The plastic stun gun! 

Mine had fallen from my hand. It was probably buried in that mud hole. But 
my eyes fell on Marty’s gun. Its handle poked out from his jeans pocket. 

Without saying a word, I grabbed the handle and tugged the plastic pistol 
from Marty’s jeans. 

“Hey—!” he cried. “Erin—what are you doing?” 

“They gave us the guns for a reason,” I explained, shouting over the 
frightening howls of the two werewolves. “Maybe this will stop them.” 

“It—it’s only a toy!” Marty stammered. 

I didn’t care. It was worth a try. 

Maybe it would frighten them. Maybe it would hurt them. Maybe it would 
chase them away. 

I raised the plastic gun. Aimed it as the two werewolves made another leap 
of attack. “One—two—three—FIRE!” I squeezed the trigger. Again. Again. 
Again! 

21 

The gun made a loud buzzing sound. It shot out a beam of yellow light. 

Yes! I thought. Yes! I prayed. 

The light will stop them. 

It’s a stun gun—right? The buzzing sound and the bright light will stun 
them. It will freeze them in place so Marty and I can make our escape. 

I squeezed the trigger hard. Again. Again. 

It didn’t stop the werewolves. It didn’t even seem to surprise them. 

They leaped higher. I felt sharp claws scrape my leg. I cried out in pain. 

And the plastic gun flew out of my hand. 

It clattered against the top of the wall, then slid to the ground. 

Just a toy. Marty was right. It wasn’t a real weapon. It was just a stupid toy. 

“Look out!” Marty opened his mouth in a shrill shriek as the snarling 
creatures made another high leap at the wall. 

Claws scraped the brick—and held on. Red eyes glared up at me. Hot wolf 
breath tingled my skin. 

“Ohhh.” My arms flew up as I lost my balance. I struggled to stay up. But 
my knees bent. My feet slipped. 

I grabbed for Marty. Missed. 

And toppled off. Landed hard on my back on the other side of the wall. 

Gazing up in horror, I saw Marty leap down beside me. 

The two werewolves were on the top of the wall now. They glared down at 
us, red eyes glowing, tongues out, breathing hard. 

Preparing to pounce. 

Marty dragged me to my feet. “Run!” he cried hoarsely, his eyes wide with 
panic. 

The werewolves growled above us. 

The ground tilted. I still felt dizzy, a little dazed from my fall. “We—we 
can’t outrun them!” I moaned. 

I heard a rumbling sound. A clatter. 

Marty and I both turned. And saw two yellow eyes, glowing against the 
dark sky. 

Yellow eyes of a creature roaring toward us. 

No. Not a creature. 

As it drew nearer, I could make out its long, sleek shape. 

The tram! 

The tram bouncing over the road behind yellow headlights. Coming closer. 
Closer. 

Yes! 

I turned to Marty. Did he see it, too? He did. 

Without saying a word, we both began running to the road. The tram was 
rolling fast. Somehow we had to climb on it. We had to! 

Behind us, I heard the werewolves howl. I heard a hard thump, then another 
as they dropped off the wall. 

The twin yellow headlights of the tram swept over us. 

The werewolves snarled and howled angrily as they chased after us. 

A few feet ahead of me, Marty was hurtling forward, his head down, his 
legs pumping furiously. 

The tram bumped closer. Closer. 

The howling werewolves were inches behind us. I could almost feel their 
hot breath on the back of my neck. 

A few more seconds. A few more seconds—and Marty and I would make 
our jump. 

I watched the tram speed around a curve, the yellow headlights washing 
over the dark road. I kept my eyes on the front car. Took a deep breath. Prepared 
to jump. 

And then Marty fell. 

I saw his hands shoot out. Saw his mouth open wide in surprise. In horror. 

He stumbled over his own bare feet and dropped to the ground, landing 
hard on his stomach. 

I couldn’t stop in time. 

I ran right into him. Stumbled over him. 

Fell heavily on top of him. 

And watched the tram speed past us. 

22 

“Owoooooooo!” 

The two werewolves uttered long howls of triumph. 

My heart pounding, I scrambled to my feet. “Get up!” I frantically pulled 
Marty up by both arms. 

We took off after the tram, our bare feet pounding the hard road. The last 
car bounced a few feet ahead of us. 

I reached it first. Shot out my right hand. Grabbed the back of the car. 

With a desperate leap, I hoisted myself up. Up. And into the last seat. 

Struggling to catch my breath, I turned back to find Marty running behind 
the tram. His hands reached for the back of the tramcar. “I—I can’t make it!” he 
gasped. 

“Run! You’ve got to!” I screamed. 

Behind him, I could see the werewolves scampering close behind. 

Marty put on a burst of speed. He grabbed the back of the car with both 
hands. It dragged him for several feet—until he swung himself around and 
dropped into the seat beside me. 

Yes! I thought happily. We made it! We got away from those howling 
werewolves. 

Or did we? 

Would they jump into the tram after us? 

I spun around, my whole body trembling. And I watched the werewolves 
fade into the distance. They ran for a while, then gave up. They both stood in the 
road, hunched over in defeat, watching us escape. 

Escape. 

What a wonderful word. 

Marty and I grinned at each other. I slapped him a high five. 

We were both breathing hard, covered in mud. My legs ached from running. 
My bare feet throbbed. My heart still thudded from the frightening chase. 

But we had escaped. And now we were safe in the tram, on our way back to 
the starting platform. Back to my dad. 

“We’ve got to tell your dad that this place is messed up,” Marty said 
breathlessly. 

“Something is horribly wrong here,” I agreed. 

“Those werewolves—they weren’t kidding around,” Marty continued. 
“They—they were real, Erin. They weren’t actors.” 

I nodded. I felt so glad that Marty finally agreed with me. And he wasn’t 
pretending to be brave anymore. He wasn’t pretending that it was all robots and 
special effects. 

We both knew that we had faced real dangers. Real monsters. 

Something was terribly wrong at Shocker Studios. Dad had told us he 
wanted a full report. Well, he was going to get one! 

I settled back in the seat, trying to calm down. 

But I shot straight up again when I realized we weren’t alone. “Marty— 
look!” I pointed to the front of the tram. “We aren’t the only passengers.” 

In fact, every tramcar appeared to be filled with people. 

“What’s going on?” Marty murmured. “Your dad said we were the only 
ones on the tour. And now the tram is—OH!—” 

Marty never finished his sentence. His mouth fell open in a gasp. His eyes 
bulged open wide. 

I gasped, too. 

The other passengers on the tram all turned around at the same time. And I 
saw their grinning jaws, their dark, empty eye sockets, the gray bones of their 
skulls. 

Skeletons. 

The other passengers were all grinning skeletons. 

Their jaws opened in dry laughter. Cruel laughter that sounded like the 
wind screeching through bare trees. Bones rattled and clattered as they raised 
their yellowed, skeletal hands to point at us. 

Their skulls bobbed and bounced as the tram carried us, faster, faster, 
through the darkness. 

Marty and I slumped low in the seat, trembling, staring at the grinning 
skulls, the pointing fingers. 

Who were they? 

How did they get on this tram? 

Where were they taking us? 

23 

The skeletons laughed their wheezing laugh. Their bones clanked and rattled. 
Their yellowed skulls bounced loosely on their clattering shoulder bones. 

The tram picked up speed. We were flying through the darkness. 

I forced myself to turn away from the grinning skulls and peered out. 
Beyond the trees, I could see the low buildings of the movie studio. As I stared, 
they grew smaller, faded into the blackness of the night. 

“Marty—we’re not going back to the main platform,” I whispered. “We’re 
heading the wrong way. We’re going away from all the buildings.” 

He swallowed hard. I could see the panic in his eyes. “What can we do?” he 
choked out. 

“We’ve got to get off!” I replied. “We’ve got to jump.” 

Marty had slumped all the way down in the seat, as low as he could get. I 
think he was trying to hide from the skeletons. 

Now he raised his head and peeked over the side of the tram. “Erin—we 
can’t jump!” he cried. “We’re going too fast.” 

He was right. 

We were rocketing along the road. And the tram kept picking up speed. The 
trees and shrubs whirred past in a dark blur. 

And then as we squealed into a sharp curve, a tall building seemed to jump 
into our path. 

A castle, bathed in swirling spotlights. All gray and silver. Twin towers 
reached up to the sky. A solid stone wall rose up from the road. 

The road. 

It curved straight into the castle wall. The road ended at the wall. 

And we were roaring down the road, still picking up speed. 

Roaring toward the castle. 

The skeletons rattled and clattered and laughed their dry, screeching laugh. 
They bounced in their seats, bones cracking, jumping in excitement as we 
zoomed at the castle. 

Closer. Closer. 

Right up to it now. Up to the solid stone wall. 

About to smash right into it. 

24 

My legs trembled. My heart pounded. But somehow I managed to stand up on 
the seat. 

I took a deep breath. Held it. Closed my eyes—and jumped. 

I landed hard on my side, and rolled. 

I saw Marty hesitate. The tram bounced. Marty dove over the side. 

He hit the ground on his stomach. Rolled onto his back. And kept rolling. 

I came to a stop under a tree. And turned to the castle—in time to see the 
tram plunge into the stone wall. 

Without a sound. 

The first tramcar hit the castle wall and flew through it. 

Silently. 

I could see the skeletons bobbing and bouncing. 

And I saw the next car and the next and the next—all shoot into the castle 
wall and disappear through it without making a sound. 

A few seconds later, the tram disappeared. 

A heavy silence fell over the road. 

The spotlights on the castle wall dimmed. 

“Erin—are you okay?” Marty called weakly. 

I turned to find him on his hands and knees on the other side of the road. I 
scrambled to my feet. I had scraped my side, but it didn’t hurt too badly. 

“I’m okay,” I told him. I pointed to the castle. “Did you see that?” 

“I saw it,” Marty replied, standing up slowly. “But I don’t believe it.” He 
stretched. “How did the tram go through the wall? Do you think the castle isn’t 
really there? That it’s an optical illusion? Some kind of trick?” 

“There’s an easy way to find out,” I said. 

We walked side by side on the road. The wind rustled the trees, making 
them whisper all around us. The pavement felt cold under my bare feet. 

“We’ve got to find my dad,” I said quietly. “I’m sure he can explain 
everything to us.” 

“I hope so,” Marty murmured. 

We stepped up to the castle wall. I stuck out both hands, expecting them to 

go right through. 

But my hands slapped solid stone. 

Marty lowered his shoulder and shoved it against the castle wall. His 
shoulder hit the wall with a thud. 

“It’s solid,” Marty said, shaking his head. “It’s a real wall. So how did the 
tram go through it?” 

“It’s a ghost tram,” I whispered, rubbing my hand against the cold stone. “A 
ghost tram filled with skeletons.” 

“But we rode in it!” Marty cried. 

I slapped the wall with both hands and spun away from it. “I’m sick of 
mysteries!” I wailed. “I’m sick of being scared! I’m sick of werewolves and 
monsters! I’m never going to another scary movie as long as I live!” 

“Your father can explain it all,” Marty said softly, shaking his head. “I’m 
sure he can.” 

“I don’t want him to explain it!” I cried. “I just want to get away from 
here!” 

Keeping close together, we made our way around to the side of the castle. I 
could hear strange, animal howls behind us. And a frightening cackle cut 
through the air somewhere above our heads. 

I ignored all the sounds. I didn’t want to think about whether they were 
being made by real monsters or fakes. I didn’t want to think about the 
frightening creatures we had run into—or the close calls Marty and I had had. 

I didn’t want to think. 

At the back of the castle, the road appeared again. “I hope we’re going in 
the right direction,” I murmured, following it as it curved into the hill. 

“Me, too,” Marty replied in a tiny voice. 

We picked up our pace, walking quickly in the middle of the road. We tried 
not to pay attention to the sharp animal calls, the shrill cries, the howls and 
moans that seemed to follow us everywhere. 

The road sloped uphill. Marty and I leaned forward as we climbed. The 
frightening cries and howls followed us up the hill. 

As we neared the top, I saw several low buildings. 

“Yes!” I cried. “Marty—look! We must be heading back to the main 
platform.” I started jogging toward the buildings. Marty trotted close behind. 

We both stopped when we realized where we were. 

Back on Shock Street. 

Somehow we had made a circle. 

Past the old houses and small shops, The Shock Street Cemetery came into 
view. Staring at the fence, I remembered the green hands poking up from the 
ground. The green shoulders. The green faces. The hands pulling us, pulling us 
down. 

My whole body shuddered. 

I didn’t want to be back here. I never wanted to see this terrifying street 
again. 

But I couldn’t turn away from the cemetery. As I stared at the old 
gravestones from across the street, I saw something move. 

A wisp of gray. Like a tiny cloud. 

It rose up between two crooked, old stones. Floated silently into the air. 

And then another puff of gray lifted off the ground. And another. 

I glimpsed Marty. He stood beside me, hands pressed against his waist, 
staring hard. He saw them, too. 

The gray puffs rose silently, like snowballs or cotton. Dozens of them, 
floating up from the graves. 

Floating over the cemetery and out over the street. 

Floating above Marty and me. Hovering so low. 

And then as we stared up at them, they started to grow. To inflate, like gray 
balloons. 

And I saw faces inside them. Dark faces, etched in shadow like the Man in 
the Moon. The faces scowled at us. Old faces, lined and creased. Eyes narrowed 
to dark slits. Frowning faces. Sneering faces inside the billowing, white puffs. 

I grabbed Marty’s shoulder. I wanted to run, to get away, to get out from 
under them. 

But, like smoke, the wisps of mist with their evil faces, swirled down, 
swirled around us. Trapped us. Trapped us inside. 

The faces, the ugly, scowling faces, spinning around us. Spinning faster, 
faster, holding us in the swirling, choking mist. 

25 

I pressed my hands over my eyes, trying to shut them out. 

I froze in total panic. I couldn’t think. I couldn’t breathe. 

I could hear the shrill rush of wind as the ghostly clouds swirled around us. 

And then I heard a man’s voice, shouting over the wind: “Cut! Print that 
one! Good scene, everyone!” 

I lowered my hands slowly and opened my eyes. I let out my breath in a 
long whoosh. 

A man came striding up to Marty and me. He wore jeans and a gray 
sweatshirt under a brown leather jacket. He had a blue-and-white Dodgers cap 
sideways on his head. A blond ponytail tumbled out from under it. 

He carried a clipboard in one hand. He had a silver whistle around his neck. 
He smiled at Marty and me and flashed us a thumbs-up. 

“Hey, what’s up, guys? I’m Russ Denver. Good job! You looked really 
scared.” 

“Huh?” I cried, my mouth dropping open. “We were really scared!” 

“I’m so glad to see a real live human!” Marty cried. 

“This tour—it’s totally messed up!” I shrieked. “The creatures—they’re 
alive! They tried to hurt us! They really did! It wasn’t any fun! It wasn’t like a 
ride!” The words spilled out of me in a rush. 

“It was really gross! The werewolves snapped at us and chased us up a 
wall!” Marty exclaimed. 

The two of us started talking at once, telling this guy Denver all of the 
frightening things that had happened to us on the tour. 

“Whoa! Whoa!” A smile crossed his handsome face. He raised his 
clipboard as if to shield himself from us. “It’s all special effects, guys. Didn’t 
they explain to you that we’re making a movie here? That we were filming your 
reactions?” 

“No. No one explained that, Mr. Denver!” I replied angrily. “My dad 
brought us here. He designed the studio tour. And he told us we were the first to 
try it out. But he didn’t tell us about any movie being filmed. I really think—” 

I felt Marty’s hand on my shoulder. I knew Marty was trying to calm me 
down. But I didn’t want to be calmed down. 

I was really angry. 

Mr. Denver turned back to a group of crew members behind him in the 
street. “Take thirty, guys. Let’s break for dinner.” 

They moved away, talking among themselves. Mr. Denver turned back to 
us. “Your father should have explained to you—” 

“It’s okay. Really,” Marty interrupted. “We just got a little scared. All of the 
creatures seemed so real. And we didn’t see any other people anywhere. You’re 
the first real person we’ve seen all afternoon.” 

“My dad must be really worried,” I told the movie director. “He said he’d 
be waiting for us on the main platform. Can you tell us how to get there?” 

“No problem,” Mr. Denver replied. “See that big house there with the open 
door?” He pointed with his clipboard. 

Marty and I stared at the house across the street. A narrow path led up to the 
house. A pale yellow light shone inside the open front door. 

“That’s Shockro’s House of Shocks,” the director explained. “Go right in 
that door and straight through the house.” 

“But won’t we get shocked in there?” Marty demanded. “In the movie, 
anyone who goes into Shockro’s house gets jolted with twenty million volts of 
electricity!” 

“That’s just in the movie,” Mr. Denver replied. 

“The house is just a set. It’s perfectly safe. Go through the house. Then out 
the back, and you will see the main building on the other side of the street. You 
can’t miss it.” 

“Thank you!” Marty and I called out at once. 

Marty turned and started running full speed toward the house. 

I turned back to Mr. Denver. “I’m sorry for yelling before,” I told him. “I 
was just so scared, and I thought—” 

I gasped. 

Mr. Denver had turned away. And I saw the long power cord—the power 
cord that was plugged into his back. 

He wasn’t a real human. He wasn’t a movie director. He was some kind of 
robot. 

He was fake like all the others. He was lying to us. Lying! 

I turned and cupped my hands around my mouth. I started to run, frantically 
calling after Marty: “Don’t go in there! Marty—stop! Don’t go in that house!” 

Too late. 

Marty was already running through the door. 

26 

“Marty—wait! Stop!” I shouted as I ran. 

I had to stop him. 

The director was a fake. I knew he wasn’t telling the truth. 

“Marty— please\” 

My bare feet pounded the hard pavement. I plunged up the path as Marty 
trotted into the doorway. 

“Stop!” 

I flew to the doorway. Reached out both hands. Made a wild dive to tackle 

him. 

And missed. 

I skidded across the walk on my stomach. 

As soon as Marty entered the house, I saw the flash of white light. I heard a 
loud buzz. Then the sharp crackle of electricity. 

The room exploded in a flash of lightning. So bright I had to shield my 

eyes. 

When I opened them, I saw Marty sprawled facedown on the floor. 
“Nooooo!” I let out a terrified wail. 

Scrambling to my feet, I dove into the house. 

Would I get shocked, too? 

I didn’t care. I had to get to Marty. I had to help him out of there. 

“Marty! Marty!” I screamed his name again and again. 

He didn’t move. 

“Marty—please!” I grabbed his shoulders and started to shake him. “Wake 
up, Marty! Snap out of it! Marty!” 

He didn’t open his eyes. 

I suddenly felt a chill. A dark shadow slid over me. 

And I realized I wasn’t alone in the house. 

27 

I spun around with a gasp. 

Was it Shockro? Some other scary creature? 

A tall figure leaned over me. I squinted into the darkness, struggling to see 
his face. 

“Dad!” I cried as he came into focus. “Dad! Oh, I’m so glad to see you!” 

“Erin, what are you doing here?” he asked in a low voice. 

“It—it’s Marty!” I stammered. “You’ve got to help him, Dad. He’s been 
shocked and he—he—” 

Dad leaned closer. Behind his eyeglasses, his brown eyes were cold. His 
face set in a troubled frown. 

“Do something, Dad!” I pleaded. “Marty is hurt. He isn’t moving. He won’t 
open his eyes. The studio tour was so awful, Dad! Something is wrong. 
Something is terribly wrong!” 

He didn’t reply. He leaned closer. 

And as his face came into the soft light, I saw that he wasn’t my father! 

“Who are you?” I shrieked. “You’re not my dad! Why aren’t you helping 
me? Why aren’t you helping Marty? Do something—please! Where’s my dad? 
Where is he? Who are you? Help me! Somebody? Help me 
AAAAAARRRRRRRRR. Help MRRRRRRRRRRRR. Dad— 
MARRRRRRRRRRRRRR. DRRRMMMMMMMMmmmmm.” 

28 

Mr. Wright stood staring down at Erin and Marty. He shook his head unhappily. 
He shut his eyes and let out a long sigh. 

Jared Curtis, one of the studio engineers, came running into The House of 
Shocks. “Mr. Wright, what happened to your two kid robots?” he demanded. 

Mr. Wright sighed again. “Programming problems,” he muttered. 

He pointed to the Erin robot, frozen in place on her knees beside the Marty 
robot. “I had to shut the girl off. Her memory chip must be bad. The Erin robot 
was supposed to think of me as her father. But just now, she didn’t recognize 
me.” 

“And what about the Marty robot?” Jared asked. 

“It’s totally down,” Mr. Wright replied. “I think the electrical system 
shorted out.” 

“What a shame,” Jared said, bending to roll the Marty robot over. He pulled 
up the T-shirt and fiddled with some dials on the back. “Hey, Mr. Wright, it was 
a great idea to make robot kids to test the park. I think we can fix them.” 

Jared opened up a panel on Marty’s back and squinted at the red and green 
wires. “All the other creatures, and monsters, and robots worked perfectly. Not a 
single bug.” 

“I should have known there was a problem yesterday,” Mr. Wright said. 
“We were in my office. The Erin robot asked about her mother. I built her. She 
doesn’t have a mother.” 

Mr. Wright tossed up his hands. “Oh, well. No problem. We’ll reprogram 
these two. Put in new chips. They’ll be good as new in no time. Then we’ll try 
them out once again on the Shocker Studio Tour, before we open the park to real 
kids.” 

He took the Marty robot from Jared and slung it over his shoulder. Then he 
picked up the Erin robot. He tossed it over his other shoulder. Then, humming to 
himself, he carried them to the engineering building. 


THE HAUNTED 
MASK II 


1 

I don’t know if you have ever spent any time with first graders. But there is only 
one word to describe them. And that word is ANIMALS. 

First graders are animals. 

You can quote me. 

My name is Steve Boswell, and I am in the sixth grade. I may not be the 
smartest guy at Walnut Avenue Middle School. But I know one thing for sure: 
First graders are animals. 

How do I know this fact? I learned it the hard way. I learned it by coaching 
the first-grade soccer team after school every day. 

You might want to know why I chose to coach their soccer team. Well, I 
didn’t choose it. It was a punishment. 

Someone set a squirrel loose in the girls’ locker room. That someone was 
me. But it wasn’t my idea. 

My best friend, Chuck Green, caught the squirrel. And he asked me where I 
thought he should set it free. 

I said, “How about the girls’ locker room before their basketball game on 
Thursday?” 

So maybe it was partly my idea. But Chuck was just as much to blame as I 

was. 

Of course, I was the one who got caught. 

Miss Curdy, the gym teacher, grabbed me as I was letting the squirrel out of 
its box. The squirrel ran across the gym to the bleachers. The kids in the 
bleachers all jumped up and started running and screaming and acting crazy. 

It was just a dumb squirrel. But all the teachers started chasing after it. It 
took hours to catch it and get everyone calmed down. 

So Miss Curdy said I had to be punished. 

She gave me a choice of punishments. One: I could come into the gym after 
school every day and inflate basketballs—by mouth—until my head exploded. 
Or two: I could coach the first-grade soccer team. 

I chose number two. 

The wrong choice. 

My friend Chuck was supposed to help me coach the team. But he told 

Miss Curdy he had an after-school job. 

Do you know what his after-school job is? Going home and watching TV. 

A lot of people think that Chuck and I are best friends because we look so 
much alike. We’re both tall and thin. We both have straight brown hair and dark 
brown eyes. We both wear baseball caps most of the time. Sometimes people 
think we’re brothers! 

But that’s not why I like Chuck and Chuck likes me. We’re best friends 
because we make each other laugh. 

I laughed really hard when Chuck told me what his after-school job was. 
But I’m not laughing now. 

I’m praying. Every day I pray for rain. If it rains, the first graders don’t 
have soccer practice. 

Today, unfortunately, is a bright, clear, beautiful October day. Standing on 
the playground behind school, I searched the sky for a cloud—any cloud—but 
saw only blue. 

“Okay, listen up, Hogs!” I shouted. I wasn’t making fun of them. That’s the 
name they voted for their team. Do you believe it? The Walnut Avenue Hogs. 

Does that give you an idea of what these kids are like? 

I cupped my hands around my mouth and shouted again. “Line up, Hogs!” 

Andrew Foster grabbed the whistle I wear around my neck and blew it in 
my face. Then Duck Benton tromped down hard on my new sneakers. Everyone 
calls him Duck because he quacks all the time. He and Andrew thought that was 
a riot. 

Then Marnie Rosen jumped up behind me, threw her arms around my neck, 
and climbed on my back. Marnie has curly red hair, freckles all over her face, 
and the most evil grin I ever saw on a kid. “Give me a ride, Steve!” she shouted. 
“I want a ride!” 

“Marnie—get off me!” I cried. I tried to loosen her grip on my neck. She 
was choking me. The Hogs were all laughing now. 

“Marnie—I... can’t... breathe!” I gasped. 

I bent down and tried to throw her off my back. But she hung on even 
tighter. 

Then I felt her lips press against my ear. 

“What are you doing?” I cried. Was she trying to kiss me or something? 

Yuck! She spit her bubble gum into my ear. 

Then, laughing like a crazed fiend, she hopped off me and went running 

across the grass, her curly red hair bouncing behind her. 

“Give me a break! ” I cried angrily. The purple gum stuck in my ear. It took 
me a while to scrape it all out. 

By the time I finished, they had started a practice game. 

Have you ever watched six-year-olds play soccer? It’s chase and kick, chase 
and kick. Everybody chase the ball. Everybody try to kick it. 

I try to teach them positions. I try to teach them how to pass the ball to each 
other. I try to teach them teamwork. But all they want to do is chase and kick, 
chase and kick. 

Which is fine with me. As long as they leave me alone. 

I blow my whistle and act as umpire. And try to keep the game going. 

Andrew Foster kicked a big clump of dirt on my jeans as he ran by. He 
acted as if it were an accident. But I knew it was deliberate. 

Then Duck Benton got into a shoving fight with Johnny Myers. Duck 
watches hockey games on TV with his dad, and he thinks you’re supposed to 
fight. Some days Duck doesn’t chase after the ball at all. He just fights. 

I let them chase-and-kick, chase-and-kick for an hour. Then I blew the 
whistle to call practice to an end. 

Not a bad practice. Only one bloody nose. And that was a win because it 
wasn’t mine! 

“Okay, Hogs—see you tomorrow!” I shouted. I started to trot off the 
playground. Their parents or baby-sitters would be waiting for them in front of 
the school. 

Then I saw that a bunch of the kids had formed a tight circle in the middle 
of the field. They all wore grins on their faces, so I decided I’d better see what 
they were up to. 

“What’s going on, guys?” I asked, trotting back to them. 

Some kids stepped back, and I spotted a soccer ball on the grass. Marnie 
Rosen smiled at me through her freckles. “Hey, Steve, can you kick a goal from 
here?” 

The other kids stepped away from the ball. I glanced to the goal. It was 
really far away, at least half the field. 

“What’s the joke?” I demanded. 

Mamie’s grin faded. “No joke. Can you kick a goal from here?” 

“No way!” Duck Benton called. 

“Steve can do it,” I heard Johnny Myers say. “Steve can kick it farther than 

that.” 

“No way!” Duck insisted. “It’s too far even for a sixth grader.” 

“Hey—that’s an easy goal,” I bragged. “Why don’t you give me something 
hard to do?” 

Every once in a while I have to do something to impress them. Just to prove 
that I’m better than they are. 

So I moved up behind the ball. I stopped about eight or ten steps back. 
Gave myself plenty of running room. 

“Okay, guys, watch how a pro does it!” I cried. 

I ran up to the ball. Got plenty of leg behind it. 

Gave a tremendous kick. 

Froze for a second. 

And then let out a long, high wail of horror. 

2 

On my way home a few minutes later, I passed my friend Chuck’s house. Chuck 
came running down the gravel driveway to greet me. 

I didn’t really feel like talking to anyone. Not even my friend. 

But there he was. So what could I do? 

“Yo—Steve!” He stopped halfway down the driveway. “What happened? 
Why are you limping?” 

“Concrete,” I groaned. 

He pulled off his black-and-red Cubs cap and scratched his thick brown 
hair. “Huh?” 

“Concrete,” I repeated weakly. “The kids had a concrete soccer ball.” 

Chuck squinted at me. I could see he still didn’t understand. 

“One of the kids lives across the street. He had his friends help roll a ball of 
concrete to the school,” I explained. “Painted white and black to look like a 
soccer ball. Solid concrete. They had it there on the field. They asked me to kick 
a goal and—and—” My voice caught in my throat. I couldn’t finish. 

I hobbled over to the big beech tree beside Chuck’s driveway and leaned 
back against its cold, white trunk. 

“Wow. That’s not a very funny joke,” Chuck said, replacing his cap on his 
head. 

“Tell me about it,” I groaned. “I think I broke every bone in my foot. Even 
some bones I don’t have.” 

“Those kids are animals /” Chuck declared. 

I groaned and mbbed my aching foot. It wasn’t really broken. But it hurt. A 
lot. I shifted my backpack on my shoulders and leaned back against the tree. 

“Know what I’d like to do?” I told Chuck. 

“Pay them back?” 

“You’re right!” I replied. “How did you know?” 

“Lucky guess.” He stepped up beside me. I could see that he was thinking 
hard. Chuck always scrunches up his face when he’s trying to think. 

“It’s almost Halloween,” he said finally. “Maybe we could think of some 
way to scare them. I mean, really scare them.” His dark eyes lit up with 
excitement. 

“Well... maybe.” I hesitated. “They’re just little kids. I don’t want to do 
anything mean.” 

My backpack felt weird—too full. I pulled it off my shoulder and lowered it 
to the ground. 

I leaned over and unzipped it. 

And about ten million feathers came floating out. 

“Those kids—!” Chuck exclaimed. 

I pulled open the backpack. All of my notebooks, all of my textbooks— 
covered in sticky feathers. Those animals had glued feathers to my books. 

I tossed down the backpack and turned to Chuck. “Maybe I do want to do 
something mean!” I growled. 

A few days later, Chuck and I were walking home from the playground. It was a 
cold, windy afternoon. Dark storm clouds rose up in the distance. 

The storm clouds were too late to help me. I had just finished afternoon 
practice with the Hogs. 

It hadn’t been a bad practice. It hadn’t been a good practice, either. 

Just as we started, Andrew Foster lowered his head and came at me full 
speed. He weighs about a thousand pounds, and he has a very hard head. He 
plowed into my stomach and knocked the wind out of me. 

I rolled around on the ground for a few minutes, groaning and choking and 
gasping. The kids thought it was pretty funny. Andrew claimed it was an 
accident. 

I’m going to get you guys back, I vowed to myself. I don’t know how. But 
I’m going to get you guys. 

Then Marnie Rosen jumped on my back and tore the collar off my new 
winter coat. 

Chuck met me after practice. He’d started doing that now. He knew that 
after one hour with the first graders, I usually needed help getting home. 

“I hate them,” I muttered. “Do you know how to spell hate? H-O-G-S.” My 
torn coat collar flapped in the swirling wind. 

“Why don’t you make all of them practice with a concrete ball?” Chuck 
suggested. He adjusted his Cubs cap over his hair. “No. Wait. I’ve got it. Let 
them take turns being the ball!” 

“No. No good,” I replied, shaking my head. The sky darkened. The trees 
shook, sending a shower of dead leaves down around us. 

My sneakers crunched over the leaves. “I don’t want to hurt them,” I told 
Chuck. “I just want to scare them. I just want to scare them to death.” 

The wind blew colder. I felt a cold drop of rain on my forehead. 

As we crossed the street, I noticed two girls from our class walking on the 
other side. I recognized Sabrina Mason’s black ponytail swinging behind her as 
she hurried along the sidewalk. And next to her, I recognized her friend Carly 
Beth Caldwell. 

“Hey—!” I started to call out to them, but I stopped. 

An idea flashed into my mind. 

Seeing Carly Beth, I knew how to scare those first graders. 

Seeing Carly Beth, I knew exactly what I wanted to do. 

3 

I started to call to the girls. But Chuck clamped his hand over my mouth and 
dragged me behind a wide tree. 

“Hey—get your clammy paws off me. What’s the big idea?” I cried when 
he finally pulled his hand away. 

He pushed me against the rough bark of the tree trunk. “Ssshhh. They 
haven’t seen us.” He motioned with his eyes toward the two girls. 

“So?” 

“So we can sneak up and scare them,” Chuck whispered, his dark eyes 
practically glowing with evil excitement. “Let’s make Carly Beth scream.” 

“You mean for old times’ sake?” 

Chuck nodded, grinning. 

For many years, making Carly Beth scream had been our hobby. That’s 
because she was a really good screamer, and she would scream at just about 
anything. 

One day in the lunchroom last year, Chuck tucked a worm inside his turkey 
sandwich. Then he gave the sandwich to Carly Beth. 

She took one bite and knew that something tasted a little weird. When 
Chuck showed her the big bite she had taken out of the worm, Carly Beth 
screamed for a week. 

Chuck and I took bets on who could scare Carly Beth the most and who 
could make her scream. I guess it was kind of mean. But it was funny too. 

And sometimes when you know that people are real easy to scare, you have 
no choice. You have to scare them as often as you can. 

Anyway, that all changed last Halloween. 

Last Halloween Chuck and I had a horrible scare. Carly Beth wore the most 
frightening mask I had ever seen. It wasn’t a mask. It was like a living face. 

It was so ugly, so real. It glared at us with evil, living eyes. Its mouth 
sneered at us with real lips. The skin glowed a sick green. And Carly Beth’s 
normally soft voice burst out in a terrifying animal growl. 

Chuck and I ran for our lives. 

No joke. We were terrified. 

We ran for blocks, screaming the whole way. It was the worst night of my 

life. 

Everything changed after that. 

Nearly a whole year has gone by, and we haven’t tried to scare Carly Beth 
once. I don’t think Carly Beth can be scared. Not anymore. 

After last Halloween, I don’t think anything scares her. 

She is totally fearless. I haven’t heard her shriek or scream once the entire 

year. 

So I didn’t want to try to scare her now. I needed to talk to her. About that 
scary mask of hers. 

But Chuck kept pressing me back against the tree trunk. “Come on, Steve,” 
he whispered. “They don’t see us. We’ll duck down behind the hedges and get 
ahead of them. Then when they come by, we’ll jump out and grab them.” 

“I don’t really—” I started. But I could see that Chuck had his heart set on 
scaring Carly Beth and Sabrina. So I let him pull me down out of sight. 

A light rain had started to fall. The gusting wind blew the raindrops into my 
face. I crept along the hedge, bent low, following Chuck. 

We passed by the girls and kept moving. I could hear Sabrina’s laugh 
behind us. I heard Carly Beth say something else. Then Sabrina laughed again. 

I wondered what they were talking about. I stopped to glance through the 
hedge. Carly Beth had a weird expression on her face. Her dark eyes stared 
straight ahead. She was moving stiffly. She had the collar of her blue down 
jacket pulled up high around her face. 

I ducked down low again as the girls came closer. I turned and saw that 
Chuck and I were standing on the wide front lawn of the old Carpenter mansion. 

I felt a chill as I stared across the weed-choked lawn at the gloomy old 
house, covered in a deep darkness. Everyone said that the house was haunted— 
haunted by people who had been murdered inside it a hundred years ago. 

I don’t believe in ghosts. But I don’t like standing so close to the creepy old 
Carpenter mansion, either. 

I pulled Chuck into the empty lot next door. Rain pattered the ground. I 
wiped raindrops off my eyebrows. 

Carly Beth and Sabrina were only a few yards away. I could hear Sabrina 
talking excitedly about something. But I couldn’t make out her words. 

Chuck turned to me, an evil grin spreading across his face. “Ready?” he 
whispered. “Let’s get ’em!” 

We leaped to our feet. Then we both jumped out, screaming at the top of 

our lungs. 

Sabrina gasped in shock. Her mouth dropped to her knees. Her hands flew 
up in the air. 

Carly Beth stared at me. 

Then her head tilted against the blue jacket collar—tilted and fell. 

Her head fell off her shoulders. 

It dropped to the ground and bounced onto the grass. 

Sabrina lowered her eyes to the ground. She gaped at Carly Beth’s fallen 
head in disbelief. 

Then Sabrina’s hands began to flail the air crazily. She opened her mouth in 
a scream of horror. And screamed and screamed and screamed. 

4 

I swallowed hard. My knees started to buckle. 

Carly Beth’s head stared up at me from the grass. Sabrina’s shrieks rang in 
my ears. 

And then I heard soft laughter. Laughter from inside Carly Beth’s jacket. 

I saw a clump of brown hair poke up through the raised collar. And then 
Carly Beth’s laughing face shot up from under the jacket. 

Sabrina stopped her wild cries and started to laugh. 

“Gotcha!” Carly Beth cried. She and Sabrina fell all over each other, 
laughing like lunatics. 

“Oh, wow,” Chuck groaned. 

My knees were still shaking. I don’t think I had taken a breath the whole 

time. 

I bent down and picked up Carly Beth’s head. Some kind of dummy head. 
A sculpture, I guess. I rolled it around between my hands. It was amazing. It 
looked just like her. 

“It’s plaster of Paris,” Carly Beth explained, grabbing it away from me. 
“My mom made it.” 

“But—it’s so real-looking!” I choked out. 

She grinned. “Mom is getting pretty good. She keeps doing my head over 
and over. This is one of her best.” 

“It’s okay. But it didn’t fool us,” Chuck said. 

“Yeah. We knew it was a fake,” I quickly agreed. But my voice cracked 
when I said it. I was still kind of in shock. 

Sabrina shook her head. Her black ponytail waved behind her. Sabrina is 
very tall, taller than Chuck and me. Carly Beth is a shrimp. She only comes up to 
Sabrina’s shoulder. 

“You should have seen the looks on your faces!” Sabrina exclaimed. “I 
thought your heads were going to fall off!” 

The two girls hugged each other again and had another good laugh. 

“We saw you a mile away,” Carly Beth said, twirling the head in her hands. 
“Luckily, I brought this head in to show off in art class today. So I pulled my 
jacket over my head, and Sabrina tucked the plaster head into the collar.” 

“You guys scare pretty easy,” Sabrina smirked. 

“We weren’t scared. Really,” Chuck insisted. “We were just playing along.” 

I wanted to change the subject. The girls would talk all day and night about 
how dumb Chuck and I were. If we let them. I didn’t want to let them. 

The rain kept pattering down, blown by the gusting wind. I shivered. We 
were all getting pretty wet. 

“Carly Beth, you know that mask you wore last Halloween? Where did you 
get it?” I asked. I tried to sound casual. I didn’t want her to think it was any big 
deal. 

She hugged her plaster head against the front of her jacket. “Huh? What 
mask?” 

I groaned. She is such a jerk sometimes! 

“Remember that really scary mask you had last Halloween? Where did you 
get it?” 

She and Sabrina exchanged glances. Then Carly Beth said, “I don’t 
remember.” 

“Give me a break!” I groaned. 

“No. Really—” she insisted. 

“You remember,” Chuck told her. “You just don’t want to tell.” 

I knew why Carly Beth didn’t want to tell. She was probably planning to 
get another truly terrifying mask at the same store for this Halloween. She 
wanted to be the scariest kid in town. She didn’t want me to be scary too. 

I turned to Sabrina. “Do you know where she bought that mask?” 

Sabrina made a zipper motion over her lips. “I’m not telling, Steve.” 

“You don’t want to know,” Carly Beth declared, still hugging the head. 
“That mask was too frightening.” 

“You just want to be scarier than me,” I replied angrily. “But I need a really 
scary mask this year, Carly Beth. There are some kids I want to scare and—” 

“I’m serious, Steve,” Carly Beth interrupted. “There was something totally 
weird about the mask. It wasn’t just a mask. It came alive. It clamped onto my 
head, and I couldn’t get it off. The mask was haunted or something.” 

“Ha-ha,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

“She’s telling the truth!” Sabrina cried, narrowing her dark eyes at me. 

“The mask was evil,” Carly Beth continued. “It started giving me orders. It 
started talking all by itself, in a horrible, harsh growl. I couldn’t control it. And I 
couldn’t get it off. It was attached to my head! I—I was so scared!” 

“Oh, wow,” Chuck murmured, shaking his head. “You’ve got a good 
imagination, Carly Beth.” 

“Good story,” I agreed. “Save it for English class.” 

“But it’s the truth!” Carly Beth cried. 

“You just don’t want me to be scary,” I grumbled. “But I need a good, scary 
mask like that one. Come on,” I begged. “Tell.” 

“Tell us,” Chuck insisted. 

“Tell,” I repeated, trying to sound tough. 

“No way,” Carly Beth replied, shaking her fake round, little head. “Let’s get 
home. It’s really raining hard.” 

“Not till you tell!” I cried. I stepped in front of her to block her path. 

“Grab the head!” Chuck cried. 

I grabbed the plaster head from Carly Beth’s hands. 

“Give it back!” she shrieked. She swiped at it, but I swung it out of her 
reach. Then I tossed it to Chuck. 

He backed away. Sabrina chased after him. “Give that back to her!” 

“We’ll give it back when you tell us where you bought that mask!” I told 
Carly Beth. 

“No way!” she cried. 

Chuck tossed the head to me. Carly Beth made a wild grab for it. But I 
caught it and heaved it back to Chuck. 

“Give it back! Come on!” Carly Beth cried, running after Chuck. “My mom 
made that. If it gets messed up, she’ll kill me!” 

“Then tell me where you bought the mask!” I insisted. 

Chuck tossed the head to me. Sabrina jumped up and batted it down. She 
made a wild dive for it, but I got there first. I picked it up off the grass and 
heaved it back to Chuck. 

“Stop it! Give it back!” 

Both girls were screaming angrily. But Chuck and I kept up our game of 
keep-away. 

Carly Beth made a frantic leap for the head and fell on her stomach onto the 
grass. When she stood up, the front of her jacket and her jeans were soaked, and 
she had grass stains on her forehead. 

“Tell!” I insisted, holding the head high in the air. “Tell, and you can have 
the head back!” 

She growled at me. 

“Okay,” I warned her. “I guess I have to drop-kick it onto that roof.” 

I turned toward the house at the top of the lawn. Then I held the head in 
front of me in both hands and pretended I was going to punt it onto the roof. 

“Okay, okay!” Carly Beth cried. “Don’t kick it, Steve.” 

I kept the head in front of me. “Where did you get the mask?” 

“You know that weird little party store a couple of blocks from school?” 

I nodded. I had seen the store, but I had never gone in. 

“That’s where I bought it. There’s a back room. It was filled with weird, 
ugly masks. That’s where I got mine.” 

“All right!” I cried happily. I handed Carly Beth back her head. 

“You guys are creeps,” Sabrina muttered, pulling her collar up against the 
rain. She pushed me out of the way and wiped the grass stain off Carly Beth’s 
forehead. 

“I really didn’t want to tell you,” Carly Beth moaned. “I wasn’t making that 
story up about the mask. It was so terrifying.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes again. 

“Please, don’t go there!” Carly Beth begged. She grabbed my arm tightly. 
“Please, Steve. Please, don’t go to that party store!” 

I pulled my arm away. I narrowed my eyes at her. And I laughed. 

Too bad I didn’t take her seriously. 

Too bad I didn’t listen to her. 

It might have saved me from a night of endless horror. 

5 

“Get off me! Get off me, Mamie! I mean it!” I shouted. 

The little redheaded pest hung onto my back, laughing and digging her 
pudgy fingers into my neck. Why did she think I was some kind of thrill ride? 

“Get off! This is my good sweater!” I cried. “If you wreck it—” 

She laughed even harder. 

It had rained all night and all morning. But the clouds had parted at 
lunchtime. Now the sky was blue and clear. I had no choice. I had to hold soccer 
practice for the Hogs. 

Across the playground, I saw Duck Benton fighting with Andrew Foster. 
Andrew picked up the soccer ball and heaved it with all his might into Duck’s 
stomach. 

Duck’s mouth shot open. He let out a whoosh of breath, and a huge wad of 
bubblegum went flying into the air. 

“Get off!” I pleaded with Marnie. I tried spinning and twirling as fast as I 
could, trying to throw her off my back. I knew if anything happened to this 
sweater, Mom would have a fit. 

You might ask why I was wearing my best, blue wool sweater to soccer 
practice. Good question. 

The answer is: It was Class Photo Day. And Mom wanted me to take a 
really good picture to send to all my aunts and uncles. She made me wear the 
sweater. And she made me shampoo my hair before school and not wear my 
Orlando Magic cap over it. 

So I looked like a jerk all day. And now, here was soccer practice. And I 
had forgotten to bring a sweatshirt or something to replace my good sweater. 

“Whoooooa!” Marnie gave me a final kick in the side as she hopped off my 

back. 

I pulled down my sweater, hoping it wasn’t stretched too badly. I heard 
angry shouts and glanced up to find Andrew and Duck swinging their fists at 
each other and butting heads across the field. 

I reached for my whistle. 

And grabbed air. 

Marnie had swiped it. She held it high above her head and ran, laughing, 

over the grass. 

“Hey, you—!” I screamed, chasing after the little thief. 

I took three steps—and my sneakers slid in the mud. My feet flew out from 
under me. With an angry cry, I fell forward. And landed on my stomach in deep, 
wet mud. 

“Noooooo!” I let out a howl of dread. “Please. Nooooo!” 

But when I pulled myself up, the mud came with me. My entire body was 
caked in thick, wet mud. My beautiful blue sweater? It was now an ugly brown 
sweater. 

With a sad groan, I sank back onto the ground. I just wanted to disappear, to 
sink from sight into the big mud hole. 

My faithful team, the Horrible Hogs, were laughing and hooting. They 
thought it was a riot. Nice kids, huh? 

At least my mud dive had stopped Andrew and Duck from fighting. 

The mud weighed me down as I climbed slowly to my feet. I felt like 
Andrew. I felt as if I weighed a thousand pounds. Maybe I did! 

I wiped mud off my eyes with both hands—and saw Chuck standing over 
me. He tsk-tsked a few times. “You look really bad, man.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered. 

“Why did you do that?” he asked. 

I squinted through two inches of mud at him. “Excuse me?” 

“You look like a Mud Monster or something.” Chuck snickered. 

“Ha-ha,” I said glumly. 

“You told me to meet you here, Steve. You said we were going straight to 
that party store to buy the you-know-what.” 

He glanced back at my team of first graders. They weren’t listening to our 
conversation. They were too busy flinging mud balls at each other. 

I scooped my hand along the front of my sweater and scraped off about ten 
pounds of glop. “I... uh... I think I’d better go home after practice and get 
changed first,” I told Chuck. 

Talk about your long afternoons! 

I had to break up the mud ball fight. Then I had to hand over all of the little 
angels to their parents and baby-sitters. 

Then I had to explain to their angry parents and baby-sitters why they had 
practiced mud ball fighting instead of soccer. 

I crept home. Chuck waited for me outside. I hid my mud-caked clothes in 
the back of my closet. I didn’t have time to explain to my mom. 

Then I changed into a clean pair of jeans and a gray-and-red Georgetown 
Hoyas sweatshirt one of my uncles had sent me. I don’t know anything about the 
Hoyas. I don’t even know what a Hoya is. But it is a cool sweatshirt. 

I pulled my cap down over my mud-drenched hair. Then I hurried to meet 
Chuck. 

“Steve—is that you?” Mom called from the den. 

“No, it isn’t!” I called back. I closed the front door behind me and ran down 
the driveway before she could stop me from going out again. 

I was really eager to find that party store and check out the weird masks. So 
eager, I forgot to bring any money with me. 

Chuck and I walked two blocks before I reached into my jeans pocket and 
realized it was empty. We jogged back to my house, and I crept up to my room 
once again. 

“This just isn’t my day,” I muttered to myself. 

But I knew that buying a really gross and frightening mask would instantly 
cheer me up. Then I could go ahead with my plan to terrify the Hogs, to get my 
revenge. 

Revenge! 

What a beautiful word. 

When I’m older and have my own car, that’s what I want it to say on my 
license plate. 

I pulled all of my allowance money out of the dresser drawer where I hide 
it. I counted it quickly—about twenty-five dollars. Then I jammed the bills into 
my jeans pocket and hurried back downstairs. 

“Steve—are you going out again?” Mom called from the den. 

“Be right back!” I shouted. I slammed the front door and ran down the 
driveway to meet Chuck. 

Our sneakers slid over fat, wet leaves as we walked. A pale full moon hung 
low over the trees. 

The streets and sidewalks still glistened from all the rain. 

Chuck had his hands stuffed into the pockets of his hooded sweatshirt. He 
leaned into the wind as we walked. “I’m going to be late for dinner,” he 
grumbled. “I’m probably going to get into major trouble.” 

“It’ll be worth it,” I told him, feeling a little more cheerful. We crossed the 

street that led to the party store. A small grocery stood on the corner. Other small 
shops came into view. 

“I can’t wait to see these masks!” I exclaimed. “If I find one just half as 
scary as Carly Beth’s...” 

There it stood! In the darkness above a small, square store, I could make out 
the sign: THE PARTY PLACE. 

“Let’s check it out!” I cried. 

I leaped over a fire hydrant. 

Flew over the sidewalk. Up to the big front window. 

And peered in the window. 

6 

“Oh, wow!” Chuck cried breathlessly, stepping up beside me. 

We both pressed our faces against the window glass and stared in. 

Stared into total darkness. 

“Is it closed?” Chuck asked softly. “Maybe it’s just closed for the night.” 

I uttered an unhappy sigh. “No way. It’s closed for good. The store is gone.” 

Peering through the dust-smeared glass, I could see empty shelves and 
display racks inside. A tall metal shelf lay on its side across the center aisle. A 
trash basket, overflowing with paper and empty soda cans, stood on top of the 
counter. 

“There’s no 'Out of Business’ sign on the door,” Chuck said. He’s a good 
friend. He saw how disappointed I looked. He was trying to stay hopeful. 

“It’s empty.” I sighed. “Totally cleaned out. It isn’t going to open up again 
tomorrow morning.” 

“Yeah. Guess you’re right,” Chuck murmured. 

He slapped my shoulder. “Yo—snap out of it. You’ll find a scary mask at 
some other store.” 

I pushed myself away from the window. “I wanted one like Carly Beth’s,” I 
complained. “You remember that mask. You remember those glowing eyes, 
right? And the way the mouth moved. The way it growled at us with those long, 
dripping fangs. It was so gross. And it looked totally real. Like a real monster!” 

“They probably have masks like that at K-Mart,” Chuck said. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered. I kicked at a candy wrapper that blew across 
the sidewalk. 

A car rumbled past slowly. Its headlights rolled over the front of the store, 
lighting up the bare shelves, the empty counters inside. 

“We’d better get home,” Chuck warned, pulling me away from the store. 
“I’m not allowed to wander around town after dark.” 

He said something else, but I didn’t hear him. I was still picturing Carly 
Beth’s mask, still unable to get over my disappointment. 

“You don’t understand how important this is to me,” I told Chuck. “Those 
first graders are ruining my life. I have to pay them back this Halloween. I have 
to.” 

“They’re just first graders,” he replied. 

“No, they’re not. They’re monsters. Vicious, man-eating monsters.” 

“Maybe we can make a scary mask,” Chuck suggested. “You know. Out of 
papier-mache and stuff.” 

I didn’t even bother to answer him. Chuck is a good guy, but sometimes he 
has the dumbest ideas ever thought up by a human. 

I could just see Marnie Rosen and Duck Benton when I popped out on 
Halloween. “Ooh, we’re scared! We’re scared! Papier-mache!” 

“I’m hungry,” Chuck grumbled. “Come on, Steve. Let’s get out of here.” 

“Yeah. Okay,” I agreed. I started to follow him down the sidewalk—then 
stopped. 

Another car had turned onto the street. Its headlights rolled over a narrow 
alley beside the party store. 

“Whoa, Chuck! Check it out!” I grabbed the shoulder of his sweatshirt and 
spun him around. “Look!” I pointed into the alley. “That door is open!” 

“Huh? What door?” 

I dragged Chuck into the alley. A large black trapdoor in the sidewalk had 
been left up. It caught the light from a streetlamp on the sidewalk. 

Chuck and I peered in through the door. Steep concrete steps led down to a 
basement. 

The basement of the party store! 

Chuck turned to me, a confused expression on his face. “So? They left the 
basement door open. So what?” 

I grabbed the open trapdoor and leaned over the steps, squinting into the 
dim light from the streetlamp. “There are boxes down there. A whole bunch of 
cartons.” 

He still didn’t understand. 

“Maybe all the masks and costumes and party things are packed up in those 
cartons. Maybe the stuff hasn’t been shipped away yet.” 

“Whoa. What are you thinking about?” Chuck demanded. “You’re not 
going down there—are you? You’re not going to sneak down to that dark 
basement and try to steal a mask —are you ? ” 

I didn’t answer him. 

I was already halfway down the stairs. 

7 

My heart began to pound as I made my way down. The steps were narrow and 
slippery. Slick from all the rain. 

“Ohh!” I let out a cry as one foot slid over the concrete step and I felt 
myself start to fall. I shot out both hands in search of a railing—but there wasn’t 
one. 

I landed on the hard basement floor with a loud thud —luckily, on both feet. 
Feeling shaken, I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I turned back to the trapdoor and called up to Chuck. “I’m okay. Get 
down here.” 

In the light from the streetlamp, I could see his unhappy face peering down 
at me. “I—I really don’t want to,” he called softly. 

“Chuck—hurry,” I insisted. “Get out of the alley. If someone drives by and 
sees you, they’ll get suspicious.” 

“But it’s so late, Steve,” he whined. “And it isn’t right to break into 
basements and—” 

“We’re not breaking in,” I called up to him impatiently. “The door was open 
—right? Hurry up. If the two of us search the boxes, we can do it in five 
minutes.” 

He leaned down over the opening. “It’s too dark,” he complained. “We 
don’t have a flashlight or anything.” 

“I can see fine,” I replied. “Get down here. You’re wasting time.” 

“But it’s against the law...” he started. Then I saw his expression change. 
His mouth dropped open as car headlights washed over him. With a low gasp, 
Chuck ducked through the opening, and bolted down the stairs. 

He stepped up close beside me, breathing hard. “I don’t think they saw me.” 
His eyes darted around the large basement. “It’s too dark, Steve. Let’s go home.” 

“Give your eyes a chance to adjust,” I instructed him. “I can see okay.” 

I gazed slowly around the basement. It was bigger than I’d thought. I 
couldn’t really see the walls. They were hidden in darkness. 

The ceiling was low, only a foot or two over our heads. Even in the dim 
light, I could see the thick cobwebs in the rafters. 

The cartons had been stacked in two rows near the steps. Somewhere way 

across the room, I could hear the steady drip drip drip of water. 

“Oh!” I jumped when I heard a clattering sound. 

It took me a few seconds to figure out that it was the wind blowing against 
the metal trapdoor up in the alley. 

I made my way over to the nearest carton and bent over to examine it. The 
flaps were folded over each other. But the carton wasn’t sealed. 

“Let’s have a look,” I murmured, reaching for the flaps. 

Chuck had his arms crossed tightly in front of his chest. “This isn’t right,” 
he protested. “It’s stealing.” 

“We haven’t taken anything,” I protested. “And even if we do find a good, 
scary mask and take it, we’ll just borrow it. We’ll return it after Halloween.” 

“Aren’t you... a little scared?” Chuck asked softly, his eyes moving all 
around the dark room. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I’m a little scared,” I admitted. “It’s cold and creepy down 
here.” The wind clattered the trapdoor above us again. I heard the faint drip of 
water against the concrete floor. 

“Let’s hurry,” I urged. “Help me.” 

Chuck stepped beside me, but he just stared down at the box and didn’t try 
to help. 

I pulled open the first carton, pushed back the cardboard flaps, and peered 
inside. “What is this stuff?” I reached in and pulled out a cone-shaped party hat. 
The box was stuffed with party hats. 

“This is great!” I whispered happily to Chuck. 

I dropped the hat back in the box. “I was right. All the stuff from the store is 
packed up down here. We’re going to find the scary masks. I know we will!” 

Cartons were stacked on top of cartons. I pulled down another one and 
started to pull it open. “Chuck, you take the bottom one,” I instructed. 

He hesitantly reached for the box. “I have a bad feeling about this, Steve,” 
he murmured. 

“Just find the masks,” I replied. My heart was thudding. My hands were 
shaking as I pulled open the second carton. I was really excited. 

“This one is filled with candles,” Chuck reported. 

My carton had piles of party place mats, napkins, and paper cups. “Keep 
going,” I urged. “The masks have got to be down here.” 

Above our heads, the wind shook the trapdoor. I hoped it wouldn’t suddenly 
slam shut on us. I didn’t want to be trapped down in this cold basement in the 

dark. 

Chuck and I slid two more cartons into the pale square of light from 
outside. My carton was taped shut. I struggled to pull off the tape. 

I stopped when I heard the creaking sound above my head. 

Creaking floorboards? 

I froze, my hands over the carton. “What was that?” I whispered. 

Chuck frowned at me. “What was what?” 

“Didn’t you hear that noise upstairs? It sounded like a footstep.” 

Chuck shook his head. “I didn’t hear anything.” 

I listened for a few more seconds. Silence now. So I went back to work on 
the carton. 

I pulled it open and peered eagerly inside. 

Greeting cards. Dozens of greeting cards. I sifted through them. Birthday 
cards. Valentines. A whole carton of cards. 

Disappointed, I shoved the carton to the side and turned to Chuck. “Any 
luck?” 

“Not yet. Let’s see what’s in this one.” 

He pulled open the carton with both hands. Then he leaned over it and 
peered inside. 

“Oh, yuck! ” he cried. 

8 

“It’s so gross!” Chuck groaned. 

“What is? What?” I demanded. I leaped over my carton to get to him. 

“Check it out.” A grin spread over Chuck’s face as he pulled something out 
of the carton. 

I gasped as I saw an ugly purple face with broken teeth and a long, fat 
worm poking out of a hole in its cheek. 

“You found them!” I shrieked. 

Chuck let out a gleeful laugh. “A whole carton of masks! And they’re all 
totally gross!” 

I grabbed the ugly mask from his hand and studied it. “Hey—it feels 
warm!” 

It was so cold down in that basement. Why did the mask feel warm? 

The worm bobbed out of the ugly face, as if it were alive. 

I dropped the mask, plunged my hand into the carton, and pulled out 
another one. A disgusting pig face with thick gobs of green stuff dripping from 
its snout. 

“That one looks like Carly Beth!” Chuck joked. 

“These are scarier than the mask Carly Beth had last year,” I said. 

I pulled another one from the box. A furry animal face, sort of like a gorilla, 
except that it had two long pointed fangs sliding down past its chin. 

I dropped it and grabbed up another mask. Then another. A hideous bald 
head with one eye hanging down by a thread and an arrow through the forehead. 

I tossed it to Chuck and pulled out another one. 

“This is amazing!” I cried happily. “These will terrify those kids. How will 
I ever choose the best one?” 

Chuck let out a disgusted groan and dropped the mask he was holding into 
the box. “They feel like real skin. They’re so warm.” 

I didn’t pay any attention to him. I was busy digging down to the bottom of 
the carton. I wanted to check out each mask before I made my choice. 

I wanted the scariest, grossest mask in the box. I wanted a mask that would 
give those first graders more nightmares than they had given me! 

I pulled out a mask of a girl’s face with a lizard’s head poking out from her 

mouth. 

No. Not scary enough. 

I pulled out a mask of a snarling wolf, its lips pulled back to show two 
jagged rows of pointed teeth. 

Too wimpy. 

I pulled out an ugly mask of a leering old man, his mouth twisted in an evil 
grin. One long, crooked tooth stuck down over his lower lip. 

The mask had long, stringy yellow hair that drooped down over the old 
man’s craggy forehead. I could see big black spiders climbing in the hair and in 
the ears. A chunk of forehead was missing, revealing a patch of gray skull 
underneath. 

Not bad, I thought. 

This one even smelled bad! 

I started to put it back when I heard a creaking sound again. 

Louder this time. 

The ceiling above my head groaned. 

I gasped. It really sounded like a footstep. Someone walking around up 
there. 

But the store had appeared dark and empty. Chuck and I had both stared 
into the window for a long time. If anyone was hiding there in the darkness, we 
would have seen them. 

Another creak made me suck in a mouthful of air. 

I froze, listening hard. I could hear the steady drip drip of water across the 
dark basement. I could hear the trapdoor rattling outside. 

And I could hear my own shallow breathing. 

The ceiling squeaked. I swallowed hard. 

It’s an old building, I told myself. All old buildings squeak and creak. 
Especially on a windy night. 

A scraping footstep made me gasp out loud. 

“Chuck—did you hear that?” 

Gripping the old-man mask, I listened hard. 

“Did you hear that?” I whispered. “Do you think someone else is in the 
building?” 

Silence. 

Another scraping footstep. 

“Chuck?” I whispered. “Hey—Chuck?” 

My heart pounding, I turned to him. 
“Chuck?” 

He was gone. 

9 

“Chuck?” 

A stab of fear made my breath catch in my throat. 

I heard the hard thud of sneakers against concrete, and turned to the stairs. 
In the dim light, I saw Chuck disappear out through the trapdoor. 

As soon as he reached the alley, he poked his head back in. “Steve—get 
out!” he called down in a loud whisper. “Hurry! Get out of there!” 

Too late. 

A ceiling light flashed on. 

As I blinked against the bright light, I saw a man move quickly across the 
basement. He swept along the wall, pulled a long, black cord—and the trapdoor 
slammed shut with a deafening clang. 

“Oh!” I uttered a weak cry as he turned angrily to me. 

I was trapped. 

Chuck got out. But I was trapped. Trapped in the basement with this guy. 

And what a weird-looking guy! To begin with, he wore a long black cape 
that swept behind him as he crossed the room to me. 

Is that a Halloween costume? I wondered. 

Does he wear a black cape all the time? 

Beneath the billowing cape, he wore a black suit, kind of old-fashioned 
looking. 

He had shiny black hair, parted in the middle and slicked down with some 
kind of hair grease, and a pencil-thin, black mustache that curled over his upper 
lip. 

As he stood over me, his black eyes glowed like two burning coals. 

Like vampire eyes! I thought. 

My whole body was shaking. I gripped the sides of the carton and tried to 
return his stare. 

Trapped, I thought, waiting for him to speak. Trapped with a vampire. 

“What are you doing here?” he asked finally. He pushed back his cape and 
crossed his arms in front of him. The glowing eyes glared down at me sternly. 

“Uh... just looking at masks,” I managed to choke out. I was still on my 

knees on the floor. I knew that my legs were shaking too hard to stand up. 

“The store is closed,” the man said through gritted teeth. 

“I know,” I admitted, lowering my eyes to the floor. “I—” 

“The store went out of business. We’re closed for good.” 

“I... I’m sorry,” I murmured. 

Was he going to let me go? What was he going to do with me? 

If I started to scream, no one would hear me. 

Would Chuck try to get help for me? Or was he halfway home by now? 

“I live upstairs,” the man explained, still glaring at me angrily. “I heard 
scraping sounds down here. Boxes being moved around. I was going to call the 
police.” 

“I’m not a burglar,” I blurted out. “Please don’t call the police. The trapdoor 
was open and my friend and I came down.” 

His eyes moved quickly around the room. “Your friend?” 

“He ran away when he heard you coming,” I told him. “I just wanted to see 
if there were any masks. You know. For Halloween. I wasn’t going to steal 
anything. I just—” 

“But the store is closed,” the man repeated. He glanced at the open carton in 
front of me. “Those masks are very special. They’re not for sale.” 

“N-not for sale?” I stammered. 

“You shouldn’t break into stores,” the man replied, shaking his head. His 
slicked-down hair gleamed under the low ceiling light. “How old are you?” 

I drew a blank. My mouth dropped open, but no answer came out. I was so 
terrified, I forgot how old I was! 

“Twelve,” I answered finally. I took a deep breath, trying to calm myself. 

“Twelve and you’re already breaking into stores,” the man said softly. 

“I don’t break into stores!” I protested. “I mean, I never did before. I came 
to buy a mask. Look. I brought money.” 

I jammed my trembling hand into my jeans pocket and pulled out the wad 
of bills. “Twenty-five dollars,” I said, holding up the money so he could see it. 
“Here. Is it enough for one of these masks?” 

He rubbed his chin. “I told you, young man. These masks are special. They 
cannot be sold. Believe me—you do not want one of these.” 

“But I do!” I cried. “They’re awesome! They’re the best masks I’ve ever 
seen. Halloween is only a few days away. I need one. I need one desperately. 
Please—!” 

“No!” the man shouted sharply. “Not for sale.” 

“But why not?” I wailed. 

He eyed me thoughtfully. “Too real,” he replied. “The masks are too real.” 

“But that’s why they’re so awesome!” I exclaimed. “Please? Please? Take 
my money. Here.” I pushed the wad of bills toward him. 

He didn’t reply. Instead, he turned away. His cape swirled behind him. 
“Come with me, young man.” 

“Huh? Where?” Cold fear ran down my back. I was still holding the money 
out in front of me. 

“Come upstairs with me. I’m going to call your parents.” 

“No!” I shrieked. “Please—!” 

If my mom and dad found out I got caught breaking into the basement of a 
store, they would go totally ballistic! They’d ground me for life! I’d miss this 
Halloween—and the next thirty Halloweens to come! 

The man eyed me coldly. “I don’t want to call the police,” he said softly. 
“I’d rather call your parents.” 

“Please...” I murmured again, climbing to my feet. 

I suddenly had an idea. 

I could make a run for it. 

I glanced quickly at the concrete stairs leading up to the trapdoor. If I took 
off—and really flew—I could get up those stairs before the man could reach me. 

The trapdoor was shut. But it probably wasn’t locked. I could push it open 
from underneath, and just keep running. 

I glanced again at the steps. It was worth a try, I decided. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

Then I silently counted to three. 

One... two... THREE! 

On three, I took off. My heart thudded louder than my sneakers on the hard 
floor. But I made it to the stairs in about a second and a half! 

“Hey—stop!” I heard the caped man cry out in surprise. I could hear his 
heavy steps as he plunged after me. 

“Stop, young man! Where are you going?” 

I didn’t slow down or glance back. 

I took the stairs two at a time. 

Yes! Yes! Em getting away! I thought. 

As I reached the top, I shot out both hands—and pushed up on the trapdoor 

with all of my might. 
It didn’t budge. 

“Ohh!” I let out a terrified moan. 

The caped man had reached the bottom of the steps. I could practically feel 
his breath on the back of my neck. 

The door has got to open! I told myself. It’s got to! 

I took a deep breath. Then I heaved my shoulder against the door. I uttered 
a desperate groan as I pushed. 

Pushed. 

The caped man made a grab for me. 

I felt his hand brush my ankle. 

I kicked the hand away. Then I shoved my shoulder hard against the 
trapdoor. 

And it opened. 

“Yes!” A happy cry escaped my throat as I scrambled out into the alley. 

The cold air rushed against my hot face. I stumbled over something hard—a 
stone or a brick. I didn’t stop to look. I ran through the narrow alley, to the 
sidewalk in front of the store. 

My eyes swept back and forth. I searched for Chuck. No sign of him. 

Had the caped man followed me out the trapdoor? Was he chasing after me? 

I turned back to the alley. And saw only darkness. 

Then I took off, running fast, my feet practically flying over the pavement. I 
shot across the street. Bright lights washed over me. A car horn honked, making 
me jump about a mile! The car roared past. 

“Hey, Steve—!” 

Chuck stepped out from behind a tall evergreen shrub. “You made it!” 

“Yeah. I made it,” I replied, gasping for breath. 

“I—I didn’t know what to do!” he stammered. 

I shook my head. “So you just stood here?” 

“I waited for you,” he said. “I was kind of scared.” 

Big help. 

“Get going,” I urged, glancing back across the street. “He may be chasing 

We ran side by side, our breath steaming up into the cold night air. The 
houses and dark lawns whirred past in a gray-black blur. We didn’t say another 
word to each other. 

Three blocks later, I slowed down as we reached Chuck’s house. I leaned 
over and tried to shake away the sharp pain in my side. I always get a pain like 
that when I run more than a few blocks. 

“See you!” Chuck cried breathlessly. “Sorry you didn’t get your mask.” 

“Yeah. It’s too bad,” I murmured glumly. 

I watched him run along the side of his house until he disappeared around 
the back. Then I took a deep breath and took off again, jogging now, toward my 
house on the next block. 

My heart was still racing in my chest. But I was starting to feel calmer. The 
man in the black cape didn’t chase after us. In a few seconds, I would be safe in 
my own home. 

Halfway up our driveway, I slowed to a stop. The pain in my side had faded 
to a dull ache. 

I stepped into the yellow light from the front porch. I could hear my dog 
Sparky barking inside the house. Sparky knew I was home. 

As I climbed onto the front stoop, a smile crossed my face. 

Avery wide smile. 

I was pleased with myself. In fact, I was overjoyed. I felt like leaping in the 
air. Or maybe doing a wild, crazy dance. Or crowing like a rooster. Or tilting 
back my head and howling at the moon. 

The evening had been a total success. 

I didn’t tell Chuck. I didn’t want Chuck to know. 

But when the caped man clicked on the basement light—in that split second 
before he saw me and I saw him—I grabbed a mask from the carton. And I 
shoved it under my sweatshirt. 

I had a mask! 

It hadn’t been easy. In fact, being trapped in that eerie basement with that 
strange man had been the scariest time of my life. 

But I had a mask! Safely tucked under my sweatshirt. 

I could feel it against my chest as I ran. And I could feel it now, warm 
against my skin as I reached for the front door. 

I was so happy. So pleased with myself. 

And then I felt the mask start to move. 

And I screamed as something sharp bit into my chest. 

11 

I grabbed the front of my sweatshirt. I pressed both hands tight against the bulge 
of the mask. 

“Whoa,” I murmured, holding the mask in place under the sweatshirt. 

Stop imagining things, Steve, I scolded myself. 

Calm down. The mask started to slip down your chest. That’s all. It wasn’t 
moving. It didn’t bite you. 

Get in the house, I ordered myself. Hide the thing in a drawer in your room. 
And pull yourself together. 

Why was I so nervous? 

The scary part was over. I had escaped with one of the great masks. Now it 
was my turn to scare other people. Why was I standing there scaring myself? 

Still holding the front of my sweatshirt, I pushed open the front door and 
stepped into the house. “Down, boy! Get down, Sparky!” I cried as the little 
black terrier greeted me. He leaped high off the floor, bouncing off me, barking 
and whining as if he hadn’t seen me in twenty years. 

“Get down, Sparky! Down!” 

I wanted to sneak into the house, run up to my room, and stash the mask 
away before my parents heard me return. But Sparky ruined that plan. 

“Steve—is that you?” Mom stormed into the living room, a fretful frown on 
her face. She glared at me and angrily blew a curl of blond hair from in front of 
her eyes. “Where on earth were you? Your father and I went ahead and ate 
dinner. Yours is ice-cold by now!” 

“Sorry, Mom,” I said, still holding the front of my sweatshirt to keep the 
mask in place as I tried to push Sparky away. 

The lock of hair fell back over her forehead. She blew at it again. “Well? 
Where were you?” 

“I... well...” 

Think fast, Steve. 

You can’t tell her you sneaked out to steal a Halloween mask from the 
basement of a store. 

“I had to help Chuck with something,” I finally answered. 

Sure, it was a lie. But it wasn’t a serious lie. 

I’m usually a very honest guy. But right then, all I cared about was having 
the mask! I had it, and I was desperate to get it out from under my sweatshirt and 
hidden in a safe place in my room. 

“Well, you should have told me where you were going,” Mom scolded. 
“Your father went out to do the grocery shopping. But he’s very angry, too. You 
should have been home for dinner.” 

I lowered my head. “Sorry, Mom.” 

Sparky gazed up at me. Was he staring at the bulge in my sweatshirt? 

If the dog could see it, Mom could see it too. 

“I’ll take off my coat and come right down,” I told her. 

I didn’t give her a chance to reply. I spun around, leaped onto the stairs, and 
ran up two at a time. I flew down the hall, burst into my room, and slammed the 
door behind me. 

I took a few seconds to catch my breath. I listened hard, making sure that 
Mom hadn’t followed me upstairs. 

No. I could hear her banging around in the kitchen, getting my dinner ready. 

I couldn’t wait to check out the mask! 

Which one did I take? When the light came on in the store basement, I 
grabbed a mask without looking. I stuffed it under my sweatshirt before I could 
see it. 

Now I eagerly reached under the sweatshirt and pulled out my hard-won 
prize. 

“Wow!” I raised it in both hands and admired it. 

The old-man mask. I took the mask of the creepy old man. 

I smoothed out its long strings of yellow-white hair. Holding it by the big, 
pointy ears, I lifted it in front of my face and examined it closely. 

A single white tooth hung down over the bottom lip. A brown wormhole 
poked through the center of the tooth. 

Outside on the front stoop, the big tooth had scraped my chest, I realized. 
That’s what made me think the mask was biting me. 

The mouth was twisted in an evil sneer. The lips curled like two brown 
worms. 

The long nose had gobs of green dripping from each nostril. A square patch 
of skin was missing just above the forehead. I could see gray skull bone in the 
hole. 

The whole face was creased and lined. The flesh was a sickly green. The 

skin appeared to be peeling off the face. Dark scabs bulged from the sunken 
cheeks. 

Black spiders appeared to crawl through the stringy, yellow hair. Spiders 
poked out of the two ears. 

“Yuck!” I cried. 

Was I holding the scariest Halloween mask in the world? 

No. In the universe! 

I began to feel a little queasy just holding it. I rubbed the scabby cheek with 
one finger. The skin felt warm, like real skin. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced laughing like an old man. “Heh-heh-heh.” I 
tried a dry cackle. 

Look out, Hogs! I told myself. When I come leaping out at you on 
Halloween night in this mask, you will jump out of your skins! 

“Heh-heh-heh.” 

I raked the ugly, long hair back over the head. My fingers bumped over the 
spiders tangled in the hair. The spiders didn’t feel rubbery. They felt soft and 
warm like the skin. 

I gazed down happily at the disgusting, old face. It sneered back at me. The 
brown worm lips quivered. 

Should I try it on? 

I carried it over to the mirror on my closet door. I was dying to see what I’d 
look like. 

I’ll slip it on for just a second, I decided. Long enough to see how ugly and 
frightening I’d look. 

Holding it in both hands, I raised the mask over my head. 

Then slowly, carefully... very carefully... I began to pull the mask down, 
down, down over my face. 

12 

“Steve—!” 

Mom’s loud cry from downstairs startled me. 

“Steve—where are you? Get down here for your dinner!” 

“Coming!” I shouted back. I lowered the mask. I’d try it on later, I decided. 

I walked quickly to the dresser and pulled open my sock drawer. Smoothing 
the long, spidery hair over the ugly face, I set the mask down carefully in the 
drawer. Then I hid it under several pairs of socks and closed the drawer. 

I hurried down to the kitchen. Mom had a salad on the table and a plate of 
warmed-up macaroni-and-cheese. 

My stomach growled. I suddenly realized that I was starved! I sat down, 
pushed the salad aside, and started forking up the macaroni as fast as I could. 

I glanced down to see Sparky staring up at me with his big, black, soulful 
eyes. He saw me looking at him and tilted his head. 

“Sparky,” I said, “you don’t like macaroni—remember?” 

He tilted his head the other way, as if trying to understand. I slipped him a 
couple of noodles. He sniffed them and left them on the floor. 

Behind me, Mom busily cleaned out the refrigerator, making room for the 
groceries Dad was out buying. I was dying to tell her about the scary mask. I 
wanted to show it to her. Maybe put it on and make her scream. 

But I knew she’d ask too many questions about where I bought it, and how 
much it cost, and how much of my allowance I used up to pay for it. 

All questions I couldn’t answer. 

So I bit my tongue and forced myself not to blurt out the exciting news that 
I wouldn’t have to be a hobo again this Halloween. 

That was my costume for the past five years. A hobo. Actually, it wasn’t 
much of a costume. I wore one of Dad’s baggy old suits with patches on the 
pants. Mom rubbed charcoal on my face to make me look dirty. And I carried a 
knapsack on a fishing pole over my shoulder. 

Bor-ring! 

This Halloween will be different, I promised myself. This Halloween will 
not be boring. 

I was so happy. As I sat gobbling down macaroni-and-cheese, I couldn’t get 

that creepy mask out of my mind. 

I’m not going to tell anyone about it, I decided. I’m going to scare everyone 
I know. 

I’m not even going to tell Chuck. After all, he ran away and left me down in 
that dark basement. 

Look out, Chuckie Boy! I told myself, grinning so hard some noodles 
slipped out of my mouth. I’m going to get you too! 

13 

I had soccer practice for my first graders after school the next day. It was a 
sunny, cold October afternoon. The sunlight made the yellow and brown falling 
leaves glitter like gold. Puffs of white cloud floated like soft cotton across the 
blue sky. 

Everything looked beautiful to me. Because Halloween was only one day 
away. 

I was staring up at the clouds when Marnie Rosen drop-kicked the soccer 
ball into my stomach. 

I grabbed my stomach and doubled over in pain. Duck Benton and two 
other kids jumped on my back and drove me facedown into the mud. 

I didn’t care. 

In fact, I laughed. 

Because I knew that I had only one day to wait. 

I tried to show them how to pass. As I ran along the sidelines, Andrew 
Foster stuck out his foot. I tripped and went sailing into the bike rack. A 
handlebar caught me under the chin as I fell, and I actually saw stars. 

But I didn’t care. 

I picked myself up with a grin on my face. 

Because I knew a secret. I knew an evil secret that the kids didn’t know. I 
knew that trick-or-treat night was going to be a special treat for me! 

At four o’clock, I called an end to practice. I was too weak to blow the 
whistle. My clothes were soaked with mud, I walked with a limp, and I had cuts 
and bruises in twenty different places. 

A typical practice with the Horrible Hogs. 

But did I care? 

You know the answer. 

I gathered them in a circle around me. They were shoving each other, and 
pulling hair, and calling each other horrible names. I told you—they’re total 
animals. 

I raised my hands to quiet them down. “Let’s have a special Hogs’ 
Halloween party tomorrow,” I suggested. 

“YAAAY!” they cheered. 

“We’ll meet in our costumes after practice,” I continued. “The whole team. 
And we’ll all go trick-or-treating together. I’ll take you.” 

“YAAY!” they cheered again. 

“So tell your parents to drop you off,” I told them. “This is going to be our 
special party. We’ll meet in front of the old Carpenter mansion.” 

Silence. This time they didn’t cheer. 

“Why do we have to meet there?” Andrew asked. 

“Isn’t that old house supposed to be haunted?” Marnie asked softly. 

“That place is too creepy,” Duck added. 

I narrowed my eyes at them, challenging them. “You guys aren’t scared — 
are you?” I demanded. 

Silence. They exchanged nervous glances. 

“Well? Are you all too wimpy to meet me there?” I asked. 

“No way!” Marnie insisted. 

“No way! We’re not scared of a stupid old house!” 

They all began to tell me how brave they were. They all said they would 
meet me there. 

“I saw a ghost once,” Johnny Myers bragged. “Behind my garage. I shouted 
‘Boo!’ and it floated away.” 

These kids are animals, but they have great imaginations. 

The other kids all started teasing Johnny. He stuck to his story. He insisted 
he saw a ghost. So they pushed him to the ground and got his jacket all muddy. 

“Hey, Steve—what are you going to be for Halloween?” Marnie asked. 

“Yeah. What’s your costume?” Andrew demanded. 

“He’s going to be a pile of toxic waste!” someone joked. 

“No. He’s going to be a ballerina!” someone else declared. 

They all hooted and jeered. 

Go ahead and laugh, guys, I thought. Have a good laugh now. Because 
when you see me on Halloween, I’ll be the only one laughing. 

“Uh... I’m going to be a hobo,” I told them. “You’ll recognize me. I’ll be 
wearing a tattered old suit. And my face will be all dirty. I’ll be dressed like a 
bum.” 

“You are a bum!” one of my loyal team members shouted. 

More wild laughing and hooting. More shoving and hair-pulling and 
wrestling on the ground. 

Luckily, their parents and baby-sitters showed up to take them home. I 

watched them go with a big smile on my face. A big, evil smile. 

Then I grabbed up my backpack and hurried home. I ran all the way. I was 
eager to take another look at my mask. 

Chuck stepped out as I jogged past his house. “Hey, Steve... what’s up?” he 
called. 

“Not much!” I called back. “Later, man!” 

I kept running. I didn’t want to hang out with Chuck. I needed to check out 
that mask. I needed to remind myself of how awesome it was. How totally 
terrifying. 

I burst through the front door. Then I ran straight up the stairs to my room, 
taking the stairs three at a time. 

I raced down the long hall. I turned into my room and tossed my backpack 
onto the bed. Then I hurried across the room to my dresser and eagerly jerked 
open my sock drawer. 

“Huh?” 

I peered inside. With a trembling hand, I shoved away several balled-up 
pairs of socks. 

The mask was gone. 

14 

“No!” 

I began pawing frantically through the drawer, tossing all the socks onto the 
floor. 

No mask. Gone. 

The balled-up socks bounced all over the room. My heart was bouncing too. 

Then I remembered that I had moved the mask. Before school that morning. 
I was worried that my mom might do laundry. And open my sock drawer. And 
see it there. 

So I had shoved it to the back of my closet, behind my rolled-up sleeping 

bag. 

Letting out a long whoosh of air, I dropped to my hands and knees. I 
quickly collected all the socks and stuffed them back into the drawer. Then I 
opened the closet door and pulled down the mask from the top shelf. 

Steve, you’ve got to calm down, man, I told myself. It’s just a Halloween 
mask, after all. You’ve got to stop scaring yourself like that. 

Sometimes it helps to scold yourself, to give yourself advice. 

I started to feel a little calmer. I smoothed back the stringy yellow hair and 
mbbed my hand over the craggy, scab-covered skin of the mask. 

The brown lips sneered at me. I poked my little finger through the 
disgusting wormhole in the tooth. I squeezed the spiders hiding inside the ears. 

“This is so cool! ” I declared out loud. 

I couldn’t wait a whole day till Halloween. I had to show it to someone. 

No. I had to scare someone with it. 

Chuck’s face popped instantly into my mind. My old friend Chuck was the 
perfect victim. I knew that he was home. I had seen him there a few minutes ago. 

Wow. Will he be shocked! I told myself. Chuck thought that I ran out of that 
store basement empty-handed. When I sneak into his house and creep up on him 
wearing this disgusting mask, he’ll faint! 

I glanced at the clock. I had an hour before dinnertime. Mom and Dad 
weren’t even home yet. 

Yes, I’ll do it! I decided. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” I practiced my old-man cackle. “Heh-heh-heh.” The 

scariest, most evil cackle I could do. 

Then I grasped the wrinkled neck of the mask in both hands. Stepping in 
front of the mirror, I raised the mask over my head. 

And tugged it down. 

It slid easily over my hair. It felt soft and warm as I pulled it over my face. 

Down over my ears. Over my cheeks. 

Down, down. 

Until I felt the top of the mask settle onto my hair. I twisted it until I could 
see out of the narrow eyeholes. 

Then I lowered my hands to my sides and stepped closer to the mirror to 
check myself out. 

So warm. 

I suddenly felt too warm. 

The rubbery mask pressed tightly against my cheeks and forehead. 

Warmer. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as my face began to burn. 

So hot... 

So hard to breathe. 

“Hey... what is happening to me?” 

15 

I could feel the skin of the mask tightening around my face. 

My cheeks burned. A sour odor swept over me, choked me. 

I gagged. I sucked in a deep breath through my mouth. But the mask was so 
tight, I could hardly breathe. 

I grabbed the ears with both hands. The outside of the mask felt normal. But 
inside, I was burning up! 

I tried to tug the mask off. But it wouldn’t slide up. The hot rubber stuck to 
my face. 

I groaned as the putrid odor washed over me again. 

I tugged harder. The mask didn’t budge. 

I gasped for breath. 

I grabbed the stringy hair—and pulled. I slid my hands under the chin—and 
pushed. 

“Ohhh.” A sick groan escaped my throat. My hands dropped limply to my 
sides. 

I suddenly felt so tired. So weak. 

So totally weak. 

Every breath was a struggle. I bent over. My body began to tremble. 

I felt so weak. And old. 

Old. 

Was this how an old man felt? 

Calm down, Steve, I scolded myself. It’s just a rubber mask. It fits a little 
too snug, that’s all. 

It’s stuck to your face. But you’ll pull it off, and you’ll be fine. 

Calm down. Count to ten. Then examine the mask in the mirror. Grab it 
from the bottom, and you’ll be able to pull it up. No problem. 

I counted to ten. Then I stepped up close to the mirror. 

I nearly cried out when I saw my reflection. The mask really was awesome! 
So real. So gross. 

With my eyes staring out of it, the face seemed to come alive. The brown 
lips sneered back at me. When I moved my lips, they appeared to move too. The 

green gobs of goo trembled inside the big nostrils. The spiders appeared to be 
crawling through the tangled, yellow hair. 

It’s only a mask. A really cool mask, I said to myself. 

I started to feel a little calmer. 

But then a cackle escaped my throat. “Heh-heh-heh.” 

Not my cackle! 

Not in my voice! An old man’s cackle. 

How did that happen? How did I utter such a strange sound? 

I clamped my lips shut. I didn’t want to make that sound again. 
“Heh-heh-heh.” 

Another frightening cackle! In a shrill, high-pitched voice. More like a dry 
croak than a laugh. 

I tightened my jaw. Clenched my teeth. Held my breath so I wouldn’t 
cackle again. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” 

I wasn’t doing it! 

Who was cackling like that? 

Where was the shrill, dry laugh coming from? 

I gaped at the old face in the mirror, suddenly frozen in fear. 

And then I felt a strong hand grab my leg. 

16 

With a choked gasp, I whirled around. 

And peered down through the tight eyeholes of the mask. 

I instantly saw that it wasn’t a hand on my leg. It was teeth. 

Dog teeth. 

“Sparky—it’s you!” I cried. But my voice came out in a dry whisper. 

Sparky backed away. 

I cleared my throat and tried again. “Don’t be afraid, Sparky. It’s only me.” 
My voice! It sounded more like a dry cough. 

It sounded like my grandpa! 

I had an old man’s face—and an old man’s voice. 

And I felt so tired. So totally weak and tired. 

As I reached to pet Sparky, my arms drooped as if they weighed a thousand 
pounds. Both of my knees cracked as I bent down. 

The dog gazed up at me and tilted his head. His short stub of a tail wagged 
furiously. 

“Don’t be scared, Sparky,” I croaked. “I was just trying out this mask. 
Pretty scary, huh?” 

I lowered my face and tried to pick Sparky up. 

But as I leaned forward, I could see the dog’s eyes go wide with terror. 
Sparky let out a shrill yip —jumped out of my hands, and went tearing across the 
room, barking at the top of his lungs. Barking in total fright. 

“Sparky—it’s me!” I cried. “I know I sound different. But it’s me—Steve!” 

I wanted to chase after him. But my legs felt so weak, and my knees refused 
to bend. 

It took me three tries to pull myself up to a standing position. My head 
ached. I was too out-of-breath to run after Sparky. 

Too late, anyway. I could hear him barking his head off, already downstairs. 
“Weird,” I muttered, rubbing my aching back. I hobbled back to the mirror. 
Sparky has seen masks before. He knew it was me. Why was he so scared? Was 
it my weird voice? 

How had the mask dried up my voice? And why did I suddenly feel one 

hundred and ten? 

At least, my face no longer felt on fire. But the skin of the mask still 
pressed so tightly against my face, I could barely move my lips. 

I have to get out of this thing, I decided. Chuck will have to wait until 
Halloween night to be scared out of his skull. 

I raised both hands to my neck and searched for the bottom of the mask. My 
neck felt craggy and wrinkled. The skin was dry. 

Where was the bottom of the mask? 

I leaned close to the mirror on my closet door and narrowed my eyes at my 
reflection. I stared hard at the neck of the mask. 

Wrinkled skin flecked with ugly brown patches. 

But where was the bottom? Where did the mask end and my neck begin? 

My hands began to tremble as they fumbled up and down my throat. I could 
feel my heart begin to race. 

I moved my hands slowly, carefully, up and down my neck. 

Again. And again. 

Finally, I let my hands drop to my side and uttered a weary, frightened sigh. 

There was no mask bottom. No line at all between the mask and my neck. 

The wrinkled, spotted mask skin had become my skin. 

“Nooooo! Nooooo!” I wailed in my old man’s voice. I had to get the thing 
off me! There had to be a way! 

I squeezed the cheeks of the mask and tugged with all my might. 

“Ow!” Sharp pain ran down my face. 

I pulled the hair. That sent a wave of pain shooting down my scalp. 
Frantically, I grabbed at the mask, slapped at it, pulled it, tore at it. 

I felt each move. Each slap and tug made my skin hurt. Every touch hurt me 
as if it were my own skin. 

“The eyeholes!” I croaked. 

I reached for the eyeholes. Maybe I could slip my fingers inside the 
eyeholes and lift the mask off. 

My hands fumbled around my eyes. My trembling fingers searched, poking 
and rubbing. 

No eyeholes. There were no eyeholes. 

The rutted, scab-covered skin had melted onto me. It had become my skin. 

The ugly, disgusting mask had become my face! 

I looked like a horrifying, spider-infested, decaying old man. And I felt as 

old and weird as I looked! 

My throat tightened in terror. I sank against the mirror, pressing my ugly, 
craggy forehead against the glass. 

I shut my eyes. What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated like 
an unhappy chant in my mind. 

And then I heard the front door slam. And I heard Mom’s voice at the 
bottom of the stairway. “Steve—are you home? Steve?” 

What can I do? What can I do? The question repeated and repeated. 

“Steve?” Mom called. “Come down here. I want to show you something.” 

No! I thought, swallowing hard, my dry throat making a sick clicking 
sound. No! I can’t come down! I can’t! I don’t want you to see me like this! 

“Oh, never mind!” Mom called. “I’m coming up there!” 

17 

I heard her footsteps on the stairs. 

A shock of panic made me lurch toward the door. I nearly fell over. My old 
legs were stiff, too stiff to move quickly. 

I hobbled to the door and closed it just as Mom reached the second floor. 
Then I leaned against the door, my hand on my throbbing chest, trying to catch 
my breath. 

Trying to think. Trying to decide what to say. 

I couldn’t let her see me like this. I couldn’t let her see the mask. She’d start 
asking questions. And I couldn’t let her see how the mask had changed me. 

A few seconds later, she knocked gently on the door. “Steve, are you in 
there? What are you doing?” 

“Uh... nothing, Mom.” 

“Well, may I come in? I brought you something.” 

“Not right now,” I croaked. 

Please don’t open the door! I begged silently. Please don’t come into my 
room! 

“Steve, why do you sound so strange?” Mom demanded. “What’s wrong 
with your voice?” 

“Uh...” Think fast, Steve. Think fast. 

“Uh... sore throat, Mom. A really bad sore throat.” 

“Let me take a look at you. Are you sick?” Glancing down, I saw the 
doorknob turn. 

“No!” I screamed, pressing my back against the door. 

“You’re not sick?” 

“I mean, yes,” I croaked in my shaky, old-man voice. “I’m not feeling well, 
Mom. I’m going to lie down for a while. I’ll come down later, okay?” 

I stared at the doorknob, listening to her breathing on the other side of the 
door. “Steve, I bought you those black-and-white cookies that you love. Your 
favorites. Do you want one? Maybe it’ll make you feel better.” 

My stomach growled. Those cookies are my favorites. Dripping with 
chocolate icing on one side and vanilla icing on the other. “Maybe later,” I 
moaned. 

“But I drove two miles out of my way to buy them for you,” Mom said. 

“Later. I’m really not feeling well.” I was telling the truth. My temples 
throbbed. My whole body ached. I felt so weak, I could barely stand up. 

“I’ll call you for dinner,” Mom said. I listened to her make her way back 
down the stairs. Then I hobbled over to the bed and slumped my old man’s body 
down onto the edge. 

“Now what?” I asked myself. I pressed my hands against my scabby 
cheeks. “How do I get out of this thing?” 

I shut my tired, burning eyes and tried to think. After a few minutes, Carly 
Beth’s face floated into my mind. 

“Yes!” I croaked. “Carly Beth is the one person in the world who can help 

me.” 

Carly Beth wore a mask from the same store last Halloween. Maybe the 
same thing happened to her. Maybe her mask stuck to her face and changed her. 

She got her mask off. She will know how I can get my mask off too. 

The phone stood across the room beside the computer on my desk. 
Normally, I’d be over there in three seconds. But it took me three minutes of 
gmnting and straining to get my old body to stand up. Then it took another five 
minutes to drag myself across the room. 

By the time I dropped into my desk chair, I was exhausted. It took all of my 
strength to raise my hand and punch in Carly Beth’s number on the phone. 

I can’t go on like this, I told myself. She’s got to help me. She’s got to know 
how to get this mask off. 

After the third ring, Carly Beth’s father answered. “Hello?” 

“Hi... uh... could I speak to Carly Beth?” I choked out. 

A silence. Then: “Who is this?” Mr. Caldwell sounded confused. 

“It’s me,” I answered. “Is Carly Beth there?” 

“Is this one of her teachers?” he demanded. 

“No. It’s Steve. I—” 

“I’m sorry, sir. I can’t hear you very well. Can you speak up? Why did you 
wish to speak to my daughter? Perhaps I can help you?” 

“No... I—” 

I heard Mr. Caldwell speak softly to someone else at his house. “It’s an old 
man, asking for Carly Beth. I can barely hear him. He won’t say who he is.” 

He came back on the phone. “Are you one of her teachers, sir? Where do 
you know my daughter from?” 

“She’s my friend,” I croaked. 

I heard him turn again to someone else in the room, probably Carly Beth’s 
mom. He muffled the phone with his hand, but I heard what he said: “I think it’s 
a nut. Some kind of crank call.” 

He returned to me. “Sorry, sir. My daughter can’t come to the phone.” He 
hung up. 

I sat there listening to the buzz in my spider-filled ear. 

Now what? I asked myself. 

Now what? 

18 


I must have fallen asleep in the desk chair. I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened by Dad pounding on my bedroom door. “Steve— 
dinnertime!” he called in. 

I sat up with a start. My back ached from sleeping sitting up. I rubbed my 
wrinkled neck, trying to rub away the stiffness. 

“Steve—are you coming down to dinner?” Dad asked. 

“I—I’m not very hungry,” I croaked. “I’m going to take a nap, Dad. I think 
I’m getting sick.” 

“Hey, don’t get sick the night before Halloween,” he replied. “You don’t 
want to miss out on trick-or-treating.” 

“I—I’ll be okay,” I stammered in my hoarse voice. “If I get a good night’s 
sleep, I’ll be fine.” 

Yeah. Right. 

I’ll be one hundred and fifty. But I’ll be fine. 

I let out an unhappy sigh. 

“We’ll bring you up some soup or something later,” Dad called in. Then he 
disappeared downstairs. 

I stared at the phone. Should I try Carly Beth again? 

No, I decided. She won’t believe it’s me. She’ll hang up the way her father 
did. 

I scratched my ears. I could feel the spiders crackling around in them. I 
touched the bare spot on top of my head where the skin was ripped apart. The 
skin was soft and wet. I could feel the patch of hard skull that showed through. 

“Ohhhh.” Another long sigh. 

I’ve got to think, I told myself. I’ve got to think of a way out of this. 

But I felt so weary, so sleepy. 

I pulled myself up and slumped to the bed. A few seconds later, I fell sound 
asleep. 

I awoke to bright sunlight streaming through my bedroom window. 

I blinked several times, startled by the bright morning light. Morning. 
Halloween morning. 

It should have been a happy day. An exciting day. But instead... 

I reached up with both hands and touched the sides of my face. 

Smooth! 

My cheeks felt smooth. Soft and smooth. 

I rubbed my ears. Small ears. My ears. No spiders! 

I raised both hands to my hair. And touched my hair. Not the stringy, old 
man’s hair. 

Hesitantly, carefully, I touched the torn spot on top of my head where the 
skull showed through. 

Not there! 

“I’m me again!” I cried out loud. I let out a long whoop of joy. 

No old man’s mask. No old man’s voice. No old man’s body. 

It had all been a dream. A horrible nightmare. 

Still blinking in the light, I gazed happily around my room. 

“I dreamed it all!” I cried. 

Going down to that dark store basement. Pawing through the carton of 
masks. The man in the cape. The mask of the old man. Sneaking it home and 
trying it on. 

The mask sticking to my skin. Refusing to come off. 

All a dream! 

All a horrifying nightmare that was over now. 

I was so happy! This had to be the happiest moment of my life. 

I started to jump out of bed. I wanted to leap around my room, to dance for 

joy- 

But then my eyes blinked open. And I woke up for real... 

19 


...I woke up for real. 

And knew that I had only dreamed that it was all a dream! 

I grabbed my face—and felt the craggy wrinkles, the heavy scabs. I rubbed 
my nose and brushed the green gobs stuck in my nostrils. 

I had dreamed that the mask didn’t exist. 

I had dreamed that I had my own face back. My own voice and body. 

All a dream. A wonderful dream. 

But now I was really awake—and really in trouble. 

I pulled myself up and brushed the stringy, yellow hair out of my eyes. “I 
have to tell Mom and Dad,” I decided. “I can’t spend another day like this.” 

I had slept in my clothes. I staggered to my feet and dragged my old body 
to the door. I tugged open the door—and saw a note taped on the other side. 

Dear Steve, 

Hope you’re feeling better. Mom and I had to go visit your Aunt Helen this 
morning. We left early to beat the traffic. We’ll be home in time to help you with 
your hobo costume. Love, Dad 

My hobo costume? 

Not this year. Besides, since I was now at least one hundred and fifty, I was 
a little old to go trick-or-treating! 

Crinkling the note in my hand, I made the long trip down to the kitchen, 
holding on to the banister, taking one step at a time. I had a sudden craving for a 
steaming bowl of oatmeal and a cup of hot milk. 

“Oh, no!” I croaked. I was starting to think like an old man! 

I made myself a breakfast of orange juice and corn flakes. I carried it to the 
table and sat down to eat. The juice glass felt strange against my fat, brown lips. 
And it was almost impossible to chew the cornflakes with just one long, crooked 
tooth. 

“What am I going to do?” I moaned out loud. 

Then, suddenly, I had an answer. 

I decided to go ahead with my plan to terrify the first graders. Why 

shouldn’t I pay back those bratty kids for all the trouble they gave me day after 
day on the soccer field? 

Yes! I decided. When Mom and Dad get home, I’ll greet them and show off 
my old-man costume. They won’t know it isn’t a costume. They’ll think it’s 
really cool. 

Then, later, I’ll go to the spooky old Carpenter mansion to meet the kids. 
And I’ll scare the first graders out of their masks! 

And then what? 

Then I’ll find Carly Beth. It won’t be hard to find her. She’s having a 
Halloween party at her house after trick-or-treating. 

I’ll find Carly Beth and get her to tell me the secret. I’ll get her to show me 
how to remove this horrible mask. 

Then I will be a very happy guy. 

Sitting there alone in the kitchen, struggling to choke down my cornflakes, 
it seemed like a really good plan. 

Too bad it didn’t work out the way I hoped. 

20 

When Mom and Dad returned home that evening, I hobbled downstairs to greet 
them. They both gasped when they saw my ugly, scabby face. 

Mom dropped the bag she was carrying. Her mouth fell open to her knees. 

Dad’s eyes bulged. He stared at me for a long time. Then he burst out 
laughing. “Steve—that is the best costume!” he exclaimed. “Where did you get 
that?” 

“It’s disgusting,” Mom said. “Ohh. I can’t stand that open patch on top of 
the head. And that horrible hole in your tooth.” 

Dad walked in a circle around me, admiring my new look. 

I had put on the patched, black suit that I wore as my hobo costume. And I 
had found one of my grandpa’s old canes in the closet, which I leaned on now. 

“It’s great!” Dad declared, squeezing my shoulder. 

“I bought the mask at a party store,” I croaked. It was almost the truth. 

Mom and Dad exchanged glances. “The old man’s voice is very good,” 
Mom said. “Have you been practicing?” 

“Yes. All day,” I replied. 

“Do you feel better?” Dad asked. “We didn’t want to disturb you this 
morning since you weren’t feeling good. Your mom and I had to leave so 
early...” 

“I’m feeling much better,” I lied. Actually, my legs were trembling and my 
whole body was drenched in a cold sweat. 

Feeling weak, I leaned harder on the cane. 

“Yuck! What’s that in your hair?” Mom cried. 

“Spiders,” I told her. I shuddered. I could feel them crawling over my head 
and in my ears. 

“They’re so real-looking,” Mom declared, raising a hand to her cheek. She 
shook her head. “Are you sure you don’t want to be a hobo? That mask must be 
so hot and uncomfortable.” 

If she only knew how uncomfortable it was! 

“Leave him be,” Dad scolded her. “He looks great. He’s going to terrify 
everyone on the street tonight.” 

I hope so, I thought. I glanced at my watch. Time to get going. 

“Well, he’s terrifying me!” Mom exclaimed. She shut her eyes. “I can’t 
stand to look at you, Steve. Why did you buy something so... so ugly?” 

“I think it’s funny,” Dad told her. He poked a finger at my long tooth. 
“Great mask. Is it rubber?” 

“Yeah. I guess,” I muttered in my quivering, old voice. 

Mom made a disgusted face. “Are you trick-or-treating with Chuck?” 

I yawned. I suddenly felt sleepy. “I promised my soccer players I’d meet 
them,” I croaked. “Then I’m going over to Carly Beth’s house.” 

“Well, don’t stay out too late,” Mom said. “And if that heavy mask gets too 
hot, take it off for a while—okay?” 

I wish! I thought bitterly. 

“See you later,” I said. Leaning on the cane, I began dragging myself to the 
front door. 

Mom and Dad laughed at my funny walk. 

I wasn’t laughing. I wanted to cry. 

Only one thing kept me from breaking down and telling them the truth. 
Only one thing kept me from telling Mom and Dad that I was trapped inside this 
horrible mask, that it had turned me into a weak, ancient creature. 

Revenge. 

I could see the terrified expressions on the faces of my soccer team. And I 
could hear their howls of horror as they went running for their lives. 

That cheered me up and kept me going. 

I grabbed the doorknob and struggled to pull open the front door. 

“Steve—wait!” Dad cried. “My camera. Wait. I want to take a picture.” He 
disappeared in search of the camera. 

“Your trick-or-treat bag!” Mom cried. “You forgot your trick-or-treat bag.” 
She rummaged around in the front closet until she found the shopping bag with 
little pumpkins all over both sides. 

I knew I couldn’t manage the cane and the shopping bag. But I took it from 
her anyway. I’ll throw the bag away when I get outside, I decided. I didn’t plan 
to trick-or-treat. I knew it would take me half an hour just to walk up someone’s 
driveway! 

Dad burst back into the living room. “Say cheese!” he cried, raising his 
little camera. 

I tried to twist my wormy lips into a smile. 

Dad flashed the camera once. Then three more times. 

Blinded by flashbulb lights, I said good-bye and made my way out the door. 
The white circles followed me into the night. I nearly fell off the front stoop. 

I grabbed the railing and waited for my heart to stop pounding. Slowly the 
flashes of light faded from my eyes, and I began to pull myself down the 
driveway. 

It was a clear, cold night. No wind at all. The nearly bare trees stood as still 
as statues. 

I limped onto the sidewalk and started in the direction of the Carpenter 
mansion. There was no moon. But the street appeared brighter than usual. Most 
houses had all of their front lights on to welcome trick-or-treaters. 

I stuffed the shopping bag into a trash can at the foot of our neighbors’ 
driveway. Then I continued down the block, my cane tap-tapping on the 
sidewalk. 

My back began to ache. My old legs trembled. I leaned over the cane, 
breathing hard. 

After half a block, I had to take a rest against a lamppost. Luckily, the 
Carpenter mansion was on the next block. 

As I started on my way, two little girls came hurrying down the sidewalk, 
followed by their father. One girl wore colorful butterfly wings. The other wore 
lots of makeup, a gold crown, and a long fancy dress. 

“Ooh, he’s ugly,” the butterfly whispered to her friend as they came near. 

“Yuck!” I heard the princess reply. “Look at the green stuff in his nose.” 

I leaned close to them, opened my lips in a snarl, and rasped, “Get out of 
my way! ” 

The little girls both let out frightened squeals and took off down the 
sidewalk. Their father flashed me an angry stare and hurried after them. 

“Heh-heh-heh.” An evil cackle escaped my lips. 

Seeing their frightened faces gave me new energy. Leaning on my cane, I 
tap-tapped my way across the street. 

A few minutes later, the Carpenter mansion came into view. The huge old 
house stood dark and empty. Its stone turrets rose up to the purple night sky like 
castle towers. 

Huddled under a streetlamp at the bottom of the weed-choked front yard 
stood my soccer team. My Hogs. My first graders. 

My victims. 

They were all in costumes. I saw Power Rangers and Ninja Turtles. 

Mummies and monsters. Two ghosts, a Beauty, and a Beast. 

But I recognized them anyway. I recognized them because they were 
shoving each other, grabbing at trick-or-treat bags, shouting and fighting. 

I leaned against my cane, watching them from halfway down the block. My 
heart started to pound. My whole body trembled. 

This was it. My big moment. 

“Okay, guys,” I murmured softly to myself. “It’s show time! ” 

21 

I was trembling with excitement as I dragged myself up to them. I stepped into 
the light, my wormy lips twisted in a frightening sneer. 

I stared from one to another, giving them a chance to see my terrifying face. 
Giving them a chance to see the spiders crawling through my hair. The 
wormhole in my tooth. The patch of skull poking up through my rutted scalp. 
They grew quiet. I could feel their eyes on me. I could sense their instant 

fear. 

I opened my mouth to let out a frightening growl that would send them 
running for their mommies. 

But Marnie Rosen, wearing a white bride’s dress and veil, stepped up to me 
before I could get it out. “Can we help you, sir?” she asked. 

“Are you lost?” one of the Power Rangers asked. 

“Do you need directions?” 

“Can we help you get somewhere?” 

No. No! 

This wasn’t going right. This wasn’t going the way I’d planned—the way 
I’d dreamed! 

Marnie took my arm. “Which way were you headed, sir? We’ll walk with 
you. It’s kind of a scary night to be walking around a strange neighborhood.” 

The others pushed in closer, trying to be helpful. 

Trying to be helpful to an old man. An old man they weren’t the least bit 
scared of. 

“Nooooo!” I howled in protest. “I’m the ghost of the Carpenter mansion! 
I’ve come to pay you back for trespassing on my front yard!” 

I tried to shriek—but my voice came out in a weak whisper. I don’t think 
they heard a word I uttered. 

I’ve got to scare them, I told myself. I’ve got to! 

I raised both hands together in the air as if I planned to strangle them all. 

My cane flew out of my grasp. I lost my balance and tottered over 
backward. 

“Ohhhh!” I let out a groan as I hit the sidewalk sitting up. 

They all cried out. But not in fear. They cried out because they were 

worried about me. 

Helping hands reached down to pull me to my feet. 

“Are you okay? Here’s your cane.” I recognized Duck Benton’s scratchy 
voice. 

I heard murmurs of sympathy. “Poor old guy,” someone whispered. 

“Are you hurt?” 

“Can we get you some help?” 

No. No. No. No. No. 

They weren’t terrified. The weren’t the tiniest bit afraid. 

I sank onto the cane. I suddenly felt so weary. So totally exhausted I could 
barely keep my head up. 

Forget about scaring them, Steve, I told myself. You’ve got to get to Carly 
Beth’s house before you collapse. You’ve got to find out from Carly Beth how to 
get the mask off. How to get your old face—and strength—back. 

Marnie was still holding on to my trembling arm. “Where are you trying to 
go?” she asked, her freckled face filled with concern. 

“Uh... do you know where Carly Beth Caldwell’s house is?” I asked in a 
weak croak. 

“It’s on the next block. Across the street. I know her brother,” I heard 
Andrew Foster say. 

“We’ll take you there,” Marnie offered. 

She gripped my arm tighter. A mummy stepped up and took my other arm. 
They began to walk me slowly, gently down the sidewalk. 

I don’t believe this! I thought bitterly. They’re supposed to be scared out of 
their costumes! They should be shrieking and crying by now. 

But instead, they’re helping me walk. 

I sighed. The sad thing was, I felt so tired and weak, I couldn’t have made it 
to Carly Beth’s without their help. 

They led me halfway up her driveway. Then I thanked them and told them I 
could make it the rest of the way. 

I watched them scurry away to go trick-or-treating. “I guess Steve isn’t 
going to show up,” Duck said. 

“He was probably too big a wimp to go out on Halloween night!” Marnie 
joked. 

They all laughed. 

Leaning heavily on the cane, I turned toward Carly Beth’s house. The lights 

were all on. But I couldn’t see anyone in the windows. 

She probably isn’t back from trick-or-treating yet, I decided. 

I heard chattering voices. Footsteps on the gravel drive. 

I wheeled around to see Carly Beth and her friend Sabrina Mason hurrying 
across the lawn, heading toward the house. 

I recognized Carly Beth’s duck costume. She wore it every year. Except for 
last Halloween, when she wore that terrifying mask. 

Sabrina was some kind of superhero. She wore silvery tights and a long 
silvery cape. She had a silvery mask pulled over her face, but I recognized her 
long, black hair. 

“Carly Beth—!” I tried to shout. But her name came out in a choked 
whisper. 

She and Sabrina kept chattering excitedly as they hurried across the lawn. 

“Carly Beth—! Please!” I cried. 

Halfway to the house, they both turned. They saw me. 

Yes! 

“Carly Beth—” I cried. 

She pulled off her duck mask and took a few steps toward the driveway. 
She squinted hard at me. “Who are you?” 

“It’s me!” I cried weakly. “I—” 

“Are you the man who tried to call me earlier?” she demanded coldly. 

“Well... yes,” I croaked. “You see, I need—” 

“Well, leave me alone!” Carly Beth screamed. “Why are you following me? 
Leave me alone, or I’ll get my father!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered helplessly. 

The two girls spun away and began jogging to the house. 

Leaving me standing there in the driveway. 

Leaving me all alone. 

Leaving me doomed. 

22 

I let out a bitter wail. “Carly Beth—it’s me! It’s me! Steve!” I cried. “Steve 
Boswell!” 

Did she hear me? 

Yes. 

She and Sabrina had stepped onto the stone walk that led to the front porch. 
In the square of yellow light from the porch, I saw them both turn around. 

“It’s Steve! It’s Steve!” I repeated, my throat aching from my desperate 
cries. 

Slowly, cautiously, both girls made their way back to me. 

“Steve?” Carly Beth stared hard at me, her mouth falling open. 

“Is that a mask?” Sabrina demanded, keeping close to Carly Beth. 

“Yes, it’s a mask,” I croaked. 

“Yuck. It’s disgusting!” Sabrina declared. She pulled off her silver mask to 
see better. “Are those spiders? Yuck!” 

“I need help,” I confessed. “This mask—” 

“You went to the party store!” Carly Beth cried. The duck mask fell to the 
ground. She raised both hands to the sides of her face. “Oh, no! No! Steve, I 
warned you!” 

“Yes. That’s where I got it,” I said, pointing to my hideous face. “I didn’t 
listen to you. I didn’t know.” 

“Steve, I told you not to go there,” Carly Beth said, her expression still tight 
with horror. Hands still pressed against her cheeks. 

“Now the mask won’t come off,” I wailed. “It’s stuck to me. It’s part of me. 
And it’s—it’s turning me into an old, old man. A feeble old man.” 

Carly Beth shook her head sadly. She stared at my ugly face, but didn’t say 
a word. 

“You’ve got to help me,” I pleaded. “You’ve got to help me get this mask 

off.” 

Carly Beth let out a frightened sigh. “Steve—I don’t think I can.” 

23 

I grabbed her duck feathers and held on. “You’ve got to help me, Carly Beth,” I 
begged. “Why won’t you help me?” 

“I want to help you,” she explained. “But I’m not sure I can.” 

“But you had a mask from the same store last Halloween,” I protested. 
“You pulled the mask off. You escaped from it—right?” 

“It can’t be pulled off,” Carly Beth said. “There’s no way to pull it off.” 

Over her shoulder, I saw three kids in costumes at the next house. A woman 
appeared in the doorway. I saw her dropping candy bars into the three trick-or- 
treat bags. 

Some kids are having fun tonight, I thought bitterly. 

I am not having fun tonight. 

I may never have fun again. 

“Come into the house,” Carly Beth suggested. “It’s cold out here. I’ll try to 
explain.” 

I tried to follow them up the driveway. But my legs wobbled like rubber. 
Carly Beth and Sabrina practically had to carry me into her house. They dropped 
me down on the green leather couch in the living room. 

On a table across the room, a carved jack-o’-lantern grinned at me. The 
pumpkin had more teeth than I did! 

Carly Beth dropped down on the couch arm. Sabrina sat on the edge of the 
armchair beside it. She leaned over and sifted through her trick-or-treat bag. 
How could she think of candy at a time like this? 

I turned to Carly Beth. “How do I get the mask off?” I croaked. 

Carly Beth chewed her bottom lip. She raised her eyes to me, her 
expression grim. “It isn’t a mask,” she said softly. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“It isn’t a mask,” she explained. “It’s a real face. A living face. Did you 
meet the man in the black cape?” 

I nodded. 

“He’s some kind of weird scientist, I think. He made the faces. In his lab.” 

“He—he made them?” I stammered. 

Carly Beth nodded solemnly. “They are real, living faces. The man in the 

cape tried to make them good-looking. But something went wrong. They all 
came out ugly. As ugly as the one you’re wearing.” 

“But, Carly Beth—” I started. 

She raised a hand to hush me. “The caped man calls the faces The Unloved. 
No one wants them because they turned out so ugly. They are The Unloved. 
They’re alive. And they attach themselves to anyone who comes near enough.” 

“But how do I get it off?” I cried impatiently. I raised my hands and tugged 
at my rutted, scabby cheeks. “I can’t spend the rest of my life like this. What can 
I do?” 

Carly Beth jumped up and began pacing back and forth in front of Sabrina 
and me. Sabrina unwrapped a Milky Way bar and began chewing it, watching 
Carly Beth pace. 

“The same thing happened to me last Halloween,” Carly Beth said. “I had 
chosen a really ugly mask. It was so scary. It attached itself to my head. And 
then it turned me evil.” 

“And what did you do?” I cried, leaning forward on my cane. 

“I went back to the party store. I found the man in the cape. He told me 
there was only one way to get rid of the mask. It could only be done with a 
symbol of love.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her. I didn’t understand. 

“I had to find a symbol of love,” Carly Beth continued. “At first, I didn’t 
know what the man meant. I didn’t know what to do. But then I remembered 
something my mom had made for me.” 

“What?” I demanded eagerly. “What was it?” 

“It was that head,” Sabrina chimed in, her mouth bulging with chocolate. 

“My mom had sculpted a head of me,” Carly Beth said. “It looked just like 
me. You’ve seen it. Mom sculpted it because she loves me. It was a symbol of 
love.” 

Carly Beth dropped back down beside me. “I placed Mom’s sculpted head 
over The Unloved face. And The Unloved disappeared. The ugly face slipped 
right off.” 

“Great!” I cried happily. “Go get it. Hurry!” 

“Huh?” Carly Beth stared at me, confused. 

“Go get the sculpted head,” I begged. “I’ve got to get this thing off me!” 

Carly Beth shook her head. “You don’t get it, Steve. You can’t use my 
symbol of love. It will only work for me. You have to find your own symbol of 

love.” 

“But maybe it won’t work for Steve’s mask,” Sabrina interrupted. “Maybe 
each mask is different.” 

“Give me a break, Sabrina,” I muttered angrily. “It’s got to work! Don’t you 
understand? It’s got to!” 

“You have to find your own symbol of love,” Carly Beth repeated. “Can 
you think of one, Steve?” 

I stared back at her, thinking hard. I thought. And thought. Symbol of 
love... symbol of love... No. I couldn’t think of anything. Not a single thing. 
And then an idea popped into my mind. 

24 

I leaned on the cane and tried to pull myself up from the couch. But my feeble 
arms gave way, and I fell back into the cushion. 

“You’ve got to help me get home,” I told Carly Beth. “I thought of a 
symbol of love. It’s at my house.” 

“Okay. Let’s go!” she replied. 

“But what about the kids coming over here?” Sabrina asked, swallowing a 
chunk of Milky Way. “What about the party?” 

“You stay here and greet them,” Carly Beth told her. “If Steve really can 
find a symbol of love at his house—and if it works—we’ll be right back.” 

“It’ll work,” I said. “I know it will.” 

But I had my fingers crossed. Which made it even harder to climb up from 
the couch. 

Carly Beth saw me struggling. She took both my hands and pulled me to 
my feet. “Yuck! What are those things moving around in your ears?” she cried, 
making a disgusted face. 

“Spiders,” I said quietly. 

She swallowed hard. “I sure hope you find something that works.” 

“Me too,” I murmured as she guided me to the door. 

Carly Beth turned back into the living room. “Don’t eat all the chocolate 
while we’re gone,” she called to Sabrina. 

“It’s only my second piece!” Sabrina protested with her mouth full. 

We stepped into the darkness. Some kids in costumes were coming up the 
driveway, all carrying bulging trick-or-treat bags. “Hey, Carly Beth—where are 
you going?” a girl called. 

“I’m doing a good deed!” Carly Beth replied. “See you guys later!” She 
turned back to me. “I can’t believe you didn’t listen to me, Steve. You really 
look disgusting.” 

“I can’t even wipe the green gobs out of my nose!” I wailed. 

Holding me by the shoulder, she guided me toward my house. We crossed 
the street onto my block. I heard kids laughing and loud music inside the house 
on the corner. A Halloween party. 

As we passed the house, I stumbled over a moving shadow. Carly Beth 

caught me before I fell. “What was that?” I cried. 

Then I saw it scamper silently across the street. A black cat. 

I laughed. What else could I do? I had to laugh. 

Go ahead, cat, I thought bitterly. Go ahead and cross my path. I couldn’t 
have any worse luck—could I? 

My house came into view past a row of tall evergreen shrubs. Through the 
shrubs, I could see that nearly all the downstairs lights were on. 

“Are your parents home?” Carly Beth asked, helping me across the grass. 

I nodded. “Yeah. They’re home.” 

“Do they know about the... uh...” 

“No,” I replied. “They think it’s a costume.” 

As we stepped onto the front stoop, I could hear Sparky start to bark inside 
the house. I pushed open the door, and the little dog let out an excited yip and 
leaped up at me. 

His paws landed on my waist and pushed me back hard. I toppled against 
the wall. 

“Down, Sparky! Please! Get down!” I pleaded in my old man’s croak. 

I knew Sparky was glad to see me. But I was too feeble for his usual 
greeting. 

“Down, boy! Please!” 

Carly Beth finally managed to pull the dog off me so that I could stand up. 
Then she held onto Sparky until I regained my balance. 

“Steve—is that you?” I heard Mom call from the den. “You’re back so 
early!” 

Mom stepped into the living room. She had changed into the gray flannel 
housedress she usually relaxes in at night, and she had her blond hair in curlers. 

“Oh, hi, Carly Beth!” she cried in surprise. “I wasn’t expecting visitors. I 

“That’s okay, Mom,” I croaked. “We’re only staying a minute. We came 
back to get something.” 

“Don’t you love Steve’s costume?” Mom asked Carly Beth. “Isn’t that the 
most horrible mask you ever saw?” 

“You mean he’s wearing a mask?” Carly Beth joked. She and Mom enjoyed 
a good laugh. 

Sparky sniffed my shoes. 

“What did you come back here for?” Mom asked me. 

“Those black-and-white cookies,” I replied eagerly. “You know. The ones 
you bought me yesterday.” 

Those cookies were a symbol of love. 

Mom had told me how she drove two miles out of her way to buy them for 
me. She knew they were my favorite cookies in the whole world. And she drove 
out of her way to buy them because she loves me. 

So the cookies were the perfect symbol of love. 

I couldn’t wait to bite into one. One bite, I knew—and I’d be able to pull 
off this horrible mask. 

Mom’s face twisted in surprise. She narrowed her eyes, studying me. “You 
came back here for those cookies? Why? What about all your trick-or-treat 
candy?” 

“Uh... well...” I stammered. My brain stalled. I couldn’t think of a good 
reason. 

“He had a strong craving,” Carly Beth chimed in. “He told me he’s been 
thinking about those cookies all night.” 

“That’s right. I had a craving,” I repeated. “Candy bars can’t compare, 
Mom. Those cookies are the best.” 

“I love them, too,” Carly Beth added. “So I came back with Steve. We want 
to bring them to my Halloween party.” 

Mom tsk-tsked. “What a shame,” she said. 

“Huh?” I cried, feeling my heart skip a beat. “What do you mean? What’s 
wrong?” 

Mom shook her head. “The cookies are gone,” she replied softly. “The dog 
found the box this morning and broke into it. I’m sorry, guys. But Sparky ate 
them all.” 

25 

Mom’s words sent a cold shiver down my back. I let out a weak moan. And 
stared down at Sparky. 

The dog gazed up at me and began wagging his stubby tail. As if he were 
pleased with himself! 

“You’ve ruined my life, Sparky!” That’s what I felt like screaming. “You 
greedy pig! Couldn’t you save me just one cookie? Now I’m doomed. Doomed 
to live with this gross, frightening face forever.” 

And all because Sparky loved black-and-white cookies as much as I did. 

Still wagging his tail, Sparky ran over to me and brushed his furry, black 
body against my leg. He wanted to be petted. 

Forget it, I thought. No way I’m petting you—you traitor. 

I heard Dad calling Mom from the den. “Have fun, guys,” Mom said. She 
waved to Carly Beth and me and hurried off to see what Dad wanted. 

Have fun, guys? 

I’m never going to have fun again, I realized. 

Feeling weak and defeated, I turned to Carly Beth. “Now what do we do?” I 
whispered. 

“Quick—pick up Sparky,” she whispered back, motioning to the dog with 
both hands. 

“Huh? Do what? I’m never touching this dog again!” I croaked miserably. 

Panting hard, his tongue hanging to the floor, Sparky brushed my ankle 
again. 

“Pick him up!” Carly Beth insisted. 

“Why?” 

“Sparky is your symbol of love!” Carly Beth declared. “Look at him, Steve. 
Look how much that dog loves you.” 

“He loves me so much, he ate all my cookies!” I wailed. 

Carly Beth frowned at me. “Forget about the cookies. Pick up the dog. 
Sparky is your symbol of love. Pick him up and hold him against you. And I’ll 
bet the mask will come right off.” 

“I guess it’s worth a try,” I said softly. I started to pick up the little black 
terrier. My back creaked as I bent down. My aching knees cracked. 

Please work! I pleaded silently. Please let this work! 

I reached for Sparky—and he darted through my hands and ran across the 
carpet toward the den. 

“Sparky—come back! Sparky!” I cried, still bent over, still reaching out 
both hands. 

The dog stopped halfway across the living room and turned back. 

“Come back, Sparky!” I called in my old man’s quivering voice. “Come 
back, boy! Come back to Steve!” 

His stubby tail started wagging again. He stared at me, head tilted, and 
didn’t move. 

“He’s playing games with me,” I told Carly Beth. “He wants me to chase 
him.” 

I got down on my knees and motioned to Sparky with both hands. “Come, 
boy! Come! I’m too old to chase you! Come, Sparky!” 

To my surprise, the dog let out a yip, ran back across the room, and jumped 
into my arms. 

“Hug him tight, Steve,” Carly Beth urged. “Hug him tight. It’s going to 
work. I know it will!” 

The little dog felt so heavy in my weak, aching arms. But I held him against 
my chest. Held him tight. 

Held him as tight as I could. 

Held him for a long, long time. 

And nothing happened. 

26 

After about a minute, the dog got tired of being squeezed. He jumped out of my 
arms, bounced over the carpet, and disappeared into the den. 

I tugged at the mask with both hands. 

But I knew I was wasting my strength. It didn’t feel any different. Nothing 
had changed. The hideous face was still tightly attached to my head. 

Carly Beth put a hand gently on my shoulder. “Sorry,” she murmured. “I 
guess each mask is different.” 

“You mean I need something else to get it off,” I said, shaking my old, 
spider-infested head sadly. 

Carly Beth nodded. “Yes. Something else. But we don’t know what it is.” 

I uttered a helpless cry. “I’m doomed!” I wailed. “I can’t even climb up off 
my knees!” 

Carly Beth slid both of her hands under my shoulders and lifted me to my 
feet. I steadied myself, leaning on the cane. 

And then I had an idea. 

“The man in the cape,” I croaked. “He’ll know what I can do.” 

“You’re right!” Carly Beth’s face brightened. “Yes, you’re right, Steve. He 
helped me last Halloween. If we go back to the party store, I know he’ll help 
you!” 

She started to pull me to the front door. But I held back. “There’s just one 
little problem,” I told her. 

She turned back to me. “Problem?” 

“Yeah,” I replied. “I forgot to tell you. The party store is closed. It went out 
of business.” 

We walked there anyway. Well, I didn’t exactly walk. I limped and hobbled, 
feeling weaker and more feeble every second. Carly Beth practically had to carry 
me. 

The streets stood empty, glimmering dimly under the rows of streetlamps. 
Lights were going out in all the houses. It was pretty late. All of the trick-or- 
treaters had gone home. 

Two dogs followed us down the street. Big German shepherds. Maybe they 

thought we’d share our Halloween candy with them. Of course, I didn’t have any 
Halloween candy. 

“Go away,” I snarled at them. “I don’t like dogs anymore. Dogs are 
useless!” 

To my surprise, they seemed to understand. They turned and went loping 
across a dark front lawn, disappearing around the side of the house. 

A few minutes later, we passed the row of small shops and stepped up in 
front of the party store. Dark. Empty. 

“Out of business,” I murmured. 

Carly Beth pounded on the front door. I peered into the blue shadows 
beyond the dusty front window. Nothing moved. No one in there. 

“Open up! We need help!” Carly Beth shouted. She banged on the wooden 
door with both fists. 

Silence inside. No one stirred. 

A cold wind swept down the street. I shivered. I tried to bury my ugly head 
in my shoulders. “Let’s go,” I mumbled. Defeated. 

Doomed. 

Carly Beth refused to give up. She pounded the door with both fists. 

I turned away from the window—and gazed at the alley beside the store. 
“Whoa. Wait,” I called to her. “Come over here.” 

I dragged myself to the alley. Carly Beth followed. She rubbed her 
knuckles. I guess they were sore from pounding so hard on the door. 

I could see from the sidewalk that the trapdoor was shut. But I led Carly 
Beth into the alley. We stopped beside the trapdoor. 

“It leads into the basement of the party store,” I explained. “All the masks 
and other stuff are down there.” 

“If we can get down there,” Carly Beth whispered, “maybe we can find a 
way to help you.” 

“Maybe,” I whispered back. 

Carly Beth bent down and grabbed the wire handle to the trapdoor. She 
tugged it up hard. 

The door didn’t budge. 

“I think it’s locked,” she groaned. 

“Try again,” I urged. “It sticks. It’s very hard to open.” 

She bent down, grasped the handle in both hands, and pulled again. 

This time the door swung up, revealing the concrete stairs that led down to 

the basement. 

“Come on. Hurry, Steve.” Carly Beth tugged my arm. 
My last chance, I thought. My last chance. 

Trembling, I followed her down into the heavy darkness. 

27 

We huddled close together as we made our way across the basement floor. Pale 
light from a streetlamp floated in through the open trapdoor. 

Across the room, I heard the steady drip drip drip I’d heard before. The 
large cartons stood just where Chuck and I had left them. Three or four of them 
were still open. 

“Well. Here we are,” Carly Beth murmured. Her words sounded hollow, 
echoing softly against the stone basement walls. Her eyes darted around the 
room, then stopped on me. “Now what?” 

I shrugged. “Search through the cartons, maybe?” 

I stepped over to the nearest one and peered inside. “This one has all the 
masks,” I told her. I picked up a monster mask covered in bristly fur. 

“Yuck,” Carly Beth groaned. “Put it down. We don’t need another mask.” 

I dropped the mask back into the carton. It made a soft plop as it landed on 
the other masks. 

“I don’t know what we need,” I said. “But maybe we can find 
something...” 

“Look at these!” Carly Beth cried. She had pulled open another carton. She 
held up some kind of jumpsuit. It had a long, pointy tail on the back. 

“What’s that?” I demanded, stepping around two cartons to get to her. 

“A costume,” she replied. She leaned into the carton and pulled out another 
one. A pair of furry tights covered with leopard spots. “The box is filled with 
costumes.” 

“Big deal,” I grumbled. “That’s not going to help me.” 

I sighed. “Nothing is going to help me.” 

Carly Beth didn’t seem to hear me. She leaned over the edge of the box and 
pulled out another costume. She held it up in front of her. A shiny black suit. 
Very fancy. Like a tuxedo. 

As I stared at it, my face began to tingle. 

“Put it down,” I said glumly. “We need to find—” 

“Oh, yuck!” Carly Beth cried. “This suit—it’s crawling with spiders!” 

“Huh?” I gasped. My face tingled harder. I heard a loud buzzing in my ears. 
The tingle became an itch. 

“Hey, I’ll bet this is the costume that goes with your mask!” Carly Beth 
declared. She carried it over to me. “See? Spiders and more spiders!” 

I scratched my itching cheeks. The itch was quickly becoming painful. I 
scratched harder. 

“Get it away from me! It’s making me itch!” I cried. 

Carly Beth ignored my plea. She held the shiny black suit up in front of me, 
beneath my itching, burning face. 

“See? You have the head—and this is the body that goes with it,” she said, 
holding it against me. Admiring it. 

“Put it away!” I shrieked. “My face—it’s burning! Ow!” 

I slapped frantically at my cheeks. My forehead. My chin. 

“Owwwwww!” I howled. “I feel so weird! What is happening to me?” 

28 

“It’s burning hot!” I shrieked. “Owwwwww/ What is happening ?” 

I grabbed the sides of my face, trying to soothe away the burning pain. 

As I gripped my cheeks, the face began to slide under my hands. 

I felt it begin to rise. Up, up. 

I pulled my hands away—as the old man’s head slid over my head. Lifted 
off. Floated up. 

Cool air greeted my cheeks. I took a deep breath of the cold, fresh air. 

The craggy old head hovered above me for a moment. Then it floated 
toward the shiny black suit in Carly Beth’s hand. 

The head floated down onto the collar of the suit. 

Carly Beth let out a startled cry as the suit’s arms thrashed out. The trouser 
legs kicked. The suit twitched and squirmed as if trying to break free. 

Carly Beth let go of it and jumped back. 

A smile spread over the ugly old face. The suit legs lowered themselves to 
the floor. The old man performed a little dance, arms flapping, trouser legs 
hopping. 

And then he turned away from us. The head attached to the suit. The trouser 
legs bent at the knees, he shuffled toward the steps. 

Carly Beth and I both cried out in shock as the old man climbed up the 
steps and disappeared out the trapdoor. 

We stood there, eyes bulging, mouths wide-open. We stared at the opening 
at the top of the stairs. Stared in silence. Stared in amazement. 

And then we both began to laugh. 

We fell on each other, laughing, laughing till tears rolled down our cheeks. 

I laughed louder and harder than I had ever laughed. Because I was 
laughing in my voice. Laughing with my face. My real face. 

The old-man face found its body—and escaped. 

And now I was me again! 

This had to be the best Halloween ever! I had never been so happy in all my 
life just to have things normal. 

Carly Beth and I danced down the street as we made our way home. We 

sang at the top of our lungs. Sang and twirled each other around. 

And danced and strutted down the middle of the street. 

We were both so happy! 

We were half a block from my house—when the creature leaped out from 
behind a hedge. 

It opened its jaws in a broken-toothed roar. 

Carly Beth and I grabbed each other and uttered shrill cries of terror. 

The creature had bright purple skin that glowed in the light from the 
streetlamp. Fiery red eyes. A mouth full of broken, rotting teeth. And a fat, 
brown worm poking out from the middle of its cheek. 

“Huh?” I stared at the worm as it bobbed from the creature’s skin. Stared at 
the frightening purple face. 

And recognized it. 

“Chuck!” I cried. 

He let out a hoarse laugh from behind the mask. “I gotcha!” he bellowed. “I 
got both of you! You should have seen the looks on your faces!” 

“Chuck—” 

“I’ve been waiting here. Waiting to surprise you,” he rasped. The disgusting 
worm bobbed up and down in his cheek as he talked. 

“You didn’t see me grab this mask when I ran out of that store basement,” 
he growled. “I kept it a secret. I wanted to give you a good scare.” 

“You scared me to death!” Carly Beth admitted, giving him a playful shove. 
“Now take off the mask and let’s go to my house.” 

“Uh... I have a problem,” Chuck replied, lowering his voice. 

“Problem?” 

Chuck nodded. “I’m having a little trouble getting this mask off. Think you 
guys could help me?” 


THE HEADLESS GHOST 


1 

Stephanie Alpert and I haunt our neighborhood. 

We got the idea last Halloween. 

There are a lot of kids in our neighborhood, and we like to haunt them and 
give them a little scare. 

Sometimes we sneak out late at night in masks and stare into kids’ 
windows. Sometimes we leave rubber hands and rubber fingers on windowsills. 
Sometimes we hide disgusting things in mailboxes. 

Sometimes Stephanie and I duck down behind bushes or trees and make the 
most frightening sounds—animal howls and ghostly moans. Stephanie can do a 
terrifying werewolf howl. And I can toss back my head and shriek loud enough 
to shake the leaves on the trees. 

We keep almost all the kids on our block pretty frightened. 

In the mornings, we catch them peeking out their doors, seeing if it’s safe to 
come out. And at night, most of them are afraid to leave their houses alone. 

Stephanie and I are really proud of that. 

During the day we are just Stephanie Alpert and Duane Comack, two 
normal twelve-year-olds. But at night, we become the Twin Terrors of Wheeler 
Falls. 

No one knows. No one. 

Look at us, and you see two sixth graders at Wheeler Middle School. Both 
of us have brown eyes and brown hair. Both of us are tall and thin. Stephanie is a 
few inches taller because she has higher hair. 

Some people see us hanging out together and think we’re brother and sister. 
But we’re not. We don’t have any brothers and sisters, and we don’t mind one 
bit. 

We live across the street from one another. We walk to school together in 
the morning. We usually trade lunches, even though our parents both pack us 
peanut-butter-and-jelly sandwiches. 

We’re normal. Totally normal. 

Except for our secret late-night hobby. 

How did we become the Twin Terrors? Well, it’s sort of a long story.... 

Last Halloween was a cool, clear night. A full moon floated over the bare trees. 

I was standing outside Stephanie’s front window in my scary Grim Reaper 
costume. I stood up on tiptoes, trying to peek inside to check out her costume. 

“Hey—beat it, Duane! No looking!” she shouted through the closed 
window. Then she pulled down the shade. 

“I wasn’t looking. I was just stretching!” I shouted back. 

I was eager to see what Stephanie was going to be. Every Halloween, she 
comes up with something awesome. The year before, she came waddling out 
inside a huge ball of green toilet paper. You guessed it. She was an iceberg 
lettuce. 

But this year I thought maybe I had her beat. 

I’d worked really hard on my Grim Reaper costume. I wore high platform 
shoes—so high that I’d tower over Stephanie. My black, hooded cape swung 
along the ground. I hid my curly brown hair under a tight rubber skullcap. And I 
smeared my face with sick-looking makeup, the color you see on moldy bread. 

My dad didn’t want to look at me. He said I turned his stomach. 

A success! 

I couldn’t wait to make Stephanie sick! I banged my Grim Reaper sickle on 
Stephanie’s window. “Hey, Steph—hurry up!” I called. “I’m getting hungry. I 
want candy!” 

I waited and waited. I started pacing back and forth across her front lawn, 
my long cape sweeping over the grass and dead leaves. 

“Hey! Where are you?” I called again. 

No Stephanie. 

With an impatient groan, I turned back to the house. 

And a huge, hairy animal jumped me from behind and chewed off my head. 


2 

Well, it didn’t really chew off my head. 

But it tried to. 

It growled and tried to sink its gleaming fangs into my throat. 

I staggered back. The creature looked like an enormous black cat, covered 
in thick, black bristles. Gobs of yellow goo poured from its hairy ears and black 
nose. Its long, pointed fangs glowed in the dark. 

The creature snarled again and shot out a hairy paw. “Candy... give me all 
your candy!” 

“Stephanie—?” I choked out. It was Stephanie. Wasn’t it? 

The creature jabbed its claws into my stomach in reply. That’s when I 
recognized Stephanie’s Mickey Mouse watch on its hairy wrist. 

“Wow. Stephanie, you look awesome! You really—” I didn’t finish. 
Stephanie ducked behind the hedge and yanked me down beside her. 

My knees hit the sidewalk hard. “Ow! Are you crazy?” I shrieked. “What’s 
the big idea?” 

A group of little kids in costumes paraded by. Stephanie leapt out of the 
hedge. “Arrrggghhh!” she growled. 

The little kids totally freaked. They turned and started to run. Three of them 
dropped their trick-or-treat bags. Stephanie scooped up the bags. “Yummmm!” 

“Whoa! You really scared them,” I said, watching the little kids run up the 
street. “That was cool.” 

Stephanie started to laugh. She has a high, silly laugh that always starts me 
laughing, too. It sounds like a chicken being tickled. “That was kind of fun,” she 
replied. “More fun than trick-or-treating.” 

So we spent the rest of the night scaring kids. 

We didn’t get much candy. But we had a great time. 

“I wish we could do this every night!” I exclaimed as we walked home. 

“We can,” Stephanie said, grinning. “It doesn’t have to be Halloween to 
scare kids, Duane. Get my meaning?” 

I got her meaning. 

She tossed back her bristly head and let out her chicken laugh. And I 
laughed, too. 

And that’s how Stephanie and I started haunting our neighborhood. Late at 
night, the Twin Terrors strike, up and down our neighborhood. We’re 
everywhere! 

Well... almost everywhere. 

There’s one place in our neighborhood that even Stephanie and I are afraid 
of. 

It’s an old stone house on the next block. It’s called Hill House. I guess 
that’s because it sits up on a high hill on Hill Street. 

I know. I know. A lot of towns have a haunted house. 

But Hill House really is haunted. 

Stephanie and I know that for sure. 

Because that’s where we met the Headless Ghost. 

3 

Hill House is the biggest tourist attraction in Wheeler Falls. Actually, it’s the 
only one. 

Maybe you’ve heard of Hill House. It’s written up in a lot of books. 

Tour guides in creepy black uniforms give the Hill House tour every hour. 
The guides will act real scary and tell frightening stories about the house. Some 
of the ghost stories give me cold shivers. 

Stephanie and I love to take the tour—especially with Otto. Otto is our 
favorite guide. 

Otto is big and bald and scary-looking. He has tiny black eyes that seem to 
stare right through you. And he has a booming voice that comes from deep 
inside his huge chest. 

Sometimes when Otto leads us from room to room in the old house, he 
lowers his voice to a whisper. He talks so low, we can barely hear him. Then his 
tiny eyes will bulge. He’ll point—and scream: “There’s the ghost! There!” 

Stephanie and I always scream. 

Even Otto’s smile is scary. 

Stephanie and I have taken the Hill House tour so often, we could probably 
be tour guides. We know all the creepy old rooms. All the places where ghosts 
have been spotted. 

Real ghosts! 

It’s the kind of place we love. 

Do you want to know the story of Hill House? Well, here’s the story that 
Otto, Edna, and the other guides tell: 

Hill House is two hundred years old. And it’s been haunted practically from the 
day the stones were gathered to build it. 

A young sea captain built the house for his new bride. But the day the big 
house was finished, the captain was called out to sea. 

His young wife moved into the huge house all alone. It was cold and dark, 
and the rooms and hallways seemed to stretch on forever. 

For months and months, she stared out of their bedroom window. The 
window that faced the river. Waiting patiently for the captain’s return. 

Winter passed. Then spring, then summer. 

But he never came back. 

The captain was lost at sea. 

One year after the sea captain disappeared, a ghost appeared in the halls of 
Hill House. The ghost of the young sea captain. He had come back from the 
dead, back to find his wife. 

Every night he floated through the long, twisting halls. He carried a lantern 
and called out his wife’s name. “Annabel! Annabel!” 

But Annabel never answered. 

In her grief, she had fled from the old house. She never wanted to see it 
again. 

Another family had moved in. As the years passed, many people heard the 
ghost’s nightly calls. “Annabel! Annabel!” Through the twisting halls and cold 
rooms of the house. 

“Annabel! Annabel!” 

People heard the sad, frightening calls. But no one ever saw the ghost. 

Then, one hundred years ago, a family named Craw bought the house. The 
Craws had a thirteen-year-old boy named Andrew. 

Andrew was a nasty, mean-natured boy. He delighted in playing cruel tricks 
on the servants. He scared them out of their wits. 

He once threw a cat out of a window. He was disappointed when it 
survived. 

Even Andrew’s own parents couldn’t stand to spend time with the mean- 
tempered boy. He spent his days on his own, exploring the old mansion, looking 
for trouble he could get into. 

One day he discovered a room he had never explored before. He pushed 
open the heavy wooden door. It let out a loud creak. 

Then he stepped inside. 

A lantern glowed dimly on a small table. The boy saw no other furniture in 
the large room. No one at the table. 

“How strange,” he thought. “Why should I find a burning lantern in an 
empty room?” 

Andrew approached the lantern. As he leaned down to lower the wick, the 
ghost appeared. 

The sea captain! 

Over the years, the ghost had grown into an old and terrifying creature. He 

had long, white fingernails that curled in spirals. Cracked, black teeth poked out 
from between swollen, dry lips. And a scraggly white beard hid the ghost’s face 
from view. 

The boy stared in horror. “Who—who are you?” he stammered. 

The ghost didn’t utter a word. He floated in the yellow lantern light, glaring 
hard at the boy. 

“Who are you? What do you want? Why are you here?” the boy demanded. 

When the ghost still didn’t reply, Andrew turned—and tried to run. 

But before he moved two steps, he felt the ghost’s cold breath on his neck. 

Andrew grabbed for the door. But the old ghost swirled around him, swirled 
darkly, a swirl of black smoke in the dim yellow fight. 

“No! Stop!” the boy screamed. “Let me go!” 

The ghost’s mouth gaped open, revealing a bottomless black hole. Finally, it 
spoke—in a whisper that sounded like the scratch of dead leaves. “Now that you 
have seen me, you cannot leave.” 

“No!” The boy shrieked. “Let me go! Let me go!” 

The ghost ignored the boy’s cries. He repeated his dry, cold words: “Now 
that you have seen me, you cannot leave.” 

The old ghost raised his hands to the boy’s head. His icy fingers spread over 
Andrew’s face. The hands tightened. Tightened. 

Do you know what happened next? 

4 

The ghost pulled off the boy’s head—and hid it somewhere in the house! 

After hiding the head, hiding it away in the huge, dark mansion, the ghost 
of the sea captain let out a final howl that made the heavy stone walls tremble. 

The terrifying howl ended with the cry, “Annabel! Annabel!” 

Then the old ghost disappeared forever. 

But Hill House was not freed from ghosts. A new ghost now haunted the 
endless, twisting halls. 

From then on, Andrew haunted Hill House. Every night the ghost of the 
poor boy searched the halls and rooms, looking for his missing head. 

All through the house, say Otto and the other tour guides, you can hear the 
footsteps of the Headless Ghost, searching, always searching. 

And each room of the house now has a terrifying story of its own. 

Are the stories true? 

Well, Stephanie and I believe them. That’s why we take the tour so often. 

We must have explored the old place at least a hundred times. 

Hill House is such awesome fun. 

At least it was fun—until Stephanie had another one of her bright ideas. 

After Stephanie’s bright idea, Hill House wasn’t fun anymore. 

Hill House became a truly scary place. 

5 

The trouble started a few weeks ago when Stephanie suddenly got bored. 

It was about ten o’clock at night. We were out haunting the neighborhood. 
We did our terrifying wolf howl outside Geena Jeffers’ window. Then we went 
next door to Terri Abel’s house. We put some chicken bones in her mailbox— 
just because it’s creepy to reach in your mailbox and feel bones. 

Then we crept across the street to Ben Fuller’s house. 

Ben was our last stop for the night. Ben is a kid in our class, and we have a 
special scare for him. 

You see, he’s afraid of bugs, which makes him really easy to scare. 

Even though it’s pretty cold out, he sleeps with his bedroom window open. 
So Stephanie and I like to step up to his window and toss rubber spiders onto 
Ben as he sleeps. 

The rubber spiders tickle his face. He wakes up. And starts to scream. 

Every time. 

He always thinks the spiders are real. 

He screams and tries to scramble out of bed. He gets all tangled in his 
covers and thuds onto the floor. 

Then Stephanie and I congratulate each other on a job well done. And we 
go home to bed. 

But tonight, as we tossed the rubber spiders at Ben’s sleeping face, 
Stephanie turned to me and whispered, “I just had a great idea.” 

“Huh?” I started to reply. But Ben’s scream interrupted me. 

We listened to him scream, then thud to the floor. 

Stephanie and I slapped each other a high five. Then we took off, running 
across the dark backyards, our sneakers thumping the hard, nearly-frozen 
ground. 

We stopped in front of the split oak tree in my front yard. The tree trunk is 
completely split in two. But Dad doesn’t have the heart to have the tree taken 
away. 

“What is your great idea?” I asked Stephanie breathlessly. 

Her dark eyes flashed. “I’ve been thinking. Every time we go out to haunt 
the neighborhood, we scare the same old kids. It’s starting to get boring.” 

I wasn’t bored. But I knew that once Stephanie gets an idea, there’s no 
stopping her. “So, do you want to find some new kids to scare?” I asked. 

“No. Not new kids. Something else.” She began to walk around the tree. 
Circling it. “We need a new challenge.” 

“Like what?” I asked. 

“Our scares are all kid stuff,” she complained. “We make some spooky 
sounds, toss a few things inside an open window—and everyone is frightened to 
death. It’s too easy.” 

“Yeah,” I agreed. “But it’s funny.” 

She ignored me. She stuck her head through the split in the tree trunk. 
“Duane, what’s the scariest place in Wheeler Falls?” 

That was easy. “Hill House, of course,” I answered. 

“Right. And what makes it so scary?” 

“All the ghost stories. But especially the one about the boy searching for his 
head.” 

“Yes!” Stephanie cried. All I could see now was her head, poking through 
the split oak tree. “The Headless Ghost!” she cried in a deep voice, and let out a 
long, scary laugh. 

“What’s your problem?” I demanded. “Are you trying to haunt me now?” 

Her head seemed to float in the darkness. “We need to haunt Hill House,” 
she declared in a whisper. 

6 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “Stephanie, what are you talking about?” 

“We’ll take the Hill House tour and sneak off on our own,” Stephanie 
replied thoughtfully. 

I shook my head. “Give me a break. Why would we do that?” 

Stephanie’s face seemed to glow, floating by itself in the tree trunk. “We’ll 
sneak off on our own—to search for the ghost’s head.” 

I stared back at her. “You’re kidding, right?” 

I walked behind the tree and tugged her away from it. The floating head 
trick was starting to give me the creeps. 

“No, Duane, I’m not kidding,” she replied, shoving me away. “We need a 
challenge. We need something new. Prowling around the neighborhood, 
terrifying everyone we know—that’s just kid stuff. Bor-ring.” 

“But you don’t believe the story about the missing head—do you?” I 
protested. “It’s just a ghost story. We can search and search. But there is no head. 
It’s all a story they made up for the tourists.” 

Stephanie narrowed her eyes at me. “I think you’re scared, Duane.” 

“Huh? Me?” My voice got pretty shrill. 

A cloud rolled over the moon, making my front yard even darker. A chill 
ran down my back. I pulled my jacket around me tighter. 

“I’m not afraid to sneak off from the tour and search Hill House on our 
own,” I told Stephanie. “I just think it’s a big waste of time.” 

“Duane, you’re shivering,” she teased. “Shivering with fright.” 

“I am not!” I screamed. “Come on. Let’s go to Hill House. Right now. I’ll 
show you.” 

A grin spread over Stephanie’s face. She tossed back her head and let out a 
long howl. A victory howl. “This is going to be the coolest thing the Twin 
Terrors have ever done!” she cried, slapping me a high five that made my hand 
sting. 

She dragged me up Hill Street. The whole way there, I didn’t say one word. 
Was I afraid? 

Maybe a little. 

We climbed the steep, weed-choked hill and stood before the front steps of 

Hill House. The old house looked even bigger at night. Three stories tall. With 
turrets and balconies and dozens of windows, all dark and shuttered. 

All the houses in our neighborhood are brick or clapboard. Hill House is the 
only one made out of stone slabs. Dark gray slabs. 

I always have to hold my breath when I stand close to Hill House. The 
stone is covered with a blanket of thick green moss. Two hundred years of it. 
Putrid, moldy moss that doesn’t exactly smell like a flower garden. 

I peered up. Up at the round turret that stretched to the purple sky. A 
gargoyle, carved in stone, perched at the very top. It grinned down at us, as if 
challenging us to go inside. 

My knees suddenly felt weak. 

The house stood in total darkness, except for a single candle over the front 
doorway. But the tours were still going on. The last tour left at ten-thirty every 
night. The guides said the late tours were the best—the best time to see a ghost. 

I read the sign etched in stone beside the door. ENTER HILL HOUSE— 
AND YOUR LIFE WILL BE CHANGED. FOREVER. 

I’d read that sign a hundred times. I always thought it was funny—in a 
corny sort of way. 

But tonight it gave me the creeps. 

Tonight was going to be different. 

“Come on,” Stephanie said, pulling me by the hand. “We’re just in time for 
the next tour.” 

The candle flickered. The heavy wooden door swung open. By itself. I 
don’t know how, but it always does that. 

“Well, are you coming or not?” Stephanie demanded, stepping into the dark 
entryway. 

“Coming,” I gulped. 

7 

Otto met us as we stepped inside the door. Otto always reminds me of an 
enormous dolphin. He has a big, smooth bald head. And he’s sort of shaped like 
a dolphin. He must weigh about three hundred pounds! 

Otto was dressed entirely in black, as always. Black shirt. Black pants. 
Black socks. Black shoes. And gloves—you guessed it—black. It’s the uniform 
that all the tour guides wear. 

“Look who’s here!” he called. “Stephanie and Duane!” He broke out into a 
wide grin. His tiny eyes flashed in the candlelight. 

“Our favorite guide!” Stephanie greeted him. “Are we in time for the next 
tour?” 

We pushed through the turnstile without paying. We’re such regulars at Hill 
House that they don’t even charge us anymore. 

“About five minutes, guys,” Otto told us. “You two are out late tonight, 
huh?” 

“Yeah... well,” Stephanie hesitated. “It’s more fun to take the tour at night. 
Isn’t it, Duane?” She jabbed my side. 

“You can say that again,” I mumbled. 

We moved into the front hall with some others who were waiting for the 
tour to begin. Teenagers mostly, out on dates. 

The front hall is bigger than my living room and dining room put together. 
And except for the winding staircase in the center, it’s completely bare. No 
furniture at all. 

Shadows tossed across the floor. I gazed around the room. No electric 
lights. Small torches were hung from the peeling, cracked walls. The orange 
torchlight flickered and bent. 

In the dancing light, I counted the people around me. Nine of them. 
Stephanie and I were the only kids. 

Otto lighted a lantern and crossed to the front of the hall. He held it up high 
and cleared his throat. 

Stephanie and I grinned at each other. Otto always starts the tour the same 
way. He thinks the lantern adds atmosphere. 

“Ladies and gentlemen,” he boomed. “Welcome to Hill House. We hope 

you will survive your tour tonight.” Then he gave a low, evil laugh. 

Stephanie and I mouthed Otto’s next words along with him: 

“In 1795, a prosperous sea captain, William P. Bell, built himself a home on 
the highest hill in Wheeler Falls. It was the finest home ever built here at the 
time—three stories high, nine fireplaces, and over thirty rooms. 

“Captain Bell spared no expense. Why? Because he hoped to retire here and 
finish his days in splendor with his young and beautiful wife. But it was not to 
be.” 

Otto cackled, and so did Stephanie and I. We knew every move Otto had. 

Otto went on. “Captain Bell died at sea in a terrible shipwreck—before he 
ever had a chance to live in his beautiful house. His young bride, Annabel, fled 
the house in horror and sorrow.” 

Now Otto’s voice dropped. “But soon after Annabel left, strange things 
began to happen in Hill House.” 

This was Otto’s cue to start walking toward the winding stairs. The old, 
wooden staircase is narrow and creaky. When Otto starts to climb, the stairs 
groan and grumble beneath him as if in pain. 

Keeping silent, we followed Otto up the stairs to the first floor. Stephanie 
and I love this part, because Otto doesn’t say a word the whole time. He just 
huffs along in the darkness while everyone tries to keep up with him. 

He starts talking again when he reaches Captain Bell’s bedroom. A big, 
wood-paneled room with a fireplace and a view of the river. 

“Soon after Captain Bell’s widow ran away,” Otto reported, “people in 
Wheeler Falls began reporting strange sightings. Sightings of a man who 
resembled Captain Bell. He was always seen here, standing by his window, 
holding his lantern aloft.” 

Otto moved to the window and raised his lantern. “On a windless night, if 
you listened carefully, you could sometimes hear him calling out her name in a 
low, mournful voice.” 

Otto took a deep breath, then called softly: “Annabel. Annabel. Annabel...” 

Otto swung the lantern back and forth for effect. By now, he had everyone’s 
complete attention. 

“But of course, there’s more,” he whispered. 

8 

As we followed him through the upstairs rooms, Otto told us how Captain Bell 
haunted the house for about a hundred years. “People who moved into Hill 
House tried all kinds of ways to get rid of the ghost. But it was determined to 
stay.” 

Then Otto told everyone about the boy finding the ghost and getting his 
head pulled off. “The ghost of the sea captain vanished. The headless ghost of 
the boy continued to haunt the house. But that wasn’t the end of it.” 

Into the long, dark hallway now. Torches darting and flickering along the 
walls. “Tragedy continued to haunt Hill House,” Otto continued. “Shortly after 
young Andrew Craw’s death, his twelve-year-old sister Hannah went mad. Let’s 
go to her room next.” 

He led us down the hall to Hannah’s room. 

Stephanie loves Hannah’s room. Hannah collected porcelain dolls. And she 
had hundreds of them. All with the same long yellow hair, painted rosy cheeks, 
and blue-tinted eyelids. 

“After her brother was killed, Hannah went crazy,” Otto told us all in a 
hushed voice. “All day long, for eighty years, she sat in her rocking chair over 
there in the corner. And she played with her dolls. She never left her room. 
Ever.” 

He pointed to a worn rocking chair. “Hannah died there. An old lady 
surrounded by her dolls.” 

The floorboards creaked under him as Otto crossed the room. Setting the 
lantern down, he lowered his big body into the rocking chair. 

The chair made a cracking sound. I always think Otto is going to crush it! 
He started to rock. Slowly. The chair groaned with each move. We all watched 
him in silence. 

“Some people swear that poor Hannah is still here,” he said softly. “They 
say they’ve seen a young girl sitting in this chair, combing a doll’s hair.” 

He rocked slowly, letting the idea sink in. “And—then we come to the story 
of Hannah’s mother.” 

With a grunt, Otto pulled himself to his feet. He grabbed up the lantern and 
made his way to the top of the long, dark stairway at the end of the hall. 

“Soon after her son’s tragedy, the mother met her own terrible fate. She was 
on her way down these stairs one night when she tripped and fell to her death.” 

Otto gazed down the stairs and shook his head sadly. 

He does this every time. As I said, Stephanie and I know his every move. 

But we hadn’t come here tonight to watch Otto perform. I knew that sooner 
or later, Stephanie would want to get going. So I started glancing around. To see 
if it was a good time for us to sneak away from the others. 

And that’s when I saw the strange kid. Watching us. 

I didn’t see him when we first came in. In fact, I’m sure he wasn’t there 
when the tour started. I had counted nine people. No kids. 

The boy was about our age, with wavy blond hair and pale skin. Very pale 
skin. He was wearing black jeans and a black turtleneck that made his face look 
even whiter. 

I edged over to Stephanie. She was hanging back from the group. 

“You ready?” she whispered. 

Otto had started back down the stairs. If we were going to sneak away from 
the tour, now was the time. 

But I could see that weird kid still staring at us. 

Staring hard. 

He was giving me the creeps. 

“We can’t go. Someone’s watching us,” I whispered to Stephanie. 

“Who?” 

“That weird kid over there.” I motioned with my eyes. 

He was still staring at us. He didn’t even try to be polite and turn away 
when we caught him. 

Why was he watching us like that? What was his problem ? 

Something told me we should wait. Something told me not to hide from the 
others just yet. 

But Stephanie had other ideas. “Forget him,” she said. “He’s nobody.” She 
grabbed my arm—and tugged. “Let’s go!” 

We pressed against the cold wall of the hallway and watched the others 
follow Otto down the stairs. 

I held my breath until I heard the last footsteps leave the stairway. We were 
alone now. Alone in the long, dark hall. 

I turned to Stephanie. I could barely see her face. “Now what?” I asked. 

9 

“Now we do some exploring on our own!” Stephanie declared, rubbing her 
hands together. “This is so exciting!” 

I gazed down the long hallway. I didn’t feel real excited. I felt kind of 
scared. 

I heard a low groan from a room across the hall. The ceiling creaked above 
our heads. The wind rattled the windows in the room we had just come from. 

“Steph—are you sure—?” I started. 

But she was already hurrying down the hall, walking on tiptoes to keep the 
floors from squeaking. “Come on, Duane. Let’s search for the ghost’s head,” she 
whispered back to me, her dark hair flying behind her. “Who knows? We might 
find it.” 

“Yeah. Sure.” I rolled my eyes. 

I didn’t think the chances were too good. How do you find a hundred-year- 
old head? And what if you do find it? 

Yuck! 

What would it look like? Just a skull? 

I followed Stephanie down the hall. But I really didn’t want to be there. I 
like haunting the neighborhood and scaring other people. 

I don’t like scaring myself! 

Stephanie led the way into a bedroom we had seen on other tours. It was 
called the Green Room. Because the wallpaper was decorated with green vines. 
Tangle after tangle of green vines. Up and down the walls and across the ceiling, 
too. 

How could anyone sleep in here? I wondered. It was like being trapped in a 
thick jungle. 

We both stopped inside the doorway and stared at the tangles of vines on all 
sides of us. Stephanie and I call the Green Room by another name. The 
Scratching Room. 

Otto once told us that something terrible happened here sixty years ago. 
The two guests who stayed in the room woke up with a disgusting purple rash. 

The rash started on their hands and arms. It spread to their faces. Then it 
spread over their entire bodies. 

Big purple sores that itched like crazy. 

Doctors from all around the world were called to study the rash. They 
couldn’t figure out what it was. And they couldn’t figure out how to cure it. 

Something in the Green Room caused the rash. 

But no one ever figured out what it was. 

That’s the story Otto and the other guides tell. It might be true. All the 
weird, scary stories Otto tells might be true. Who knows? 

“Come on, Duane!” Stephanie prodded. “Let’s look for the head. We don’t 
have much time before Otto sees that we’re missing.” 

She trotted across the room and dove under the bed. 

“Steph—please!” I started. I stepped carefully over to the low, wooden 
dresser in the corner. 

“We’re not going to find a ghost’s head in here. Let’s go,” I pleaded. 

She couldn’t hear me. She had climbed under the bed. 

“Steph—?” 

After a few seconds, she backed out. As she turned toward me, I saw that 
her face was bright red. 

“Duane!” she cried. “I... I...” 

Her dark eyes bulged. Her mouth dropped open in horror. She grabbed the 
sides of her face. 

“What is it? What’s wrong?” I cried, stumbling across the room toward her. 

“Ohhh, it itches! It itches so badly!” Stephanie wailed. 

I started to cry out. But my voice got caught in my throat. 

Stephanie began to rub her face. She frantically rubbed her cheeks, her 
forehead, her chin. 

“Owwww. It itches! It really itches!” She started to scratch her scalp with 
both hands. 

I grabbed her arm and tried to pull her up from the floor. “The rash! Let’s 
get you home!” I cried. “Come on! Your parents will get the doctor! And... 
and...” 

I stopped when I saw that she was laughing. 

I dropped her arm and stepped back. 

She stood up, straightening her hair. “Duane, you jerk,” she muttered. “Are 
you going to fall for every dumb joke tonight?” 

“No way!” I replied angrily. “I just thought—” 

She gave me a shove. “You’re too easy to scare. How could you fall for 

such a stupid joke?” 

I shoved her back. “Just don’t pull any more dumb jokes, okay?” I snarled. 
“I mean it, Stephanie. I don’t think it’s funny. I really don’t. I’m not going to fall 
for any more stupid jokes. So don’t even try.” 

She wasn’t listening to me. She was staring over my shoulder. Staring in 
open-mouthed shock. 

“Oh, I d-don’t believe it!” she stammered. “There it is! There’s the head!” 

10 

I fell for it again. 

I couldn’t help myself. 

I let out a shrill scream. 

I spun around so hard, I nearly knocked myself over. I followed Stephanie’s 
finger. I squinted hard in the direction she pointed. 

She was pointing to a gray clump of dust. 

“Sucker! Sucker!” She slapped me on the back and started to giggle. 

I uttered a low growl and balled my hands into tight fists. But I didn’t say 
anything. I could feel my face burning. I knew that I was blushing. 

“You’re too easy to scare, Duane,” Stephanie teased again. “Admit it.” 

“Let’s just get back to the tour,” I grumbled. 

“No way, Duane. This is fun. Let’s try the next room. Come on.” 

When she saw that I wasn’t following her, she said, “I won’t scare you like 
that anymore. Promise.” 

I saw that her fingers were crossed. But I followed her anyway. 

What choice did I have? 

We crept through the narrow hall that connected us to the next room. And 
found ourselves in Andrew’s room. Poor, headless Andrew. 

It still had all his old stuff in it. Games and toys from a hundred years ago. 
An old-fashioned wooden bicycle leaning against one wall. 

Everything just the way it was. Before Andrew met up with the sea 
captain’s ghost. 

A lantern on the dresser cast blue shadows on the walls. I didn’t know if I 
believed the ghost story or not. But something told me that if Andrew’s head 
were anywhere, we’d find it here. In his room. 

Under his old-fashioned-looking canopy bed. Or hidden under his dusty, 
faded toys. 

Stephanie tiptoed over to the toys. She bent down and started to move 
things aside. Little wooden bowling pins. An old-fashioned board game, the 
colors all faded to brown. A set of metal toy soldiers. 

“Check around the bed, Duane,” she whispered. 

I started across the room. “Steph, we shouldn’t be touching this stuff. You 
know the tour guides never let us touch anything.” 

Stephanie set down an old wooden top. “Do you want to find the head or 
not?” 

“You really think there’s a ghost’s head hidden in this house?” 

“Duane, that’s what we’re here to find out—right?” 

I sighed and stepped over to the bed. I could see there was no use arguing 
with Stephanie tonight. 

I ducked my head under the purple canopy and studied the bed. A boy 
actually slept in this bed, I told myself. 

Andrew actually slept under this quilt. A hundred years ago. 

The thought gave me a chill. 

I tried to picture a boy about my age sleeping in this heavy, old bed. 

“Go ahead. Check out the bed,” Stephanie instructed from across the room. 

I leaned over and patted the gray and brown patchwork quilt. It felt cold 
and smooth. 

I punched the pillows. They felt soft and feathery. Nothing hidden inside 
the pillow cases. 

I was about to test the mattress when the quilt began to move. 

It rustled over the sheets. A soft, scratchy sound. 

Then, as I stared in horror, the gray and brown quilt began to slide down the 

bed. 

There was no one in the bed. No one! 

But someone was pushing the quilt down, down to the bottom of the bed. 

11 

I swallowed a scream. 

“You’ve got to move faster, Duane,” Stephanie said. 

I turned and saw her standing at the end of the bed. Holding the bottom of 
the quilt in both hands. 

“We don’t have all night!” she declared. She pulled the quilt down farther. 
“Nothing in the bed. Come on. Let’s move on.” 

A sigh escaped my lips. Stephanie had tugged down the quilt and scared me 
again. 

No ghost in the bed. No ghost pushing down the covers to climb out and 
grab me. 

Only Stephanie. 

At least this time she hadn’t seen how frightened I was. 

We worked together to pull the quilt back into place. She smiled at me. 
“This is kind of fun,” she said. 

“For sure,” I agreed. I hoped she couldn’t see that I was still shaking. “It’s a 
lot more fun than tossing rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s bedroom window.” 

“I like being in this house so late at night. I like sneaking off from the 
group. I can feel a ghost lurking nearby,” Stephanie whispered. 

“You c-can?” I stammered, glancing quickly around the room. 

My eyes stopped at the bottom of the door to the hallway. 

There it sat. On the floor. Wedged between the door and the wall. Half- 
hidden in deep shadow. 

The head. 

This time, I saw the head. 

Not a joke. Not a cruel trick. 

Through the gray-black shadows, I saw the round skull. And I saw the two 
black eye sockets. Empty eye sockets. Two dark holes in the skull. 

Staring up at me. 

Staring. 

I grabbed Stephanie’s arm. I started to point. 

But there was no need. 



Stephanie saw it, too. 

12 

I was the first to move. I took a step toward the door. Then another. 

I heard sharp gasps. Someone breathing hard. Close behind me. 

It took me a few seconds to realize it was Stephanie. 

Keeping my eyes on the head, I made my way into the dark corner. My 
heart started to pound as I bent down and reached for it with both hands. 

The black eye sockets stared up at me. Round, sad eyes. 

My hands trembled. 

I started to scoop it up. 

But it slipped out of my hands. And started to roll away. 

Stephanie let out a cry as the head rolled over the floor toward her. 

In the orange light from the lantern, I saw her frightened expression. I saw 
that she was frozen there. 

The head rolled over the floor and bumped against her sneaker. It came to a 
stop inches in front of her. 

The empty black eye sockets stared up at her. 

“Duane—” she called, staring down at it, hands pressed against her cheeks. 
“I didn’t think—I didn’t really think we’d find it. I—I—” 

I hurried back across the room. It’s my turn to be the brave one, I decided. 
My turn to show Stephanie that I’m not a wimp who’s afraid of every shadow. 
My turn to show Stephanie. 

I scooped up the ghost’s head in both hands. I raised it in front of Stephanie. 
Then I moved toward the lantern on the dressertop. 

The head felt hard. Smoother than I thought. 

The eye sockets were deep. 

Stephanie stayed close by my side. Together we made our way into the 
orange lantern light. 

I let out a groan when I realized I wasn’t carrying a ghost’s head. 

Stephanie groaned too when she saw what I held in my hands. 

13 

A bowling ball. 

I was carrying an old wooden bowling ball, the pale wood cracked and 
chipped. 

“I don’t believe it,” Stephanie murmured, slapping her forehead. 

My eyes went to the wooden bowling pins, lying among Andrew’s old toys. 
“This must be the ball that went with those pins,” I said softly. 

Stephanie grabbed it from me and turned it between her hands. “But it only 
has two holes.” 

I nodded. “Yeah. In those days, bowling balls only had two holes. My dad 
told me about it one day when we went bowling. Dad never could figure out 
what they did with their thumb.” 

Stephanie stuck her fingers into the two holes. The “eye sockets”. She 
shook her head. I could see she was really disappointed. 

We could hear Otto’s voice, booming from somewhere downstairs. 

Stephanie sighed. “Maybe we should go down and rejoin the tour,” she 
suggested. She rolled the ball back to the pile of toys. 

“No way!” I exclaimed. 

I liked being the brave one for a change. I didn’t want to quit while I was 
ahead. 

“It’s getting kind of late,” Stephanie said. “And we’re not going to find any 
ghost head up here.” 

“That’s because we’ve already explored these rooms a hundred times,” I 
told her. “I think we should find a room we’ve never explored before.” 

She scrunched up her face, thinking hard. “Duane, do you mean—?” 

“I mean, the ghost head is probably hidden in a room the tour doesn’t go 
through. Maybe upstairs. You know. On the top floor.” 

Stephanie’s eyes grew wide. “You want to sneak up to the top floor?” 

I nodded. “Why not? That’s probably where all the ghosts hang out— 
right?” 

She studied me, her eyes searching mine. I knew she was surprised by my 
brave idea. 

Of course, I didn’t feel very brave at all. I just wanted to impress her. I just 

wanted to be the brave one for a change. 

I was hoping that she’d say no. I was hoping she’d say, “Let’s go back 
downstairs, Duane.” 

But instead, an excited grin spread over her face. And she said, “Okay. Let’s 
do it!” 

14 

So I was stuck being the brave one. 

We both had to be brave now. The Twin Terrors, on their way up the dark, 
creaking stairway that led to the third floor. 

A sign beside the stairs read: NO VISITORS. 

We stepped right past it and began climbing the narrow staircase. Side by 

side. 

I couldn’t hear Otto’s voice anymore. Now I could only hear the creak and 
squeak of the steps beneath our sneakers. And the steady thud thud thud of my 
heart. 

The air grew hot and damp as we reached the top. I squinted down a long, 
dark hallway. There were no lanterns. No candles. 

The only light came from the window at the end of the hall. Pale light from 
outside that cast everything in an eerie, ghostly blue. 

“Let’s start in the first room,” Stephanie suggested, whispering. She 
brushed her dark hair off her face. 

It was so hot up here, I had sweat running down my forehead. I mopped it 
up with my jacket sleeve and followed Stephanie to the first room on the right. 

The heavy wooden door was half open. We slid in through the opening. 
Pale blue light washed in through the dust-caked windows. 

I waited for my eyes to adjust. Then I squinted around the large room. 

Empty. Completely empty. No furniture. No sign of life. 

Or ghosts. 

“Steph—look.” I pointed to a narrow door against the far wall. “Let’s check 
it out.” 

We crept across the bare floor. Through the dusty window, I glimpsed the 
full moon, high over the bare trees now. 

The doorway led to another room. Smaller and even warmer. A steam 
radiator clanked against one wall. Two old-fashioned-looking couches stood 
facing each other in the center of the room. No other furniture. 

“Let’s keep moving,” Stephanie whispered. 

Another narrow door led to another dark room. “The rooms up here are all 
connected,” I murmured. I sneezed. Sneezed again. 

“Ssshhh. Quiet, Duane,” Stephanie scolded. “The ghosts will hear us 
coming.” 

“I can’t help it,” I protested. “It’s so dusty up here.” 

We were in some kind of sewing room. An old sewing machine stood on a 
table in front of the window. A carton at my feet was filled with balls of black 
yarn. 

I bent down and pawed quickly through the balls of yarn. No head hidden 
in there. 

We stepped into the next room before we realized it was completely dark. 

The window was partly shuttered. Only a tiny square of gray light crept 
through from outside. 

“I-I can’t see anything,” Stephanie declared. I felt her hand grasp my arm. 
“It’s too dark. Let’s get out of here, Duane.” 

I started to reply. But a loud thump made my breath catch in my throat. 

Stephanie’s hand squeezed my hand. “Duane, did you make that thump?” 

Another thump. Closer to us. 

“No. Not m-me,” I stammered. 

Another thump on the floor. 

“We’re not alone in here,” Stephanie whispered. 

I took a deep breath. “Who is it?” I called. “Who’s there?” 

15 

“Who’s there?” I choked out. 

Stephanie squeezed my arm so hard, it hurt. But I made no attempt to move 
away from her. 

I heard soft footsteps. Ghostly footsteps. 

A cold chill froze the back of my neck. I clamped my jaw shut to keep my 
teeth from chattering. 

And then yellow eyes floated toward us through the thick darkness. 

Four yellow eyes. 

The creature had four eyes! 

A gurgling sound escaped my throat. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move. 

I stared straight ahead. Listening. 

Watching. 

The eyes floated apart in pairs. Two eyes moved to the right, two to the left. 

“Noooo!” I cried out when I saw more eyes. 

Yellow eyes in the corners of the room. Evil eyes glinting at us from against 
the wall. 

Yellow eyes all along the floor. 

Yellow eyes all around us. 

Catlike yellow eyes glaring in silence at Stephanie and me as we huddled 
together in the center of the room. 

Catlike eyes. 

Cat’s eyes. 

Because the room was filled with cats. 

A shrill yowl gave them away. A long meeeeyoww from the windowsill 
made Stephanie and me both sigh in relief. 

A cat brushed against my leg. Startled, I jumped aside, bumping into 
Stephanie. 

She bumped me back. 

More cats meowed. Another cat brushed the back of my jeans leg. 

“I-I think these cats are lonely,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you think 
anyone ever comes up here?” 

“I don’t care,” I snapped. “All these yellow eyes floating around. I 
thought... I thought... well... I don’t know what I thought! It’s creepy. Let’s get 
out of here.” 

For once, Stephanie didn’t argue. 

She led the way to the door at the back of the room. All around us, cats 
were howling and yowling. 

Another one brushed my leg. 

Stephanie tripped over a cat. In the darkness, I saw her fall. She landed on 
her knees with a hard thud. 

The cats all began to screech. 

“Are you okay?” I cried, hurrying to help pull her up. 

The cats were howling so loud, I couldn’t hear her reply. 

We jogged to the door, pulled it open, and escaped. 

I closed the door behind us. Silence now. “Where are we?” I whispered. 

“I-I don’t know,” Stephanie stammered, keeping close to the wall. 

I moved to a tall, narrow window and peered through the dusty glass. The 
window led out to a small balcony. The balcony jutted out from the gray 
shingled roof. 

Pale white moonlight washed in through the window. 

I turned back to Stephanie. “We’re in some kind of back hallway,” I 
guessed. The long, narrow hallway seemed to stretch on forever. “Maybe these 
rooms are used by the workers. You know. Manny, the night watchman. The 
house cleaners. And the tour guides.” 

Stephanie sighed. She stared down the long hallway. “Let’s go downstairs 
and find Otto and the tour group. I think we’ve done enough exploring for 
tonight.” 

I agreed. “There must be stairs at the end of this hall. Let’s go.” 

I took four or five steps. Then I felt the ghostly hands. 

They brushed over my face. My neck. My body. 

Sticky, dry, invisible hands. 

The hands pushed me back as they clung to my skin. 

“Ohhhh, help!” Stephanie moaned. 

The ghosts had her in their grasp, too. 

16 

The ghost’s filmy hands brushed over me. I could feel the soft fingers—dry and 
soft as air—tighten around my skin. 

Stephanie’s hands thrashed wildly. Beside me in the dark hall, she struggled 
to free herself. 

“It-it’s like a net!” she choked out. 

I swiped at my face. My hair. 

I spun away. But the dry fingers clung to me. Tightening. Tightening. 

And I realized we hadn’t walked into a ghost’s grasp. 

Tugging and tearing frantically with both hands, I realized we had walked 
into cobwebs. 

A thick curtain of cobwebs. 

The blanket of sticky threads had fallen over us like a fisherman’s net. The 
more we struggled, the tighter it wrapped itself around us. 

“Stephanie—it’s cobwebs !” I cried. I tugged a thick, stringy wad of them 
off my face. 

“Of course it’s cobwebs!” she shot back, squirming and thrashing. “What 
did you think it was?” 

“Uh... a ghost,” I muttered. 

Stephanie snickered. “Duane, I know you have a good imagination. But if 
you start seeing ghosts everywhere, we’ll never get out of here.” 

“I... I... I...” I didn’t know what to say. 

Stephanie thought the same thing I did. She thought she’d been grabbed by 
a ghost. But now she was pretending she knew all along. 

We stood there in the darkness, tearing the sticky threads off our faces and 
arms and bodies. I let out an angry groan. I couldn’t brush the stuff from my 
hair! 

“I’m going to itch forever !” I wailed. 

“I’ve got more bad news for you,” Stephanie murmured. 

I pulled a thick wad off my ear. “Huh?” 

“Who do you think made these cobwebs?” 

I didn’t have to think about it. “Spiders?” 



My arms and legs started to tingle. My back began to itch. I felt a light 
tingling on the back of my neck. 

Were there spiders crawling up and down my body? Hundreds and 
hundreds of them? 

Forgetting the wispy strings of cobweb, I started to run. Stephanie had the 
same idea. We both ran down the long hall, scratching and slapping at ourselves. 

“Steph—the next time you have a great idea, don’t have a great idea!” I 
warned her. 

“Let’s just get out of here!” she groaned. 

We reached the end of the hall, still scratching as we ran. 

No stairway. 

How do we get back downstairs? 

Another hall twisted to the left. Low candles over the doorways flickered 
and danced. Shadows darted over the worn carpet like slithering animals. 

“Come on.” I pulled Stephanie’s arm. We had no choice. We had to follow 
this hallway, too. 

We jogged side by side. The rooms were ah dark and silent. 

The candle flames dipped as we ran past. Our long shadows ran ahead of 
us, as if eager to get downstairs first. 

I stopped when I heard someone laughing. 

“Whoa,” Stephanie murmured, breathing hard. Her dark eyes grew wide. 

We both listened hard. 

I heard voices. Inside the room at the end of the hall. 

The door was closed. I couldn’t make out the words. I heard a man say 
something. A woman laughed. Other people laughed. 

“We caught up to the tour,” I whispered. 

Stephanie scrunched up her face. “But the tour never comes up here to the 
top floor,” she protested. 

We stepped up close to the door and listened again. 

More laughter on the other side. A lot of people talking cheerfully, all at the 
same time. It sounded like a party. 

I pressed my ear against the door. “I think the tour ended, and everyone is 
just chatting,” I whispered. 

Stephanie scratched the back of her neck. She pulled a stringy gob of 
cobweb from her hair. “Well, hurry, Duane. Open the door. Let’s join them,” she 
urged. 



“I hope Otto doesn’t ask us where we’ve been,” I replied. 
I grabbed the doorknob and pushed open the door. 
Stephanie and I took a step inside. 

And gasped in shock at what we saw. 



17 


The room stood empty. 

Empty, silent, and dark. 

“What happened? Where is everyone?” Stephanie cried. 

We took another step into the dark room. The floor creaked beneath us. The 
only sound. 

“I don’t get it,” Stephanie whispered. “Didn’t we just hear voices in here?” 
“Lots,” I said. “They were laughing and talking. It really sounded like a 
party.” 

“A big party,” Stephanie added, her eyes darting around the empty room. 
“Tons of people.” 

A cold chill ran down the back of my neck. “I don’t think we heard people,” 
I whispered. 

Stephanie turned to me. “Huh?” 

“They weren’t people,” I croaked. “They were ghosts.” 

Her mouth dropped open. “And they all disappeared when we opened the 
door?” 

I nodded. “I—I think I can still feel them in here. I can feel their presence.” 
Stephanie let out a frightened squeak. “Feel them? What do you mean?” 

At that moment, a cold wind came whooshing through the room. It rushed 
over me, cold and dry. And it chilled me down to my toes. 

Stephanie must have felt it, too. She wrapped her arms around her chest. 
“Brrr! Do you feel that breeze? Is the window open? How come it got so cold in 
here all of a sudden?” she asked. 

She shivered again. Her voice became tiny. “We’re not alone in here, are 

we?” 

“I don’t think so,” I whispered. “I think we just crashed someone’s party.” 
Stephanie and I stood there, feeling the cold of the room. I didn’t dare 
move. Maybe a ghost stood right beside me. Maybe the ghosts we heard were all 
around us, staring at us, preparing to swoop over us. 

“Stephanie,” I whispered. “What if we really have crashed their party? 
What if we’ve invaded the ghosts’ quarters?” 

Stephanie swallowed hard. She didn’t reply. 



Hadn’t Andrew, the ghost boy, lost his head when he stumbled into the 
ghost’s living quarters? Were we standing in the same living quarters? The same 
room where Andrew found the ghost of the old sea captain? 

“Stephanie, I think we should get out of here,” I said softly. “Now.” 

I wanted to run. I wanted to fly down the stairs. Fly out of Hill House. Fly 
to my safe, warm home where there were no ghosts. 

No ghosts. 

We spun around and bolted for the door. 

Were the ghosts going to try to stop us? 

No. We made it back into the flickering orange light of the hallway. I pulled 
the door shut behind us. 

“The stairs. Where are the stairs?” Stephanie cried. 

We stood at the end of the hall. Facing a solid wall. The flowers on the 
wallpaper appeared to open and close, moving in the darting candlelight. 

I banged both fists against the wall. “How do we get out of here? How?” 

Stephanie had already pulled open a door across the hall. I followed her 
inside. 

“Oh, no!” Ghostly figures filled the room. It took me a few seconds to 
realize that I was staring at sheets pulled over furniture. Chairs and couches 
covered with sheets. 

“M-maybe this is the ghosts’ living room,” I stammered. 

Stephanie didn’t hear me. She had already burst through the open door 
against the far wall. 

I followed her into another room, cluttered with large crates. The crates 
were piled nearly to the ceiling. 

Another room. Then another. 

My heart began to pound. My throat ached. 

I felt so discouraged. Were we ever going to find our way to the stairs? 

Another door. Another dark, empty room. 

“Hey, Steph—” I whispered. “I think we’re going in circles.” 

Out into a long, twisting hallway. More candles. More flowers flickering 
darkly on the wallpaper. 

We ran side by side down the hall. Until we came to a door I hadn’t seen 
before. A door with a horseshoe nailed onto it. 

Maybe it meant that our luck was about to change. I sure hoped so! 

I grabbed the knob with a trembling hand. I pulled open the door. 



A staircase! 

“Yes!” I cried. 

“Finally!” Stephanie gasped. 

“This must be the servants’ staircase,” I guessed. “Maybe we’ve been in the 
servants’ quarters all this time.” 

The stairway was blanketed in darkness. The stairs looked steep. 

I took a step down, holding onto the wall. Then another step. 

Stephanie had one hand on my shoulder. When I stepped down, she stepped 
down, too. 

Another step. Another. The soft thuds of our sneakers echoed in the deep 
stairwell. 

We had taken about ten steps when I heard footsteps. 

Someone coming up the stairs. 



18 


Stephanie bumped me hard. I shot out both hands. Grabbed the wall to keep 
from falling down the stairs. 

No time to turn and run. 

The footsteps grew louder. And heavier. Light from a flashlight swept over 
Stephanie, then me. 

Squinting against the light, I saw a dark figure climbing up to us. “So there 
you are!” his voice boomed, echoing in the stairwell. 

A familiar voice. 

“Otto!” Stephanie and I both cried. 

He bounced up in front of us, moving the flashlight from her face to mine. 
“What are you two doing up here?” he demanded breathlessly. 

“Uh... we got lost,” I answered quickly. 

“We got separated from the tour,” Stephanie added. “We tried to find you.” 

“Yes. We tried,” I chimed in. “We were searching everywhere. But we 
couldn’t catch up to the group.” 

Otto lowered the flashlight. I could see his tiny dark eyes narrowing at us. I 
don’t think he believed our story. 

“I thought you two knew my tour by heart,” he said, rubbing his chin. 

“We do,” Stephanie insisted. “We just got turned around. We got lost. And 
we—” 

“But how did you get up here on the top floor?” Otto demanded. 

“Well...” I started. But I couldn’t think of a good answer. I turned back to 
Stephanie on the step above me. 

“We heard voices up here. We thought it was you,” she told Otto. 

It wasn’t exactly a lie. We did hear voices. 

Otto lowered the beam of light to the stairs. “Well, let’s get back 
downstairs. No one is allowed on this floor. It’s private.” 

“Sorry,” Stephanie and I murmured. 

“Watch your step, kids,” Otto warned. “These back stairs are very steep and 
rickety. I’ll lead you back to the group. Edna took over for me while I went to 
find you.” 



Edna was our second-favorite tour guide. She was old and white-haired. 
Very pale and frail-looking, especially in her black tour-guide outfit. 

But she was a great storyteller. With her quivering, old voice, she really 
made you believe every frightening story she told. 

Stephanie and I eagerly clumped down the stairs, following Otto. His 
flashlight swept in front of us as he led us out onto the second floor. We followed 
a long hallway. A hallway I knew very well. 

We stopped outside Joseph Craw’s study. Joseph was Andrew’s father. I 
peeked inside. A bright fire blazed in the fireplace. 

Edna stood beside the fireplace, telling the tragic story of Joseph Craw to 
the tour group. 

Stephanie and I had heard the sad story a hundred times. A year after 
Andrew had his head cut off, Joseph came home late one winter night. He took 
off his coat, then moved to the fireplace to warm himself. 

No one knows how Joseph was burned up. At least, that’s how Otto, Edna, 
and the other guides tell the story. Was he pushed into the fireplace? Did he fall 
in? 

One guess is as good as another. 

But when the maid came into the study the next morning, she found a 
horrifying sight. 

She found two charred, blackened hands gripping the mantel. 

Two hands, holding on tightly to the marble mantelpiece. 

All that was left of Joseph Craw. 

It’s a yucky story—isn’t it? 

It gives me a chill every time I hear it. 

As Otto led us to the study, Edna was just getting to the sickening part. The 
ending. “Do you want to rejoin the group?” Otto whispered. 

“It’s pretty late. I think we’d better get home,” Stephanie told him. 

I quickly agreed. “Thanks for rescuing us. We’ll catch the tour again soon.” 

“Good night,” Otto said, clicking off his flashlight. “You know the way 
out.” He hurried into the study. 

I started to leave. But stopped when I saw the boy again, the pale boy with 
the wavy blond hair. The boy in the black jeans and black turtleneck. 

He stood away from the tour group. Close to the door. And he was staring 
at Stephanie and me again. Staring hard at us, a cold expression on his face. 

“Come on,” I whispered, grabbing Stephanie’s arm. I tugged her away from 



the study door. 

We quickly found the front stairway. A few seconds later, we pushed open 
the front door and stepped outside. A cold wind greeted us as we started down 
the hill. Wisps of black cloud floated like snakes over the moon. 

“Well, that was fun!” Stephanie declared. She zipped her coat to her chin. 

“Fun?” I wasn’t so sure. “It was kind of scary.” 

Stephanie grinned at me. “But we weren’t afraid—right?” 

I shivered. “Right.” 

“I’d like to go back and explore some more,” she said. “You know. Maybe 
go back to that room with all the voices. Find some real ghosts.” 

“Yeah. Great,” I agreed. I didn’t feel like arguing with her. I felt pretty tired. 

She pulled a wool muffler from her coat pocket. As she swung it around her 
neck, one end caught in a low pine bush. 

“Hey—!” she cried out. 

I moved to the bush and started to pull the muffler free. 

And that’s when I heard the voice. 

Just a whisper. A whisper from the other side of the bush. 

But I heard it very clearly. 

“Did you find my head ? ” 

That’s what I heard. 

“Did you find my head? Did you find it for me?” 



19 


I uttered a startled gasp and stared into the bush. “Stephanie—did you hear 
that?” I choked out. 

No reply. 

“Stephanie? Steph?” 

I spun around. She was staring at me, her mouth open in surprise. 

“Did you hear that whisper?” I asked again. 

Then I realized she wasn’t staring at me. She was staring past me. 

I turned—and saw the strange, blond boy standing there beside the pine 
bush. “Hey—did you just whisper to us?” I demanded sharply. 

He narrowed his pale gray eyes at me. “Huh? Me?” 

“Yeah. You,” I snapped. “Were you trying to scare us?” 

He shook his head. “No way.” 

“You didn’t whisper from behind this bush?” I asked again. 

“I just got out here,” the boy insisted. 

We saw him in Joseph Craw’s study less than a minute ago, I told myself. 
How did he get out here so fast? 

“Why did you follow us?” Stephanie demanded, shoving her muffler 
around her coat collar. 

The boy shrugged. 

“Why were you staring at us?” I asked, stepping up close to Stephanie. 

The wind howled over the hilltop. The row of pine bushes shook in the 
gusty wind, as if shivering. Thin black clouds continued to snake their way over 
the pale moon. 

The boy wore no coat. Only the black turtleneck and black jeans. The wind 
fluttered his long, wavy hair. 

“We saw you staring at us,” Stephanie repeated. “How come?” 

He shrugged again. He kept his strange, gray eyes down at the ground. “I 
saw you sneak away,” he said. “I wondered if... if you saw anything 
interesting.” 

“We got lost,” I told him, glancing at Stephanie. “We didn’t see much.” 

“What’s your name?” Stephanie asked. 



“Seth,” he replied. 

We told him our names. 

“Do you live in Wheeler Falls?” Stephanie asked. 

He shook his head. He kept his eyes down at his shoes. “No. I’m just 
visiting.” 

Why wouldn’t he look us in the eye? Was he just shy? 

“Are you sure you didn’t whisper something from behind that bush?” I 
asked again. 

He shook his head. “No way. Maybe someone was playing a joke on you.” 

“Maybe,” I said. I stepped closer and kicked the bush. I don’t know what I 
expected. 

But nothing happened. 

“You and Stephanie went exploring on your own?” Seth asked. 

“Yeah. A little,” I confessed. “We’re kind of into ghosts.” 

When I said that, he jerked his head up. He raised his gray eyes and gazed 
hard at Stephanie, then at me. 

His face had been a blank. No life to it. No expression at all. 

But now I could see that he was really excited. 

“Do you want to see some real ghosts?” he asked us, staring hard. “Do 


you?” 



20 


Seth stared at us as if challenging us. “Do you two want to see some real 
ghosts?” 

“Yeah. Sure,” Stephanie replied, returning his stare. 

“What do you mean, Seth?” I demanded. “Have you ever seen a ghost?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. In there.” He pointed with his head, back to the big 
stone house. 

“Huh?” I cried. “You saw a real ghost in Hill House? When?” 

“Duane and I have taken the tour a hundred times,” Stephanie told him. 
“We’ve never seen any ghost in there.” 

He snickered. “Of course not. Do you think the ghosts come out when the 
tour groups are in there? They wait till the house closes. They wait until all the 
tourists go home.” 

“How do you know?” I asked. 

“I sneaked in,” Seth replied. “Late one night.” 

“You what?” I cried. “How?” 

“I found a door around back. It was unlocked. I guess everyone forgot about 
it,” Seth explained. “I sneaked in after the house was closed. And I—” 

He stopped suddenly. His eyes were on the house. 

I turned and saw the front door open. People stepped out, fastening their 
coats. The last tour had ended. People were heading for home. 

“Over here!” Seth whispered. 

We followed him behind the pine bushes and ducked down low. The people 
walked past us. They were laughing and talking about the house and all the ghost 
stories. 

When they were down the hill, we stood up again. Seth brushed his long 
hair off his forehead. But the wind blew it right back. 

“I sneaked in late at night, when the house was dark,” he repeated. 

“Your parents let you go out so late at night?” I asked. 

A strange smile crossed his lips. “They didn’t know,” he said softly. The 
smile faded. “Your parents let you two out?” 

Stephanie laughed. “Our parents don’t know, either.” 



“Good,” Seth replied. 

“And you really saw a ghost?” I asked. 

He nodded. Brushed his hair back again. “I crept past Manny, the night 
watchman. He was sound asleep. Snoring away. I made my way to the front of 
the house. I was standing at the bottom of the big staircase—when I heard a 
laugh.” 

I gulped. “A laugh?” 

“From the top of the stairs. I backed up against the wall. And I saw the 
ghost. A very old lady. In a long dress and a black bonnet. She wore a heavy 
black veil over the front of her face. But I could see her eyes through the veil. I 
could see them because they glowed bright red—like fire!” 

“Wow!” Stephanie cried. “What did she do?” 

Seth turned to the house. The front door had closed. The lantern over the 
door had been put out. The house stood in total darkness. 

“The old ghost came sliding down the banister,” he reported. “She tossed 
back her head—and screamed all the way down. And as she slid, her red eyes 
left a bright trail, like the tail of a comet.” 

“Weren’t you scared?” I asked Seth. “Didn’t you try to run away?” 

“There was no time,” he replied. “She came sliding down the banister, right 
toward me. Eyes blazing. Screaming like some kind of crazed animal. I was 
pressed against the wall. I couldn’t move. And when she reached the bottom, I 
thought she’d grab me. But she vanished. Disappeared into the darkness. And all 
that was left was the faint red glow, floating in the air. The glow of her eyes.” 

“Oh, wow!” Stephanie cried. 

“That’s awesomel” I agreed. 

“I want to sneak back in again,” Seth declared, watching the house. “I’ll bet 
there are more ghosts in there. I really want to see them.” 

“Me, too!” Stephanie cried eagerly. 

Seth smiled at her. “So you’ll come with me? Tomorrow night? I don’t want 
to go back alone. It’ll be so much more fun if you come, too.” 

The wind swirled sharply. The black clouds rolled over the moon, covering 
it, shutting out its light. The old house appeared to grow darker on its hilltop 
perch. 

“So you’ll come with me tomorrow night?” Seth asked again. 

“Yeah. Great!” Stephanie told him. “I can’t wait. How about you, Duane?” 
She turned to me. “You’ll come, too—won’t you, Duane? Won’t you?” 



21 


I said yes. 

I said I couldn’t wait to see a real ghost. 

I said I was shivering because of the cold wind. Not because I was scared. 

We made a plan to meet at midnight tomorrow at the back of Hill House. 
Then Seth hurried away. And Stephanie and I walked home. 

The street was dark and empty. Most of the house lights were out. Far in the 
distance, a dog howled. 

Stephanie and I walked quickly, leaning into the wind. We usually didn’t 
stay out this late. 

Tomorrow night, we’d be even later. 

“I don’t trust that guy,” I told Stephanie as we reached her front yard. “He’s 
too weird.” 

I expected her to agree. But she said, “You’re just jealous, Duane.” 

“Huh? Me? Jealous?” I couldn’t believe she said that. “Why would I be 
jealous?” 

“Because Seth is so brave. Because he saw a ghost and we didn’t.” 

I shook my head. “Do you believe that crazy story about a ghost sliding 
down the banister? I think he made it up.” 

“Well,” Stephanie replied thoughtfully, “we’ll find out tomorrow night— 
won’t we!” 

Tomorrow night came too quickly. 

I had a math test in the afternoon. I don’t think I did too well on it. I 
couldn’t stop thinking about Seth, and Hill House, and ghosts. 

After dinner, Mom cornered me in the living room. She brushed back my 
hair and studied my face. “Why do you look so tired?” she asked. “You have 
dark circles around your eyes.” 

“Maybe I’m part raccoon,” I replied. That’s what I always say when she 
tells me I have circles around my eyes. 

“I think you should go to bed early tonight,” Dad chimed in. Dad always 
thinks that everyone should go to bed early. 

So I went to my room at nine-thirty. But of course I didn’t go to sleep. 



I read a book and listened to a tape on my Walkman. And waited for Mom 
and Dad to go to bed. And watched the clock. 

Mom and Dad are very heavy sleepers. You can pound and pound on their 
bedroom door, and they don’t wake up. They once slept through a hurricane. 
That’s the truth. They didn’t hear the tree that fell onto our house! 

Stephanie’s parents are heavy sleepers, too. That’s why it’s so easy for the 
two of us to sneak out of our bedroom windows. That’s why it’s so easy for us to 
haunt our neighborhood at night. 

As the clock neared midnight, I wished we were going out on one of our 
usual haunting trips. I wished we were going to hide under Chrissy Jacob’s 
window and howl like wolves. And then toss rubber spiders into Ben Fuller’s 
bed. 

But Stephanie had decided that was too boring. 

We needed excitement. We needed to go ghost hunting. With a strange kid 
we’d never seen before. 

At ten to twelve, I pulled on my down coat and crept out of my bedroom 
window. Another cold, windy night. I felt sprinkles of frozen rain on my 
forehead. Sol pulled up my hood. 

Stephanie was waiting for me at the bottom of her driveway. She had pulled 
her brown hair back in a ponytail. Her coat was open. She wore a heavy ski 
sweater underneath, pulled down over her jeans. 

She raised her head and let out a ghostly howl. “Owooooooo!” 

I clapped my hand over her open mouth. “You’ll wake up the whole block!” 

She laughed and backed away from me. “I’m a little excited. Aren’t you?” 
She opened her mouth in another howl. 

The frozen rain pattered the ground. We hurried toward Hill House. The 
swirling wind scattered twigs and dead leaves as we walked. Most of the house 
lights had been turned off. 

A car rolled by slowly as we turned onto Hill Street. Stephanie and I ducked 
behind a hedge. The driver might wonder why two kids were wandering around 
Wheeler Falls at midnight. 

I wondered, too. 

We waited for the car to disappear. Then we continued our journey. 

Our sneakers crunched over the hard ground as we climbed the hill that led 
to the old haunted house. Hill House rose above us, like a silent monster waiting 
to swallow us up. 



The last tour had ended. The lights were all off. Otto and Edna and the other 
tour guides were probably all home by now. 

“Come on, Duane. Hurry,” Stephanie urged. She started to run around the 
side of the house. “Seth is probably waiting.” 

“Wait up!” I cried. We followed a narrow dirt path around to the back. 

Squinting into the darkness, I searched for Seth. No sign of him. 

The backyard was cluttered with equipment of all kinds. A row of rusted 
metal trashcans formed a fence along one wall. A long wooden ladder lay on its 
side in the tall weeds. Wooden cartons and barrels and cardboard boxes were 
strewn everywhere. A hand lawnmower tilted against the house. 

“It—it’s so much darker back here,” Stephanie stammered. “Do you see 
Seth?” 

“I can’t see anything ,” I replied in a whisper. “Maybe he changed his mind. 
Maybe he isn’t coming.” 

Stephanie started to reply. But a choked cry from the side of the house made 
us both jump. 

I turned to see Seth stagger into view. 

His blond hair was wild, flying around his face. His eyes bulged. His hands 
gripped his throat. 

“The ghost!” he cried, stumbling clumsily. “The ghost—he—he got me!” 

Then Seth collapsed at our feet and didn’t move. 



22 


“Nice try, Seth,” I said calmly. 

“Nice fall,” Stephanie added. 

He raised his head slowly, staring up at us. “I didn’t fool you?” 

“No way,” I replied. 

Stephanie rolled her eyes. “That’s Joke Number One,” she told Seth. 
“Duane and I have pulled that one a thousand times.” 

Seth climbed to his feet and brushed off the front of his black turtleneck. He 
scowled, disappointed. “Just trying to give you a little scare.” 

“You’ll have to do better than that,” I told him. 

“Duane and I are experts at giving scares,” Stephanie added. “It’s sort of 
our hobby.” 

Seth straightened his hair with both hands. “You two are weird,” he 
murmured. 

I brushed cold raindrops off my eyebrows. “Can we get inside?” I asked 
impatiently. 

Seth led the way to the narrow door at the far side of the house. “Did you 
two have any trouble sneaking out?” he asked, whispering. 

“No. No trouble,” Stephanie told him. 

“Neither did I,” he replied. He stepped up to the door and lifted the wooden 
latch. “I took the tour again tonight,” he whispered. “Otto showed me some new 
things. Some new rooms we can explore.” 

“Great!” Stephanie exclaimed. “Do you promise we’ll see a real ghost?” 
Seth turned back to her. A strange smile spread over his face. “Promise,” he 

said. 



23 


Seth gave the door a tug, and it creaked open. 

We slipped inside. Into total blackness. Too dark to see where we were. 

I took a few steps into the room—and bumped into Seth. 

“Ssshhh,” he warned. “Manny the night watchman is posted in the front 
room. He’s probably asleep already. But we’d better stay in back.” 

“Where are we?” I whispered. 

“In one of the back rooms,” Seth whispered. “Wait a few seconds. Our eyes 
will adjust.” 

“Can’t we turn on a light?” I asked. 

“Ghosts won’t come out in the light,” Seth replied. 

We had closed the door behind us. But a cold wind still blew at my back. 

I shivered. 

A soft rattling sound made my breath catch in my throat. 

Was I starting to hear things? 

I pulled off my hood to hear better. 

Silence now. 

“I think I know where I can find some candles,” Seth whispered. “You two 
wait here. Don’t move.” 

“D-don’t worry,” I stammered. I didn’t plan to go anywhere until I could 

see! 

I heard Seth move away, making soft, scraping footsteps over the floor, 
keeping as quiet as he could. His footsteps faded into silence. 

Then I felt another rush of cold wind against the back of my neck. 

“Oh!” I cried out when I heard the rattling again. 

A gentle rattling. Like the rattling of bones. 

Another cold gust of wind swept over me. A ghost’s cold breath, I thought. 
My whole body shook as a chill ran down my back. 

I heard the rattling bones again. Louder. A clattering sound. So close. 

I reached out in the thick blackness. Tried to grab onto a wall. Or a table. Or 
anything. 

But my hands grabbed only air. 



I swallowed hard. Calm down, Duane, I ordered myself. Seth will be back 
in a moment with some candles. Then you’ll see that everything is okay. 

But another jangle and clatter of bones made me gasp. 

“Steph—did you hear that?” I whispered. 

No reply. 

A cold wind tingled my neck. 

The bones rattled again. 

“Steph? Do you hear that noise, too? Steph?” 

No reply. 

“Stephanie? Steph?” I called. 

She was gone. 



24 


Panic time. 

My breaths came short and fast. My heart clattered louder than the skeleton 
bones. My whole body began to shake. 

“Stephanie? Steph? Where are you?” I choked out weakly. 

Then I saw the two yellow eyes moving toward me. Two glowing eyes, 
floating silently, gleaming with evil. Coming nearer. Nearer. 

I froze. 

I couldn’t move. I couldn’t see anything but those two gleaming, yellow 

eyes. 

“Ohh!” I uttered a moan as they floated closer. And I could see them more 
clearly. See that they were candle flames. 

Two candle flames, moving side by side. 

In the soft yellow light, I saw Seth’s face. And Stephanie’s. They each 
carried a lighted candle in front of them. 

“Stephanie—where were you?” I cried in a choked whisper. “I—I thought 

55 

“I went with Seth,” she replied calmly. 

The orange glow from her candle washed over me. I guess Stephanie could 
see how panicked I was. “I’m sorry, Duane,” she said softly. “I said I was going 
with Seth. I thought you heard me.” 

“S-something is rattling,” I stammered. “Bones, I think. I keep feeling a 
cold wind, and I keep hearing—” 

Seth handed me a candle. “Light it,” he instructed. “We’ll look around. See 
what’s rattling.” 

I took the candle and raised it to his. But my hand was shaking so badly, it 
took me five tries to light the wick. Finally, the candle flamed to life. 

I gazed around in the flickering orange light. 

“Hey—we’re in the kitchen,” Stephanie whispered. 

A gust of cold wind blew past me. “Did you feel that?” I cried. 

Seth pointed his candle flame toward the kitchen window. “Look, Duane— 
that window-pane. It’s missing. The cold air is blowing in through the hole.” 

“Oh. Right.” 



Another blast of air. And then the rattling. 

“Did you hear it?” I demanded. 

Stephanie giggled. She pointed to the kitchen wall. In the dim light, I saw 
big pots and pans hanging on the wall. “The wind is making them rattle,” 
Stephanie explained. 

“Ha-ha.” I uttered a feeble laugh. “I knew that. I was just trying to scare 
you,” I lied. “You know. Give you a thrill.” 

I felt like a total jerk. But why should I admit that a bunch of pots on the 
wall nearly had me scared out of my skin? 

“Okay. No more jokes,” Stephanie insisted, turning to Seth. “We want to 
see a real ghost.” 

“Follow me. HI show you something that Otto told me about,” Seth 
whispered. 

Holding his candle in front of him, he led the way across the kitchen to the 
wall beside the stove. He lowered his candle in front of a cabinet door. Then he 
pulled open the cabinet door and moved the candle closer so we could see inside. 

“Why are you showing us a kitchen cabinet?” I demanded. “What’s scary 
about that?” 

“It’s not a cabinet,” Seth replied. “It’s a dumbwaiter. Watch.” He reached 
inside and pulled a rope beside the cabinet shelf. The shelf began to slide up. 

He raised the shelf, then lowered it. “See? This dumbwaiter is like a little 
elevator. It was used to send food from the kitchen to the master bedroom 
upstairs.” 

“You mean for midnight snacks?” I joked. 

Seth nodded. “The cook would put the food on the shelf. Then he would 
pull the rope, and the shelf would carry it upstairs.” 

“Thrills and chills,” I said sarcastically. 

“Yeah. Why are you showing it to us?” Stephanie demanded. 

Seth brought the candle up close to his face. “Otto told me that this 
dumbwaiter is haunted. A hundred and twenty years ago, things suddenly started 
to go wrong with it.” 

Stephanie and I moved closer. I lowered my candle and examined the 
dumbwaiter cabinet. “What went wrong?” I asked. 

“Well,” Seth began softly, “the cook would put food on the shelf and send it 
upstairs. But when the shelf reached the bedroom up there, the food was gone.” 

Stephanie narrowed her eyes at Seth. “It disappeared between the first and 



second floor?” 

Seth nodded solemnly. His gray eyes glowed in the soft candlelight. “This 
happened several times. When the shelf reached the second floor, it was empty. 
The food had vanished.” 

“Wow,” I murmured. 

“The cook became very frightened,” Seth continued. “He was afraid that 
the dumbwaiter had become haunted. He decided to stop using it. And he 
ordered everyone on his staff never to use the dumbwaiter again.” 

“And that’s the end of the story?” I asked. 

Seth shook his head. “And then something horrible happened.” 

Stephanie’s mouth dropped open. “What? What happened?” 

“Some kids were visiting the house. One of them was a boy named Jeremy. 
Jeremy was a real show-off, and very athletic. When he saw the dumbwaiter, he 
decided it would be fun to ride it to the second floor.” 

“Oh, wow,” Stephanie murmured. 

I felt a chill. I thought I could guess what was coming. 

“So Jeremy squeezed onto the shelf. And one of the other kids pulled the 
rope. Suddenly the rope caught. The kid couldn’t get it to move up or down. 
Jeremy was stuck somewhere between the floors. 

“The other kids called up to him, ‘Are you okay?’ But Jeremy didn’t reply. 
They started to get very worried. They tugged and tugged, but they couldn’t 
move the rope. 

“Then suddenly, the shelf came crashing back down.” 

“And was Jeremy on it?” I asked eagerly. 

Seth shook his head. “There were three covered bowls on the shelf. The 
kids lifted the lid off the first bowl. Inside was Jeremy’s heart, still beating. 

“They opened the second bowl. Inside were Jeremy’s eyes, still staring in 
horror. And they opened the third bowl. And saw Jeremy’s teeth, still 
chattering.” 

The three of us stood silent in the orange glow of candlelight. We stared at 
the dumbwaiter shelf. 

I shivered. The pots rattled against the wall. But I was no longer frightened 
by them. I raised my eyes to Seth. “Do you think that story is true?” 

Stephanie laughed. Nervous laughter. “It can’t be true,” she said. 

Seth’s face remained solemn. “Do you believe any of Otto’s stories?” he 
asked me quietly. 



“Well. Yes. No. Some.” I couldn’t decide. 

“Otto swears the story is true,” Seth insisted. “But of course, he may just be 
doing his job. His job is to make this house as scary as possible.” 

“Otto is a great storyteller,” Stephanie murmured. “But enough stories. I 
want to see a real ghost.” 

“Follow me,” Seth replied. His candle flame dipped low as he spun around. 
He led us back through the kitchen, into a long, narrow room at the back. 
“This is the old butler’s pantry,” he announced. “All of the food for the house 
was stored in here.” 

Stephanie and I stepped past him, raising our candles to see the room better. 
When I turned around, Seth was closing the pantry door behind us. 

Then I saw him turn the lock. 

“Hey—what are you doing?” I cried. 

“Why are you locking us in here?” Stephanie demanded. 



25 


I dropped my candle. It bounced on the hard floor, and the flame went out. The 
candle rolled under a shelf. 

When I glanced back up, Stephanie was storming toward Seth. “Seth—what 
are you doing?” she demanded angrily. “Unlock that door. This isn’t funny!” 

I gazed around the long, narrow room. Shelves from floor to ceiling on 
three walls. No windows. No other door to escape through. 

With a sharp cry, Stephanie grabbed for the door handle. But Seth moved 
quickly to block her way. 

“Hey—!” I cried, my heart pounding. I stepped up beside Stephanie. 
“What’s the big idea, Seth?” 

His silvery eyes glowed with excitement behind his candle flame. He stared 
back at us without speaking. The same cold stare I had seen on his face the night 
before. 

Stephanie and I took a step back, huddling close together. 

“Sorry, guys. But I played a little trick on you,” he said finally. 

“Excuse me?” Stephanie cried, more angry than frightened. 

“What kind of trick?” I asked. 

He pushed back his long, blond hair with his free hand. The flickering 
candle sent shadows dancing across his face. “My name isn’t Seth,” he said 
softly, so softly I could barely hear him. 

“But—but—” I stammered. 

“My name is Andrew,” he said. 

Stephanie and I both cried out in surprise. 

“But Andrew is the name of the ghost,” Stephanie protested. “The ghost 
who lost his head.” 

“I am the ghost,” he said softly. A dry laugh escaped his lips. More like a 
cough than a laugh. “I promised you a real ghost tonight. Well... here I am.” 

He blew out the candle. He appeared to vanish with the light. 

“But, Seth—” Stephanie started. 

“Andrew,” he corrected her. “My name is Andrew. My name has been 
Andrew for more than a hundred years.” 

“Let us out of here,” I pleaded. “We won’t tell anyone we saw you. We 



won’t—” 

“I can’t let you go,” he replied in a whisper. 

I remembered the story of the sea captain’s ghost. When Andrew stumbled 
into the sea captain’s room and saw the old ghost, the sea captain had said the 
same thing to him. “Now that you have seen me, I can never let you go. ” 

“You—you lost your head!” I blurted out. 

“So you can’t be Andrew!” Stephanie cried. “You have a head!” 

In the dim light from Stephanie’s candle, I could see the sneer spread over 
Andrew’s face. “No,” he said softly. “No, no, no. I do not have my head. This is 
one that I borrowed.” 

He raised both hands to the sides of his face. “Here. Let me show you,” he 

said. 

Then he pressed his hands against his cheeks and started to tug the head up 
from the black turtleneck. 



26 


“No! Stop!” Stephanie screeched. 

I shut my eyes. I didn’t really want to see him pull off his head. 

When I opened my eyes, Andrew had lowered his hands. 

I gazed once again around the narrow pantry. How could we escape? How 
could we get out of there? The ghost was blocking the only exit. 

“Why did you trick us?” Stephanie asked Andrew. “Why did you bring us 
here? Why did you lie to us?” 

Andrew sighed. “I told you. I borrowed this head.” He ran one hand 
through the hair, then down over the cheek, as if petting it. “I borrowed it. But I 
have to return it.” 

Stephanie and I stared back at him in silence, waiting for him to continue. 
Waiting for him to explain. 

“I saw you last night in the tour group,” he said finally, his eyes locked on 
me. “The others couldn’t see me. But I made myself visible to you.” 

“Why?” I asked in a trembling voice. 

“Because of your head,” he replied. “I liked your head.” 

“Huh?” A frightened gasp escaped my throat. 

He gripped the blond hair again. “I have to return this head, Duane,” he said 
calmly, coldly. “So I’m going to take yours.” 



27 


A frightened giggle escaped my throat. 

Why do people suddenly start laughing when they’re terrified? I guess it’s 
because if you don’t laugh, you’ll scream. Or explode or something. 

Trapped in that small, dark room with a hundred-year-old ghost that wanted 
my head, I felt like laughing, screaming, and exploding all at once! 

I stared hard at Andrew, squinting in the dim light. “You’re kidding, right?” 

He shook his head. His silvery eyes narrowed, hard and cold. “I need your 
head, Duane,” he said softly. He shrugged, as if apologizing. “I’ll pull it off 
quickly. It won’t hurt a bit.” 

“But—but I need it, too!” I sputtered. 

“I’m only going to borrow it,” Andrew said. He took a step toward us. “I’ll 
return it when I find my own head. Promise.” 

“You’re not cheering me up,” I replied. 

He took another step toward us. 

Stephanie and I backed up a step. 

He took a step. We backed up a step. 

We didn’t have much more room to back up. We were nearly to the back 
wall of pantry shelves. 

Suddenly Stephanie spoke up. “Andrew, we’ll find your head!” she offered. 
Her voice shook. 

I turned to her. I’d never seen her scared before. Knowing that Stephanie 
was scared made me even more scared! 

“For sure!” I croaked. “We’ll find your real head. We’ll search all night. We 
know this house really well. I’m sure we can find it if you give us a chance.” 

He stared back at us without replying. 

I wanted to get down on my knees and beg him to give us a chance. 

But I was afraid that if I got down on my knees, he’d pull off my head. 

“We’ll find it, Andrew. I know we will,” Stephanie insisted. 

He shook his head. His borrowed head. “There’s no way,” he murmured 
sadly. “How long have I been searching this house? For more than a hundred 
years. For more than a hundred years, I’ve searched every hallway, every room, 
every closet.” 



He took another step closer. His eyes were locked on my head. I knew he 
was studying it, thinking about how it would look on his shoulders. 

“In all these years, I haven’t found my head,” Andrew continued. “So what 
makes you think you can find it tonight?” 

“Well... uh...” Stephanie turned to me. 

“Uh... maybe we’ll get lucky!” I declared. 

Lame. How lame can you get? 

“Sorry,” Andrew murmured. “I need your head, Duane. We’re wasting 
time.” 

“Give us a chance!” I cried. 

He took a step closer. He was studying my hair now. Probably deciding if 
he should let it grow longer. 

“Andrew—please!” I begged. 

It was no use. His eyes were glassy now. He reached out both hands and 
took another step. 

Stephanie and I backed up. 

“Give me your head, Duane,” the ghost whispered. 

My back bumped a shelf on the wall behind me. 

“I need your head, Duane.” 

Stephanie and I huddled close and pressed our backs against the shelves. 

The ghost floated closer, hands outstretched. 

We pressed ourselves tighter against the shelves. My elbow bumped 
something hard. I heard some heavy objects fall from the shelf. 

“I need your head, Duane.” 

He clenched and unclenched his hands. Two more steps and he’d be close 
enough to grab me. 

“Your head. Give me your head.” 

I jammed my back against the shelves. 

I heard a creaking sound—and the shelf started to slide. 

I stumbled back. And realized that the whole wall was sliding. 

“Wh-what’s happening?” I stammered. 

The ghost reached for my head. “Gotcha!” 



28 


The ghost leaped at me, hands outstretched. 

I ducked—and stumbled back as the wall slid away. 

The wall made a loud grinding sound as it slowly spun around. 

Stephanie fell to the hard floor. 

I pulled her up quickly as Andrew made another wild grab for my head. 

“A tunnel!” I shouted over the grinding of the wall. 

As the wall spun away, it revealed a dark opening. Just big enough to 
squeeze through. 

I pulled Stephanie to the opening—and we squeezed inside. 

We found ourselves in a long, low passageway. Some kind of tunnel. 
Hidden behind the sliding wall. 

I’d always heard about old houses that had secret halls and hidden rooms 
built in them. I never thought I’d be so glad to find one! 

Stephanie and I started to run. Our footsteps echoed loudly on the concrete 

floor. 

We ran past bare, concrete walls, cracked and pitted by time. We had to 
stoop as we ran. The ceiling wasn’t as tall as we were! 

Stephanie slowed down to glance back. “Is he following us?” 

“Just keep running!” I cried. “This tunnel has got to lead out of here! Out of 
this house! It’s got to!” 

“I can’t see where it leads!” she replied breathlessly. 

The low tunnel stretched out in a straight line. I could see only darkness at 
the end. 

Did it stretch on forever? 

If it did, I’d keep running forever. I didn’t plan to stop running until I was 
safely outside. 

And once I was outside, I planned never to visit Hill House again. And I 
planned to stay away from ghosts and to keep my head on my shoulders where it 
belonged. 

Big plans. 

But plans don’t always work out. 



“Ohh!” Stephanie and I both cried out as we nearly crashed into a solid 
concrete wall. 

The tunnel ended. It just ended. 

“It—it doesn’t go anywhere !” I gasped. Breathing hard, I pounded both fists 
against the wall. “Who would build a secret tunnel that leads nowhere?” 

“Push on the wall,” Stephanie cried. “Let’s both push. Maybe this wall will 
slide open, too.” 

We turned and leaned our shoulders into the wall. And pushed. Groaning 
and gasping, I pushed with all my strength. 

I was still pushing when I heard the scraping footsteps moving toward us 
down the tunnel. 

Andrew! 

“Push!” Stephanie cried. 

We shoved ourselves against the wall. 

“Come on—slide! Slide!” I ordered it. 

I glanced back and saw Andrew, jogging slowly, steadily toward us. 

“We’re trapped,” Stephanie moaned. She collapsed against the wall with a 

sigh. 

Andrew came trotting closer. 

“Duane—I want your head!” he called, his voice echoing against the 
concrete walls. 

“Trapped,” Stephanie murmured. 

“Maybe not,” I choked out. I pointed into the dark corner. “Look. A ladder.” 

“Huh?” Stephanie leaped to her feet. She squinted at the ladder. A metal 
ladder, the rungs blanketed with dust. It led straight up the wall, through a small, 
square opening in the low ceiling. 

To where? 

“Give me your head!” the ghost called. 

I grabbed the sides of the metal ladder. I raised a foot onto the first rung and 
peered straight up. 

Into thick blackness. I couldn’t see a thing up there. 

“Duane—” Stephanie whispered. “We don’t know where it leads!” 

“It doesn’t matter,” I replied, starting to climb. “We don’t have a choice— 
do we?” 



29 


“Where are you going, Duane? I need your head!” 

I ignored the ghost’s shout and scrambled up the ladder. Stephanie kept 
bumping me from behind. 

My sneakers slipped on the thick dust. My hands slid over the cold, metal 
railings. 

“Duane—you can’t get away!” Andrew called from down below. 

Straight up. Straight up the ladder. Stephanie and I, breathing hard, 
climbing frantically, as fast as we could climb. 

Straight up. 

Until the ladder started to tilt. 

“Noooo!” I uttered a scream as it spilled forward. 

A crumbling, cracking noise drowned out my scream. 

It took me a few seconds to realize that the wall was breaking apart. 
Crumbling into powdery chunks. 

And we were falling. 

I heard Stephanie scream. 

I grabbed the metal railings with both hands—and held on tight. 

But the ladder was sailing down now. Tumbling over the cracking, 
crumbling old wall. 

“Oww!” I landed hard. Bounced once. Twice. 

My hands flew up and I was tossed off the ladder. I rolled onto my stomach, 
rolled in the chunks of dirt and concrete of the broken wall. 

Stephanie landed on her knees. She shook her head, dazed. 

Chunks of wall spilled all around us. Stephanie’s hair was covered in dust. 

I shielded my eyes and waited for the wall to stop crumbling down. 

When I opened my eyes, Andrew stood above me. His hands were balled 
into fists. His mouth hung open. And he was staring... staring past me. 

I struggled to my feet. Turned to see what he was staring at. 

“A hidden room!” Stephanie cried, moving beside me. “A room behind the 
old wall.” 

Slipping over the chunks of broken concrete, I took a few steps closer to the 



room. 

And saw what Andrew was staring at. 

A head. 

A boy’s head lying on the floor of the hidden room. 

“I don’t believe it!” Stephanie gasped. “We found it! We actually found it!” 

I swallowed hard. And took a careful step forward. 

The head was pale, shimmering white, even in the dim light. 

I could see clearly that it was a boy’s head. But the long, wavy hair had 
turned to white. The round eyes glowed green, sparkling like emeralds in the 
shimmering, pale face. 

“The ghost head,” I murmured. 

I turned back to Andrew. “Your head—we found it for you.” 

I expected to see a smile on his face. I expected him to shout or jump for 

joy- 

For a hundred years, he had waited for this happy moment. And now his 
long search was over. 

But to my shock, Andrew’s face was twisted in horror. 

He wasn’t even looking at his long lost head. He stared above it. And as he 
stared, his entire body began to quiver. Frightened cries escaped his lips. 
“Andrew—what is your problem?” I demanded. 

But I don’t think he even heard me. 

He stared up at the ceiling, trembling. Hands balled into tight fists at his 
sides. Then, slowly, he raised one hand and pointed. “Nooooo,” he moaned. 
“Ohhhh, nooooooo.” 

I turned to see what had frightened him. 

Turned in time to see a filmy figure float down from the ceiling. 

At first I thought it was a thin window curtain, falling from above. 

But as it curled slowly, softly to the floor, I saw that it had arms. And legs. 

I could see right through it! 

The air around us suddenly grew cold. 

“It—it’s a ghost\” Stephanie cried, grabbing my arm. 



30 


The ghost landed softly, silently on the floor of the hidden room, raising its arms 
like bird wings. 

Stephanie and I both gasped as it raised its arms and stood upright. 

It was short and very thin. It wore baggy, old-fashioned-looking pants and a 
long-sleeved shirt with a high collar. 

A high collar. 

A collar. 

And no head. 

The ghost had no head! 

I felt a burst of cold air as it bent down, shimmering, bending, as if made of 
soft gauze. It reached down. Lifted the head off the floor. 

Lifted the head to the stiff, tall collar. 

Gently pressed the head into place. 

And as the head touched the ghostly, gauzy neck, the green eyes flashed. 

The cheeks twitched. The pale white eyebrows arched up and down. 

And then the mouth moved. 

The ghost turned to us—to Stephanie and me. And the lips moved in a 
silent “Thank you.” 

And then the arms rose into the air. Its green eyes still on us, the ghost 
floated up into the air. Lighter than air, it floated silently up. 

I watched in amazement, my heart pounding, until the ghostly figure 
vanished in the darkness. 

And then Stephanie and I both turned to Andrew at the same time. We had 
just seen the headless ghost. We had just seen Andrew, the boy from a hundred 
years ago. We had just watched him collect his head. 

But the boy who claimed to be Andrew was still there. He stood behind us, 
still trembling, his eyes wide, staring into the hidden room, making soft 
swallowing sounds. 

I narrowed my eyes at him. “If you aren’t Andrew,” I started—“if you 
aren’t the headless ghost—then who are you?” 



31 


Stephanie turned on the boy, too. “Yeah. Who are you?” she asked angrily. 

“If you’re not the headless ghost, why did you chase us?” I demanded. 

“Well. I... uh...” The boy raised both hands as if surrendering. Then he 
started to back away. 

He had only gone three or four steps when we heard footsteps coming down 
the long tunnel. 

I turned to Stephanie. Another ghost? 

“Who’s in here?” a deep voice boomed. 

I saw a circle of light from a flashlight sweeping over the tunnel floor. 

“Who is here?” the voice repeated. 

I recognized the deep voice. Otto! 

“Uh... back here,” the boy called softly. 

“Seth—is that you?” The circle of light floated closer. Otto appeared behind 
it, squinting at us. “What’s going on? What are you doing back here? This part 
of the house is dangerous. It’s all falling apart.” 

“Well... we were exploring,” Seth started. “And we got lost. It really wasn’t 
our fault.” 

Otto gazed at Seth sternly. Then his face filled with surprise as his flashlight 
washed over Stephanie and me. “You two! How did you get in? What are you 
doing here?” 

“He... well... he let us in,” I answered. I pointed at Seth. 

Otto turned back to Seth and shook his head unhappily. “More of your 
tricks? Were you scaring these kids?” 

“Not really, Uncle Otto,” Seth replied, keeping his eyes on the ground. 

Uncle Otto? So Seth was Otto’s nephew! 

No wonder he knew so much about Hill House. 

“Tell the truth, Seth,” Otto insisted. “Were you pretending to be a ghost 
again? Haven’t you played that trick on enough kids? Haven’t you scared 
enough kids to death?” 

Seth stood silent. 

Otto rubbed a hand back over his smooth, bald head. Then he let out a 



weary sigh. “We have a business to run here,” he told Seth. “Do you want to 
scare my customers away? Do you want to get the whole neighborhood upset?” 

Seth lowered his head and still didn’t reply. 

I could see that he was in major trouble. So I decided to jump in. “It’s okay, 
Otto,” I said. “He didn’t scare us.” 

“That’s right,” Stephanie chimed in. “We didn’t believe he was a ghost. Did 
we, Duane?” 

“Of course not,” I replied. “He didn’t fool us for a minute.” 

“Especially when we saw the real ghost,” Stephanie added. 

Otto turned to her, studying her in the light from the flashlight. “The what?” 

“The real ghost!” Stephanie insisted. 

“We saw the real ghost, Uncle Otto!” Seth exclaimed. “It was awesomel” 

Otto rolled his eyes. “Save the jokes, Seth. It’s too late at night. You’re just 
trying to get out of trouble.” 

“No. Really!” I insisted. 

“Really!” Seth and Stephanie cried. 

“We saw the headless ghost, Uncle Otto. You’ve got to believe us!” Seth 
pleaded. 

“Sure, sure,” Otto muttered. He turned and motioned with his flashlight. 
“Come on. Everyone out.” 



32 


After our scary night at Hill House, Stephanie and I gave up haunting the 
neighborhood. 

It just wasn’t that exciting anymore. Especially since we’d seen a real 
ghost. 

We stopped sneaking out at night. We stopped peeking into kids’ windows 
in scary masks. We stopped hiding behind bushes and howling like werewolves 
in the middle of the night. 

We gave up all the scary stuff. And we never even talked about ghosts. 

Stephanie and I found other things to be interested in. I tried out for the 
basketball team at school, and I became a starting forward. 

Stephanie joined the Theater Arts Club. This spring, she’s going to be 
Dorothy in The Wizard of Oz. Either Dorothy or a Munchkin. 

We had a good winter. Lots of snow. Lots of unscary fun. 

Then late one evening we were heading home from a birthday party. It was 
the first warm night of spring. Tulips were blooming in some of the front yards 
we passed. The air smelled fresh and sweet. 

I stopped in front of Hill House and gazed up at the old mansion. Stephanie 
stopped beside me. She read my mind. “You want to go in, don’t you, Duane?” 

I nodded. “How about taking the tour? We haven’t been in there since...” 
My voice trailed off. 

“Hey, why not?” Stephanie replied. 

We climbed the steep hill. Tall weeds brushed the legs of my jeans as I 
made my way to the front door. The huge old house stood as dark and as creepy 
as ever. 

As Stephanie and I climbed onto the front stoop, the door creaked open. As 
it always had. 

We stepped into the small front entryway. A few seconds later, Otto 
bounced into view. Dressed all in black. A friendly smile on his round, bald 
head. 

“You two!” he exclaimed happily. “Welcome back.” He called into the front 
room. “Edna, come see who is here.” 

Edna came tottering into the room. “Oh, my!” she cried, pressing a hand 



against her pale, wrinkled face. “We were wondering if we would see you two 
again.” 

I gazed into the front room. No other customers. 

“Could you take us on the tour?” I asked Otto. 

He smiled his toothy smile. “Of course. Wait. I’ll get my lantern.” 

Otto took us around Hill House. He gave us the complete tour. 

It was great to see the house again. But it no longer held any secrets for 
Stephanie and me. 

After the tour, we thanked Otto and said good night. 

We were halfway down the hill when a police car pulled up to the curb. A 
dark-uniformed officer stuck his head out of the passenger window. “What were 
you kids doing up there?” he called. 

Stephanie and I made our way down to the police car. The two officers eyed 
us suspiciously. 

“We just took the tour,” I explained, pointing up to Hill House. 

“Tour? What tour?” the officer demanded gruffly. 

“You know. The haunted house tour,” Stephanie replied impatiently. 

The police officer stuck his head farther out the window. He had blue eyes, 
and freckles all over his face. “What were you really doing up there?” he asked 
softly. 

“We told you,” I said shrilly. “Taking the tour. That’s all.” 

Behind the wheel, the other policeman chuckled. “Maybe a ghost gave 
them the tour,” he told his partner. 

“There are no tours,” the freckle-faced officer said, frowning. “There 
haven’t been any tours in that house for months.” 

Stephanie and I both uttered cries of surprise. 

“The house is empty,” the police officer continued. “Shut down. There 
hasn’t been anyone in there all winter. Hill House went out of business three 
months ago.” 

“Huh?” Stephanie and I exchanged startled glances. Then we both turned to 
gaze up at the house. 

The gray stone turrets rose up into the purple-black sky. Nothing but 
darkness all around. 

And then I saw a trail of soft light across the front window. Lantern light. 
Orange and soft as smoke. 

In the soft light, I saw Otto and Edna. They floated in front of the window. I 



could see right through them, as if they were made of gauze. 

They’re ghosts, too, I realized, staring into the soft, smoky light. 
I blinked. And the light faded out. 

 

THE ABOMINABLE 
SNOWMAN OF PASADENA 

1 


All my life, I’ve wanted to see snow. 

My name is Jordan Blake. My life has been twelve years of sun, sand, and 
chlorine. I’d never felt cold, ever —unless you count air-conditioned 
supermarkets. And I don’t. It doesn’t snow in the supermarket. 

I’d never felt cold, that is, until the adventure. 

Some people think I’m a lucky guy to live in Pasadena, California, where 
it’s always sunny and warm. It’s okay, I guess. But if you’ve never seen snow, it 
seems like something out of a science-fiction movie. 

Fluffy white frozen water that falls out of the sky? It piles up on the ground, 
and you can make forts and snowmen and snowballs out of it? You have to admit 
it sounds weird. 

One day, my wish came true. I got to see snow at last. And it turned out to 
be weirder than I thought. 

Way weirder. 

“Pay attention, kids. This is going to be cool.” 

Dad’s face glowed under the red darkroom light. My sister, Nicole, and I 
watched him developing film. With a pair of tongs, he dipped a sheet of special 
paper in a chemical bath. 

I’ve watched Dad develop film all my life. He’s a professional 
photographer. But I’d never seen him so excited about photos before—and that’s 
saying a lot. 

Dad takes nature photos. Well, actually, he takes pictures of everything! 

He never stops taking pictures. My mom says that once when I was a baby I 
saw Dad and screamed. I didn’t recognize him without a camera in front of his 
face. I used to think he had a zoom lens for a nose! 

Our house is filled with embarrassing pictures of me—me as a baby in 
baggy diapers, me with food all over my face, me crying after scraping my knee, 
me hitting my sister... 

Anyway, Dad had just returned from a trip to the Grand Tetons. That’s a 
mountain range in Wyoming—part of the Rocky Mountains. He was all worked 
up about the pictures he took there. 

“I wish you kids had seen those bears,” Dad said. “A whole family of them. 



The cubs reminded me of you two—always teasing each other.” 

Teasing. Ha. Dad thinks Nicole and I tease each other. That’s putting it 
mildly. Nicole—Miss Know-it-all—drives me crazy. 

Sometimes I wish she’d never been born. I’ve made it my mission to make 
her feel the same way. I mean, I try to make her wish she’d never been born. 

“You should have taken us with you to the Grand Tetons, Dad,” I 
complained. 

“It’s very cold in Wyoming this time of year,” Nicole said. 

“How do you know, Brainiac?” I jabbed her in the ribs. “You’ve never been 
to Wyoming.” 

“I read up on it while Dad was away,” she explained. Of course. “There’s a 
picture book about it in the library if you want to know more, Jordan. It’s just 
right for you—it’s for first graders.” 

I couldn’t think of anything to say back. That’s my problem. I’m too slow 
with the comebacks. So I jabbed her again. 

“Hey, hey,” Dad murmured. “No jabbing. I’m working here.” 

Dumb Nicole. Not that she’s dumb—she’s really smart. But in a dumb way 
—that’s my opinion. She’s so smart she skipped fifth grade—and landed in my 
class. She’s a year younger than I am and she’s in my class —and she gets 
straight A’s. 

Dad’s pictures floated in the chemical bath, slowly becoming clear. “Did it 
snow in the mountains while you were there, Dad?” I asked. 

“Sure, it snowed,” Dad replied. He was concentrating on his work. 

“Did you go skiing?” I asked. 

Dad shook his head. “I was too busy working.” 

“How about ice-skating?” Nicole asked. 

Nicole acts as if she knows everything. But like me, she’d never seen snow, 
either. We’d never left Southern California—and you could tell by looking at us. 

We’re both tan all year round. Nicole’s hair is greenish-blond from the 
chlorine in the community pool, and mine is brown with blond streaks. We’re on 
the school swim team. 

“I’ll bet it’s snowing at Mom’s house right now,” Nicole said. 

“Could be,” Dad replied. 

Mom and Dad are divorced. Mom just moved to Pennsylvania. We’re going 
to spend the summer with her. But we stayed in California with Dad to finish out 
the school year. 



Mom sent us some pictures of her new house. It was covered with snow. I 
stared at the pictures, trying to imagine the cold. 

“I wish we stayed at Mom’s house while you were gone,” I said. 

“Jordan, we’ve been over this.” Dad sounded a little impatient. “You can 
visit your mother when she’s settled. She hasn’t even bought furniture yet. 
Where would you sleep?” 

“I’d rather sleep on a bare floor than listen to Mrs. Witchens snoring on the 
couch,” I grumbled. 

Mrs. Witchens stayed with Nicole and me while Dad was away. She was a 
nightmare. Every morning we had to clean our rooms—she actually inspected 
them for dust. Every single night she served us liver, brussels sprouts, and fish- 
head soup with a tall glass of soy milk. 

“Her name’s not Witchens ,” Nicole corrected me. “It’s Hitchens .” 

“I know that, Sicole,” I retorted. 

Under the red light in the darkroom, the photos grew clearer. I heard 
excitement in Dad’s voice. 

“If these shots come out well, I can publish them in a book,” he said. “I will 
call it The Brown Bears of Wyoming, by Garrison Blake. Yes, that has a nice ring 
to it.” 

He stopped to pull a photo out of the liquid. It dripped as he stared at it. 

“That’s weird,” he murmured. 

“What’s weird?” Nicole asked. 

He set the picture down without saying anything. Nicole and I glanced at it. 

“Dad—” Nicole said. “I hate to break it to you, but that looks like a teddy 
bear.” 

It was a picture of a teddy bear. A stuffed brown toy bear with a lopsided 
grin, sitting in the grass. Not the kind of creature you usually find in the Grand 
Tetons. 

“There must be some mistake,” Dad said. “Wait until the rest of the photos 
develop. You’ll see. They’re amazing.” 

He pulled up another picture. He studied it. “Huh?” 

I grabbed the photo. Another teddy bear. 

Dad picked up a third picture. Then a fourth. He moved faster and faster. 

“More teddy bears!” he cried. He was frantic. Even in the darkroom, I could 
see the panic on his face. 

“What’s going on?” he shouted. “Where are the photos I took?” 



2 


“Dad—” Nicole began. “Are you sure those bears you saw were real?” 

“Of course I’m sure!” Dad boomed at her. “I know the difference between a 
brown bear and a teddy bear!” 

He began to pace back and forth across the darkroom floor. “Did I lose the 
film somehow?” he murmured, clutching his head with one hand. “Could 
someone have switched it?” 

“The weird part is that you were taking pictures of bears,” Nicole noted. 
“And you ended up with teddy bears. That’s just so strange.” 

Dad furiously tapped his hands on the developing table. He muttered to 
himself. He was starting to lose it. 

“Did I lose the film on the plane somehow? Switch carry-on bags with 
someone else, maybe?” 

I turned my back to Dad, my shoulders shaking. 

“Jordan? What’s the matter?” Dad grabbed my shoulders. “Are you all 
right?” 

He spun me around. “Jordan!” Dad cried. “You’re—laughing!” 

Nicole crossed her arms. She narrowed her eyes at me. “What did you do to 
Dad’s pictures?” 

Dad frowned. His voice was calmer now. “All right, Jordan. What’s the big 
joke?” 

I gasped for breath, trying to stop laughing. “Don’t worry, Dad. Your 
pictures are okay.” 

He shoved one of the teddy bear shots in my face. “Okay! You call this 
okay?!” 

“I borrowed your camera before you left for Wyoming,” I explained. “I 
took a bunch of shots of my old teddy bear, for a joke. The rest of the film 
should have your real bears on it.” 

I can’t resist a good practical joke. 

Nicole said, “I had nothing to do with it, Dad. I swear.” 

Little Miss Goody-Goody. 

Dad shook his head. “A joke?” He turned back to the photos and developed 
a few more. The next shot showed a real bear cub fishing in a stream. Dad 



laughed. 

“You know,” he said, putting the picture of the real bear next to one of the 
teddy bear shots, “they don’t look as different as you’d think.” 

I knew Dad wouldn’t stay angry. He never does. That’s one reason I like to 
play tricks on him. He likes to play practical jokes, too. 

“Did I ever tell you about the trick I pulled on Joe Morrison?” he asked. Joe 
Morrison is a photographer friend of Dad’s. 

“Joe had just gotten back from Africa, where he had spent months 
photographing gorillas. He was all excited about these fabulous gorilla shots 
he’d taken. I saw the pictures, and they were really spectacular. 

“Joe had a big meeting set up with the editor of a nature magazine. He was 
going to go in and show the editor these photos. He was sure the magazine 
would snap them up in a second. 

“Joe didn’t know that the editor and I had gone to college together. So I 
called her up and asked her to help me play a little joke on Joe. 

“When Joe went to see her, he showed her the pictures. She looked at them 
without saying a word. 

“Finally he couldn’t stand the suspense any longer. He blurted out, ‘Well? 
Do you like them or not?’ He’s an impatient guy, Joe.” 

“What did she say?” I asked. 

“She frowned and said, ‘You’re a good photographer, Mr. Morrison. But 
I’m afraid you’ve been tricked. The creatures you photographed aren’t gorillas at 
all.’ 

“Joe’s jaw practically fell off his face. He said, ‘What do you mean, they’re 
not gorillas?’ 

“She said, with a perfectly straight face, ‘They’re people in gorilla suits. 
Can’t you tell the difference between a real gorilla and a man in a gorilla suit, 
Mr. Morrison?”’ 

I chuckled. Nicole asked, “Then what happened?” 

“Joe practically had a nervous breakdown. He snatched up the photos and 
stared at them. He shouted, ‘I don’t get it! How could that happen? I spent six 
months of my life studying people in gorilla suits?’ 

“Finally the editor burst out laughing and told him it was a joke. She loved 
the photos and wanted to publish them. Joe wouldn’t believe her at first—it took 
her fifteen minutes to get him to calm down.” 

Dad and I both laughed. 



“I think that’s really mean, Dad,” Nicole scolded. 

I get my joker streak from Dad. Nicole takes after Mom. She’s more 
practical. 

“Joe thought it was funny once he got over the shock,” Dad assured her. 
“He’s played his share of tricks on me, believe me.” 

Dad swished another photo through the chemical bath. Then he held it up 
with his tongs. It showed two bear cubs wrestling. He smiled with satisfaction. 

“This roll came out great,” he said. “But I’ve got a lot more work to do in 
here, kids. Go on outside for a while, okay?” 

He turned the red light off and flipped on the normal light. Nicole opened 
the door. 

“Don’t get all messed up and dirty, though,” Dad added. “We’re all going 
out to dinner tonight. I want to celebrate my luck with the brown bears.” 

“We’ll be careful,” Nicole promised. 

“Speak for yourself,” I said. 

“I mean it, Jordan,” Dad warned. 

“Just kidding, Dad.” 

A wave of heat blasted us when we opened the darkroom door. Nicole and I 
stepped out into the backyard, blinking in the afternoon sun. It always takes my 
eyes a long time to adjust after I’ve been in the darkroom. 

“What do you want to do?” Nicole asked. 

“I don’t know,” I replied. “It’s so hot. It’s too hot to do much of anything.” 

Nicole closed her eyes and zoned out for a minute. 

“Nicole?” I nudged her. “Nicole? What are you doing?” 

“I’m thinking about the snow in Dad’s pictures of the Grand Tetons. I 
thought it would make me feel cooler.” 

She stood perfectly still with her eyes closed. A bead of sweat dripped 
down her forehead. 

“Well?” I asked. “Is it working?” 

She opened her eyes and shook her head. “No. How can I imagine snow if 
I’ve never felt it?” 

“Good point.” I sighed and gazed around me. 

We live in a subdivision in the suburbs of Pasadena. There are only three 
different kinds of houses in our neighborhood. The same three house styles are 
repeated for miles around. 

It’s so boring to look at, it makes me feel even hotter, somehow. Each block 



has a couple of palm trees, not enough to give much shade. There’s a vacant lot 
across the street from us, next door to the Millers’. The most exciting feature of 
our backyard—maybe the whole block—is Dad’s disgusting compost heap. 

I squinted and stared some more. Everything appeared bleached in the 
sunlight. Even the grass looked almost white. 

“I’m so bored I could scream,” I complained. 

“Let’s ride our bikes,” Nicole suggested. “Maybe the breeze will cool us 

off.” 

“Maybe Lauren will want to go with us,” I added. 

Lauren Sax lives next door to us. She’s in our class at school. I see her so 
often, she might as well be my sister. 

We rolled out our bikes from the garage and walked them over to Lauren’s. 
We left our bikes at the side of her house. Then we went around back. 

We found Lauren sitting on a towel under a palm tree in her backyard. 
Nicole sat beside Lauren on the towel. I leaned against the tree. 

“It’s so hot!” Lauren whined. She tugged on her yellow shorts. She’s tall 
and muscular, with long brown hair and bangs. 

She has a nasal voice, good for complaining. “This is supposed to be winter. 
It’s winter everywhere else. A normal winter has snow and ice and sleet and 
freezing rain and cold, cold air. What do we get? Nothing but sun! Why do we 
have to be so hot?” 

Suddenly I felt a pain in my back. 

“Ow!” I jerked forward. Something stabbed me. Something stinging sharp 
—and ice cold! My face twisted in pain. 

“Jordan!” Nicole gasped. “What’s wrong? What’s wrong?” 



3 


I clutched the icy spot on my back. “What is it?” I cried. “It’s so cold!” 

Nicole jumped to her feet and examined my back. “Jordan, you’ve been 
stabbed!” she announced. “With a purple Popsicle!” 

As I turned around I heard mean laughter. The Miller twins jumped out 
from behind the tree. 

I should’ve known. The Miller twins—Kyle and Kara. The twin pug noses, 
the beady little eyes, the matching short-cropped red hair. Yuck. They carried 
twin Super Soakers, red ones. 

The Miller twins love practical jokes. They’re worse than I am. And much 
meaner. 

Everyone in the neighborhood is afraid of them. They pounce on little kids 
waiting at the bus stop and rob them of their lunch money. Once they blew up 
the Saxes’ mailbox with a stink bomb. Last year, Kyle sucker-punched me 
during a basketball game. He thought it was funny to watch me turn purple. 

The Millers like to pick on me more than anyone, for some reason. 

Kara is just as scary as her brother Kyle. I hate to admit it, but Kara can 
take me out with one punch. I know that for a fact. She gave me a black eye last 
summer. 

“‘Oh, it’s so hot. It’s so hot!”’ Kara sneered, making fun of Lauren’s whiny 
voice. 

Kyle flipped his Super Soaker from one hand to the other behind his back. 
He tried to make it look like a really complicated move. 

“Arnold taught me how to do that,” he bragged. 

Kyle wanted me to think he was talking about Arnold Schwarzenegger. He 
claims he knows Arnold. I have my doubts. 

Nicole tugged on the back of my shirt. “Dad’s going to kill you, Jordan,” 
she said. 

“Why?” 

I craned my neck backwards. The back of my white polo shirt was stained 
dark purple. 

“Oh, great,” I muttered. 

“Dad said not to get messed up,” Nicole reminded me. As if I needed to be 



reminded. 

“Don’t worry, Jordan,” Kyle said. “We’ll clean it off for you.” 

“Uh—that’s okay,” I murmured, backing away. Whatever Kyle meant by 
“clean it off”, I knew I wouldn’t like it. 

I was right. 

He and Kara raised their Super Soakers and squirted me, Nicole, and 
Lauren. 

“Stop it!” Lauren screamed. “You’re getting us all wet!” 

Kyle and Kara laughed their maniac laughs. “You said you were hot!” 

They drenched us. My shirt was so wet I could wring a glass of water out of 
it. I glared at them. 

Kyle shrugged. “We were only trying to help.” 

Yeah. Sure they were. 

I should’ve been grateful that all they did was soak us. We got off easy. 

I can’t stand the Miller twins. Neither can Nicole and Lauren. They think 
they’re so hot. Just because they’re thirteen and they have a swimming pool in 
their backyard. 

Their father works at a movie studio. They’re always bragging about how 
they go to sneak previews and hang out with movie stars. 

I haven’t seen a movie star show up at their house yet. Not once. 

“Aw, you’re all wet,” Kara said, sneering. “Why don’t you take a bike ride 
to dry off?” 

Nicole and I exchanged glances. When we’re alone, we don’t get along so 
well. But when the Millers are around, we have to stick together. 

We knew the Millers too well. They wouldn’t mention our bikes without a 
reason. A bad reason. 

“What did you do to our bikes?” Nicole demanded. 

The Millers faked wide-eyed innocence. “Who—us? We didn’t do anything 
to your precious bikes. Go see for yourself.” 

Nicole and I glanced around the side of Lauren’s house, where we’d left our 
bikes. 

“They look okay from here,” Nicole whispered. 

“There’s something wrong with them,” I said. “They look weird.” 

We approached our bikes. They looked weird all right. The handlebars had 
been unscrewed and twisted backwards. 

“Hope you have reverse gear,” Kyle snickered. 



Normally, I’m not the kind of guy who goes around getting into fights. But 
something in me snapped. This time Kyle and Kara had gone too far. 

I jumped on Kyle. We tumbled to the ground. We wrestled. I tried to pin 
him with my knee, but he pushed me over onto my side. 

“Stop it!” Nicole screamed. “Stop it!” 

Kyle rolled me onto my back. “You thought you could jump me, Jordan? 
You’re too big a wimp!” 

I kicked him. He pinned my shoulder to the ground with one knee. 

Nicole shouted hysterically, “Jordan! Look out!” 

I glanced up. Kara stood over me, clutching a rock the size of her head. A 
mean grin spread across her face. 

“Drop it, Kara!” Kyle ordered. 

I tried to roll out of the way, but I couldn’t move. Kyle had me pinned. 

Kara heaved the rock. Then she let it drop—right onto my head. 



4 


I squeezed my eyes shut. 

The rock landed on my forehead—and bounced off. 

I opened my eyes. Kara laughed like a hyena. She picked up the rock and 
dropped it on my face again. It bounced off, just like the first time. 

Lauren grabbed it. “It’s made of sponge,” she announced. She squeezed it 
in her hand. “It’s a fake.” 

Kyle laughed. “It’s a movie prop, moron.” 

“You should’ve seen your face,” Kara added. “What a chicken!” 

I kicked Kyle off me and pounced on him again. This time I was so mad I 
had the strength of two Kyles. I wrestled him to the ground. I had him pinned! 

“What’s going on, guys?” 

Uh-oh. Dad. 

I leaped to my feet. “Hi, Dad. We were just kidding around.” 

Kyle sat up, rubbing his elbow. 

Dad didn’t even seem to notice that we’d been fighting. He was excited 
about something. 

“Listen, kids—I have great news. Wilderness magazine just called. They 
want to fly me to Alaska!” 

“Great, Dad,” I said sarcastically. “You get to go on another exciting trip 
while we stay here and die of boredom.” 

“And heat,” Nicole added. 

Dad laughed. “I called Mrs. Hitchens to see if she could come stay with you 
again—” he began. 

“Not Mrs. Hitchens again!” I cried. “Dad, she’s horrible! I can’t stand her 
cooking. I’ll starve to death if she stays with us!” 

“You will not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “Even if you ate only bread and water, 
you could survive a week easily.” 

“Nicole? Jordan? Hello?” Dad said, knocking lightly on our heads. “Will 
you please listen to me? I haven’t finished yet.” 

“Sorry, Dad.” 

“Anyway, Mrs. Hitchens can’t come. So, I guess you two will just have to 



come along with me.” 

“To Alaska?” I cried. I was too excited to believe it. 

“Hurray!” Nicole yelled. We jumped up and down. 

“You guys are so lucky!” Lauren said. Kara and Kyle stood by. Saying 
nothing. 

“We’re going to Alaska!” I shouted. “We’ll get to see snow! Tons of snow! 
Alaskan snow!” 

I was thrilled. And Dad hadn’t even told us the interesting part yet. 

“It’s a strange project,” Dad continued. “They want me to track down some 
kind of snow creature—an Abominable Snowman.” 

“Wow!” I gasped. 

Kyle and Kara snorted. 

Nicole shook her head. “An Abominable Snowman? Has anybody really 
seen him?” 

Dad nodded. “Some kind of snow creature has been spotted. Who knows 
what it really is. Whatever it is, the magazine wants me to shoot photos of it. I’m 
sure it’s a wild-goose chase. There’s no such thing as an Abominable 
Snowman.” 

“So why are you going?” Nicole asked. 

I poked her in the ribs. “Who cares? We’re going to Alaska!” 

“The magazine is paying a big fee,” Dad explained. “And even if we don’t 
find a snow creature, I’ll still get some great shots of the tundra.” 

Lauren asked, “What’s a tundra?” 

Dad began to reply, but Nicole stepped forward. “I’ll handle this one, Dad,” 
she interrupted. I felt like screaming. She does that in school all the time, too. 

“A tundra is a huge frozen plain. It exists in the Arctic, in Alaska, and in 
Russia. The word tundra comes from the Russian, meaning—” 

I clapped my hand over her big mouth. “Any other questions, Lauren?” 

Lauren shook her head. “That’s all I needed to know.” 

“Egghead here goes on forever if you don’t stop her.” I let go of Nicole’s 
mouth. She stuck her tongue out at me. 

“This trip is going to be great,” I cried happily. “We’ll see ice and snow for 
real! We’re going hunting for an Abominable Snowman! Awesome!” 

An hour earlier we’d been bored out of our minds. Now suddenly 
everything had changed. 

Dad smiled. “I’ve got to go back to the darkroom for a while. Don’t forget 



—we’re going out to dinner tonight.” He wandered back across the lawn and 
into the house. 

As soon as Dad was gone, Kara started laughing. “An Abominable 
Snowman! What a joke!” 

Typical Kara—she was too chicken to say a word while Dad was around. 

Kyle made fun of me, jumping up and down and squealing, “Alaska! 
Alaska! I’ll get to see snow!” 

“You both will probably turn blue and freeze,” Kara sneered. 

“We’ll be fine,” Nicole said. “It’s your turn to freeze!” She grabbed Kara’s 
Super Soaker and sent a spray of water into Kara’s face. 

“Stop it!” Kyle shouted. He dove at Nicole. Nicole laughed and ran away, 
turning around to soak them every few feet. 

“Give that back!” Kara yelled. 

The Millers chased Nicole. Kyle raised his Super Soaker and let Nicole 
have it in the back. 

Lauren and I ran after them. Nicole raced into our backyard. She turned 
around and squirted the Millers again. 

“You can’t catch me!” she cried, shooting and walking backward. 

She was backing right into Dad’s compost heap. 

Should I warn her? I thought. 

No way. 

“Take that!” she shouted, blasting the Millers with water. 

Then she slipped and fell backward—into the compost heap. 

“Yuck,” Lauren groaned. 

Nicole stood up slowly. Greenish-brown slime oozed in her hair and 
dripped down her back, her arms, and her legs. “Ugh!” she screamed, frantically 
wiping the glop off her hands. “Uggghhh!” 

We all stood and stared. She looked like some kind of Abominable 
Snowman herself. All covered in glop. 

We were still staring when Dad popped his head out the back door. “You 
kids ready to go to dinner?” he called. 



5 


“There it is!” Dad shouted over the roar of the small plane’s engine. “Iknek. 
That’s the airstrip.” 

I stared out the window at the tiny brown patch where we’d be landing. For 
the last half hour I’d seen nothing but miles and miles of snow. Wow. It was so 
white ! 

It was cool the way the snow sparkled in the sunlight. It made me think of 
Christmas carols. I couldn’t get “Winter Wonderland” out of my head—and it 
was driving me crazy! 

I watched for giant footprints as we flew. How big would an Abominable 
Snowman’s footsteps be? Big enough to see from a low-flying plane? 

“I hope there’s a restaurant down there,” Nicole said. “I’m starving.” 

Dad patted her shoulder. “We’ll have a big, hot meal before we set out. But 
after that, it’s camping food.” 

“How are we going to build a fire in the snow?” Nicole asked. 

“We’ll be staying in a little cabin,” Dad replied. “It’s a long way out in the 
tundra, but it’s better than sleeping in tents. There should be a stove in the cabin. 
I hope so, anyway.” 

“Can we build an igloo and sleep in that?” I asked. “Or dig out an ice 
cave?” 

“You can’t build an igloo just like that, Jordan,” Nicole snapped. “It’s not 
like a snow fort or something. Right, Dad?” 

Dad took the lens cap off his camera and started taking pictures through the 
plane window. “Sure,” he said absently. “Uh-huh.” 

Nicole turned to the window, too. I mimicked her behind her back. You 
can’t build an igloo just like that, I mouthed. She acts like she’s my teacher or 
something. It’s really embarrassing when she does it in front of everybody at 
school. 

“How are we going to find the cabin?” Nicole asked. “Everything looks the 
same in all this snow.” 

Dad turned and snapped a picture of her. “Did you say something, Nicole?” 

“I was wondering how we’re going to find the cabin,” Nicole repeated. “Do 
you know how to use a compass, Dad?” 



“A compass? No, but that doesn’t matter. A man named Arthur Maxwell is 
supposed to meet us at the airport. He’ll be our guide through the tundra.” 

“I know Arthur,” the pilot shouted back to us. “He’s an old musher from 
way back. Knows everything about dogs and sleds. He knows this part of Alaska 
better than anybody, I guess.” 

“Maybe he’s seen the Abominable Snowman,” I suggested. 

“How do you know there is such a thing?” Nicole taunted. “We haven’t 
seen any sign of him yet.” 

“Nicole, people have seen him with their own eyes,” I replied. “And if 
there’s no such thing, what are we doing here?” 

“Some people say they’ve seen him,” Nicole said. “Or maybe they think 
they’ve seen one. I won’t believe it until I get more facts.” 

The plane circled the small town. I played with the zipper on my new 
Arctic jacket. I’d been hungry a few minutes earlier, but now I was too excited to 
think about food. 

There really is an Abominable Snowman down there, I thought. I know 
there is. I felt a chill, despite a blast of hot air from the plane’s heater. 

What if we find him? What will happen then? 

What will happen if the Abominable Snowman doesn’t like to be 
photographed? 

The plane flew very low now, getting ready to land. We touched down with 
a bump and taxied along the runway. The plane lurched as the pilot put on the 
brakes. 

Something big loomed at the end of the runway. Something huge, white, 
and monstrous. 

“Dad, look!” I cried. “I see him! The Abominable Snowman!” 



6 


The plane squealed to a stop right in front of the big monster. 

Dad, Nicole, and the pilot all laughed—at me. 

I hate that. But I couldn’t blame them. The big white monster was a polar 

bear. 

A statue of a polar bear. 

“The polar bear is the symbol of the town,” the pilot explained. 

“Oh,” I murmured. I knew I was blushing. I turned away. 

“Jordan knew that,” Dad said. “He was just playing one of his practical 
jokes.” 

“Uh—yeah.” I went along with it. “I knew it was a statue all along.” 

“You did not, Jordan,” Nicole said. “You were really scared!” 

I punched Nicole in the arm. “I was not! It was a joke.” 

Dad put an arm around each of us. “Isn’t it great the way these two kid each 
other?” he said to the pilot. 

“If you say so,” the pilot replied. 

We hopped out of the plane. The pilot opened the cargo hold. Nicole and I 
grabbed our backpacks. 

Dad had brought a huge, airtight trunk for film, cameras, food, sleeping 
bags, and other supplies. The pilot helped him carry it off the airstrip. 

The trunk was so big, Dad could fit inside it. It reminded me of a red plastic 
coffin. 

Iknek Airport was like a tiny wooden house, just two rooms. Two pilots in 
leather jackets sat at a table playing cards. 

A tall, brawny man with dark hair, a thick beard, and leathery skin stood up 
and crossed the room to greet us. His gray parka hung open over a flannel shirt 
and deerskin pants. 

This must be our guide, I realized. 

“Mr. Blake?” the man said to Dad. His voice was low and hoarse. “I’m 
Arthur Maxwell. Need some help there?” He grabbed one end of the trunk from 
the pilot. 

“This is an awfully big trunk you brought,” Arthur added. “Do you really 
need all this stuff?” 



Dad reddened. “I’ve got a lot of cameras, tripods and things.... Well, maybe 
I overpacked.” 

Arthur frowned at me and Nicole. “I’d say so.” 

“Call me Garry,” Dad said. “These are my kids, Jordan and Nicole.” He 
nodded toward us. 

Nicole said “Hi,” and I added, “Nice to meet you.” I can be polite when I 
have to be. 

Arthur stared at us. Then he grunted. 

“You didn’t mention kids,” he mumbled to Dad after a minute. 

“I’m sure I did,” Dad protested. 

“I don’t remember it,” Arthur replied, frowning. 

Everyone was silent. We pushed through the airport door and started down 
the muddy road. 

“I’m hungry,” I said. “Let’s go into town and get some food.” 

“How far is it to town, Arthur?” Dad asked. 

“How far?” Arthur echoed. “You’re looking at it.” 

I stared around in surprise. There was only one road. It began at the airport 
and ended in a pile of snow about two blocks away. A few wooden buildings 
were sprinkled along it. 

“This is it?” I cried. 

“It’s not Pasadena,” Arthur grumbled. “But we call it home.” 

He led us down the muddy road to a diner called Betty’s. 

“I guess you’re hungry,” he grumbled. “Might as well eat a hot meal before 
we set out.” 

We settled into a booth by a window. Nicole and I ordered hamburgers, 
french fries, and Cokes. Dad and Arthur ordered coffee and beef stew. 

“I’ve got a sled and four dogs ready to go,” Arthur announced. “The dogs 
can pull this trunk of yours and the other supplies. We’ll walk beside the sled.” 

“That sounds fine,” Dad said. 

“Whoa!!” I protested. “We’re walking? How far?” 

“Ten miles or so,” Arthur replied. 

“Ten miles!” I’d never walked that far before. “Why do we have to walk? 
Why can’t we take a helicopter or something?” 

“Because I want to take photos along the way, Jordan,” Dad explained. 
“The landscape is fascinating. You never know what we’ll come across.” 

Maybe we’ll come across the Abominable Snowman, I thought. That would 



be cool. 

Our food arrived. We all ate in silence. Arthur wouldn’t look me in the eye. 
He wouldn’t look any of us in the eye. He stared out the window while he ate. 
Outside on the street, a Jeep drove by. 

“Have you ever seen this snow creature we’re looking for?” Dad asked 
Arthur. 

Arthur speared a piece of meat with his fork and popped it into his mouth. 
He chewed. He chewed some more. Dad, Nicole, and I all watched him, waiting 
for his answer. 

Finally he swallowed. “Never seen it,” he said. “Heard about it, though. 
Lots of stories.” 

I waited to hear one of the stories. But Arthur kept on eating. 

I couldn’t stand waiting any longer. “What kind of stories?” 

He swabbed at some gravy with his bread. He stuffed it into his mouth. 
Chewed. Swallowed. 

“A couple of people in town,” he said. “They’ve seen the monster.” 
“Where?” Dad asked. 

“Out by the big snow ridge,” Arthur said. “Beyond the musher’s cabin. 
Where we’re staying.” 

“What does he look like?” I asked. 

“They say he’s big,” Arthur said. “Big and covered with brown fur. You 
might think he’s a bear. But he’s not. He walks on two feet like a man.” 

I shuddered. The Abominable Snowman sounded a lot like a vicious cave 
monster I saw in a horror movie once. 

Arthur shook his head. “Personally, I hope we never find him.” 

Dad’s jaw dropped. “But that’s what we’re here for. It’s my job to find him 
—if he exists.” 

“He exists all right,” Arthur declared. “Friend of mine—another musher— 
he was out in a blizzard one day. Ran smack into the snow monster.” 

“What happened?” I asked. 

“You don’t want to know.” Arthur stuffed more bread into his mouth. 

“We certainly do want to know,” Dad persisted. 

Arthur stroked his beard. “The monster picked up one of the dogs and made 
off with him. My friend chased after him, trying to get the dog back. Never 
found him. But he could hear the dog whining. Pitiful howls. Whatever 
happened to that dog—it sounded pretty bad.” 



“He’s probably a carnivore,” Nicole said. “A meat-eater. Most animals 
around here are. There’s so little vegetation—” 

I jabbed Nicole. “I want to hear about the snowman—not your stupid nature 
facts.” 

Arthur flashed Nicole an annoyed glance. I figured he was thinking, What 
planet is she from? That’s what I’m usually thinking, anyway. 

He cleared his throat and continued. “My friend came back to town. He and 
another guy went out to try and capture the snow monster. Darn foolish, if you 
ask me.” 

“What happened to them?” I asked. 

“Don’t know,” Arthur said. “They never came back.” 

“Huh?” I gaped at the big guide. I swallowed hard. “Excuse me? Did you 
say they never came back?” 

Arthur nodded solemnly. “They never came back.” 



7 


“Maybe they got lost in the tundra,” Dad suggested. 

“Doubt it,” Arthur said. “Those two knew what they were doing. The 
monster killed them. That’s what happened.” 

He paused to butter another slice of bread. 

“Close your mouth, Jordan,” Nicole said. “I don’t want to look at your 
chewed-up french fries.” 

I guess my mouth had been hanging open. I shut it and swallowed. 

Arthur seems like a weird guy, I thought. But he’s not lying to us. He 
definitely believes in the Abominable Snowman. 

Nicole asked him, “Has anyone else seen the snow monster?” 

“Yep. A couple of TV people from New York. They heard about what 
happened to my friend and came to town to investigate. They set out into the 
tundra. Never came back, either. We found one of them, frozen to death in a 
block of ice. Who knows what became of the other. 

“Then Mrs. Carter—she lives at the end of Main Street—she saw the snow 
monster a few days later,” Arthur continued in a low voice. “She was looking 
through her telescope and spied him out in the tundra. He was chewing on bones, 
she said. Don’t believe me, go ask her yourself.” 

Dad made a noise. I glanced at him. He was trying to keep from laughing. 

I didn’t see what was so funny. This snow monster sounded pretty scary to 
me. 

Arthur glared at Dad. “You don’t have to believe me if you don’t want to, 
Mr. Blake,” he said. 

“Call me Garry,” Dad repeated. 

“I’ll call you what I please, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said sharply. “What I’m 
telling you is true. That monster is real—and he’s a killer! You’re taking a big 
risk, chasing after him. No one has ever caught him. Anyone who goes out after 
him... doesn’t return.” 

“We’ll take our chances,” Dad said. “I’ve heard stories like this before, in 
other parts of the world. Stories about monsters in the jungle or weird creatures 
in the ocean. So far the stories have never turned out to be true. I have a feeling 
the Abominable Snowman will be no different.” 



Part of me really wanted to see the snow creature. But part of me hoped 
Dad was right. I don’t deserve to die, I thought—just because I want to see 
snow! 

“Well,” Dad said, wiping his mouth. “Let’s get going. Everybody ready?” 

“I’m ready,” Nicole piped up. 

“Me too,” I said. I couldn’t wait to get out in the snow. 

Arthur said nothing. Dad paid the lunch check. 

We waited for change. “Dad,” I asked, “what if the Abominable Snowman 
is real? What if we run into him? What will we do?” 

He pulled something small and black out of his coat pocket. 

“This is a radio transmitter,” he explained. “If we get into any kind of 
trouble out in the wilderness, I can radio the ranger station in town. They’ll send 
a helicopter to rescue us.” 

“What kind of trouble, Dad?” Nicole asked. 

“I’m sure there won’t be any trouble,” Dad assured us. “But it’s good to be 
prepared for emergencies. Right, Arthur?” 

Arthur smacked his lips and cleared his throat. But he didn’t reply. I figured 
he was angry because Dad didn’t believe his stories about the snow monster. 

Dad returned the radio transmitter to his coat pocket. He left a tip for the 
waitress. Then we spilled outside into the cold Alaskan air, ready to head out for 
the frozen tundra. 

Was an Abominable Snowman waiting for us somewhere out there? 

We would soon find out. 



8 


Smack! 

Bulls-eye. I hit Nicole in the middle of her backpack with a snowball. 

“Dad!” Nicole cried. “Jordan hit me with a snowball!” 

Dad had his camera in front of his face, clicking away, as usual. “Good for 
you, Nicole,” he said absently. Nicole rolled her eyes. 

Then she ripped off my ski cap. She stuffed it with snow and smushed it on 
top of my head. 

Snow trickled down my face. The cold burned my skin. 

At first I thought snow was cool. I could mush it up in my hand to make 
snowballs. Fall down in it without getting hurt. Put it on my tongue and let it 
melt into water. 

But I was beginning to feel the cold. My toes and fingers were getting 
numb. We had already walked two miles out of town. When I looked back, I 
couldn’t see it. I could only see snow and sky. 

Only eight more miles to the cabin, I thought, wiggling my fingers inside 
my mittens. Eight more miles! It was going to take forever. And all around us, 
nothing but snow—miles and miles of it. 

Dad and Arthur trudged beside the dogsled. Arthur had brought along four 
Alaskan huskies—Binko, Rocky, Tin-tin, and Nicole’s favorite, Lars. They 
pulled Dad’s big trunk and the other supplies in a long, narrow sled. 

Nicole and I each carried a backpack filled with emergency food and other 
supplies. Just in case, Dad said. 

In case of what? I wondered. In case we get lost? In case the dogs run away 
with the sled? In case the Abominable Snowman captures us? 

Dad snapped pictures of the dogs, of us, of Arthur, of the snow. 

Nicole threw herself backwards into a snowdrift. “Look—an angel!” she 
cried, waving her arms up and down. 

She jumped up and we checked out the snow angel. “Cool,” I admitted. I 
lay on my back to make one, too. When Nicole came closer to inspect it, I 
whopped her with a snowball. 

“Hey!” she cried. “I’m going to get you for that!” 

I leaped up and darted away. The deep snow crunched under my shoes. 



Nicole ran after me. We raced ahead of the dogsled. 

“Be careful, kids!” Dad called after us. “Stay out of trouble!” 

I stumbled in the snow. Nicole pounced on me. I wriggled free and bolted 
away. 

What kind of trouble could we get into? I thought as my feet crunched 
along. There’s nothing but snow for miles around. We couldn’t even get lost out 
here! 

I turned around and ran backwards, waving at Nicole. “Try and catch me, 
Miss Factoid!” I teased. 

“Name-calling is so immature!” she yelled, chasing after me. 

Then she stopped and pointed behind me. “Jordan! Look out!” 

“Hey—I’m not falling for that old trick,” I called back. I skipped backwards 
through the snow. I didn’t want to take my eyes off her, in case she planned to 
pelt me with snowballs. 

“Jordan, I mean it!” she screamed. “Stop!” 



9 


Thud! 

I landed hard on my back in a pile of snow. “Unh!” I grunted, stunned. 

I struggled to catch my breath. Then I stared around me. 

I had fallen down some kind of deep crevasse. I sat shivering in the pile of 
snow, surrounded by narrow cliffs of bluish ice and rock. 

I stood and looked up. The opening of the crevasse was at least twenty feet 
above me. Frantically, I clutched at the icy walls. I grabbed onto a jutting rock 
and fumbled for a foothold, hoping to climb out. 

I hoisted myself up a couple of feet. Then my hand slipped and I slid back 
to the bottom. I tried again. The ice was too slick. 

How would I ever get out of here? 

Where were Dad and Nicole? I tried to warm my cheeks with my mittens. 
Why don’t they come to get me? I’m going to freeze down here! 

Nicole’s face appeared at the top of the crevasse. I’d never been so happy to 
see her in my life. 

“Jordan? Are you all right?” 

“Get me out of here!” I shouted. 

“Don’t worry,” Nicole assured me. “Dad’s coming.” 

I leaned against the pit wall. The sunlight didn’t reach the bottom. My toes 
felt ready to break off. They were so cold! I jumped up and down to keep warm. 

A few minutes later, I heard Dad’s voice. “Jordan? Are you hurt?” 

“No, Dad!” I called up to him. He, Nicole, and Arthur all stared down at me 
from above. 

“Arthur is going to lower a rope down to you,” Dad instructed. “Hold on to 
it, and we’ll hoist you out of there.” 

I stepped aside as Arthur tossed one end of a knotted rope into the crevasse. 
I clutched the rope with my mittened hands. 

Arthur shouted, “Heave! ” 

Dad and Arthur tugged on the rope. I planted my feet in footholds in the 
ice, bracing myself against the side of the crevasse. The rope slipped out of my 
hands. I clutched it tighter. 

“Hold on, Jordan!” Dad called. 



They pulled again. My arms felt as if they were going to be yanked out of 
their sockets. “Ow!” I cried. “Careful!” 

Slowly they hoisted me to the top of the crevasse. I wasn’t much help—my 
feet kept slipping on the icy walls. Dad and Arthur each took one of my hands 
and dragged me out of the pit. 

I lay on the snow, trying to catch my breath. 

Dad tested my arms and legs for sprains and breaks. “You sure you’re all 
right?” he asked. 

I nodded. 

“It was a mistake to haul kids along,” Arthur grumbled. “The snow is not as 
solid as it looks, you know. If we hadn’t seen you fall, we never would have 
found you.” 

“We’ve got to be more careful,” Dad agreed. “I want you both to stick close 
to the sled.” He leaned over the side of the crevasse and snapped a picture. 

I stood up and brushed the snow from the seat of my pants. “I’ll be careful 
from now on,” I promised. 

“Good,” Dad said. 

“We’d better push on,” Arthur said. 

We started walking again across the snow. I gave Nicole a shove once in a 
while, and she shoved me back. But we were quieter now. Neither of us wanted 
to end up frozen to death at the bottom of a snow hole. 

Dad snapped away as we walked. “How much farther to the cabin?” he 
asked Arthur. 

“Another couple of miles,” Arthur replied. He pointed to a steep mountain 
of snow in the distance. “See that snow rise, about ten miles off? That’s where 
the monster was last spotted.” 

The Abominable Snowman had been seen by that snow rise, I thought. 
Where was he now? 

Could he see us coming? Was he hiding somewhere, watching us? 

I kept my eyes on the snow rise as we walked. It seemed to grow bigger as we 
came closer to it. The snow rise was dotted with pine trees and boulders. 

After about an hour, a tiny brown speck appeared a mile or so away. 

“That’s the abandoned musher’s cabin where we’ll stop for the night,” Dad 
explained. He rubbed his gloves together and added, “It sure will be nice to sit 
by a roaring fire.” 



I clapped my mittens together to keep the blood flowing through my hands. 
“I can’t wait,” I agreed. “It must be minus two thousand degrees out here!” 

“Actually, it’s about minus ten,” Nicole stated. “At least, that’s the average 
temperature for this area at this time of year.” 

“Thank you, Weather Girl,” I joked. “And now for sports. Arthur?” 

Arthur frowned into his beard. I guess he didn’t get the joke. 

He fell behind us a little to check the back of the sled. Dad turned around to 
snap Arthur’s picture. 

“When we get to the musher’s cabin I’ll take a few more scenery photos,” 
Dad said, as he changed his film. “Maybe I’ll photograph the cabin, too. Then 
we’ll all turn in. We have a big day tomorrow.” 

By the time we reached the cabin it was almost eight o’clock at night. 

“Took us too long to get here,” Arthur grumbled. “We left town after lunch. 
It should’ve taken us about five hours. The kids having accidents and all is 
slowing us down.” 

Dad stood a few feet away from him, shooting a portrait of Arthur while he 
talked. 

“Mr. Blake, did you hear me?” Arthur growled. “Stop taking my picture!” 

“What?” Dad said, letting his camera drop to his chest. “Oh, yeah—the 
kids. Bet they’re hungry.” 

I explored the musher’s cabin. It didn’t take long. The tiny wooden shack 
was empty except for an old wood-burning stove and a couple of broken-down 
cots. 

“Why is the cabin so empty?” Nicole asked. 

“Mushers don’t stop here anymore,” Arthur explained. “They’re afraid of 
the monster.” 

I didn’t like the sound of that. I glanced at Nicole. She rolled her eyes. 

Arthur bedded the dogs in a lean-to outside the cabin. The lean-to was a 
shed built against the back cabin wall. It was filled with straw for the dogs to 
sleep on. I spotted a rusty old dogsled propped in a corner. 

Then Arthur lit a fire and began to fix some supper. 

“Tomorrow we’ll search for this so-called monster,” Dad announced. 
“Everybody get a good night’s sleep.” 

After supper we crawled into our sleeping bags. I lay awake for a long time, 
listening to the howling wind outside. Listening for the thudding footsteps of an 
Abominable Snowman. 



“Nicole, get off me!” She rolled over in her sleeping bag and jabbed her elbow 
into my ribs. I knocked her arm away and snuggled deeper inside my own toasty 
warm sleeping bag. 

Nicole opened her eyes. Bright morning sunshine streamed into the cabin. 

“I’ll be back in a minute to fix breakfast, kids,” Dad said. He sat in a chair, 
lacing up his snow boots. “First I’m going out to check on the dogs. Arthur went 
out to feed them a few minutes ago.” 

He bundled up and stepped outside. I rubbed my nose—it was cold. The 
fire in the stove had gone out during the night. No one had relit it yet. 

I forced myself to climb out of my sleeping bag and start pulling on clothes. 
Nicole began dressing, too. 

“Do you think there’s a hot shower in this dump?” I wondered aloud. 

Nicole smirked at me. “You know perfectly well there’s no hot shower, 
Jordan.” 

“Oh, wow! This is incredible!” I heard Dad’s shout from outside. 

I jammed my feet into my boots and raced out the door. Nicole pushed right 
behind me. 

Dad stood at the side of the musher’s cabin, pointing in shock at the ground. 

I gazed down—and saw deep footprints in the snow. Huge footprints. 
Enormous footprints. 

So big that only a monster could have made them. 



10 


“Unbelievable,” Dad murmured, staring at the snow. 

Arthur hurried over from the lean-to. He stopped when he saw the prints. 

“No!” he cried. “He was here!” 

His ruddy face grew pale. His jaw trembled with terror. 

“We’ve got to get away from here—now!” he said to Dad in a low, 
frightened voice. 

Dad tried to calm him down. “Hold on a minute. Let’s not jump to 
conclusions.” 

“We’re in terrible danger!” Arthur insisted. “The monster is nearby! He’ll 
rip us all to shreds!” 

Nicole knelt in the snow, studying the footprints. “Do you think they’re 
real?” she asked. “Real Abominable Snowman footprints?” 

She thinks they’re real, I thought. She believes. 

Dad knelt beside her. “They look pretty real to me.” 

Then I saw a light glimmer in his eyes. He lifted his head and squinted at 
me suspiciously. 

I backed away. 

“Jordan!” Nicole cried in an accusing voice. 

I couldn’t help it. I started laughing. 

Dad shook his head. “Jordan. I should’ve known.” 

“What?” Arthur looked confused—and then angry. “You mean the kid 
made these prints? It’s a joke?” 

“I’m afraid so, Arthur,” Dad sighed. 

Arthur scowled at me. Beneath his beard, his face reddened to the color of a 
slab of raw steak. 

I cowered. I couldn’t help it. Arthur scared me. He sure didn’t like kids— 
especially not kids who play jokes. 

“I’ve got work to do,” Arthur muttered. He turned and stomped away 
through the snow. 

“Jordan, you crumb,” Nicole said. “When did you do it?” 

“I woke up early this morning and sneaked out,” I admitted. “You were all 



sleeping. I carved the footprints over my own prints, with my mittens. Then I 
stepped in the prints on my way back, to cover my tracks. 

“You believed,” I added, jabbing a finger at Nicole. “For a minute there, 
you believed in the snow monster.” 

“I did not!” Nicole protested. 

“Yes, you did. I got you to believe!” 

I glanced from Nicole’s peevish face to Dad’s stern one. “Don’t you think 
it’s funny?” I asked. “It’s just a joke!” 

Usually Dad liked my jokes. 

Not this time. 

“Jordan, we’re not at home in Pasadena now. We’re out in the middle of 
nowhere. The wilds of Alaska. Things could get very dangerous. You saw that 
yesterday when you fell down the crevasse.” 

I nodded and hung my head. 

“I’m serious, Jordan,” Dad warned me. “No more practical jokes. I’m here 
to work. And I don’t want anything to happen to you, or Nicole, or any of us. 
Understood?” 

“Yes, Dad.” 

No one said anything for a minute. Then Dad patted me on the back. “Okay, 
then. Let’s go inside and get some breakfast.” 

Arthur returned to the cabin a few minutes later. He stamped the snow off 
his boots, glaring at me. 

“You think you’re funny,” he muttered. “But wait till you see the snowman. 
Will you be laughing then?” 

I swallowed hard. 

The answer to his question was no. Definitely no. 



11 


After breakfast we hitched the dogs to the sled and set off for the snow rise. 
Arthur wouldn’t talk to me and would hardly look at me. I guess he was angry 
about my joke. 

Everybody else has forgiven me, I thought. Why won’t he? 

Nicole and I walked at the front of the sled with the dogs. Behind me I 
heard Dad’s camera clicking furiously. I knew that meant he’d found something 
good to photograph. I turned around. 

A large herd of elk moved toward us, toward the snow rise. We stopped to 
watch them. 

“Look at them,” Dad whispered. “Amazing.” He quickly loaded new film 
into his camera and started snapping away again. 

The elk calmly picked their way across the snow, antlers high. They 
stopped to eat at a stand of bushes. Arthur pulled back the rein on the lead sled 
dog to keep him from barking. 

Suddenly, one elk lifted its head. It seemed to sense something. 

The other elk tensed up, too. Then they turned and began to gallop away 
across the tundra. Their hooves thundered over the snow. 

Dad let his camera fall against his chest. “That’s strange,” he said. “I 
wonder what happened.” 

“Something scared them,” Arthur said grimly. “It wasn’t us. And it wasn’t 
the dogs.” 

Dad scanned the horizon. “What was it, then?” 

We all waited for Arthur’s answer. But he only said, “We ought to turn 
around and head back to town right now.” 

“We’re not going back,” Dad insisted. “Not after coming all this way.” 

Arthur stared at him. “Are you going to take my advice or not?” 

“No,” Dad replied. “I’ve got a job to do here. And I’ve hired you to do a 
job. We’re not going back without a good reason.” 

“We’ve got a good reason,” Arthur insisted. “Only you won’t see it that 
way.” 

“Push ahead,” Dad ordered. 

Arthur frowned and shouted “Mush!” to the dogs. The sled began to move. 



We followed it, on toward the snow rise. 

Nicole walked a few feet ahead of me. I picked up a pile of snow and patted 
it into a ball. But then I thought I’d better not throw it. No one seemed to be in 
the mood for snowball fights. 

We marched through the snow for a couple of hours. I slipped off my 
mittens and wiggled my fingers. Frost kept collecting on my upper lip. I wiped it 
away. 

We reached a stand of pine trees at the base of the snow rise. Suddenly the 
dogs stopped short. They began to bark. 

“Mush!” Arthur shouted. 

The dogs refused to go farther. 

Nicole ran up to her favorite dog, Lars. “What is it, Lars? What’s the 
matter?” 

Lars howled. 

“What’s wrong with them?” Dad asked Arthur. 

Arthur’s face paled again. His hands shook. He stared intently into the trees, 
squinting into the brightness. 

“Something’s frightened the dogs,” he said. “Look how their fur stands on 
end.” 

I patted Lars. It was true. His fur stood straight up. The dog growled. 

“Not much scares these dogs,” Arthur said. “Whatever it is, it’s scaring 
them bad.” 

The dogs all howled. 

Nicole huddled close to Dad. 

“There’s something dangerous on that snow rise,” Arthur said. “Something 
dangerous—and very near.” 



12 


“I’m warning you, Mr. Blake,” Arthur said. “We’ve got to go back.” 

“No way,” Dad protested. “We’re not going back. I mean it.” 

The dogs barked and skittered nervously. Arthur shook his head. “I won’t 
go any farther. The dogs won’t, either.” 

Dad shouted, “Mush!” to the dogs. They howled and started backing up. 

“Mush!” he cried again. Instead of going forward, the dogs tried to turn 
around in the snow. 

“You’re upsetting them,” Arthur said. “They won’t go any farther—I told 
you that. 

“If we turn around now,” Arthur added, “we can make it back to the cabin 
before it gets too late.” 

“What are we going to do, Dad?” I asked. 

Dad frowned. “Maybe Arthur’s right. Something is definitely frightening 
the dogs. There could be a bear or something nearby.” 

“Not a bear, Mr. Blake,” Arthur insisted. “These dogs are spooked. And so 
am I.” 

He marched away across the snow, heading back toward the musher’s 
cabin. 

“Arthur!” Dad called. “Come back here!” 

Arthur didn’t turn around. He didn’t say a word. He just kept walking. 

He must be really scared, I thought. And that sent a chill of fear down my 
back. 

Still barking excitedly, the dogs pulled the sled around and started 
following Arthur. 

Dad peered into the woods. “I wish I could see what’s out there.” 

“Let’s go check it out,” I urged. “Whatever it is, it’ll probably make a great 
photo.” That usually gets Dad. 

He glanced back at Arthur, the dogs, and the sled, rushing toward the cabin. 
“No—it’s too dangerous. We have no choice. Let’s go, kids.” 

We trudged back to the cabin. “Maybe I can persuade Arthur to push on 
tomorrow,” Dad muttered. 

I didn’t say anything. But I had a feeling it wouldn’t be easy to get Arthur 



to climb that snow rise. 

And maybe Arthur was right, I thought. Those dogs really were scared. It 
was definitely creepy. 

Arthur was unhitching the dogs from the sled when we reached the cabin. 
The dogs had calmed down a lot. 

I yanked off my backpack and collapsed on top of my sleeping bag. 

“We might as well eat supper,” Dad grumbled. I could tell he was in a 
terrible mood. “Jordan—why don’t you and Nicole go gather some firewood. 
But be careful.” 

“We will, Dad,” Nicole promised. 

I stood up and started out of the cabin. 

“Jordan!” Dad scolded. “Put your knapsack back on. I don’t want you going 
anywhere without it. Understood?” 

“We’re just going for firewood,” I protested. “I’m tired of carrying it. We’ll 
only be gone for a few minutes—and anyway, Nicole is wearing hers.” 

“No arguments,” Dad snapped. “If you get lost, that food could keep you 
alive until we find you. You leave this cabin, you wear that backpack. Is that 
clear?” 

Boy, was he in a bad mood. “It’s clear,” I said, strapping on my pack. 

Nicole and I crunched across the snow to the nearest trees. They lined a 
snow ridge about half a mile away. 

We climbed the snow ridge. I made it to the top first. 

“Nicole—look!” 

On the other side of the snow ridge, I saw a frozen stream. The first water 
we’d seen since we’d set out. 

Nicole and I skittered down the ridge and stared into the icy stream. I tested 
the ice with my foot. 

“Don’t step on it, Jordan!” Nicole cried. “You might fall in.” 

I tapped the ice with the tip of my boot. “It’s solid,” I told her. 

“Still,” Nicole said. “Don’t take any chances. Dad will kill you if you have 
another accident.” 

“I wonder if there are fish swimming under there,” I said, staring into the 
ice. 

“We should tell Dad about this,” Nicole said. “He might want to photograph 
it.” 

We left the stream to gather dead branches under the trees. We lugged them 



over the snow ridge and back across the snow to the cabin. 

“Thanks, kids,” Dad said when we burst into the cabin. He took the wood 
from us and started a fire in the stove. “How about pancakes for supper tonight?” 

He’s in a better mood now, I thought with relief. 

Nicole told Dad about the frozen stream. 

“Interesting,” Dad said. “I’ll go take a look at it after supper. I’ve got to find 
something to photograph besides all this ice and snow.” 

The pancakes cheered all of us up—except for Arthur. 

He ate a lot, but he didn’t say much. He appeared jittery. He dropped his 
fork on the floor. Muttering to himself, he picked it up and started eating without 
wiping it off. 

When supper was over, Nicole and I helped Dad clean up. 

We were gathering up the supplies when the dogs started to bark. 

I saw Arthur freeze. 

“What’s that?” I cried. “What’s upset the dogs?” 



13 


The dogs yelped and barked. 

Was someone out there? 

An animal? A monster? 

“I’ll go check,” Arthur said solemnly. He pulled on his coat and wool cap 
and hurried out of the cabin. 

Dad grabbed his coat. “Stay here,” he instructed Nicole and me. He 
followed Arthur. 

We stared at each other, listening to the yelping dogs. A few seconds later, 
the barking stopped. 

Dad poked his head back into the cabin. “Nothing out there. We don’t know 
what got them upset. But Arthur is calming them down.” 

Dad grabbed his camera. “You two get some sleep, okay? I’m going to 
check out that stream. I won’t be gone long.” 

He draped the camera over his fur coat collar. The cabin door slammed 
behind him. 

We heard Dad’s footsteps crunching over the snow. Then silence. Nicole 
and I climbed into our sleeping bags. 

I rolled onto my side, trying to get comfortable. It was after eight o’clock, 
but still light outside. The sun filtered through the window of the cabin. 

The light reminded me of when I was little. Mom used to try to make me 
take a nap in the afternoon. I never could sleep in the daytime. 

I closed my eyes. I opened them. I wasn’t sleepy. 

I turned my head and glanced at Nicole. She lay on her back, her eyes wide 
open. 

“I can’t sleep,” I announced. 

“Me either,” she replied. 

I squirmed in my sleeping bag. 

“Where’s Arthur?” Nicole asked. “I wonder what’s taking him so long?” 

“I guess he’s hanging out with the dogs,” I said. “I think he likes them 
better than he likes us.” 

“That’s for sure,” Nicole agreed. 



We tossed and turned some more. The sky stayed bright. The light poured 
in through the cabin window. 

“I give up,” I groaned. “Let’s go outside and build a snowman or 
something.” 

“Dad said to stay put.” 

“We won’t go anywhere. We’ll stay by the cabin,” I assured her. 

I crawled out of my sleeping bag and started getting dressed. Nicole sat up. 
“We shouldn’t,” she warned. 

“Come on. What could happen?” 

She stood up and pulled on her sweater. “If I don’t do something, I’ll go 
stir-crazy,” she admitted. 

We bundled up. I pulled open the cabin door. 

“Jordan—wait!” Nicole cried. “You forgot your backpack.” 

“We’re just going out the door,” I complained. 

“Come on. Dad said we have to. He’ll be furious if he finds us outside. And 
he’ll be even more furious if you’re not wearing your pack.” 

“Oh, all right,” I grumbled. I hoisted the pack over my shoulders. “Like 
something’s really going to happen to us.” 

We stepped out into the cold. I kicked at the snow. 

Nicole grabbed my coat sleeve. “Listen!” she whispered. 

We heard the crunch of footsteps behind the cabin. “It’s Arthur,” I told her. 
We crept around to the back. It was Arthur. 

He crouched beside the dogsled, hitching up one of the dogs. Two others 
were already tied to the sled. 

“Arthur!” I cried. “What’s up?” 

Startled, he turned to us. He didn’t reply. Instead, he jumped on the back of 
the sled. 

“Mush!” he commanded the dogs at the top of his lungs. 

The dogs leaned forward, tugging hard. The sled began to slide away. 
“Arthur! Where are you going?” I screamed. “Come back!” 

The sled picked up speed. 

“Arthur! Arthur!” Nicole and I ran after him, shouting his name. 

But the sled raced farther and farther away from us. 

Arthur never turned back. 



14 


Nicole and I chased after the sled, watching it grow tinier and tinier. 

“Arthur! Come back!” 

“He’s got our food!” I cried. 

We couldn’t let him get away. We ran as fast as we could, our boots falling 
deep into the snow. 

The sled climbed over a tall ridge of snow. 

“Stop! Stop!” Nicole screamed. “Please!” 

“We can’t keep up with the dogs,” I gasped. 

“We have to try,” Nicole cried frantically. “We can’t let Arthur leave us 
here!” 

The sled disappeared over the top of the ridge. We clawed our way up. The 
snow slid under our feet. 

By the time we reached the top, Arthur and the dogs were far ahead of us. 
We watched in horror as they quickly disappeared across the tundra. 

Exhausted, I collapsed in the snow. “They’re getting away,” I choked out. 

“Jordan, get up!” Nicole pleaded. 

“We can’t catch him,” I moaned. 

Then Nicole said in a small voice, “Where are we?” 

I stood up and gazed around. Snow, snow, snow. All around us, nothing but 
snow. No landmarks. No sign of the cabin. 

Clouds had covered the sun. The wind picked up. Snow began to fall. 

I had no idea where we were. 

“Which way is the cabin?” I asked in a shrill voice. “Which way did we 
come?” 

We scanned the horizon through the falling snow. I didn’t see the cabin 
anywhere. 

Nicole tugged on my arm. “The cabin is that way. Let’s go!” 

“No!” The snow came down harder and faster, stinging my eyes. I shouted 
into the wind. “The cabin’s the other way! That’s not the way we came.” 

“Look!” Nicole yelled, pointing down. “Our tracks! We’ll just follow them 
home.” 



We started down the ridge, following the ruts we’d made in the snow. The 
wind howled, growing stronger. 

We followed our own footprints for a short while. It was so hard to see in 
the falling snow. All white and gray. The whole world. White and gray. 

Nicole peered at me through the thick curtain of snow. “I can hardly see 
you!” she shouted. 

We crouched low, searching for our footprints. 

“They’re gone!” I cried. The snow had already covered them up. 

Nicole clutched my arm. “Jordan, I’m getting scared.” 

I was getting scared, too. But I didn’t tell Nicole. 

“We’ll find the cabin,” I assured her. “Don’t worry. I bet Dad’s looking for 
us right now.” 

I wished I believed it myself. The wind pelted us with hard, icy snow. I 
squinted into the wind. Nothing but white. White on white. White on gray. 

“Don’t let go of me!” I shouted to Nicole. 

“What?” 

“I said, don’t let go of me! We could easily lose each other in the storm!” 

She tightened her grip on my arm to show she understood. 

“I’m so cold,” she shouted. “Let’s run!” 

We tried to run through the snow, stumbling against the wind. “Dad!” we 
called out. “Dad!” 

I had no idea where we were going—but I knew we had to go somewhere. 

“Look!” Nicole cried, pointing through the thick snow. “I think I see 
something!” 

I stared as hard as I could, but I didn’t see anything. 

Nicole pulled me along. “Come on!” she shouted. 

We ran blindly. Suddenly, the ground gave way under our feet. 

Still holding onto Nicole, I felt myself being sucked down under the snow. 



15 


Down we fell. Down into the freezing white. 

The snow rushed up, swirled around us. 

And buried us. 

Another crevasse, I thought. Another deep pit in the snow. 

Much deeper than the first. 

We both cried out as we landed. Tangled up in each other. 

“Get off!” Nicole shrieked. “Where are we? Get off!” 

Feeling dazed, I struggled to my feet. Then I grabbed both of her hands and 
tugged her up. 

“Oh no,” Nicole groaned. 

We both stared up to the top. I could barely make out the gray of the sky, 
high above our heads. 

And all around us, high walls of snow. Powdery snow that blew down on 
us. I peered up to the top of the pit. Chunks of snow broke off the icy walls. 
They made soft thuds as they landed beside us on the snowy pit floor. 

“We’re trapped down here!” Nicole wailed. “Dad will never find us. 
Never!” 

I grabbed the shoulders of her coat. A chunk of snow fell off the pit wall 
and landed on top of my boots. “Try to stay calm,” I told her. But my voice 
trembled as I said it. 

“Calm? How can I stay calm?” she demanded shrilly. 

“Dad will find us,” I said. I wasn’t sure I believed it. I swallowed hard, 
trying to fight down my panic. 

“Daaaaaad!” Nicole screamed. She cupped her hands around her mouth, 
raised her head toward the sky, and screamed at the top of her lungs. 
“Daaaaaaad! Daaaaaaaaad!” 

I clapped a mitten over her mouth. 

Too late. 

I heard a low rumbling. 

The rumbling became a roar as the snow walls began to crack and crumble. 

Crumble down. Down on us. 



Trembling in horror, I knew what was happening. 
Nicole had started an avalanche. 



16 


As sheets of snow tumbled down on us, I grabbed Nicole. 

I pushed her against the pit wall. Then I flattened myself against the wall, 

too. 

The snow roared down. 

I pressed myself tight against the wall—and to my shock, the wall gave 

way! 

“Ooooh!” I let out a startled cry. Nicole and I tumbled through the side of 
the pit. 

We stumbled forward into total darkness. 

I heard a crash behind us. My heart pounding, I turned in time to see the pit 
fill up. Snow piled over the opening in the wall. 

Nicole and I were sealed in. Shut in this dark hole. 

Our way out was gone. The pit was gone. 

We crouched in the dark tunnel-like opening, trembling, gasping in fright. 
“Where are we?” Nicole choked out. “What do we do now?” 

“I don’t know.” I grabbed the wall. We seemed to be in a narrow 
passageway. The walls around us were made of rock instead of snow. 

My eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see a dim light at the end of the 
passageway. 

“Let’s see what’s down there,” I urged Nicole. 

We crawled on our hands and knees through the passage toward the light. 
The passage ended. We stood up. 

We found ourselves in a big cave. The top of the cave towered high above 
our heads. Water trickled slowly down one of the walls. A dim glow came from 
somewhere near the back. 

“The light must be coming from outside,” Nicole said. “That means there’s 
a way out of here.” 

We crept slowly through the cave. The only sound I could hear was the 
drip, drip, drip of melting icicles. 

Soon we’ll be out of here, I thought. “Jordan,” she whispered. “Look!” 

On the floor of the cave I could make out a footprint. A gigantic footprint. 
Bigger than the fake one I’d made in the snow that morning. 



Five of my shoes could fit inside that footprint. 

I took a few steps—and saw another footprint. 

Nicole grabbed my arm. 

“Do you think it’s...?” She stopped. 

I knew what she was thinking. 

We traced the giant footprints across the cave floor. They led us straight to a 
shadowy corner in the back—and stopped. 

I glanced up. 

Nicole gasped. 

We both saw it at the same time. 

The creature. 

The Abominable Snowman! 

He loomed over us. 

He stood upright like a human, covered in brown fur. Black eyes stared out 
of an ugly face, half-human, half-gorilla. 

He wasn’t that tall—about a head taller than me—but he seemed huge. His 
body was thick and powerful, with gigantic feet and fur-covered hands—as big 
as baseball gloves. 

“We’re t-trapped!” Nicole stammered. 

She was right. 

The entrance behind us had been blocked by the avalanche. There was no 
way we could slip past this giant creature. 

No way. 

The Abominable Snowman glared down at us. Then it started to move. 



17 


My teeth began to chatter. 

I squeezed my eyes shut and trembled, waiting for the monster to grab us. 

A second passed. Then another. 

Nothing happened. 

I opened my eyes. The snowman hadn’t moved. 

Nicole took a step forward. “He’s frozen!” she cried. 

I blinked in the dim light. “Huh?” It was true. The snowman stood frozen in 
a huge block of clear ice. 

I touched the ice. The monster stood inside it like a statue. 

“If he’s frozen in ice,” I wondered, “then what made those giant 
footprints?” 

Nicole bent down to study the prints. She shuddered again at their huge 

size. 

“They lead right to the block of ice,” she declared. “The snowman must 
have made them somehow.” 

“Maybe he walked back here and accidently froze,” I suggested. I touched 
the back wall of the cave, where icy water dripped from above. 

“Or maybe he goes into the ice to rest,” I added. “Like Dracula going to 
sleep in his coffin at dawn.” 

I backed away. It was too frightening, being this close to him. But the 
monster stayed perfectly still under the thick ice. 

Nicole leaned close to the ice. “Look at his hands!” she cried. “Or paws, or 
whatever.” 

Like the rest of his body, his hands were covered with brown fur. He had 
thick fingers, like a man’s. Jutting out of them were long, sharp claws. 

A chill ran down my spine at the sight of those claws. What did he use them 
for? Ripping wild animals to pieces? Tearing up people who got in his way? 

He had powerful legs, with shorter claws on his toes. I studied his face. Fur 
covered his whole head, except for a circle of hairless skin around his eyes, nose, 
and mouth. The skin was a pinkish red. His lips were thick and white and set in a 
mean-looking grimace. 

“He’s definitely a mammal,” Nicole declared. “The fur is a dead giveaway.” 



I rolled my eyes. “This is no time for biology lessons, Nicole. Wait until 
Dad sees this. He’ll go crazy! If he can get a picture of this, he’ll be famous!” 

“Yeah,” Nicole sighed. “If we can find Dad. If we ever get out of here.” 

“There’s got to be a way out,” I said. I moved to a side wall and pressed it 
with my hands, searching for a hole, a chink in the rock, anything. 

After a few minutes I found a tiny crack. “Nicole!” I cried. “I found 
something!” 

She raced to my side. I pointed out the crack in the cave wall. She frowned 
with disappointment. 

“That’s just a crack,” she said. 

“You don’t know everything,” I protested. “Maybe there’s a secret door 
here. A hidden passage. Or something.” 

She sighed. “I guess it’s worth a shot.” 

We pressed on the crack. We stuck our fingers into it. We kicked it. I even 
tried karate-chopping it. 

Nothing. 

“I hate to break this to you, Jordan,” she said. “But I was right. As always. 
All you found was a crack in the wall.” 

“Well, keep looking,” I snarled. “We’ve got to get out of here!” 

I kept searching. I ran my hands along the wall, my back to the monster. 

Suddenly I heard a noise. A loud crack! 

“Nicole!” I cried. “Did you find something?” 

I whirled around. I realized Nicole hadn’t made that sound. She stared at the 
monster in horror. 

“What?” I asked her. “What’s wrong?” 

I heard another crack! 

“The ice is cracking!” Nicole screamed. “The monster—he’s breaking out!” 



18 


Crack! 

The block of ice splintered apart. Nicole and I pressed ourselves against a 
wall, watching in horror. 

The Abominable Snowman burst from the ice. Chunks of ice smashed on 
the floor and shattered like glass. The snowman shook himself, growling like a 
wolf. 

“Run!” I screamed. 

Nicole and I took off. But there was nowhere to go. We scrambled to the 
other side of the cave—as far away from the monster as we could get. 

“The passageway!” I cried. I ducked down and started to crawl through the 
passage. 

Nicole grabbed me. 

“Wait! It’s blocked! The avalanche—remember?” 

Yes. Of course. The way out of the cave was blocked by tons of snow. 

Across the cave, the monster uttered a ferocious roar that shook the walls. 

Nicole and I cowered in a corner of the cave. I felt her trembling next to 
me. 

“Maybe he didn’t see us,” I whispered. 

“Then why is he roaring?” Nicole whispered back. 

The monster twitched his gorilla nose in the air, sniffing. 

Oh, no! I thought. Can he smell us from across the cave? 

He turned his huge, furry head one way and then the other. 

He’s searching for us, I realized. He smells us. 

“Unh!” he grunted. He stared into a corner of the cave—our corner of the 

cave. 

“Unh!” he grunted again. 

“Oh, no!” Nicole moaned. “He sees us!” 

The big creature staggered toward us, grunting with each heavy step. 

I pressed myself against the cave wall, wishing the cave would swallow us 
up. 

Anything would be better than having him swallow us! 



The monster kept coming. His footsteps shook the floor of the cave. Boom, 
boom, boom. 

We huddled on the floor. We tried to make ourselves as small as we could. 
He stopped inches in front of us and roared again. A deafening roar. 

“His teeth!” Nicole cried. 

I saw them, too. Two rows of huge, razor-sharp teeth. 

The monster growled. 

And reached for us. His sharp claws flashed. 

He swiped at me. I tried to duck away. 

The monster snarled in frustration. He reached out again.... 

He clamped a powerful paw on Nicole’s head. 

“Help!” Nicole screamed. “He’s crushing me!” 



19 


“Let go of her!” I shrieked. 

But I knew I was helpless. 

The Abominable Snowman growled and turned Nicole around roughly. 

Then he reached behind her and grabbed her backpack. He ripped it off her 
shoulder with a sharp, hard tug. 

“Hey!” I cried in horror. 

With one claw he sliced open the canvas backpack. He reached inside. And 
pulled something out. 

A bag. A bag of trail mix. 

Nicole and I stared in amazement as he poured the trail mix into his mouth. 

“Weird,” I choked out. “He likes trail mix.” 

The monster crumpled up the bag and shifted through Nicole’s pack, 
searching for more. 

“That’s all there is,” Nicole whispered to me. 

With an angry growl, the monster tossed Nicole’s pack away. 

“Now what?” Nicole whispered. 

I reached into my own backpack, and with a trembling hand I yanked out 
my bag of trail mix. I heaved it at the monster. 

The bag hit the floor and slid to the monster’s feet. He bent down. Grabbed 
it. Tore it open. And hungrily gulped down the trail mix. 

When he finished, I shoved my pack toward him. 

He grunted. Then he dumped out my stuff. 

No more trail mix. 

Uh-oh. 

The monster stretched and roared. Then he reached down. With two 
gigantic arms, he grabbed Nicole and me. 

He lifted us up. 

He raised us toward his face. 

Toward his mouth. 

Preparing to eat us. 



20 


I struggled, but he was too strong. I pounded my fists on his chest. I kicked as 
hard as I could. He didn’t seem to feel it. 

He clutched Nicole and me like a couple of dolls. 

“Please don’t eat us!” I begged. “Please!” 

The monster grunted. He draped us both over the crook of one arm. Then he 
staggered back across the cave, gripping us tightly. 

I kicked him in the side. No reaction. Nothing. 

“Let go!” I shrieked. “Let us down!” 

“Where’s he taking us?” Nicole cried, bouncing as the creature tromped 
across the cave. 

Maybe he wants to roast us, I thought grimly. Maybe he doesn’t like his 
kids raw. 

He lugged us to the back of the cave. With one powerful swipe of the paw, 
he knocked a boulder aside. A narrow passage appeared behind it. 

Nicole moaned. “Why didn’t we see that before? Maybe we could have 
escaped!” 

“Too late now,” I groaned. 

The snowman pulled us through the passage. We came out into a smaller 
cave, flooded with light. I glanced up. 

Above us I could see the gray sky. 

Away out! 

Balancing us in one arm, the monster scaled the wall of the cave. With big, 
lurching steps, he climbed out of the hole. 

Cold air blasted me in the face. But the monster’s body pulsed with heat. 

The blizzard had stopped. Fresh snow covered the tundra. 

The monster stumbled through the snow, grunting as he walked. 

His gigantic feet sank deep into the snow. But with each huge step he 
covered a lot of ground. 

Where was he taking us? Where? 

Maybe he has another cave, I thought with a shudder. A cave with more 
monsters in it. His friends. They’ll all feast on us! 



I tried again to break out of the snowman’s grip. I kicked and squirmed as 
hard as I could. 

The monster growled. He dug his claws into my side. 

“Ow!” I yelped. But I stopped squirming. If I moved, his claws dug deeper. 
Poor Dad, I thought sadly. He’ll never know what happened to us. 

Unless he finds our bones buried in the snow. 

Suddenly, I heard barking. A dog! 

The Abominable Snowman stopped. He growled and sniffed the air. Then 
he gently dropped Nicole and me in the snow. 

We landed unsteadily on our feet. 

Nicole stared at me in surprise. 

We started to run, stumbling through the deep snow. I glanced back. 

“Is he chasing us?” Nicole asked. 

I couldn’t be sure. I couldn’t see him now. I only saw white. 

“Keep running!” I shouted. 

Then I saw something familiar in the distance. A brown speck. 

I bumped Nicole. “The cabin!” 

We ran even faster. If we could just get to the cabin... 

From the cabin we heard furious barking—the dog Arthur had left behind. 
“Dad! Dad!” we shrieked. We burst through the door. “We found him! We 
found the Abominable Snowman!” 

“Dad?” 

The cabin stood empty. Empty and bare. 

Dad was gone. 



21 


My eyes darted around the empty cabin. 

“Dad? Dad?” 

My heart skipped a beat. My throat went dry. 

Where did he go? 

Was he out searching for Nicole and me? Did he get lost in the snow? 

“We—we’re all alone,” I murmured. 

Nicole and I ran to the window. A thin layer of snow frosted the pane. We 
peered out into the bright sunlight. 

No sign of Dad. 

“At least the snowman didn’t follow us,” I said. 

“Jordan, why did he drop us?” Nicole asked softly. 

“I think the barking dog scared him,” I replied. 

If that dog hadn’t barked, what would the monster have done to us? 

As the question pushed into my mind, I heard the dog start to bark again. 
Nicole and I both gasped. 

“The snowman—!” I cried. “He’s back! Hide!” 

We glanced around, frantically searching for a good hiding place. The cabin 
was so bare—it wouldn’t take the monster long to find us. 

“Behind the stove!” Nicole urged. 

We dashed to the small, square stove and crouched behind it. 

Outside the cabin we heard the slow, heavy footsteps of the monster. 

Crunch, crunch, crunch. Footsteps over the snow. 

Nicole grabbed my hand. We froze, waiting. Listening. 

Crunch, crunch. 

Please don’t come into the cabin, I prayed. Please don’t capture us again. 
The footsteps stopped outside the door. I squeezed my eyes shut. 

The door burst open. A blast of cold air blew into the room. 

“Jordan? Nicole?” 

Dad! 

We jumped out from behind the stove. There stood Dad, with his camera 
around his neck. 



We both ran to him and hugged him. “Dad! I’m so glad it’s you!” 

“Hi!” he replied. “What’s going on, guys? I expected you to be asleep.” He 
glanced around the cabin. “Hey—where’s Arthur?” 

“He took off!” I cried breathlessly. “He took the sled. He took all the food 
and three of the dogs.” 

“We chased after him,” Nicole added. “But he got away.” 

Dad’s face filled with surprise, then horror. “I’d better radio for help. We 
won’t last long without food.” 

“Dad—listen.” I blocked his way to the radio. “Nicole and I—found the 
Abominable Snowman!” 

He sidestepped around me. “This is no time for jokes, Jordan. If we don’t 
get help, we could starve to death out here!” 

“He’s not joking, Dad,” Nicole insisted, tugging Dad’s arm. “We really 
found the snowman. He lives in a cave under the snow.” 

Dad stopped and studied Nicole. He always believes her. But this time he 
wasn’t sure. 

“It’s true!” I cried. “Come on—we’ll show you!” 

Nicole and I tugged him out the door. 

“Jordan, if this is one of your tricks, you are going to be in major trouble,” 
he warned. “We’re in a serious situation here and—” 

“Dad, he’s not kidding!” Nicole cried impatiently. “Come on!” 

We led him out into the snow to the spot where the snowman had dropped 
us. We pointed out his huge footprints. 

“Why should I believe this?” Dad said. “You faked the snowman’s 
footprints this morning, Jordan. These just look a little bigger.” 

“Dad, I swear—I didn’t make these prints!” 

“We’ll show you the cave, Dad,” Nicole promised. “Follow the footprints. 
You’ll see. It’s unbelievable!” 

I knew Dad went along with us only because Nicole insisted. He trusted 
her. She never played jokes on him. 

Leaning into the wind, we traced the giant prints across the snow. Dad 
couldn’t resist snapping pictures of them—just in case. 

The footsteps led us back to the cave. They stopped at an opening in the 
ground. 

“The cave is down that hole,” I told Dad, pointing. 

I think Dad believed us now. “Let’s go. Check it out,” he said. 



“Huh?” I cried. “Back down there? To the monster?” 

Dad was already sliding down to the cave opening. He reached up to help 
Nicole climb down. 

I hesitated. “Dad—wait. You don’t understand. There’s a monster down 
there!” 

“Come on, Jordan,” Dad urged. “I want to see this for myself.” 

I had no choice. Dad was going in there no matter what I said. And I didn’t 
want to wait outside alone. I scrambled down to the opening of the cave. 

The three of us felt our way along the narrow passage until we reached the 
mouth of the big cave. 

Keeping close together, Dad and Nicole walked in. But I stopped at the 
entrance and stared into the cave. 

“Jordan! Come on!” Dad whispered. 

There’s a monster in there, I thought with a shudder. A huge monster with 
long claws and sharp teeth. 

We managed to escape from him once. Why are we going back? What’s 
going to happen to us in there? 

I had a bad feeling. A very bad feeling. 



22 


Dad grabbed me by the hand and pulled me into the cave. I heard the drip of icy 
water against the back wall. I blinked in the darkness. 

Where was he? Where was the Abominable Snowman? 

I heard Dad’s camera clicking away. I tried to stay close to Dad. I cried out 
when I spotted the snowman. I expected him to roar and lumber after us. 

But he stood stiffly, staring straight ahead. 

Refrozen again. Inside a huge block of ice. 

Nicole stepped closer to the block of ice. “How does he do that?” 

“This is amazing !” Dad cried, snapping picture after picture. “ Incredible /” 

I stared up at the monster’s face. He glared out at us from inside the ice. His 
black eyes glittered, his mouth set in a toothy snarl. 

“This is the most amazing discovery in history!” 

Dad exclaimed. “Do you realize how famous we are going to be?” 

He stopped shooting for a second and peered up at the brown-furred 
monster. 

“Why stop here?” he murmured. “Why go home with nothing but photos? 
Why not take the snowman himself back to California? Do you know what a 
sensation that will create?” 

“But—how?” Nicole asked. 

“He’s alive, you know, Dad,” I warned. “I mean, he can crack out of that 
ice. And when he does, it’s really scary. I don’t think you could control him.” 

Dad knocked gently on the ice, testing it. “We won’t let him out of the ice,” 
he said. “At least not until we’ve got him under control.” 

Dad walked all the way around the block of ice, rubbing his chin. “If we cut 
the ice a bit, it might fit into the supply trunk,” he said. “Then we could carry the 
snowman back to California in the block of ice, locked in the trunk. It’s airtight, 
so the ice won’t melt.” 

He stepped up close to the ice and snapped a few more shots of the 
snowman’s snarling face. “Let’s go get the trunk, kids.” 

“Dad—wait.” I didn’t like this idea. “You don’t understand. The snowman 
could rush us! He let us go once. But why take another chance?” 

“Look at his teeth, Dad,” Nicole pleaded. “He’s so strong, he picked us both 



up at once!” 

“It’s worth the risk,” Dad insisted. “Neither of you is hurt, right?” 

Nicole and I nodded. “Yes, but—” 

“Let’s go.” Dad had made his mind up. He wasn’t going to listen to our 
warnings. 

I’d never seen him so excited. As we hurried from the cave, he called to the 
snowman, “Don’t go away—we’ll be right back!” 

We rushed over the snow to the cabin. Dad pulled the supply trunk outside. 
It was about six feet long and three feet wide. 

“The snowman will fit,” he said. “But with him inside the trunk, it will be 
very heavy.” 

“We need the dogsled to pull it,” Nicole said. 

“But Arthur took the sled,” I reminded them. “So I guess the deal is off. 
We’ll just have to go home without an Abominable Snowman. Too bad!” 

“Maybe there’s another sled around somewhere,” Dad suggested. “This is 
an old musher’s cabin, after all.” 

I remembered the old sled I’d seen in the dog shed. Nicole had seen it, too. 
She led Dad to it. 

“Fantastic!” Dad cried. “Now let’s go get that snowman before he escapes.” 

We hitched Lars, our only dog, to the old sled and towed the supply trunk to 
the cave. 

Then we crept silently into the cave, pulling the trunk behind us. “Careful, 
Dad,” I warned. “He might have broken out of the ice by now.” 

But the Abominable Snowman stood where we’d left him, frozen in his 
block of ice. 

Dad began to cut the ice down to size with a hacksaw. 

I paced nervously. “Hurry!” I whispered. “He could burst out any minute!” 

“This isn’t easy,” Dad snapped. “I’m working as fast as I can.” He hacked 
away. 

Each second felt like an hour to me. I watched the snowman carefully for 
any signs of movement. 

“Dad, do you have to saw so loudly?” I complained. “The noise could wake 
him up!” 

“Relax, Jordan,” Dad said. But his voice was tight and shrill, too. 

Then I heard a crack. 

“Look out!” I cried. “He’s breaking out!” 



Dad straightened up. “I cracked the ice a bit, Jordan.” 

I studied the monster. He hadn’t moved. 

“Okay, kids,” Dad said. “We’re ready.” Dad had cut the ice into a six-foot- 
long rectangle. “Help me slide this into the trunk.” 

I opened the lid of the trunk. Nicole and I helped Dad tip the ice over and 
gently drop it into the trunk. It just barely fit. 

We slid the trunk along the ground to the opening of the cave. Dad tied a 
rope around it and climbed out of the hole. “I’ll tie the rope to the sled,” Dad 
called from above. “That way Lars can help me hoist it out.” 

“Hey,” I whispered to Nicole, “let’s sneak some snowballs into the trunk— 
just for fun. We can throw them at Kyle and Kara when we get home. Snow 
from the cave of the Abominable Snowman—they’ll never top that!” 

“No—please. Don’t open the trunk,” Nicole begged. “We just barely got the 
snowman inside.” 

“We can squeeze a few snowballs in,” I insisted. I quickly made a bunch of 
snowballs, packing them tight. Then I cracked open the trunk and slipped them 
inside, next to the block of ice. 

I checked the monster one last time for signs of life. The ice was solid. We 
were safe. 

“They won’t melt in there,” I said sealing the lid of the trunk shut. We 
locked it with the bolt and tightened the rope around it. I felt pretty sure the 
snowman wouldn’t be able to break out of there; even if he did crack through the 
ice. 

“Ready?” Dad shouted from up above. “One, two, three—heave!” 

Dad and Lars tugged on the rope until the chest lifted off the ground. Nicole 
and I squatted beneath it to help push it up. 

“Again!” Dad yelled. “Heave!” 

We pushed as hard as we could. “It’s so heavy!” Nicole complained. 

“Come on, kids!” Dad called. “Push!” 

We gave the trunk a shove. Dad and Lars tugged it over the lip of the cave 
opening. 

Dad collapsed in the snow. “Whew,” he muttered, wiping his brow. “Well, 
the hardest part is over.” 

He helped Nicole and me scramble out. 

We all rested a few minutes. Then we dragged the trunk onto the sled. Dad 
secured it with the rope. Lars pulled the sled back to the cabin. 



Once inside, Dad hugged us both. “What a day! What a great day!” 

He turned to me. “See, Jordan? Nothing terrible happened.” 

“We’re lucky,” I said. 

“I’m so sleepy,” Nicole complained, sinking onto her sleeping bag. 

I glanced out the window. The sun sat high in the sky, as usual. But I knew 
it had to be very late. 

Dad glanced at his watch. “It’s almost midnight. You two should get some 
sleep.” He frowned. “I’d hate to wake up here in the morning with no food, 
though. I’m going to radio for help. You guys can sleep when we get back to 
town.” 

“Can we stay in a hotel?” I asked Dad. “In a bed?” 

“If we can find one,” he promised. He opened his pack, searching for the 
radio. 

He shuffled stuff around in his pack. Then he pulled things out, one by one. 
A compass. An extra camera. Cans of film. A pair of socks, balled up. 

I didn’t like the look on his face. He turned the pack over and dumped 
everything on the floor. He sifted through it, again, getting frantic. 

“Dad? What’s the matter?” 

When he turned to me, he had a terrified expression on his face. “The 
radio,” he murmured. “It’s gone.” 



23 


“No!” Nicole and I both shrieked. 

“I don’t believe it!” Dad cried, pounding his fist against his empty pack. 
“Arthur must have taken the radio so we wouldn’t report him.” 

I stomped around the room, frightened and furious. Our dogs, our sled, our 
food—Arthur had taken them all. 

And now the radio. 

Did Arthur leave us here to freeze? To starve? 

“Calm down, Jordan,” Dad said. 

“But, Dad—” Nicole interrupted. 

Dad shushed her. “Just a second, Nicole. I’ve got to think of a way out of 
this.” Dad searched the cabin. “Don’t panic. Don’t panic. Don’t panic,” he 
instructed himself. 

“But Dad—” Nicole said, tugging at his sleeve. 

“Nicole!” I snapped. “We’re in huge trouble. We could die out here!” 

“Dad!” she insisted. “Listen to me! You wrapped up the radio last night so 
it wouldn’t freeze. It’s in your sleeping bag!” 

Dad’s mouth dropped open. “You’re right!” he cried. He hurried to his 
sleeping bag and reached inside. He dug into his sleeping bag—and pulled out 
the radio, wrapped in a wool scarf. 

He switched on the radio and fiddled with the dials. “Iknek, Iknek. Come 
in, Iknek.” 

Dad asked the Iknek airport to send us a helicopter. He tried to describe 
where we were. 

Nicole and I smiled sleepily at each other. 

“We’re going home!” she said happily. “Home to sunny, hot Pasadena.” 

“I’m going to kiss a palm tree!” I declared. “I never want to see snow 
again.” 

I had no idea that our snowy adventure was just beginning! 



24 


“Ahhhh,” I sighed. “Feel that sun? Nice and hot.” 

“The radio said it’s a hundred degrees today,” Nicole reported. 

“I love it!” I beamed. “Love it!” 

I slapped more tanning lotion on my chest. 

Our Alaska trip all seemed unreal, now that we were home in Pasadena. 
The cold, the snow, the wind blowing over the rolling white tundra. The snarling, 
brown-furred Abominable Snowman. It all seemed like a dream. 

But I knew it was no dream. 

Dad had hidden the trunk with the Abominable Snowman inside the 
darkroom in the backyard. Every time I passed it, I remembered the trip... 
remembered the creature lying frozen in there—and shivered. 

In our swimsuits, Nicole and I caught some rays in the backyard. Good old 
sunny Pasadena. Where it never, never snowed. 

Thank goodness. 

Lauren came over to hear about our trip. I wanted to tell her the whole story. 
But Dad told us to keep quiet about it—at least until the snowman was safely 
settled somewhere. 

“I don’t believe you two!” Lauren snorted. “A week ago you wouldn’t shut 
up about snow. Now you’re letting the sun burn you to a crisp!” 

“Well, we did the cold thing and now we’re doing the hot thing,” I told her. 
“Anyway, I’ve seen enough snow to last me the rest of my life.” 

“Tell me about the trip,” Lauren insisted. “Tell me everything!” 

“It’s a big secret,” Nicole told her. She and I exchanged glances. 

“Secret? What kind of secret?” Lauren demanded. 

Before we could reply, Dad emerged from the darkroom. He squinted in the 
sunlight. He wore a down jacket, a ski cap, and gloves. He had turned the air- 
conditioning way up in the darkroom and covered the trunk with ice packs, to 
keep the snowman cold. 

“I’m going into the city now,” he announced, removing his coat. Dad had a 
meeting with some scientists and wildlife experts in Los Angeles. 

He wanted to turn the Abominable Snowman over to the right people. He 
wanted to be sure the snowman would be treated well. 



“Are you kids going to be all right while I’m gone?” he asked. 

“Of course,” Nicole replied. “We survived the Alaskan tundra. I think we 
can live through one afternoon in our own backyard.” 

“My mom is home,” Lauren said. “She’ll be around if we need anything.” 
“Good.” Dad nodded. “Okay, I’m off. But remember—Jordan and Nicole, 
are you listening? Don’t touch the supply trunk. Stay away from it— 
understood?” 

“Gotcha, Dad,” I promised. 

“All right. I’ll bring a pizza home for dinner.” 

“Good luck, Dad!” Nicole called. I watched him jump into the car and drive 
off. 

“So what’s the big secret?” Lauren asked as soon as Dad was gone. “What’s 
in the supply trunk?” 

Nicole and I glanced at each other. 

“Come on. Spill,” Lauren urged. “I won’t leave you alone until you tell 

me.” 

I couldn’t resist. I had to tell someone. “We found him. We found him and 
we brought him back.” 

“Found who?” 

“The snowman!” Nicole exclaimed. “The Abominable Snowman!” 

Lauren rolled her eyes. “For sure. And did you find the Tooth Fairy up 
there, too?” 

“Yes, we did,” I joked. 

“He’s lying in the darkroom right now,” Nicole told Lauren. 

Lauren’s face twisted in confusion. “Who—the Tooth Fairy?” 

“No. The Abominable Snowman. Areal one,” I said. “Trapped in a block of 

ice.” 

Along with four or five snowballs, I thought to myself. 

Snowballs I could throw at Lauren. For a nice little surprise. 

“Prove it,” Lauren challenged us. “You’re making it all up. You think 
you’re really funny.” 

Nicole and I exchanged glances. I knew what she was thinking. Dad had 
just told us to stay away from the trunk. 

“You two are as bad as the Miller twins,” Lauren complained. 

That did it. “Come on,” I said. “We’ll show you.” 

“We’d better not, Jordan,” Nicole argued. 



“We won’t hurt anything,” I promised. “We’ll just pull open the lid a tiny 
bit so Lauren can see him. Then we’ll slam it shut. No harm done.” 

I climbed off my lounge chair and started across the lawn to the darkroom. 
Nicole and Lauren followed me. 

I knew they would. 

I opened the darkroom door and switched on the light. A blast of cold air 
swept over me, making my bare chest tingle. 

Nicole hesitated in the doorway. “Jordan, maybe we shouldn’t.” 

“Oh, come on, Nicole,” Lauren chided. “There’s no Abominable Snowman. 
You two are ridiculous!” 

“We’re not ridiculous!” Nicole protested. 

“We might as well show her, Nicole,” I said. 

Nicole didn’t reply. She stepped into the darkroom and shut the door. 

In my bathing suit, I was shivering from the cold. It was almost like being 
back in Alaska. 

I knelt beside the huge trunk. I unhooked the latches. 

Slowly, carefully, I lifted the heavy lid. 

Peered inside. 

And let out a chilling, bloodcurdling scream of horror. 



25 


Nicole and Lauren shrieked and leaped back. 

Nicole backed into the wall with a crash. 

Lauren ducked under the developing table. 

I couldn’t keep a straight face. I started to laugh. “Gotcha!” I cried 
gleefully. I was so pleased with myself. 

I had scared them to death. They were both stiffer than the Abominable 
Snowman. He lay frozen and still inside his block of ice. 

“Jordan—you creep!” Nicole declared angrily. She punched me in the back. 

Lauren punched me too. Then she peered into the open trunk. 

And let out another scream. “He’s real! You—you weren’t kidding!” I could 
see that she was breathing hard. 

“It’s okay, Lauren,” I assured her. “He can’t hurt you. He’s frozen.” 

She stepped closer and stared down at him. 

“He’s huge!” she cried in amazement. “His—his eyes are open. They’re so 
mean-looking!” 

“Close the lid, Jordan,” Nicole insisted. “Quick. We’ve seen enough.” 

“Now do you believe us?” I asked Lauren. 

She nodded. “It’s... awesome!” She shook her head, stunned at the amazing 
sight. 

Before I shut the lid, I sneaked two snowballs out of the bottom of the 
trunk. Snickering, I passed one to Nicole. 

“What’s so funny?” Lauren asked suspiciously. 

“Nothing,” I said. I sealed the lid shut and latched the trunk. That’ll hold 
him, I thought. We’re safe. Dad will never know we sneaked a peek at the 
monster. 

We left the darkroom, closing the door carefully behind us. 

“That creature is just so awesome!” Lauren exclaimed. “What is your dad 
going to do with him?” 

“We’re not sure yet,” Nicole replied. “Dad’s trying to figure that out.” 

She held her hands behind her back, hiding the snowball from Lauren. 
Suddenly she shouted, “Hey, Lauren! Think fast!” 



She threw the snowball at Lauren. It missed. 

Splat! It hit a tree. 

“Nice shot, ace!” I cried sarcastically. 

But then I gaped at the tree in shock. 

The snowball—it didn’t crumble to the ground. 

It started to growl 

Thick white snow spread quickly up the tree trunk—and over the branches. 
Within seconds, the entire tree was covered with snow! 

“Wow!” Lauren gasped. “Nicole—how did you do that?” 

Nicole and I stared open-mouthed at the snow-covered tree. 

I was so stunned, the snowball fell out of my hand. 

I jumped back as it hit the ground—and spread! 

“Oh, wow!” I shrieked. I watched snow spread over the lawn like a white 
blanket. 

It spread under our bare feet. Over the driveway. Out to the street. 

“Ooooh! It’s cold!” Nicole wailed, hopping from foot to foot. 

“This is too weird!” I cried. “It’s a hundred degrees out—and the snow isn’t 
melting! It’s spreading—and growing deeper!” 

I turned to see Lauren hopping and dancing, whirling around wildly. 
“Snow! Snow!” she sang. “It’s wonderful! Snow in Pasadena!” 

“Jordan—” Nicole said quietly. “This isn’t right. We should have left this 
snow in the cave. It isn’t normal snow.” 

Of course she was right. Any cave where an Abominable Snowman lives 
has got to be a weird place. But how could we have guessed—? 

“Let’s build a snowman!” Lauren cried gleefully. 

“No!” Nicole warned. “Don’t touch it. Don’t do anything, Lauren. Not until 
we’ve figured this out.” 

I don’t think Lauren heard my sister. She was too excited. She kicked a 
spray of snow at an evergreen bush. The bush froze over with snow. 

“What are we going to do?” I asked Nicole. “What’s going to happen when 
Dad comes home? He’ll kill us!” 

Nicole shrugged. “Beats me.” 

“But—but—you’re supposed to be the brain ]” I sputtered. 

“This is so cool!” Lauren squealed. “Snow in Pasadena!” She picked up a 
chunk of snow and started balling it up between her hands. 

“Snowball fight!” she shouted. 



“Stop it, Lauren!” I cried. “We’re in big trouble here. Don’t you understand 

_ ?” 

Lauren fired the snowball at Nicole. 

Instantly, thick white snow spread all over Nicole’s body. Covering her. 
Covering her until she looked like a snowman! 

“Nicole!” I cried, running over the snowy ground to her. “Nicole—are you 
okay?” 

I grabbed her arm. Stiff as an icicle. She was frozen solid! 

“Nicole?” I stared into her snow-covered eyes. “Can you hear me, Nicole? 
Can you breathe in there? Nicole? Nicole?” 



26 


“Oh, no!” Lauren shrieked. “What have I done?” 

My sister was a statue. A frozen, snow-covered statue. 

“Nicole, I’m so sorry,” Lauren cried. “Can you hear me? I’m so sorry!” 

“Let’s take her inside,” I suggested frantically. “If we get her in the warm 
house, maybe we can warm her up.” 

Lauren grabbed one of Nicole’s arms. I grabbed the other. We carefully 
dragged her stiff body to the house. Her bare toes, hard as ice, left a long trail in 
the snow. 

“She’s so freezing!” Lauren cried. “How can we melt the snow?” 

“Let’s put her next to the oven,” I said. “Maybe if we turn it up full blast, 
the snow will melt.” 

We stood her in front of the oven. For good measure, I turned on all the 
burners on top of the stove. 

“That ought to do it,” I said. A bead of sweat trickled down my face. From 
the heat—or from worry? 

Lauren and I watched and waited. 

Watched and waited. 

I didn’t move. I didn’t breathe. 

The snow didn’t melt. 

“It’s not working,” Lauren groaned. “Nothing’s happening.” 

I tapped Nicole’s arm. Solid ice. 

I tried to stay calm. But I felt as if a hundred butterflies were tap dancing in 
my stomach. “All right, it’s not working. We’ll have to try something else. 
Something else...” 

Tears rolled down Lauren’s cheeks. “Like what?” Lauren demanded in a 
trembling voice. 

“Well...” I racked my brain for the hottest place I could think of. “The 
furnace! We’ll hold her in front of the furnace.” 

We dragged Nicole into the furnace shed behind the garage. The snow 
seemed to weigh a ton. It took all our strength to drag her. 

I turned the furnace on full blast. Lauren stood Nicole in front of the open 
furnace door. 



A blast of hot air sent Lauren and me staggering back. “If this doesn’t work, 
nothing will,” Lauren sobbed. 

The heat roared out of the furnace. I saw reflections of the red flames on 
Nicole’s icy face. 

My heart pounding, I watched to see the ice start to drip and the snow slide 
off her. 

But the ice didn’t melt. My sister remained a human snow cone. 

“Jordan—what are we going to do?” Lauren wailed. 

I shook my head, thinking hard. “The furnace isn’t working. What else is 
hot?” I was too scared to think clearly. 

“Don’t worry, Nicole,” Lauren told my frozen sister. “We’ll get you out of 
this—somehow.” 

I suddenly remembered how warm the Abominable Snowman had felt 
when he carried us across the Alaskan tundra. There we were, ten degrees below 
zero, surrounded by deep snow, and heat had poured off the creature’s body. 

“Come on, Lauren,” I ordered. “We’re taking her to the darkroom.” 

Struggling and straining, we dragged Nicole back outside and across the 
backyard to the darkroom. 

“Stay here,” I told Lauren. “I’ll be right back.” 

I raced into the kitchen. I pulled open all the cupboards and drawers, 
desperately searching for one thing—trail mix. 

Please, please let there be trail mix somewhere in this house! I prayed. 

“Yes!” I found a plastic bag of trail mix behind an old box of spaghetti. I 
grabbed it and flew back to the darkroom. 

Lauren stared at the bag in my hand. “What’s that?” 

“Trail mix.” 

“Trail mix? Jordan, can’t you wait to eat later?” 

“It’s not for me—it’s for him” I motioned at the trunk. 

“What?” 

I unlatched the trunk and pulled it open. The Abominable Snowman lay 
inside as before, frozen in the block of ice. 

I grabbed a handful of trail mix and waved it above the snowman’s face. 
“Wake up!” I begged. “Please wake up! Look—I brought you some trail mix!” 

“Jordan—have you totally lost it?” Lauren screeched. “What on earth are 
you doing?” 

“I can’t think of any other way to save Nicole!” I cried. 



My hand trembled as I frantically waved the trail mix over the snowman. 
“Come on! You know you love trail mix. Wake up! Please wake up! Come out 
and help us.” 

I leaned over, staring hard at the monster’s eyes. Watching for him to blink. 
Watching for any signs of life. 

But the eyes didn’t move. The creature stared lifelessly up through the 
block of ice. 

I refused to give up. 

“Yum, yum!” I shouted, my voice high and wild. 

“Trail mix! Boy, is that good!” I popped a few raisins into my mouth and 
chewed. “Mmm-mm! Delicious trail mix. So good! So tasty! Come on—wake 
up and try some!” 

“He’s not moving!” Lauren sobbed. “Give up, Jordan. It isn’t going to 
work.” 



27 


I jumped when I heard a soft sound. A faint crick. 

I stared down at the block of ice. 

Did the monster move? 

No. Silence now. The Abominable Snowman’s black eyes glittered up at 
me, lifeless and blank. 

Was it my imagination? 

Lauren is right, I thought sadly. My plan isn’t working. 

Nothing is working. 

I gently touched my sister’s stiff, frozen arm. Maybe when Dad gets home, 
I hoped. Maybe he’ll think of some way to save her. 

“What are we going to dooooo?” Lauren sobbed. She was no help at all. 
Crack. 

I heard it again—louder this time. 

And then: Crrraaaaaccckkkk! 

A long crack ripped across the ice. 

The Abominable Snowman groaned. 

Lauren leaped back with a wild scream. “It’s alive!” 

The ice broke up. The furry snowman slowly pulled himself up, moaning. 
Lauren cried out in fear. She pressed herself against the darkroom wall. 
“What’s he going to do?” 

“Shhh!” 

The monster shook shards of broken ice from his shoulders. He lifted 
himself out of the trunk. He uttered a low growl. 

“Jordan, look out!” Lauren cried. 

The monster lurched toward me. My heart jumped. I wanted to back away 
—or run away. But I couldn’t. I had to stay and help Nicole. 

“Unh!” the snowman grunted. He swiped a giant paw at me. 

Lauren let out another shrill scream. 

I leaped back. What would the monster do? 

“Unh!” the monster cried again. He took another swipe. 

“Let’s get out of here!” Lauren shouted. “He’s going to hurt you!” 



I wanted to run. But Nicole... 

The monster swiped at me again—and snatched the bag of trail mix out of 
my hands. 

I suddenly realized that was all he wanted. He had been grabbing for the 
trail mix. 

He poured the trail mix into his mouth, gulping it down, swallowing it 
noisily. Then he tossed the bag away. 

Lauren pressed her back against the corner of the darkroom. “Make him go 
back into the trunk!” she cried. 

“Are you crazy? How can I do that?” 

The snowman growled and staggered across the floor. 

His heavy footsteps shook the floor. He stopped in front of Nicole. 

He reached his powerful arms around her snow-covered body—and 
squeezed. 

“Stop him!” Lauren screamed. “He’s crushing her!” 



28 


I couldn’t move. I stared in horror. 

The big creature hugged Nicole hard—so hard that he lifted her off the 
ground. 

“Stop!” I finally choked out. “You’re hurting her!” 

Without thinking of the danger, I dove forward. I grabbed his furry arms 
with both hands—and struggled to pull him off my sister. 

With an angry grunt, he brushed me away. 

I stumbled back—and fell into Lauren. 

I turned to see the monster squeezing Nicole. 

Lauren pointed down at the floor. “Jordan—look!” 

Gazing down, I saw a small puddle under Nicole’s feet. Water dripped off 
her and onto the floor. As it hit the floor, it evaporated. Vanished from sight. 

Did I see Nicole’s toes wiggle? 

Yes! 

I stepped closer. Caught a glimpse of her face. 

A dot of pink appeared on her cheeks. 

Yes! 

Chunks of snow dropped off her body. They thudded to the floor, melted, 
and disappeared. 

I turned to Lauren. “It’s working!” I cried happily. “He’s defrosting her!” 

A trembling smile crossed Lauren’s worried face. 

A few seconds later, the snowman let Nicole go. The ice and snow had all 
melted and disappeared. The snowman gave a satisfied grunt and stepped back. 

Nicole moved her arms stiffly. She rubbed her face, as if she were waking 
up. 

“Nicole!” I cried, grabbing her by the shoulders. Warm. Her shoulders were 
warm. “Are you okay?” 

She shook her head, dazed. “What happened?” 

Lauren ran up to Nicole and threw her arms around her. “You were frozen!” 
she said. “Frozen like a snowman! But thank goodness—you’re all right!” 

I turned to see the snowman watching us. 



“Thank you,” I called to him. 

I don’t know if he understood me. He grunted. 

“Let’s get out of here,” Lauren urged. “I’m freezing!” 

“Maybe the sun will warm you up,” I told her. 

We opened the darkroom door and stepped outside. The sun still beamed 
down. The air felt sweltering hot. But the whole yard was covered in snow. 

“Oh, yeah,” Lauren murmured. “I forgot about that.” 

“Hey—!” I cried out when I saw the Abominable Snowman leap out of the 
darkroom. “He’s escaping!” I shrieked. 

“Dad will kill us!” Nicole cried. 

All three of us started shouting at the creature. 

He ignored our cries and thudded heavily across the snow. His black eyes 
narrowed on the snow-covered tree. He stepped up to the tree. Threw his arms 
around it. And hugged it tightly, just like when he had hugged Nicole. 

I watched as the snow began to melt. The blanket of white slipped down, 
down, shrinking away—until the tree stood green and golden again under the 
sunlight. 

“Wow!” I uttered, hands pressed against my face. 

But the big, furry creature had more surprises in store. 

With a loud grunt, he dropped to the snowy ground. As we stared in 
surprise, he began to roll in the snow. 

The snow appeared to stick to his fur. As he rolled, the snow vanished 
beneath him. 

Before long, the big creature was rolling on green grass. The last of the 
snow had vanished. 

He jumped to his feet. His eyes went wide, and he uttered a pained cry. 

“What’s the matter with him?” Lauren demanded. 

The Abominable Snowman gazed around, stunned, at the green grass, the 
palm trees. Then he raised his eyes to the blazing sun. 

He clutched his fur-covered head and let out a scream of terror. 

He seemed confused for a moment. Frightened. Then he let out a deep grunt 
—and took off down the street. His big paws thudded heavily over the pavement. 

I ran after him. “Wait! Come back!” 

He tore through someone’s yard and kept running. 

I gave up. No way I could catch him. 

Nicole and Lauren caught up to me. “Where’s he going?” Nicole 



demanded. 

“How should I know?” I snapped, struggling to catch my breath. 

“I think he’s looking for someplace cold,” Lauren said. 

Nicole agreed. “You’re probably right. He must be so hot. Pasadena is no 
place for an Abominable Snowman.” 

“He’ll probably find a cave in the mountains,” I said. “It’s a lot colder up 
there. I only hope he finds a way to get trail mix.” 

We trudged back to our yard. Green again. And hot. I knew that Nicole and 
I had one word in our minds—D-A-D. 

He had instructed us not to touch the trunk. We had ignored his warning. 

Now the snowman was gone. Dad’s big discovery. Dad’s big chance for 
fame. 

Gone. Gone forever. 

It was all our fault. 

“At least Dad has his photos,” I said softly. “The photos will amaze 
everyone all by themselves.” 

“I guess so,” Nicole replied, biting her bottom lip tensely. 

We walked back to the darkroom to close up the supply trunk. I glanced 
inside the trunk. Two magic snowballs were left. 

“Those things are dangerous. We’d better get rid of them,” Nicole warned. 

“I’m not touching them.” Lauren backed away. 

“You’re right,” I told my sister. “We should hide them somewhere. They’re 
too dangerous to keep around.” 

Nicole ran into the house and returned with a heavy-duty garbage bag. 
“Quick—stuff them in here.” 

I carefully scooped up each snowball and dropped it in the trash bag. Then I 
twisted the bag closed and knotted it tightly. 

“Now what?” Lauren asked. 

“We should blast them into outer space,” Nicole said. “If anyone gets hold 
of them and starts spreading snow around, we’ll be in big trouble. We need the 
Abominable Snowman to get rid of the snow—and he’s gone.” 

“Pasadena could turn into a ski resort!” I joked. “We could ice skate on 
Kyle and Kara’s swimming pool.” 

I shivered. I didn’t want to think about Kyle and Kara. And I didn’t want to 
think about snow. “We should bury the snowballs,” I told them. “But where?” 

“Not in my yard!” Lauren protested. 



I didn’t want to bury them in our yard, either. What would happen to them 
down there? Would they spread snow underground? Would snow spring up 
through the grass? 

We left the darkroom and scanned the area for good burial spots. 

“What about the empty lot?” Nicole suggested. 

Across the street, right next to Kyle and Kara Miller’s house, stood a vacant 
lot. There was nothing in it but piles of sand and a few empty bottles. 

“Perfect,” I declared. “No one will ever find the snowballs there.” 

Nicole hurried to the garage and grabbed a shovel. We crossed the street, 
glancing around to make sure no one saw us. 

“The coast is clear,” I said. 

I grabbed the shovel and dug a deep hole in the sand. It took longer than I 
thought. Sand kept falling back into the hole. 

Finally, the hole was deep enough. 

Nicole dropped the trash bag into the hole. “Good-bye, snowballs,” she 
said. “Good-bye, Alaska.” 

I covered the hole with sand. Lauren smoothed it out so you couldn’t tell 
the sand had been dug up. 

“Whew,” I groaned, wiping the sweat from my face. “I’m glad that’s over. 
Let’s go inside and cool off.” 

I put away the shovel. Then Nicole, Lauren, and I got ourselves some cold 
apple juice and collapsed in front of the TV. 

A short while later, we heard Dad’s car pull into the driveway. 

“Uh-oh,” Lauren gasped. “I think I’d better go home now. See you guys 
later.” She hurried out the back door. “Good luck!” she called. The door 
slammed behind her. 

I gave Nicole a nervous glance. “How angry will Dad be? He finds an 
amazing, rare creature, brings it home—we let it loose, and it runs away. That’s 
not so bad —is it?” 

Nicole shuddered. “Maybe if we tell him the whole story, he’ll be so glad 
we’re not hurt that he won’t be angry.” 

“Uh-huh. Yeah. Maybe.” 

The front door swung open. “Hey, kids!” Dad called. “I’m home! How’s 
our snowman doing?” 



29 


We ate supper early that evening. Things were pretty quiet around the dinner 
table. 

Tm glad you kids are safe and sound,” Dad said for the fifth time. “That’s 
what counts.” 

“Yeah,” Nicole said, chewing her pizza. 

“Uh-huh,” I added quietly. I usually had three slices. Tonight I could barely 
manage one. And I left the crust on the plate. 

Poor Dad. He was trying so hard not to get upset about losing the 
Abominable Snowman. But Nicole and I knew how bad he felt. 

Dad dropped his half-eaten slice of pizza on his plate. “I’ll tell the Museum 
of Natural History that they’ll have to make do with the photographs.” 

“Photographs are better than nothing,” I said. 

“Better than nothing? Are you crazy?” Nicole cried. “Those pictures are 
going to amaze the whole world!” 

Dad perked up. “That’s true. I mentioned them to some TV producers. They 
went wild.” 

He stood and carried his plate to the sink. “I think I’ll go out to the 
darkroom and develop that film right now. These pictures are going to cheer me 
up. I mean, they’re historic. Historic!” 

I was glad to see Dad snap out of his disappointment. Nicole and I followed 
him, eager to see the photos. 

We sat quietly under the red light while Dad developed the negatives. At 
last he pulled the first set of contact sheets out of the chemical baths. 

Nicole and I leaned close to see the pictures. 

“Huh?” Dad uttered an astonished cry. 

Snow. Nothing but snow. Ten pictures of snow. 

“That’s strange,” Dad choked out. “I don’t remember taking those shots.” 

Nicole flashed me an evil stare. I knew what she was thinking. 

I held my hands up innocently. “I’m not playing any tricks. I swear!” 

“You’d better not be, Jordan,” Dad warned sternly. “I’m in no mood for 
kidding around.” 

Dad turned back to the chemical trays and developed another set of photos. 



As he pulled them up, dripping wet, we all squinted at them. 

More snow. Nothing but snow. 

“This can’t be happening!” Dad screamed. “The Abominable Snowman— 
he should be standing right there!” He pointed. 

His hands shook as he grabbed the rest of the negatives and held them up to 
the red light. “The tundra shots came out fine,” he declared. “The dogs, the sled, 
the elk herd—all there. All perfect. All of them. But the shots in the monster’s 
cave—” 

His voice trailed off. He shook his head sadly. “I don’t get it. I just don’t get 
it. How could this be? Not a single shot of the creature. Not one.” 

I sighed. I felt so bad for Dad. I felt so bad for all three of us. 

No Abominable Snowman. No photos of the Abominable Snowman. 

It was almost as if he never existed. As if the whole thing never happened. 

Nicole and I left Dad in the darkroom to finish his work. 

We trudged around the house to the front. Nicole groaned and grabbed my 
arm. “Oh, no! Look!” 

Across the street in the vacant lot, I saw the Miller twins kneeling down, 
digging in the sand. 

“They’re digging up the snowballs!” I gasped. 

“Those creeps!” Nicole growled. “They must have been spying on us while 
we buried them.” 

“We’ve got to stop them!” I cried. 

We hurried across the street, running full speed. 

I saw Kyle rip open the garbage bag—and pull out one of the snowballs. 

He swung back his arm and aimed at Kara. 

“No—Kyle! Stop!” I screamed. “Don’t throw it! Stop! Don’t throw it, 
Kyle!” 

THWOCK. 



HOW I GOT MY 
SHRUNKEN HEAD 

1 


Have you ever played Jungle King? It’s a computer game, and it’s really cool. 
Unless you sink into a quicksand pit or get squeezed to death by the Living 
Vines. 

You’ve got to be fast to swing from vine to vine without letting them curl 
around your body. And to grab the shmnken heads that are hidden under trees 
and bushes. 

If you collect ten shrunken heads, you get an extra life. You need a lot of 
extra lives in this game. It’s not for beginners. 

My friends Eric and Joel play Jungle King with me. They are twelve, like 
me. My sister Jessica is eight. She hangs around, but we don’t let her play. That’s 
because she always dives into the quicksand pits. She likes the thwuck thwuck 
thwuck sound it makes when your body is being sucked under. 

Jessica just doesn’t get it. 

“Mark, why can’t we play a different game?” Joel asked me. 

I knew why he wanted to quit. He had just been trampled by a red rhino, the 
meanest kind. 

Joel, Eric, and I were up in my room during our winter break from school, 
huddled around my computer. Jessica was on the window seat, reading a book. 
Sunlight poured over her, making her red hair sparkle. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted as I picked up my eighth shrunken head. Kah-lee- 
ah is my jungle cry. It’s a word that popped into my head one day. I guess I made 
it up. 

My face was two inches from the monitor screen. I ducked as spears came 
flying at me from behind a leafy fern. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I let out my battle cry as I picked up another shrunken head. 

“Come on, Mark,” Eric pleaded. “Don’t you have any other games?” 

“Yeah. Don’t you have any sports games?” Joel demanded. “How about 
March Madness Basketball? That’s a cool game!” 

“How about Mutant Football?” Eric asked. 

“I like this game,” I replied, keeping my eyes on the screen. 

Why do I like Jungle King so much? I think it’s because I love swinging 
from vine to vine across the sky. 



You see, I’m a little chubby. Actually, I’m short and chubby. I’m built sort 
of like the red rhinos. And so I guess I like being able to swing so lightly, to fly 
above the ground like a bird. 

Also, it’s an awesome game. 

Joel and Eric don’t like it because I always win. In our first game this 
afternoon, an alligator chewed Joel in half. I think that put him in a bad mood. 

“Do you know what game my dad bought me?” Joel asked. “Battle 
Solitaire. ” 

I leaned closer to the screen. I had to get past the biggest quicksand pit. One 
slip, and I’d be sucked into the sandy slime. 

“What kind of game is that?” Eric asked Joel. 

“It’s a card game,” Joel told him. “You know. Solitaire. Only the cards fight 
each other.” 

“Cool,” Eric replied. 

“Hey, guys—I’m in a tough spot here,” I said. “Give me a break, okay? I’ve 
got to concentrate. I’m right over the quicksand pit.” 

“But we don’t want to play anymore,” Eric complained. 

I grabbed a vine. Swung hard. Then reached for the next one. 

And someone bumped my shoulder. “Owww!” 

I saw a flash of red hair and knew it was Jessica. She bumped me again and 
giggled. 

I watched myself tumbling down on the screen. Sucked into the bottomless 
slime pit. 

Thwuck thwuck thwuck. I died. 

I spun around angrily. “Jessica—!” 

“My turn!” She grinned at me, her wide, toothy grin. 

“Now we have to start all over again!” I announced. 

“No way,” Eric protested. “I’m going home.” 

“Me, too,” Joel said, pulling his baseball cap lower on his forehead. 

“One more game!” I pleaded. 

“Come on, Mark. Let’s go outside,” Joel said, pointing to the bright 
sunshine pouring through the bedroom window. 

“Yeah. It’s a great day out. Let’s throw a Frisbee or something,” Eric 
suggested. “Or get our skateboards.” 

“One more game. Then we’ll go outside,” I insisted. 

I watched them head out the door. 



I really didn’t want to leave the jungle. I don’t know why I like jungles so 
much. But I’ve been really into jungles since I was a teeny kid. 

I like to watch all the old jungle movies on TV. And when we were little, I 
used to pretend I was Tarzan, King of the Jungle. Jessica always wanted to play, 
too. So I let her be Cheetah, my talking chimpanzee. 

She was very good at it. 

But after she was six or seven, Jessica refused to be a chimp anymore. She 
became a full-time pest instead. 

“I’ll play Jungle King with you, Mark,” she offered, after my two friends 

left. 

“No way,” I replied, shaking my head. “You just want to take a dive into the 
quicksand pit.” 

“No. I’ll play it right,” she promised. “I’ll try to win this time. Really.” 

I was about to let her play when the doorbell rang downstairs. 

“Is Mom home?” I asked, listening for her footsteps. 

“I think she’s in the backyard,” Jessica replied. 

So I hurried downstairs to answer the front door. Maybe Eric and Joel 
changed their minds, I thought. Maybe they’ve come back for another round of 
Jungle King. 

I pulled open the front door. 

And stared at the grossest thing I ever saw in my life. 



2 


I stared at a head. 

A human head, wrinkled and leathery. About the size of a tennis ball. 

The pale, dry lips were pulled back in a sneer. The neck was stitched closed 
with heavy black string. The eyes—solid black eyes—stared up at me. 

A shrunken head. A real shrunken head. 

I was so shocked, so totally amazed to find it at my front door, that it took 
me a long time to see the woman who was holding it. 

She was a tall woman, about my mom’s age, maybe a little older. She had 
short black hair with streaks of gray in it. She wore a long raincoat buttoned to 
the top even though it was a warm, sunny day. 

She smiled at me. I couldn’t see her eyes. They were hidden behind large 
black-framed sunglasses. 

She held the shrunken head by the hair—thick black hair. Her other hand 
held a small canvas suitcase. 

“Are you Mark?” she asked. She had a soft, smooth voice, like someone in 
a TV commercial. 

“Uh... yeah,” I replied, staring at the shrunken head. They never looked so 
ugly in photos I’d seen. So wrinkled and dry. 

“I hope I didn’t startle you with this thing,” the woman said, smiling. “I was 
so eager to give it to you, I took it out of my bag.” 

“Uh... give it to me?” I asked, not taking my eyes off it. The head stared 
back at me with those glassy black eyes. They looked more like teddy-bear eyes 
than human eyes. 

“Your aunt Benna sent it for you,” the woman said. “As a present.” 

She held out the head to me. But I didn’t take it. I had spent all day 
collecting shrunken heads in the game. But I wasn’t sure I wanted to touch this 
one. 

“Mark—who is here?” My mom stepped up behind me. “Oh. Hello.” 

“Hello,” the woman replied pleasantly. “Did Benna write and tell you I was 
coming? I’m Carolyn Hawlings. I work with her. On the island.” 

“Oh, my goodness,” Mom exclaimed. “Benna’s letter must have gotten lost. 
Come in. Come in.” She pulled me back so that Carolyn could enter the house. 



“Look what she brought for me, Mom,” I said. 

I pointed to the small green head dangling by the hair from Carolyn’s hand. 

“Yuck!” Mom cried, raising a hand to her cheek. “That isn’t real —is it?” 

“Of course it’s real!” I cried. “Aunt Benna wouldn’t send a fake —would 
she?” 

Carolyn stepped into the living room and set down her small suitcase. I took 
a deep breath. Worked up my courage. And reached for the shrunken head. 

But before I could take it, Jessica swooped in—and grabbed it out of 
Carolyn’s hand. 

“Hey—!” I shouted, reaching for her. 

She darted away, giggling, her red hair flying behind her. Holding the head 
in both hands. 

But then she stopped. 

Her smile faded. And she stared down at the head in horror. 

“It bit me!” Jessica cried. “It bit me!” 



3 


I gasped. Mom squeezed my shoulder. 

Jessica started to giggle. 

One of her dumb jokes. 

She tossed the head from hand to hand. And grinned at me. “You’re dumb, 
Mark. You’ll believe anything.” 

“Just give me back my head!” I cried angrily. I dove across the living room 
and grabbed for it. 

She started to pull it away—but I held on tightly. 

“Hey—you scratched it!” I shrieked. 

She did. I held the head up close to my face to examine it. Jessica had 
scratched a long white line on the right earlobe. 

“Jessica—please,” Mom begged, crossing her arms and lowering her voice. 
That’s what Mom does when she’s about to get steamed. “Shape up. We have a 
guest.” 

Jessica crossed her arms and pouted back at Mom. 

Mom turned to Carolyn. “How is my sister Benna doing?” 

Carolyn pulled off her sunglasses and tucked them into a raincoat pocket. 
She had silvery-gray eyes. She looked older without the dark glasses on. I could 
see hundreds of tiny wrinkles at the corners of her eyes. 

“Benna is fine,” she replied. “Working hard. Too hard. Sometimes she 
disappears into the jungle for days.” 

Carolyn sighed and started to unbutton her raincoat. “I’m sure you know 
Benna’s work is her life,” she continued. “She spends every minute exploring the 
jungles of Baladora. She wanted to come visit. But she couldn’t leave the island. 
So she sent me instead.” 

“Well, it’s very nice to meet you, Carolyn,” Mom said warmly. “I’m sorry 
we didn’t know you were coming. But any friend of Benna’s is more than 
welcome.” 

She took Carolyn’s raincoat. Carolyn wore khaki pants and a short-sleeved 
khaki shirt. It looked like a real jungle-exploring suit. 

“Come sit down,” Mom told her. “What can I offer you?” 

“A cup of coffee would be nice,” Carolyn replied. She started to follow 



Mom to the kitchen. But she stopped and smiled at me. “Do you like your 
present?” 

I gazed down at the wrinkled, leathery head in my hands. “It’s beautiful!” I 
declared. 

That night before going to bed, I placed the head on my dresser. I brushed its 
thick black hair straight back. The forehead was dark green and wrinkled like a 
pmne. The glassy black eyes stared straight ahead. 

Carolyn told me that the head was over one hundred years old. I leaned 
against the dresser and stared at it. It was so hard to believe that it had once 
belonged to a real person. 

Yuck. 

How had the guy lost his head? I wondered. 

And who decided to shrink it? And who kept it after it was shrunk? 

I wished Aunt Benna were here. She would explain everything to me. 

Carolyn was sleeping in the guest room down the hall. We had sat in the 
living room, talking about Aunt Benna all night. Carolyn described the work 
Aunt Benna was doing on the jungle island. And the amazing things she was 
finding there on Baladora. 

My aunt Benna is a pretty famous scientist. She has been on Baladora for 
nearly ten years. She studies the animals in the jungle. And the plant life, too. 

I loved listening to Carolyn’s stories. It was as if my Jungle King computer 
game had come to life. 

Jessica kept wanting to play with my shrunken head. But I wouldn’t let her. 
She had already put a scratch on its ear. 

“It’s not a toy. It’s a human head,” I told my sister. 

“I’ll trade you two of my Koosh balls for it,” Jessica offered. 

Was she crazy? 

Why would I trade a valuable treasure like this for two Koosh balls? 

Sometimes I worried about Jessica. 

At ten o’clock, Mom sent me up to my room. “Carolyn and I have some 
things to talk about,” she announced. I said good night and made my way 
upstairs. 

I placed the shrunken head on my dresser and changed into my pajamas. 
The dark eyes in the head appeared to flash for a second when I turned out the 
lights. 



I climbed into bed and pulled up the covers. Silvery moonlight washed into 
the room from the bedroom window. In the bright moonlight, I could see the 
head clearly, staring at me from the dresser top, bathed in shadows. 

What a horrible sneer on its face, I thought with a shiver. Why is it locked 
in such a frightening expression? 

I answered my own question: You wouldn’t smile either, Mark, if someone 
shrunk your head! 

I fell asleep staring at the ugly little head. 

I slept heavily, without any dreams. 

I don’t know how long I slept. But sometime in the middle of the night, I 
was awakened by a terrifying whisper. 

“Mark... Mark...” 



4 


“Mark... Mark...” 

The eerie whisper grew louder. 

I sat straight up, and my eyes shot open. And in the heavy darkness, I saw 
Jessica, standing beside the bed. 

“Mark... Mark... ” she whispered, tugging my pajama sleeve. 

I swallowed hard. My heart pounded. “Huh? You? What’s your problem?” 

“I-I had a bad dream,” she stammered. “And I fell out of bed.” 

Jessica falls out of bed at least once a week. Mom says she’s going to build 
a tall fence around Jessica’s bed to keep her in. Or else buy her a king-size bed. 

But I think Jessica would just roll around even harder in a big bed and still 
fall out. My sister is a pest even in her sleep! 

“I need a drink of water,” she whispered, still tugging my sleeve. 

I groaned and pulled my arm away. “Well, go downstairs and get it. You’re 
not a baby,” I growled. 

“I’m scared.” She grabbed my hand and pulled. “You have to come with 

me.” 

“Jessica—!” I started to protest. But why bother? Whenever Jessica has a 
scary dream, I end up taking her downstairs for a glass of water. 

I climbed out of bed and led the way to the door. We both stopped in front 
of the dresser. The shrunken head stared out at us in the darkness. 

“I think that head gave me bad dreams,” Jessica whispered softly. 

“Don’t blame the head,” I replied, yawning. “You have bad dreams just 
about every night—remember? It’s because you have a sick mind.” 

“Do not!” she cried angrily. She punched my shoulder. Hard. 

“If you hit me, I won’t get you a drink,” I told her. 

She reached out a finger and poked the shrunken head on one of its 
wrinkled cheeks. “Yuck. It feels like leather. It doesn’t feel like skin.” 

“I guess heads get hard when you shrink them,” I said, straightening the 
thick tuft of black hair. 

“Why did Aunt Benna send you a shrunken head and not send me one?” 
Jessica asked. 



I shrugged. “Beats me.” We tiptoed out into the hall and turned toward the 
stairs. “Maybe it’s because Aunt Benna doesn’t remember you. The last time she 
visited us, you were just a baby. I was only four.” 

“Aunt Benna remembers me,” Jessica replied. She loves to argue. 

“Well, maybe she thinks that girls don’t like shrunken heads,” I said. We 
made our way down to the kitchen. The stairs squeaked under our bare feet. 

“Girls like shrunken heads,” Jessica argued. “I know I do. They’re cool.” 

I filled a glass with water and handed it to her. She made gulping sounds as 
she drank. “You’ll share your head with me—right?” she asked. 

“No way,” I told her. 

How do you share a head? 

We made our way back upstairs in the darkness. I took her to her room and 
tucked her in. Then I crept back to my room and slipped into bed. 

I yawned and pulled the covers up to my chin. 

I shut my eyes, but opened them again quickly. What was that yellow light 
across the room? 

At first, I thought someone had turned the hall light on. 

But, squinting across the room, I saw that it wasn’t a light. The head. The 
shrunken head—it was glowing! 

As if bright flames surrounded it. A shimmering yellow glow. 

And in the glow, I saw the dark eyes gleam and sparkle. 

And then the lips—the thin, dry lips that had been set in a hard scowl—the 
lips began to twitch. And the mouth pulled up in a horrifying smile. 



5 


“Nooooooo!” 

I let out a terrified wail. 

Glowing brightly, surrounded by eerie yellow light, the head grinned at me, 
its dark eyes flashing. 

My hands thrashed at the covers. I struggled to pull myself out of bed. But 
my legs tangled in the blanket, and I fell with a hard thud to the floor. 

“Nooooooo!” I cried. My body trembled so hard, I could barely scramble to 
my feet. 

Gazing up, I saw the grinning head float over the dresser. Float into the air. 
Float toward me like a glowing comet. 

No! 

I covered my face to shield myself. 

When I glanced back up, the shrunken head glowed on the dresser top. 

Had I imagined it floating up? 

I didn’t care. I ran out of the bedroom. “The head! The head!” I shrieked. 
“It’s glowing. The head is glowing!” 

Jessica jumped out as I ran past her bedroom. “Mark—what’s going on?” 
she called. 

I didn’t stop to answer. I kept on running, down the hall to Mom and Dad’s 
room. “The head!” I wailed. “The head!” I was so terrified, I didn’t know what I 
was doing! 

The door was closed. But I shoved it open without knocking. Mom was 
lying on her back on her side of the bed. My dad was away this week on a 
business trip. But Mom still slept on her side of the bed. 

As I burst in, she sat up and uttered a startled cry. “Mark?” 

I ran up beside her. “Mom—the shrunken head—it started to glow!” I cried, 
my voice high and shrill. “It’s glowing, and it—it grinned at me!” 

Mom stood up and wrapped me in a hug. She felt so warm and soft. I was 
shaking all over. I suddenly felt as if I were a little boy again. 

“Mark, you had a nightmare,” Mom said softly. She ran her hand over the 
back of my hair, the way she used to do when I was little. 

“But, Mom—” 



“That’s all it was. A nightmare. Take a deep breath. Look how you’re 
shaking.” 

I pulled away from her. I knew it wasn’t a nightmare. I’d been wide awake. 
“Come and see,” I insisted. “Hurry.” 

I pulled her out into the hall. A light clicked on in Carolyn’s room, and her 
door swung open. “What’s happening?” she asked sleepily. She was wearing a 
long black nightshirt. 

“Mark says his shrunken head glowed,” Mom reported. “I think he had a 
bad dream.” 

“No, I didn’t!” I shouted angrily. “Come on. I’ll show you!” 

I started to pull Mom down the hall. But I stopped when I saw the intense 
expression on Carolyn’s face. She had been sleepy a second ago. But now her 
eyes were wide, and she was staring at me hard. Staring at my face, studying me. 

I turned away from her and nearly bumped into Jessica. “Why did you wake 
me up?” Jessica demanded. 

I pushed past her and led everyone down the hall to my room. “The head 
glowed!” I cried. “And it smiled at me. Look. You’ll see!” 

I burst into my room and strode up to the dresser. 

The head was gone. 



6 


I stared in shock at the bare dresser top. 

Behind me, someone clicked on the bedroom light. I blinked in the bright 
light, expecting the shrunken head to appear. 

Where was it? 

My eyes searched the floor. Had it fallen and rolled away? Had it floated 
out of the room? 

“Mark—is this some kind of joke?” Mom asked. She suddenly sounded 
very tired. 

“No—” I started. “Really, Mom. The head—” 

And then I saw the sly grin on Jessica’s face. And I saw that my sister had 
both hands behind her back. 

“Jessica—what are you hiding?” I demanded. 

Her grin grew wider. She never could keep a straight face. “Nothing,” she 

lied. 

“Let me see your hands,” I said sharply. 

“No way!” she replied. But she burst out laughing and brought her hands in 
front of her. And of course she had the shrunken head gripped tightly in her right 
hand. 

“Jessica—!” I let out an angry cry and snatched it away from her. “It’s not a 
toy,” I scolded her angrily. “You keep your paws off it. Hear?” 

“Well, it wasn’t glowing,” she sneered. “And it wasn’t smiling, either. You 
made that all up, Mark.” 

“Did not!” I cried. 

I examined the head. Its dry lips were pulled back in the toothless snarl it 
always had. The skin was green and leathery, not glowing at all. 

“Mark, you had a bad dream,” Mom insisted, covering her mouth as she 
yawned. “Put the head down, and let’s all get some sleep.” 

“Okay, okay,” I muttered. I flashed Jessica another angry look. Then I set 
the shrunken head down on the dresser. 

Mom and Jessica walked out of my room. “Mark is such a jerk,” I heard 
Jessica say, just loud enough for me to hear. “I asked him to share the shrunken 
head, and he said he wouldn’t.” 



“We’ll talk about it in the morning,” Mom replied, yawning again. 

I started to turn off the light. But I stopped when I saw Carolyn, still 
standing in the hah. Still staring hard at me, a really intense expression on her 
face. 

She narrowed her silvery eyes at me. “Did you really see it glow, Mark?” 
she asked softly. 

I glanced at the head. Dark and still. “Yeah. I did,” I replied. 

Carolyn nodded. She seemed to be thinking hard about something. “Good 
night,” she murmured. Then she turned and padded silently back to the guest 
room. 

The next morning, Mom and Carolyn greeted me with the biggest surprise 
of my life. 



7 


“Your aunt Benna wants you to come visit her in the jungle,” Mom announced at 
breakfast. 

I dropped the spoon into my Froot Loops. My mouth fell open to my knees. 
“Excuse me?” 

Mom and Carolyn grinned at me. I guess they enjoyed shocking me. 
“That’s why Carolyn came,” Mom explained. “To take you back with her to 
Baladora.” 

“Wh-why didn’t you tell me?” I shrieked. 

“We didn’t want to tell you until we worked out all the details,” Mom 
replied. “Are you excited? You get to visit a real jungle!” 

“Excited isn’t the word!” I exclaimed. “I’m... I’m... I’m... I don’t know 
what I am!” 

They both laughed. 

“I get to go, too!” Jessica declared, bouncing into the kitchen. 

I let out a groan. 

“No, Jessica. You can’t go this time,” Mom said, putting a hand on my 
sister’s shoulder. “This is Mark’s turn.” 

“That isn’t fair!” Jessica wailed, shoving Mom’s hand away. 

“Yes, it is,” I replied happily. “Kah-lee-ah!” I cheered. Then I leaped to my 
feet and did a celebration dance around the kitchen table. 

“Not fair! Not fair!” Jessica chanted. 

“Jessica, you don’t like jungles,” I reminded her. 

“Yes, I do!” she insisted. 

“Next time will be your turn,” Carolyn said, taking a long sip of coffee. 
“I’m sure your aunt would love to show you the jungle, Jessica.” 

“Yeah. When you’re older,” I sneered. “You know, the jungle is too 
dangerous for a kid.” 

Of course, when I said that to my sister, I had no idea of just how dangerous 
the jungle could be. No idea that I was heading toward dangers I couldn’t even 
imagine. 

After breakfast, Mom helped me pack my suitcase. I wanted to bring shorts and 



T-shirts. I knew it was hot in the jungle. 

But Carolyn insisted that I pack long-sleeved shirts and jeans, because of 
the scratchy weeds and vines we’d be walking through. And because of all the 
jungle insects. 

“You have to protect yourself from the sun,” Carolyn instructed. “Baladora 
is so close to the equator. The sun is very strong. And the temperature stays in 
the nineties all day.” 

Of course I carefully packed the shrunken head. I didn’t want Jessica to get 
her paws on it while I was away. 

I know, I know. Sometimes I’m pretty mean to my sister. 

As we drove to the airport, I thought about poor Jessica, staying home 
while I went off to exciting adventures with Aunt Benna. 

I decided to bring her back a really cool souvenir from the jungle. Some 
poison ivy, maybe. Or some kind of poisonous snake. Ha-ha! 

At the airport, Mom kept hugging me and telling me to be careful. Then she 
hugged me some more. It was really pretty embarrassing. 

Finally, it came time for Carolyn and me to board the plane. I felt scared 
and excited and glad and worried—all at once! 

“Be sure to send postcards!” Mom called as I followed Carolyn to the gate. 

“If I can find a mailbox!” I called back. 

I didn’t think they had mailboxes in the jungle. 

The flight was very long. So long, they showed three movies in a row! 

Carolyn spent a lot of time reading through her notebooks and papers. But 
when the flight attendants served dinner, she took a break. And she told me 
about the work Aunt Benna had been doing in the jungle. 

Carolyn said that Aunt Benna had made many exciting discoveries. She had 
discovered two kinds of plants that no one had ever seen before. One is a kind of 
crawling vine that she named after herself. Benna-lepticus. Or something like 
that. 

Carolyn said that Aunt Benna was exploring parts of the jungle where no 
one had ever gone. And that she was turning up all kinds of jungle secrets. 
Secrets that will make Aunt Benna famous when she decides to announce them. 

“When was the last time your aunt visited you?” Carolyn asked. She 
struggled to pull open the plastic wrapping around her silverware. 

“A long time ago,” I told her. “I can hardly remember what Aunt Benna 



looks like. I was only four or five.” 

Carolyn nodded. “Did she give you any special presents?” she asked. She 
pulled out the plastic knife and started to spread butter on her dinner roll. 

I scrunched up my face, thinking hard. “Special presents?” 

“Did she bring you anything from the jungle when she visited you?” 
Carolyn asked. She lowered the dinner roll to the tray and turned to me. 

She had her dark glasses on again, so I couldn’t see her eyes. But I had the 
feeling she was staring at me, studying me. 

“I don’t remember,” I replied. “I know she didn’t bring me anything as cool 
as a shrunken head. That head is really awesome!” 

Carolyn didn’t smile. She turned back to her food tray. I could tell she was 
thinking hard about something. 

I fell asleep after dinner. We flew all night and landed in Southeast Asia. 

We arrived just after dawn. The sky outside the airplane window was a deep 
purple. A beautiful color I’d never seen before. A big red sun rose slowly 
through the purple. 

“We change planes here,” Carolyn announced. “A huge jet like this could 
never land in Baladora. We have to take a tiny plane from here.” 

The plane was tiny, for sure. It looked like a toy. It was painted a dull red. It 
had two red propellers on the slender wings. I searched for the rubber bands that 
made the propellers spin! 

Carolyn introduced me to the pilot. He was a young man in a red-and- 
yellow Hawaiian shirt and khaki shorts. He had slicked-down black hair and a 
black mustache. His name was Ernesto. 

“Can this thing fly?” I asked him. 

He grinned at me from beneath the mustache. “I hope so,” he replied, 
chuckling. 

He helped us up metal steps into the cabin. Then he hoisted himself into the 
cockpit. Carolyn and I filled the cabin. There was only room for the two of us 
back there! 

When Ernesto started the engine, it chugged and sputtered like a power 
mower starting up. 

The propellers began to twirl. The engine roared. So loud I couldn’t hear 
what Ernesto was shouting to us. 

Finally I figured out that he was telling us to fasten our seat belts. 

I swallowed hard and stared out the tiny window. Ernesto backed the plane 



out of the hangar. The roar was so loud, I wanted to cover my ears. 

This is going to be exciting, I thought. It’s kind of like flying inside a kite! 

A few minutes later, we were in the air, flying low over the blue-green 
ocean. The bright morning sunlight made the water sparkle. 

The plane bumped and jerked. I could feel the wind blowing it, making us 
bounce. 

After a while, Carolyn pointed out the islands down below. They were 
mostly green, with ribbons of yellow sand around them. 

“Those are all jungle islands,” Carolyn told me. “See that one?” She 
pointed to a large, egg-shaped island. “Some people found buried pirate’s 
treasure on that island. Gold and jewels worth millions of dollars.” 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. 

Ernesto leaned over the throttle and brought the plane lower. So low I could 
clearly make out trees and shrubs. The trees all seemed tangled together. I 
couldn’t see any roads or paths. 

The ocean water darkened to a deep green. The engine roared as the plane 
bounced against strong winds. 

“That’s Baladora up ahead!” Carolyn announced. She pointed out the 
window as another island came into view. Baladora was larger than the other 
islands, and very jagged. It curved around like a crescent moon. 

“I can’t believe that Aunt Benna is down there somewhere!” I exclaimed. 

Carolyn smiled beneath her dark glasses. “She’s there, okay.” 

I glanced to the front as Ernesto turned in his seat to face us. I saw instantly 
that he had a troubled expression on his face. 

“We have a little problem,” he said, shouting over the roar of the engine. 

“Problem?” Carolyn asked. 

Ernesto nodded grimly. “Yes. A problem. You see... I don’t know how to 
land this thing. You two will have to jump.” 

Panic made me gasp. “But—but—but—” I sputtered. “We don’t have 
parachutes!” 

Ernesto shrugged. “Try to land on something soft,” he said. 



8 


My mouth dropped open. My breath caught in my chest. Both hands gripped the 
arms of the seat. 

Then I saw the smile on Carolyn’s face. She shook her head, her eyes on 
Ernesto. “Mark is too smart for you,” she told him. “He’s not going to fall for a 
dumb joke like that.” 

Ernesto laughed. He narrowed his dark eyes at me. “You believed me— 
right?” 

“Ha-ha. No way!” I choked out. My knees were still shaking. “I knew you 
were kidding,” I lied. “Kind of.” 

Carolyn and Ernesto both laughed. “You’re mean,” she told Ernesto. 

Ernesto’s eyes flashed. His smile faded. “You’ve got to get used to thinking 
fast in the jungle,” he warned. 

He turned back to the controls. I kept my eyes out the window, watching the 
island of Baladora sweep beneath us. Broad-winged white birds swooped over 
the tangled green trees. 

A short strip of land had been cleared near the south shore of the island. 
Beyond it, I could see ocean waves smacking against dark rocks. 

The little plane hit hard as we landed—hard enough to make my knees 
bounce up in the air. We bounced again on the bumpy, dirt landing strip. Then 
we rolled to a stop. 

Ernesto cut the engine. He pushed open the cabin door. Then he helped us 
out of the plane. We had to duck our heads. 

Ernesto carried our suitcases out. Carolyn had her small canvas bag. My 
suitcase was a little larger. He set them down on the landing strip and gave us a 
short, two-fingered salute. Then he climbed back into the little red plane and 
pulled the door closed behind him. 

I shut my eyes as the propellers whirred, showering sand over me. A few 
seconds later, Ernesto took off. The plane nosed up steeply, just barely making it 
over the trees at the end of the landing strip. 

The plane turned sharply and headed back over the water. Carolyn and I 
picked up our bags. “Where do we go now?” I asked, squinting in the bright 
sunlight. 



Carolyn pointed. A clearing of tall grass stretched beyond the narrow, dirt 
airstrip. At the edge of the clearing where the trees started, I could see a row of 
low gray buildings. 

“That’s our headquarters,” Carolyn told me. “We built the airstrip right next 
to it. The rest of the island is jungle. No roads. No other houses. Just 
wilderness.” 

“Do you get cable?” I asked. 

She stopped short. Then laughed. I don’t think she expected me to make a 

joke. 

We carried our suitcases toward the low gray buildings. The morning sun 
was still low in the sky. But the air was already hot and wet. Hundreds of tiny 
white insects—some kind of gnat—hovered over the tall grass, darting one way 
then the other. 

I heard shrill buzzing. And somewhere in the distance, the high cry of a 
bird, followed by a long, sad reply. 

Carolyn walked quickly, taking long strides over the tall grass, ignoring the 
darting white gnats. I jogged to keep up with her. 

Sweat ran down my forehead. The back of my neck started to itch. 

Why was Carolyn in such a hurry? 

“We’re kind of trapped here, right?” I said, studying the low, twisted trees 
beyond the small headquarters buildings. “I mean, how do we get off the island 
when we’re finished?” 

“We radio for Ernesto,” Carolyn replied, not slowing her pace. “It takes him 
about an hour to get here from the mainland.” 

That made me feel a little better. I scurried over the tall grass, struggling to 
keep up with Carolyn. 

My suitcase began to feel heavy. I wiped sweat from my eyes with my free 
hand. 

We were nearing the headquarters. I expected Aunt Benna to come running 
out to greet me. But I couldn’t see any sign of anyone. 

A radio antenna was perched off to the side. The low buildings were 
perfectly square. Flat-roofed. They looked like upside-down cartons. Square 
windows had been cut in each wall. 

“What is that stretched over all the windows?” I asked Carolyn. 

“Mosquito netting,” she replied. She turned back to me. “Have you ever 
seen a mosquito as big as your head?” 



I laughed. “No.” 

“Well, you will.” 

I laughed again. She was joking—right? 

We stepped up to the first building, the largest in the row. I set down my 
suitcase, pulled off my baseball cap, and mopped my forehead with my 
shirtsleeve. Wow. It was hot. 

A screen door led into the building. Carolyn held it open for me. 

“Aunt Benna—!” I cried eagerly. Leaving the suitcase on the ground, I ran 
inside. “Aunt Benna?” 

Sunlight filtered through the netting over the window. It took a few seconds 
for my eyes to adjust to the darker light. 

I saw a table cluttered with test tubes and other equipment. I saw a 
bookshelf filled with notebooks and books. 

“Aunt Benna?” 

Then I saw her. Wearing a white lab coat. Standing with her back to me, at a 
sink against the wall. 

She turned, wiping her hands on a towel. 

No. 

Not Aunt Benna. 

A man. A white-haired man in a white lab coat. 

His hair was thick and brushed straight back. Even in the dim light, I could 
see the pale blue of his eyes, blue as the sky. Such strange eyes. They looked like 
blue glass. Like marbles. 

He smiled. Not at me. 

He was smiling at Carolyn. 

He motioned to me by tilting his head. “Does he have it?” he asked 
Carolyn. He had a scratchy, hoarse voice. 

Carolyn nodded. “Yes. He has it.” I could see that she was breathing hard. 
Short, shallow breaths. 

Was she excited? Nervous? 

A smile crossed the man’s face. His blue eyes appeared to twinkle. 

“Hi,” I said awkwardly. I felt really confused. What did that question mean? 
What did I have? 

“Where is my aunt Benna?” I asked. 

Before he could answer, a girl appeared from the back room. She had 
straight blond hair and the same pale blue eyes. She was dressed in a white T- 



shirt and white tennis shorts. She appeared to be about my age. 

“This is my daughter Kareen,” the man said in his hoarse voice, more like a 
whisper. “I am Dr. Richard Hawlings.” He turned to Kareen. “This is Benna’s 
nephew. Mark.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” Kareen replied sharply, rolling her eyes. 
She turned to me. “Hey, Mark.” 

“Hi,” I replied. Still confused. 

Kareen flipped her blond hair back over the shoulders of her T-shirt. “What 
grade are you in?” 

“Sixth,” I told her. 

“Me, too. Except I’m not in school this term. I’m in this dump.” She 
frowned at her father. 

“Where is my aunt?” I asked Dr. Hawlings. “Is she working or something? I 
thought she’d be here. You know. When I arrived.” 

Dr. Hawlings stared at me with those strange blue eyes. It took him a long 
time to reply. Finally, he said, “Benna isn’t here.” 

“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I’d heard him correctly. It was hard to 
understand his raspy voice. “Is she... uh... working?” 

“We don’t know,” he replied. 

Kareen played with a strand of her hair. She twisted it around her finger, 
staring at me. 

Carolyn stepped behind the lab table and leaned her elbows on it. She rested 
her head in her hands. “Your aunt Benna is missing,” she said. 

Her words made my head spin. 

They were so unexpected. And she said them so flatly. Without any feeling 
at all. 

“She’s... missing !” 

“She’s been missing for a few weeks,” Kareen said, glancing at her father. 
“The three of us—we’ve been trying really hard to find her.” 

“I-I don’t understand,” I stammered. I shoved my hands into my jeans 
pockets. 

“Your aunt is lost in the jungle,” Dr. Hawlings explained. 

“But—Carolyn said—” I started. 

Dr. Hawlings raised a hand to silence me. “Your aunt is lost in the jungle, 
Mark.” 

“But-but why didn’t you tell my mom?” I asked, confused. 



“We didn’t want to worry her,” Dr. Hawlings replied. “Benna’s your mom’s 
sister, after all. So Carolyn brought you here because you can help us find her.” 

“Huh?” My mouth dropped open in shock. “Me? How can I help?” 

Dr. Hawlings stepped across the small room toward me. His eyes locked on 
mine. “You can help us, Mark,” he said in his hoarse whisper. “You can help us 
find Benna—because you have Jungle Magic.” 



9 


“I have what?” 

I stared at Dr. Hawlings. I didn’t know what he was talking about. 

Was Jungle Magic some kind of computer game? Was it like Jungle King? 

Why did he think I had it? 

“You have Jungle Magic,” he repeated, staring back at me with those 
amazing blue eyes. “Let me explain.” 

“Daddy, give Mark a break,” Kareen interrupted. “He’s been flying for a 
hundred hours. He must be wrecked!” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. I’m a little tired.” 

“Come sit down,” Carolyn said. She led me over to a tall stool beside the 
lab table. Then she turned to Kareen. “Do we have any Cokes left?” 

Kareen pulled open a small refrigerator against the back wall. “A few,” she 
replied, bending down to get to the bottom shelf. “Ernesto is supposed to bring 
another carton on his next flight.” 

Kareen brought me a can of Coke. I popped it open and tilted the can to my 
mouth. The cold liquid felt so good on my hot, dry throat. 

Kareen leaned against the table, close to me. “Have you ever been to a 
jungle before?” 

I swallowed more Coke. “No. Not really. But I’ve seen a lot of jungle 
movies.” 

Kareen laughed. “It’s not like in the movies. I mean, there aren’t herds of 
gazelles and elephants gathering at the water hole. At least, not on Baladora.” 

“What animals are on the island?” I asked. 

“Mosquitoes, mostly,” Kareen answered. 

“There are some beautiful red birds,” Carolyn said. “Called scarlet ibises. 
You won’t believe their color. Kind of like flamingos, only much brighter.” 

Dr. Hawlings had been studying me the whole while. He walked over to the 
table and dropped down onto a stool across from me. 

I held the cold soda can against my hot forehead. Then I lowered it to the 
table. “Tell me about my aunt Benna,” I said to him. 

“Not much to tell,” Dr. Hawlings replied, frowning. “She was studying a 
new kind of tree snail. Somewhere on this end of the jungle. But one night she 



didn’t return.” 

“We’re very worried about her,” Carolyn said, twisting a strand of hair. She 
bit her lower lip. “Very worried. We searched and searched. Then we decided 
you could help us.” 

“But how can I help?” I demanded. “I told you—I’ve never been to a 
jungle.” 

“But you have Jungle Magic,” Carolyn replied. “Benna gave it to you. The 
last time she visited you. We read about it. It’s in Benna’s notebooks over there.” 

Carolyn pointed to a stack of black notebooks on the bookshelf against the 
wall. I gazed at them, thinking hard. I still didn’t understand. 

“Aunt Benna gave me some kind of magic?” I asked. 

Dr. Hawlings nodded. “Yes, she did. She was afraid the secret might fall 
into the wrong hands. So she gave it to you.” 

“Don’t you remember?” Carolyn asked. 

“I was so little,” I told them. “I was only four. I don’t remember. I don’t 
think she gave me anything.” 

“But she did,” Carolyn insisted. “We know you have Jungle Magic. We 
know that you—” 

“How?” I interrupted. “How do you know I have it?” 

“Because you saw the shrunken head glow,” Carolyn replied. “The head 
will only glow for people who have the magic. We read that in Benna’s 
notebooks.” 

I swallowed hard. My throat suddenly felt dry again. My heart began to 

race. 

“You’re telling me I have some special kind of magic powers?” I asked in a 
tiny voice. “But I don’t feel strange or anything. I’ve never done anything 
magic!” 

“You have the magic,” Dr. Hawlings said softly. “The magic is hundreds of 
years old. It belonged to the Oloyan people. They used to live on this island.” 

“They were headshrinkers,” Carolyn added. “Hundreds of years ago. That 
head I brought you—it was Oloyan. We have uncovered many others.” 

“But your aunt uncovered the secret of their ancient magic,” Dr. Hawlings 
said. “And she gave it to you.” 

“You’ve got to help us find her!” Kareen declared. “You’ve got to use the 
magic. We’ve got to find poor Benna—before it’s too late.” 

“I-I’ll try,” I told them. 



But secretly, I thought: They’ve made a big mistake. 
Maybe they mixed me up with someone else. 

I don’t have any Jungle Magic. None at all. 

What am I going to do? 



10 


I spent the day exploring the edge of the jungle with Kareen. We uncovered 
some amazing yellow spiders that were nearly as big as my fist. And Kareen 
showed me a plant that can snap its leaves closed around an insect and keep it 
trapped for days until the plant has digested it all. 

Pretty cool. 

We climbed low, smooth-barked trees. We sat in the tree limbs and talked. 

Kareen is okay, I think. She’s very serious. She doesn’t laugh a whole lot. 
And she doesn’t like the jungle at all. 

Kareen’s mom died when she was a little kid. She wants to go back to New 
Jersey and live with her grandmother. But her father won’t let her. 

As I talked with her, I kept thinking about Jungle Magic. And I kept 
thinking about how—whatever it was—I didn’t have it. 

Sure, I always liked jungle movies. And jungle books and jungle games. I 
always thought jungles were really awesome. But that doesn’t mean I have any 
special powers or anything. 

And now Aunt Benna was missing. And her friends on Baladora were so 
desperate to find her, they had brought me here. 

But what could I do? 

What? 

As I lay in bed that night, the questions didn’t go away. 

I stared up at the low ceiling of the small wooden shack, wide awake. There 
were six or seven flat-roofed shacks in a row, behind the main building. We each 
had our own little shack to sleep in. 

My little cabin had a narrow bed with a flat, lumpy mattress. A low bedside 
table where I placed my shrunken head. A small dresser with all the drawers 
stuck except the bottom one. A narrow closet, just big enough for the clothes I’d 
brought. And a tiny bathroom in the back. 

Through the netting over the open window, I could hear the chirp of insects. 
And in the distance, I heard a caww caww cawww. Some sort of animal cry. 

How can I help find Aunt Benna? I wondered as I stared up at the dark 
ceiling and listened to the strange sounds. 

What can I do? 



I tried to remember her. I tried to remember her visit to my house when I 
was four. 

I pictured a short, dark-haired woman. Chubby like me. A round pink face. 
Intense dark eyes. 

I remembered that she talked very fast. She had sort of a chirpy voice, and 
she always seemed excited. Very enthusiastic. 

And I remembered... 

Nothing else. 

That’s all I could remember about my aunt. 

Did she give me Jungle Magic? No. I didn’t remember anything about that. 

I mean, how do you give someone magic? 

I kept thinking about it and thinking about it. I struggled to remember more 
about her visit. 

But I couldn’t. 

I knew that Carolyn and Dr. Hawlings had made a terrible mistake. I’ll tell 
them in the morning, I decided. I’ll tell them they got the wrong kid. 

A terrible mistake... terrible mistake. The words repeated in my mind. 

I sat up. No way I could get to sleep. My brain wouldn’t let me. I was wide 
awake. 

I decided to take a walk around the headquarters building. Maybe explore 
back where the trees grew thick and the jungle started. 

I crept to the screen door and peered out. My little cabin stood at the end of 
the row. I could see the other cabins from my door. All dark. Kareen, Carolyn, 
and Dr. Hawlings had gone to sleep. 

Cawwww cawwwww. The strange cry repeated in the distance. A soft wind 
made the tall grass bend and shift. Tree leaves rustled, making a whispering 
sound. 

I was wearing a long, baggy T-shirt pulled down over boxers. No need to 
get dressed, I decided. No one else is awake. Besides, I’ll just take a very short 
walk. 

I slipped into my sandals. Pushed open the screen door. And stepped 
outside. 

Cawwww cawwwww. The cry sounded a little closer. 

The night air felt hot and wet, nearly as hot as during the day. A heavy dew 
had fallen, and my sandals slid over the damp, tall grass. The wet grass tickled 
my feet through the sandals. 



I made my way past the silent, dark shacks. To my right, the trees bent and 
swayed. Black shadows against a purple sky. No moon. No stars tonight. 

Maybe taking a walk is a bad idea, I told myself. Maybe it’s too dark. 

I need a flashlight, I realized. I remembered Carolyn’s warning earlier when 
she showed me where I would sleep. “Never go out at night without a flashlight. 
At night,” she had warned me, “we are not in charge here. At night, this is the 
creatures’ world.” 

The back of the headquarters building loomed ahead of me. I decided to 
turn around. 

But before I could turn, I realized I wasn’t alone. 

In the darkness, I caught a pair of eyes, staring back at me. 

I gasped. A chill ran down my back. 

Staring hard through the purple night, I saw another pair of eyes. 

And then another and another. 

Dark eyes, staring at me without moving, without blinking. 

Dark eyes, on top of each other. 

I froze. I couldn’t move. 

I knew that I was trapped. There were too many of them. Too many. 



11 


My legs trembled. Chill after chill rolled down the back of my neck. 

And as I stared at the eyes, the dark eyes in pairs, eyes on top of eyes—as I 
stared at them, they began to glow. 

Brighter. Brighter. 

And in the golden light, I saw that these were not creature eyes. 

These were not animal eyes. 

These were human eyes. 

I stared at the glowing eyes of a hundred shrunken heads! 

A pile of shrunken heads. A11 heaped together. Eyes on top of eyes. Heads 
like tight fists, mouths curled into snarls, or open in toothless horror. 

Heads on heads. Dark and wrinkled and leathery. 

So terrifying in the cold golden glow from their eyes. 

I uttered a choked cry—and took off. 

My legs felt rubbery and weak. My heart pounded in my chest. I ran around 
the headquarters building, the yellow glow fading slowly from my eyes. I ran as 
fast as I could. To the front of the dark building. To the screen door. 

Gasping for breath, I pulled open the door. And leaped inside. 

I pressed my back against the wall and waited. Waited for the eerie glow to 
fade completely. Waited for my heart to stop racing, for my breathing to slow. 

After a minute or two, I began to feel a little calmer. 

Those heads, I wondered. Why are they piled back there like that? 

I shook my head hard, trying to shake away the ugly picture of them. They 
were all people once, I realized. Hundreds of years ago, they were people. 

And now... 

I swallowed hard. My throat felt tight and dry. 

I started across the room to the refrigerator. I need something cold to drink, 
I told myself. I bumped the edge of the lab table. 

My hands shot out, and I knocked something over. I grabbed it before it 
rolled off the table. 

A flashlight. 

“Hey—!” I cried out happily. 



I’m going to listen to Carolyn’s advice from now on, I promised myself. 
I’m never going out again without a flashlight. 

I pushed the button, and a white beam of light swept over the floor. As I 
raised the flashlight, the light settled on the bookshelf against the wall. 

Aunt Benna’s black notebooks flashed into view. A tall stack of them nearly 
filled the shelf. 

I moved quickly to the bookshelf. With my free hand, I pulled down the top 
notebook. It was heavier than I thought, and I almost dropped it. 

Cradling it in my arms, I carried it over to the lab table. I climbed onto the 
tall stool and opened it up. 

Maybe I can find some answers in here, I thought. 

Maybe I can find the part where Aunt Benna talks about giving me Jungle 
Magic. Maybe I can find out why Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn think I have it. 

I leaned over the notebook and aimed the light onto the pages. Then I began 
flipping through, page after page, squinting in the light. 

Luckily, my aunt has big, bold handwriting. Very clean and easy to read. 

The pages seemed to be organized by year. I kept flipping pages, scanning 
each page quickly—until I came to the year of her visit. 

My eyes rolled down over a long section about lizards. Some kind of tree 
lizards that Aunt Benna was studying. 

Then she described a cave she had found, cut into the rocky shore at the 
other side of the island. The cave, she wrote, had been lived in by the Oloyans, 
maybe two hundred years ago. 

I skimmed over long lists of things Aunt Benna had found in the cave. Her 
handwriting got very jagged, very crooked here. I guess she was really excited 
by her discovery. 

I turned several more pages. And started a section marked “Summer”. 

As I read the words, my mouth dropped open. My eyes nearly bulged out of 
my head. 

The words started to blur. I lowered the flashlight to the page so that I could 
see better. I blinked several times. 

I didn’t want to believe what I was reading. 

I didn’t want to believe what Aunt Benna had written. 

But the words were there. 

And they were terrifying. 



12 


The flashlight shook in my hand. I steadied it between both hands. Then I leaned 
forward and read Aunt Benna’s words, moving my lips silently as I read. 

“Dr. Hawlings and his sister Carolyn will stop at nothing to destroy the 
jungle and all the creatures who live here,” my aunt wrote in her bold, clear 
handwriting. “They do not care who they hurt or who they kill. They care only 
about getting what they want.” 

I swallowed hard. Steadied the circle of light over the notebook page. And 
kept reading. 

“Finding the secret of Jungle Magic in that cave was my most amazing 
discovery,” Aunt Benna wrote. “But I know the secret is not safe as long as Dr. 
Hawlings and Carolyn are around. They will use the Jungle Magic to do evil. 
And so I have given the Jungle Magic and its secret to my nephew Mark. He 
lives four thousand miles away in the United States. And so I hope the secret 
will be safe. 

“If the Jungle Magic ever falls into Hawlings’ hands,” my aunt continued, 
“the jungle will be destroyed. The island of Baladora will be destroyed. And so 
will I.” 

I gasped and turned the page. I struggled to keep the flashlight steady so 
that I could read more. 

“If Hawlings gets the Jungle Magic,” Aunt Benna wrote, “he will shrink my 
head until there is no trace of me. I must keep my nephew four thousand miles 
away from Hawlings. Because he will shrink Mark’s head, too, to get at the 
magic I have hidden there.” 

“Ohhhh.” A terrified moan escaped my throat. 

Shrink my head? 

Dr. Hawlings will shrink my head? 

I read the last words again: “I must keep my nephew four thousand miles 
away...” 

But I’m not four thousand miles away! I told myself. 

I’m here. I’m right here! 

Carolyn brought me here to steal the magic. To take it from me. She and Dr. 
Hawlings planned to shrink my head! 



I slammed the notebook shut. I took a deep breath and held it. But it didn’t 
help to slow the thudding of my heart. 

What have they done to Aunt Benna? I wondered. 

Did they try to get the secret from her? Did they do something terrible to 

her? 

Or did she run away from them? Did she escape? 

Did they bring me here to track her down so that they could capture her 
again? Then when I find her, do they plan to shrink both of our heads? 

“Nooooo,” I murmured, trying to stop my body from trembling. 

I thought they were my friends. My friends... 

But I’m not safe here, I told myself. I’m in terrible danger. 

I have to get away. Get dressed and get away from these evil people. As fast 
as I can. 

I dropped off the stool, turned, and started toward the door. 

Got to get out. Got to get away. 

The words repeated in rhythm with my pounding heart. 

I reached for the screen door. Started to push it open. 

But someone was standing there. Standing there in the deep shadows, 
blocking my escape. 

“Where do you think you’re going?” a voice called. 



13 


Kareen pulled open the door and stepped into the room. She wore an oversized 
T-shirt, down past her knees. Her blond hair was wild about her face. “What are 
you doing in here?” she demanded. 

“Let me go!” I cried. I raised the flashlight like a weapon. 

She took a step back. “Hey—!” She let out a startled cry. 

“I have to go,” I insisted, pushing past her. 

“Mark—what’s your problem?” she asked. “Why are you acting so crazy?” 

I stopped with the screen door half open, my shoulder against the frame. “I 
saw Aunt Benna’s notebook,” I told Kareen, shining the flashlight beam on her 
face. “I read what Aunt Benna said. About your father. And about Carolyn.” 

“Oh.” Kareen let out a long sigh. 

I kept the harsh light on her face. She squinted at me, then covered her eyes 
with her arm. 

“Where is my aunt?” I demanded sharply. “Do you know where she is?” 

“No,” Kareen replied. “Lower the light—okay? You don’t have to blind 

me.” 

I lowered the light. “Did your father do something terrible to my aunt? Did 
he hurt Aunt Benna?” 

“No!” Kareen screamed. “How can you ask that, Mark? My father isn’t 
evil. He and Benna just don’t agree about some things.” 

“You’re sure you don’t know where my aunt is? Is she hiding somewhere? 
Hiding from your father? Is she still on the island?” The questions leaped out of 
me. I wanted to grab Kareen and force her to tell me the truth. 

She tugged at both sides of her blond hair. “We don’t know where your aunt 
is. We really don’t,” she insisted. “That’s why Carolyn brought you here. To help 
us find her. We’re worried about Benna. We really are.” 

“That’s a lie!” I cried angrily. “I read my aunt’s notebook. Your father isn’t 
worried about my aunt.” 

“Well, I am,” Kareen insisted. “I like your aunt a lot. She’s been really nice 
to me. I don’t care about Daddy and Aunt Carolyn and their arguments with 
Benna. I’m worried about Benna. I really am.” 

I raised the flashlight again. I wanted to check out Kareen’s expression. I 



wanted to see if she was telling the truth. 

Her blue eyes flashed in the light. I saw a teardrop running down one cheek. 
I decided she was being honest with me. 

“Well, if you’re worried about my aunt, help me get away from here,” I 
said, lowering the light again. 

“Okay, I’ll help you,” she answered quickly, without having to think about 
it. 

I pushed open the screen door and crept outside. Kareen followed. She 
closed the door silently behind her. “Turn off the light,” she whispered. “We 
don’t want Daddy or Carolyn to see.” 

I clicked off the light and started over the wet grass toward my cabin, 
walking fast. Kareen hurried to keep at my side. 

“I’ll get dressed,” I whispered. “Then I’m going to try to find Aunt Benna.” 
A shudder swept down my back. “But how? Where should I go?” 

“Use the Jungle Magic,” Kareen whispered. “It’ll tell you where Benna is. 
It’ll tell you where to go.” 

“But I can’t!” I cried shrilly. “Up until today, I didn’t even know I had any 
kind of magic. I’m still not sure I believe it.” 

“Use the magic—” Kareen whispered, narrowing her eyes at me. 

“But I don’t know how!” I insisted. 

“The magic will guide you,” she replied. “I’m sure it will. I’m sure it will 
show you the way.” 

I wasn’t so sure. But I didn’t say anything. 

My mind was spinning. Aunt Benna’s written words kept weaving through 
my thoughts. 

I should be four thousand miles away, I told myself. I’m only safe if I’m 
four thousand miles away. 

Now, how will I escape from Carolyn and Dr. Hawlings? 

How? 

We were striding down the row of cabins. The air still felt hot and wet, 
heavy. The sky had darkened to black. There were still no stars, no moon. 

I’ll get dressed, and I’ll get away, I told myself. 

Get dressed. Get away. 

“Hurry, Mark,” Kareen whispered at my side. “Hurry. And don’t make a 
sound. Daddy is a very light sleeper.” 

My cabin came into view at the end of the row. 



But before I could reach it, I heard the soft thud of footsteps on the grass. 
Rapid footsteps. 

Kareen gasped and grabbed my arm. “Oh, no! It’s him!” 



14 


I think I jumped a foot in the air. 

Should I run? Try to hide? 

If this was a game of Jungle King, I’d know the right moves. I’d know how 
to escape from the Evil Scientist. I’d grab a vine and swing myself to safety. And 
pick up a few extra lives along the way. 

But, of course, this was no game. 

I pressed my back against the cabin wall and froze there, waiting to be 
caught. 

The rapid footsteps thudded closer. 

I held my breath, but my heart still pounded. 

I held my breath—and watched a funny-looking animal hop into view. 

Not Dr. Hawlings. But a weird-looking rabbit, with huge ears and big paws 
that thudded the ground as it hopped. 

I watched the weird creature dart away, disappearing between two of the 
low cabins. “Is it a rabbit?” 

Kareen raised a finger to her lips, reminding me to be quiet. “It’s a new 
species of giant rabbit your aunt discovered.” 

“Very educational,” I murmured. “But do I need a nature lesson now?” 

Kareen pushed me by the shoulders toward my cabin door. “Hurry, Mark. If 
my dad wakes up...” She didn’t finish her sentence. 

If he wakes up, he’ll shrink my head. I finished the sentence for her. 

My legs suddenly felt as if they were about to collapse. But I forced myself 
into my dark cabin. 

My hands were shaking so hard, I could barely get dressed. I pulled on the 
jeans I’d been wearing that day. And a long-sleeved T-shirt. 

“Hurry!” Kareen whispered from the door. “Hurry up!” 

I wished she’d stop saying that. I jumped every time. 

“Hurry, Mark!” 

I pulled open my suitcase and grabbed the flashlight I’d brought. Then I 
started to the door. 

“Hurry, Mark. Get going!” Kareen whispered. 



I stopped halfway across the cabin. Grabbed the shrunken head. Stuffed it 
into my T-shirt pocket. Then I pushed open the door and stepped back outside. 

Where should I go? What should I do? How could I find my aunt? 

A million questions rushed through my mind. My throat felt so dry, it 
ached. I thought about getting one of those cold Cokes in the lab. But I knew I 
couldn’t risk waking Kareen’s father. 

We started walking across the wet grass. “Don’t turn on the flashlight until 
you’re hidden by the trees,” Kareen instructed. 

“But where do I go? How do I find Aunt Benna?” I whispered, swallowing 

hard. 

“There’s only one path,” Kareen told me, pointing to the tangled dark trees 
at the edge of the clearing. “It will lead you part of the way.” 

“Then what?” I demanded, my voice shaking. 

Her eyes locked on mine. “The Jungle Magic will take you the rest of the 
way.” 

Yeah. Sure. 

And next week, I’ll flap my arms and fly to the moon. 

I had the sudden urge to turn around. Go back to my little shack. Go to bed 
and pretend I never read my aunt’s notebook. 

But then Kareen and I passed the big pile of shrunken heads. The dark eyes 
all seemed to stare up at me. Such sad, sad eyes. 

I don’t want my head to end up on that pile, I decided. No way! 

I started to jog toward the trees. 

Kareen hurried to keep up with me. “Good luck, Mark!” she called softly. 

“Th-thanks,” I stammered. Then I stopped and turned to her. “What are you 
going to tell your dad in the morning?” 

Kareen shrugged. The wind blew her blond hair around her face. “I won’t 
tell him anything,” she said. “I’ll tell him I slept all night. That I didn’t hear a 
thing.” 

“Thanks,” I repeated. Then gripping the flashlight tightly, I turned and ran 
into the trees. 

The path was soft and sandy. The sand felt wet through my sandals. Vines 
and big, flat leaves reached over the path. They slapped against my jeans legs as 
I trotted along. 

Tall weeds grew over the path. After a minute or so, it became too dark to 
see. Had I wandered off the path? 



I clicked on the flashlight and shone the light along the ground. 

The light swept over the tall weeds, strange ferns, tendrils of vines. The 
black-trunked trees appeared to lean toward me, reaching for me with their 
smooth limbs. 

No path. 

Here I am, I thought, squinting into the pale beam of light. Here I am, all 
alone in the jungle. 

Now what do I do? 



15 


“Ow!” 

I swatted a mosquito on my neck. Too late. I could feel the throb of its bite. 

Rubbing my neck, I took a few steps through the tall weeds. I kept the 
circle of light in front of my feet. 

Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah. 

A shrill cry—very close by—made me stop. 

Night in the jungle belongs to the creatures, I remembered with a shiver. 

Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah. 

What was it? 

Not a giant rabbit. It sounded really BIG. 

I spun the light in a circle, keeping it low over the grass and vines. The 
smooth tree trunks shone purple in the pale light. 

I didn’t see any animals. 

I lowered the light. 

My whole body was shaking. Despite the damp heat of the night, I couldn’t 
stop shivering. 

A wind made the leaves all flap, the trees bend and whisper. 

The jungle was alive, I realized. 

Insects chittered all around. Fat leaves scraped and cracked. I heard the soft 
crackle of animal footsteps, running over the ground.. 

Aa-OO-tah. Aa-OO-tah. 

What was that? 

Without realizing it, I had pressed myself against a low tree. I took a deep 
breath and held it, listening hard. 

Was the animal moving closer? 

Thick clumps of leaves hung down from the low branches, forming a kind 
of cave. I’m protected under here, I thought, gazing all around. I suddenly felt a 
little safer, hidden under the thick leaves, under the low branches. 

Through my leafy roof, I glimpsed a sliver of white moonlight. It made the 
leaves gleam like silver. 

I clicked off the flashlight and lowered myself to a sitting position on the 



ground. Leaning back against the smooth trunk, I gazed up at the moon, taking 
slow, steady breaths. 

As soon as I felt calmer, I realized how tired I was. The sleepiness swept 
over me like a heavy blanket. I yawned loudly. My eyelids seemed to weigh a 
hundred pounds. 

I tried to stay alert. But I couldn’t fight the drowsiness. 

With the chittering of insects for a lullaby, I leaned my head against the tree 
trunk and drifted into a deep sleep. 

I dreamed about shrunken heads. 

Dozens of shrunken heads, the leathery skin purple and green, the black 
eyes glowing like dark coals, the dry black lips pulled back in angry snarls. 

The heads floated and danced through my dream. They darted back and 
forth like tennis balls. They flew into me, bounced against my chest, bounced off 
my head. But I didn’t feel them. 

They bounced and floated. And then the dry lips opened, and they all began 
to sing. “Hurry, Mark. Hurry. ” That was their song. 

The words came out hoarse and raspy. The sound of air rattling through 
dead leaves. 

“Hurry, Mark. Hurry. ” An ugly, frightening chant. 

“Hurry, Mark. Hurry. ” 

The black lips twisted into a sneer as they sang. The coal eyes glowed. The 
heads—dozens of shriveled, wrinkled heads—bobbed and bounced. 

I woke up with the whispered words in my ear. 

I blinked. Gray morning light shimmered down through the tree leaves. My 
back ached. My clothes felt damp. 

It took me a few seconds to remember where I was. 

The frightening dream stayed in my mind. My hand slid up to my T-shirt 
pocket. I felt the shrunken head tucked tightly inside. 

My face itched. 

I reached up to scratch my cheek—and pulled something off it. A leaf? 

No. 

I squinted at the insect in my hand. A large red ant. Nearly the size of a 
grasshopper. 

“Yuck!” I tossed it away. 

My skin tingled. My back itched. Something moved up and down my legs. 

I jerked myself up straight. Alert. Wide awake now. 



Itching like crazy. My whole body tingling. 

I stared down at myself. Stared down at my jeans and T-shirt. 
And started to scream. 



16 


I jumped to my feet. I thrashed my arms in the air. I kicked my legs. 

My body was covered with giant red ants. 

Hundreds and hundreds of them. Crawling over my arms, my legs, my 
chest. 

Their prickly legs scratched over my throat and the back of my neck. I 
pulled a fat one off my forehead. Then another off my cheek. 

I reached up and felt them crawling in my hair. 

“Ohhhh.” A low moan escaped my throat as I slapped at my hair. Swept my 
hands through it. Watched the big red ants fall to the ground. 

I felt them crawl over the backs of my hands. Hot and prickly. So big. And 
so many of them. 

I dropped to my knees, slapping at my chest, pulling the insects off my 
neck. I began rolling frantically in the tall grass, dripping wet from the heavy 
morning dew. 

I rolled and slapped at myself. Rolled over and over, trying to flatten the 
insects, trying to kick them off me. I grabbed another handful out of my hair and 
heaved them into a leafy bush. 

I struggled back to my feet, twisting and squirming. Pulling at the big red 

ants. 

But there were too many of them. My skin itched and tingled. Their tiny 
feet prickled my arms, my legs, my chest. 

It itched so badly, I felt I couldn’t breathe. 

I’m suffocating, I realized. The ants—they’re going to smother me! 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed, squirming and slapping. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

To my surprise, ants started to drop off my body. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed again. 

Ants showered down to the ground. They leaped out of my hair, dropped 
off my forehead, off the front of my shirt. 

I stared in amazement as they fell to the ground. Then they scurried away, 
climbing over each other, stampeding over and under the tall grass. 

I rubbed my neck. I scratched my legs. My whole body still tingled. I still 
itched all over. 



But the big ants were gone. They had all jumped off when I shouted my 
special word. 

Special word. 

I glanced down over my shirt, trying to rub away the horrible tingling. 
Inside my pocket, the shrunken head’s eyes glowed. A bright yellow glow. 

“Whoa!” I grabbed the head and tugged it from the pocket. I held it up in 
front of me. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted. 

The eyes glowed brighter. 

My special word. 

Where did the word come from? I didn’t know. I thought I made it up. 

But I suddenly knew that the word was the secret behind the Jungle Magic. 

The word—and the shrunken head. 

Somehow the word brought the Jungle Magic to life. When I shouted it out, 
the ants jumped off me and hurried away. 

I gazed at the glowing little head with new excitement. My heart pounded 
in my chest. I concentrated on the head, thinking hard. 

I did have Jungle Magic. 

Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn were right. 

I had Jungle Magic and didn’t know it. And the word Kah-lee-ah was the 
key that unlocked it. 

It had helped me get rid of the gross red ants. Would it help lead me to Aunt 
Benna? 

“Yes!” I cried out loud. “Yes!” 

I knew that it would. I knew I could find her now. 

I was no longer afraid of the jungle and its creatures. No longer afraid of 
anything that might await me in this hot, tangled jungle. 

I had Jungle Magic. 

I had it—and I knew how to use it. 

And now, I had to find Aunt Benna. 

A red morning sun rose over the treetops. The air was already hot and 
damp. Birds chirped and twittered on the tree limbs above me. 

Holding the flashlight in one hand and the shrunken head in the other, I 
started to run toward the sun. 

I’m going east, I told myself. The sun comes up in the east. 

Was it the right direction to find my aunt? 



Yes. I was sure it was right. The Jungle Magic will lead me, I decided. I just 
need to follow it, and it will take me to Aunt Benna, wherever she is hiding on 
this island. 

I ran over fat, leafy vines and low shrubs. I ducked under smooth white tree 
branches. Broad leaves of huge green ferns slapped at me as I ran through them. 

The sun beamed down on my face as I made my way through a wide, sandy 
clearing. Sweat dripped down my forehead. 

“Hey—!” I cried out as my feet slipped on the soft sand. 

My feet slid. I lost my balance. My hands shot out. The flashlight and the 
shrunken head flew onto the sand. 

“Hey—!” 

I started to sink. 

Sand rolled up over my ankles. Up my legs. 

I kicked. I waved my arms wildly. 

I pulled up my knees. Tried to step out of the deep sand. But I was sinking, 
sinking faster now. Sand up to my waist. The more I struggled, the faster I sank. 
Deeper, deeper. Down into the pit of sand. 



17 


I couldn’t move my legs. I had sunk too deep in the hot, wet sand. 

The sand crept up over my waist. 

There’s no bottom, I thought. I’m going to keep sinking. I’m going to sink 
down, down until it covers my head. Until I disappear forever. 

My friends Eric and Joel once told me that there is no such thing as 
quicksand. I wished they were here right now. I could show them how wrong 
they were! 

I opened my mouth to shout for help. But I was too panicked to make a 
sound. Only a tiny squeak came out. 

What good is shouting? I asked myself. 

There’s no one around for miles. No one who will hear me. 

The sand felt thick and heavy as I slid down, down deeper into it. I 
stretched both hands up over my head, my hands grasping, as if trying to grab 
onto something. 

I tried moving my legs. Tried to pump them, like treading water or pedaling 
a bike. 

But the sand was too heavy. I was in too deep. 

My chest heaved with terror now. I gasped in breath after breath. 

I opened my mouth once again to call for help. 

And had an idea. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed, my voice high and frightened. 

“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!” 

Nothing happened. 



18 


“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah!” 

I screeched the word at the top of my lungs. 

But I continued to sink deeper, deeper into the wet, marshy pit of sand. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” 

No. Nothing. 

I waved my arms over my head. And stared up at the pale blue sky. At the 
trees at the edge of the clearing. 

Nothing but trees as far as I could see. 

No one around. No one to help me. 

“Oh!” I suddenly realized why the magic word wasn’t working. I didn’t 
have the shrunken head. The head had flown from my hand when I fell into the 
sandpit. 

Where was it? Where? 

Did it sink into the sand? 

My eyes frantically searched the yellow-brown surface. The wet sand 
bubbled all around me, making a pock-pock-pock sound. Like a thick soup. 

I sank deeper. 

And saw the shrunken head. 

It lay on the surface. Its black eyes stared up at the sky. Its hair was tangled 
beneath it, spread over the sand. 

With an excited cry, I stretched out both hands and tried to grab it. 

No. Too far away. Just out of my reach. Inches out of my reach. 

“Unnnnh.” I uttered a low grunt as I struggled to grab it. Stretched out my 
hands. Stretched. Stretched. 

I leaned forward into the sand. Leaned and stretched. 

And grabbed for it. Grabbed for it, curling my fingers. Groaning and 
gmnting. Reaching. Reaching across the wet sand. 

But no. 

I couldn’t get it. The head lay a foot from my fingertips. 

A foot that seemed a mile. 

No way. No way. 



My fingers grabbed only air. I couldn’t reach it. 

I knew I was doomed. 

My hands dropped heavily onto the wet sand. I let out a defeated sigh. 



19 


My hands made a loud slapping sound as they hit the sand. 

And the head bounced. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry. My heart started to pound. 

I slapped the surface of the wet sand again with both palms. 

The head bounced. Closer. 

Another hard slap. Another bounce. 

The head lay only a few inches away now. 

I grabbed it, held it tightly—and joyfully shouted out the word. “Kah-lee- 
ah! Kah-lee-ah! ” 

At first, nothing happened. 

My breath caught in my throat. I froze. 

“Kah-lee-ah! Kah-lee-ah! ” 

I expected to fly up. To be lifted out of the sandpit. To float magically over 
to hard ground. 

“Jungle Magic—please work! Please work!” I cried out loud. 

But I didn’t move. I sank a little deeper. The sand crept up over my chest. 

I stared at the shrunken head in my hand. The black eyes appeared to stare 
back at me. 

“Help me!” I cried. “Why aren’t you helping me?” 

And then I saw the vines. 

Yellow-green vines creeping over the sandpit. Moving like long snakes. A 
dozen twisting, crawling vines, slithering toward me from all directions. 

My heart pounded as I watched the vines slither closer. Closer. Until I 
reached out with my free hand and grabbed for the end of one. 

But the vine swept past my hand, moving quickly with surprising force. It 
wrapped itself around my chest—and started to tighten. 

“No!” I uttered a cry of protest. Was it going to strangle me? 

Another vine dipped into the sand. I felt it curl around my waist. 

“No—stop!” I wailed. 

The vines tightened around me. And then they began to pull. 

The wet sand made a thwock sound as I started to move through it. 



Holding the shrunken head in the air, I let the vines tug me through the 
sand. They pulled hard and fast. The sand flew at my sides. 

A few seconds later, the vines tugged me, on my knees, onto hard ground. I 
let out a happy cry. The vines instantly let go. I watched them pull back, curling 
quickly into the tall weeds. 

I hunched there, struggling to catch my breath, watching until the vines 
slithered out of sight. Then I pulled myself to my feet. 

My legs felt shaky and weak. My whole body trembled from my close call. 

But I didn’t care. I felt like jumping up and clapping and shouting for joy. 
The Jungle Magic had worked. The Jungle Magic had saved me once again! 

The wet sand clung to my jeans, my shirt, my arms—even my hair! I shook 
myself furiously. I tucked the shrunken head into my shirt pocket. Then I began 
slapping at my clothes, brushing off chunks of sand. 

Now what? I asked myself, glancing quickly around. The sun had risen high 
in the sky. The trees and ferns and tall grass gleamed, a shimmering blur of green 
and gold. The air had grown hot. My shirt clung wetly to my back. 

Now what? 

How do I find Aunt Benna? 

I pulled the shrunken head from my pocket and held it in front of me. “Lead 
the way,” I ordered it. 

Nothing happened. 

I brushed chunks of sand off its leathery skin. I pried sand from between its 
thin black lips. 

I turned toward the sun and took a few steps. Was I still walking east? 

To my surprise, the dark eyes on the shrunken head suddenly started to 
glow. 

What did that mean? Did that mean I was getting close to Aunt Benna? Did 
it mean I was walking in the right direction? 

I decided to test it. 

I spun around and started walking back toward the sandpit. 

The eyes on the head instantly dimmed back to black. 

I turned and started walking north. 

The eyes remained dark. 

I turned back in the direction of the sun. 

Yes! The eyes began, to glow again. “Kah-lee-ah!” I cried happily. The 
head was guiding me to my aunt. 



Animals howled and insects chittered loudly as I made my way through the 
trees and tall weeds. It all sounded like music to me now. 

“Aunt Benna, here I come!” I cheered. 

I found myself walking deeper into the jungle. I had to keep ducking my 
head to avoid low branches and thick vines that stretched from tree to tree. 

I heard weird bird calls overhead. As if the birds were talking to each other. 
As I ducked under a low limb, the whole tree seemed to shake. And a thousand 
black birds leaped off the branches, cawing angrily, so many of them they 
darkened the sky as they flapped away. 

I suddenly came to a small clearing that forked into two branches, one to 
the left, one to the right. Which way should I go? 

I held the shrunken head in front of me, watching it carefully. I started to 
the left. 

The eyes grew dark. Wrong way. 

I turned and started to the right, watching the eyes begin to glow again. 

Was Aunt Benna hiding somewhere in these trees? Was I getting close? 

The trees ended suddenly again, and I found myself in a grassy clearing. I 
squinted in the bright sunlight, my eyes sweeping over the shimmering green 
grass. 

Alow growl made me spin back toward the trees. 

“Oh—!” I let out a sharp cry as I saw the tiger. My legs nearly crumpled 
under me. 

The tiger raised its head in another growl. An angry growl. It pulled back its 
lips, baring enormous teeth. It arched its back, its yellow-brown fur standing 
straight on end. 

Then with a furious hiss, it came charging at me. 



20 


The tiger’s huge paws pounded over the grass. Its yellow eyes burned into mine. 

I glimpsed two little cubs behind it, nestled in the shade of a tree. 

“I’m not going to hurt your cubs!” I wanted to cry. 

But of course there was no time. 

The tiger let out a furious roar as it charged. 

The roar drowned out my cry as I raised the shrunken head in front of me in 
a trembling hand. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

My voice came out in a whimper. 

I nearly dropped the head. My knees collapsed. I sank to the grass. 

The tiger closed in for the kill. Its heavy paws thudded the dirt as it leaped 
toward me. 

The ground felt as if it were shaking. 

The ground was shaking! 

To my horror, I heard a deafening ripping sound. Like Velcro being torn 
apart. Only a thousand times louder. 

I let out a cry as the ground trembled. Shook. 

Split apart. 

The grass tore away. The dirt split in two. 

The earth opened up. 

And I started to fall. Down into an endless hole in the earth. 

Down, down. 

Screaming all the way. 



21 


“Owww!” 

I landed hard on my elbows and knees. Pain shot through my body. I 
actually saw stars! Hundreds of them, all red and yellow. 

Trying to blink them away, I raised myself to my knees. 

The shrunken head had bounced out of my hand. I spotted it a few feet 
away in the dirt. I dove for it, grabbed it up in my shaking hand, and held onto it 
tightly. 

I felt dizzy and shaken. I closed my eyes and waited for the dizziness to 

pass. 

When I opened them, I realized I had fallen into a deep pit. Walls of dirt 
surrounded me. The blue sky was a small square high above my head. 

Jungle Magic had saved me once again. The magic had caused the ground 
to split open so that I could fall to safety. So that I could escape the tiger. 

I heard a low growl above me. 

With a frightened cry, I gazed up to the top of the pit. And saw two yellow 
eyes glaring down at me. 

The tiger snarled, baring its teeth. 

I didn’t escape, I realized. 

I’m trapped down here. If the tiger leaps down into the pit, it will finish me 
off in seconds. 

I have nowhere to run. No way to escape. 

I fell back against the wall of dirt. I stared up at the snarling tiger. It eyed 
me hungrily, roaring again. Preparing to leap to the attack. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I cried. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

The tiger roared in reply. 

I pressed my back against the dirt. Tried to stop my whole body from 
shaking. 

Please don’t come down here! I begged silently. Please don’t jump down 
into this pit! 

The yellow eyes glowed in the sunlight. The silvery whiskers twitched as 
the tiger snarled its toothy warning. 

And then I saw a little yellow-and-black cat face appear at the top of the pit. 



One of the tiger cubs. It peered down at me over the edge of the grass. 

The other cub popped up beside it. It leaned over the pit edge. Leaned so 
far, it nearly fell in! 

The tiger moved quickly. She lowered her head—and bumped the cub away 
from the edge. Then she picked up the other cub in her teeth and carried it away. 

I swallowed hard. I didn’t move. My back pressed against the cool dirt, I 
stared up to the top. Watched the square of blue sky. And waited for the tiger to 
return. 

Waited. 

And waited. Holding my breath. 

Silence now. So silent I could hear the wind rushing through the tall grass. 

A chunk of dirt broke off the pit wall and toppled to the bottom, crumbling 
as it landed. I kept my gaze on the opening, listening hard, watching for the tiger. 

After what seemed like hours, I let out a long whoosh of air. I stepped away 
from the dirt wall and stretched. 

The tiger isn’t coming back, I decided. 

She only wanted to protect her cubs from me. By now, she has taken them 
away. Far away. 

I stretched again. My heart was still thumping hard in my chest. But I was 
starting to feel a little more normal. 

How do I get out of here? I wondered, gazing at the steep dirt walls. Can I 
climb out? 

I tucked the shrunken head back into my pocket. Then I dug both hands into 
the soft, cool dirt and tried to climb. 

I pulled myself up about a foot or two. But then the dirt broke off under my 
sneakers. It crumbled and fell, sending me sliding back to the bottom. 

No. No way. I can’t climb out, I realized. 

I reached for the shrunken head. I’ll have to use Jungle Magic, I decided. 

The magic got me down here. Now I can use it to get me out. 

I raised the head in front of me. But before I could call out the word, 
darkness fell over the pit. 

Is the sun setting already? I wondered. 

I gazed up to the top. 

No. It wasn’t evening. The square of sky that I could see was still bright 

blue. 

Someone stood up there, blocking the sunlight. 



The tiger? 

A human? 

I squinted hard, struggling to see. 
“Who-who’s there?” I called. 



22 


A face leaned over the edge, peering down at me. Squinting into the bright 
sunlight, I saw straight blond hair. Pale blue eyes. 

“Kareen!” I shouted. 

She cupped her hands around her mouth. “Mark—what are you doing down 
there?” 

“What are you doing here?” I cried. 

Her hair fell over her face. She brushed it back. “I—I followed you. I was 
so worried about you!” 

“Get me out of here!” I shouted up to her. I tried climbing again. But the 
dirt slid out from under my sneakers. 

“How?” she called down. 

“I guess you didn’t bring a ladder with you?” I shouted. 

“Uh—no, Mark,” Kareen sniped. 

I guess she doesn’t have much of a sense of humor. 

“Maybe I could drop a rope down or something,” she suggested. 

“Rope isn’t too easy to find in the middle of the jungle,” I reminded her. 

She shook her head. Her face tightened into a fretful frown. 

“How about a vine?” I called up. “See if you can find a long vine. I could 
climb up a vine.” 

Her expression brightened. She disappeared. I waited impatiently. And 
waited. “Please hurry,” I murmured out loud, my eyes on the square opening at 
the top. “Please hurry.” 

I heard the squawk of birds somewhere up above. Fluttering wings. More 
squawking and cawing. 

Are the birds frightened? I wondered. If they are, why? Has the tiger 
returned? 

I pressed against the dirt wall, watching the sky. 

Finally, Kareen reappeared. “I found a vine. But I don’t know if it’s long 
enough.” 

“Lower it over the side,” I instructed her. “Quick. I have to get out of here. I 
feel like a trapped animal.” 



“It was hard to pull it out of the ground,” she complained. She began 
lowering the vine. It looked like a long snake twining down the side of the pit. 

It stopped a few feet above my head. “I’m going to jump up and grab it,” I 
told Kareen. “Then I’ll try to climb while you pull. Wrap the other end around 
your waist, okay? Just don’t let go of it!” 

“Just don’t pull me down with you!” she called back. 

I waited for her to tie the vine around herself. Then I bent my knees and 
jumped. I missed the end of the vine by a few inches. 

This was one of those times I wished I were tall and thin instead of short 
and chubby. 

But I grabbed the vine on my third try. I wrapped both hands around it. 

Then I pressed the soles of my sneakers against the dirt wall. And started to 
pull myself up, like a mountain climber. 

The dirt kept crumbling out from under me. And the vine grew more and 
more slippery as my hands started to sweat. But with Kareen cheering me on, I 
scrambled to the top. 

I lay in the tall grass for a moment, breathing in the sweet fragrance. It felt 
so wonderful to be out of that deep hole. 

“How did you fall down there anyway?” Kareen asked, tossing her end of 
the vine to the ground. 

“It was easy,” I replied. I climbed to my feet and tried to brush the dirt off 
my clothes. 

“But didn’t you see that big pit there?” she demanded. 

“Not exactly,” I told her. I wanted to change the subject. “How did you find 
me? What are you doing here, Kareen?” 

Her blue eyes locked on mine. “I was worried about you. I—I didn’t think 
you should be all alone in the jungle. So I sneaked away. Daddy was working in 
his lab. I crept away from the headquarters, and I followed you.” 

I brushed clumps of dirt from my hair. “Well, I’m glad,” I confessed. “But 
aren’t you going to be in major trouble with your dad and Carolyn?” 

She bit her lower lip. “Probably. But it will be worth the risk—if we find 
your aunt.” 

Aunt Benna! 

Trying to survive the quicksand and the tiger, I had nearly forgotten about 
her. 

A shadow rolled over us. The air suddenly grew cooler. I glanced up at the 



sky. The sun was lowering itself behind the trees. 

“It’s almost night,” I said quietly. “I—I hope we can find Aunt Benna 
before it gets really dark.” 

I had already spent one night out in the jungle. I didn’t want to spend 
another. 

“Do you know which way to go?” Kareen asked. “Are you just wandering 
around, hoping to get lucky?” 

“No way,” I replied. I pulled the head from my shirt pocket. “This little guy 
is showing me the way.” 

“Excuse me?” Kareen’s face filled with surprise. 

“The eyes light up when I go the right direction,” I explained. “At least, I 
think that’s why they light up.” 

Kareen gasped. “You mean, you really do have Jungle Magic?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I have it. It’s so weird. There’s a word I’ve always said. 
‘Kah-lee-ah.’ Just a crazy word. I thought I made it up when I was a little kid. 
But it’s the word that makes the Jungle Magic work.” 

“Wow!” Kareen exclaimed. A grin spread across her face. “That’s awesome, 
Mark! That means we really will find Benna. That’s so great!” 

The shadows over the ground grew longer as the sun dipped lower. I 
shivered as a cold gust of wind blew over us. 

My stomach growled. I couldn’t remember when my last meal was. I tried 
not to think about food. I had to keep moving. 

“Let’s get going,” I said softly. I raised the head in front of me. Then I 
turned slowly—one direction, then the next—until the eyes began to glow. “This 
way!” I cried, pointing across the clearing to the trees. 

We started walking side by side. The tall grass swished, brushing our legs 
as we stepped through it. Insects chittered in the trees. 

Kareen stared in amazement at the glowing eyes on the leathery head. “Do 
you really think it’s guiding us to Benna?” 

“We’ll soon find out,” I said solemnly. 

We stepped into the shifting darkness beneath the tangled trees. 



23 


As the sunlight faded, the jungle sounds changed. The birds in the trees stopped 
chirping. The shrill sawing of the insects grew louder. We heard strange animal 
howls and cries in the distance, the sound bouncing between the smooth trees. 

I hoped the howls and cries stayed in the distance! 

Dark creatures slithered through the tall weeds and low, fat ferns and 
shrubs. The shrubs appeared to tremble as night creatures scurried through them. 

I heard the warning hiss of snakes. The eerie hoot of an owl. The soft flap 
of bat wings. 

I moved closer to Kareen as we walked. The sounds were all so much more 
realistic than in my Jungle King game! 

I’ll probably never play that game again after this, I thought. It will seem 
way too tame. 

We pushed our way through a clump of tall, stiff reeds. The eyes on the 
shrunken head dimmed to black. 

“Wrong way!” I whispered. 

Kareen and I turned until the eyes glowed again. Then we moved forward, 
making our own path. We stepped over thick vines and pushed through tangles 
of weeds and low shrubs. 

“Ow!” Kareen slapped at her forehead. “Stupid mosquito.” 

The shrill scratching of insects grew louder, drowning out the crunch of our 
sneakers over the leaves and vines on the jungle floor. 

As the darkness deepened, the eyes on the shrunken head appeared to glow 
brighter. Like twin flashlights, guiding us through the trees. 

“I’m getting kind of tired,” Kareen complained. She ducked her head to 
avoid a low branch. “I hope your aunt is nearby. I don’t know how much longer I 
can walk.” 

“I hope she’s nearby, too,” I murmured in reply. I’d had a pretty exhausting 
day myself! 

As we walked, I couldn’t help thinking about Aunt Benna and her 
notebook. I didn’t want to make Kareen feel bad. But I had to say something. 

“My aunt didn’t write very nice things about your dad and Carolyn in her 
notebook,” I said, keeping my eyes at my feet. “I was kind of surprised.” 



Kareen was silent for a long moment. “That’s so horrible,” she said finally. 
“They worked together for so long. I knew they had an argument.” 

“About what?” I asked. 

Kareen let out a sigh. “Daddy has some plans to develop the jungle. He 
thinks there are valuable minerals here. Benna thinks the jungle should be 
preserved.” 

She sighed again. “I think that’s what they fought about. I’m not sure.” 

“The notebook made it seem like your dad is evil or something,” I 
muttered, avoiding her eyes. 

“Evil? Daddy?” she cried. “No. No way. He’s very strong-minded. That’s 
all. He isn’t evil. And I know that Daddy still cares about Benna. He still 
respects her and cares about her. He’s really worried about her. He—” 

“Whoa.” I grabbed Kareen’s arm, interrupting her. “Look.” I pointed 
through the trees. 

I spotted a clearing up ahead. And against the gray sky, I could see the 
black outline of a small shack. 

Kareen gasped. “That little house. Do you think—?” 

We both crept to the edge of the clearing. Something scurried quickly over 
my sneakers, but I ignored it. 

My eyes were on the tiny, dark shack. 

As we moved closer, I could see that it was built of tree limbs and sticks. 
Clumps of fat leaves made the roof. It had no window. But there were narrow 
openings between the branches. 

“Hey—!” I whispered. I saw a pale light flicker in one of the openings. 

A flashlight? A candle? 

“Someone is in there,” Kareen whispered, narrowing her eyes at the shack. 

I heard a cough. 

A woman’s cough? Aunt Benna’s cough? I couldn’t tell. 

“Do you think it’s my aunt?” I whispered, huddling close to Kareen. 

“Only one way to find out,” she whispered back. 

The shrunken head glowed brightly in my hand. The eerie yellow-green 
light splashed over the ground as Kareen and I crept closer. 

Closer. 

“Aunt Benna?” I called in a tiny voice. I cleared my throat. My heart 
pounded. “Aunt Benna? Is that you?” 



24 


I called again and stepped close to the open doorway of the small shack. I heard 
a thump inside. Saw a flash of light. And heard a startled cry. 

A lantern appeared in the doorway. My eyes went to the pale yellow light. 
And then moved up to see the woman holding the lantern. 

She was short—very short. Only about a foot taller than me, and a little 
chubby. Her straight black hair was tied back. In the glow of lantern light, I saw 
that she wore khaki slacks and a khaki safari jacket. 

“Who’s there?” She raised the lantern in front of her. 

“Aunt Benna?” I cried, moving closer. “Is that you?” 

“Mark? I don’t believe it!” she exclaimed. She came running toward me, 
the lantern swinging at her side. The light bounced over the tall grass, making 
shadows dance. 

She wrapped me in a hug. “Mark—how did you find me? What are you 
doing here?” She had a high, chirpy voice, and she talked rapidly, without taking 
a breath. 

She pushed me away from her to study my face. “I don’t believe I even 
recognized you. I haven’t seen you since you were four!” 

“Aunt Benna—what are you doing out here?” I demanded breathlessly. 
“Everyone is so worried—” 

“How did you get to Baladora?” she asked, gripping my shoulder with her 
free hand, holding the lantern high with the other. “What are you doing in the 
jungle? How did you get here?” she cried again. 

“I—I used the Jungle Magic,” I stammered. 

Her eyes went wide. With surprise? With fear? 

I suddenly realized she wasn’t looking at me. “Hello. Who are you?” Aunt 
Benna asked quietly, stretching the lantern toward the trees. 

Kareen stepped out from the edge of the clearing. In all the excitement, I 
didn’t realize that she had lingered behind. 

“That’s Kareen,” I told my aunt. “Do you know Kareen? Dr. Hawlings’ 
daughter?” 

Aunt Benna gasped. She squeezed my shoulder. “Why did you bring her 
here? Don’t you realize—?” 



“It’s okay,” Kareen said quickly. “I was worried about you. That’s why I 
followed Mark.” 

“She helped me,” I explained to Aunt Benna. “Kareen helped me get away 
from them. From Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn. Kareen helped me get through the 
jungle.” 

“But—but—” Aunt Benna sputtered. “You told her about the Jungle 
Magic?” 

“I only came to help!” Kareen insisted. “My father is worried about you. He 

“Your father wants to kill me!” Aunt Benna cried angrily. “That’s why I had 
to mn away. That’s why I had to leave everything behind and hide in the jungle.” 
She glared at Kareen, her eyes squinting, her face pinched and hard in the yellow 
lantern light. 

“Kareen is okay,” I assured her. “She only wants to help, Aunt Benna. 
Really.” 

My aunt turned to me. “Carolyn and Hawlings brought you here?” 

I nodded. “Yes. To find you. Carolyn brought me this.” I pulled the 
shrunken head from my shirt pocket. It had stopped glowing. 

“They told me I had Jungle Magic,” I continued. “I didn’t know what they 
meant. I thought they were crazy. Then, when I went out to look for you in the 
jungle, I discovered that I did have it.” 

Aunt Benna nodded. “Yes. You have it, Mark. I gave it to you when I 
visited you. When you were four. I hypnotized you. And I transferred the Jungle 
Magic from me to you. To keep it safe.” 

“Yes. I read your notebook,” I told her. “I read about why you gave me the 
magic. But it didn’t say what Jungle Magic is. I only know—” 

“It’s a powerful force,” my aunt replied, lowering her voice. “It’s a 
powerful force that will do your will, carry out your wishes.” 

Her eyes filled with sadness. “But we cannot talk about it now,” she said in 
a whisper. “We are in danger here, Mark. Real danger.” 

I started to reply. But I heard rustling, cracking sounds from the trees. 
Footsteps? 

All three of us spun around toward the sound. 

To my surprise, Kareen started running across the grass. She cupped her 
hands around her mouth. “Over here, Daddy!” she shouted. “Over here! I found 
Benna, Daddy! Hurry!” 



25 


I gasped in shock. 

No time to run. 

A beam of light flickered out from the trees. Behind it came Dr. Hawlings, 
trotting over the tall grass. He carried a flashlight in one hand. The light swept 
into my eyes, then moved over Aunt Benna. 

Was Dr. Hawlings carrying a gun? Some kind of weapon? I couldn’t see. 
And I didn’t want to find out. 

I grabbed Aunt Benna’s arm and tugged. I wanted to run, to escape into the 
jungle. 

But my aunt refused to move. She seemed frozen in surprise. Or fear. 

Kareen’s father trotted up to us, breathing hard. Even in the dim light, I 
could see the pleased smile on his face. 

“Good work, Kareen.” He patted her shoulder. “I knew that if you helped 
Mark escape, he would lead us right to his aunt.” 

Still holding onto Aunt Benna’s arm, I stared at Kareen angrily. She had 
tricked me. She had pretended to be my friend. But the whole time, she was 
working to help her father. 

Kareen stared back at me for a moment. Then she lowered her eyes to the 
ground. 

“Why did you trick me?” I demanded. “Why did you do it, Kareen?” 

She raised her eyes to me. “Daddy needs the Jungle Magic,” she replied 
softly. 

“But you lied to me!” I cried. 

“I didn’t have a choice,” Kareen said. “If your father needed your help, 
what would you do?” 

“You did the right thing, Kareen,” Dr. Hawlings told her. 

He raised the light to Aunt Benna’s face. He forced her to cover her eyes. 
“Did you really think you could hide forever, Benna?” he demanded softly. 

“I—I’m sorry,” I told my aunt. “It’s my fault. I—” 

“No.” Aunt Benna put a hand on my shoulder. “It’s not your fault, Mark. 
It’s my fault. You didn’t know anything about any of this. And now I’m afraid 
I’ve gotten you into a lot of trouble.” 



Dr. Hawlings snickered. “A lot of trouble. That’s the truth.” He stepped up 
to Aunt Benna. “I want the secret of Jungle Magic. Tell me the secret, Benna. 
Let me know how it works. And I will allow you and your nephew to leave the 
island in one piece.” 

In one piece? 

I didn’t like the sound of that. 

As Dr. Hawlings stared at my aunt, I slipped the shrunken head from my 
pocket. I’ll use the Jungle Magic, I decided. I’ll use the magic to get us out of 
this jam. 

I raised the head slowly in front of me. I opened my mouth to call out the 
secret word. 

But I was stopped when I caught Aunt Benna’s glance. 

She was signaling me with her eyes. Telling me not to do it. 

“What’s going on?” Dr. Hawlings demanded, angrily turning to me. “What 
are you doing?” 

“Don’t give it away, Mark,” Aunt Benna pleaded. “Don’t let them know the 
secret word.” 

I lowered the shrunken head. “I won’t,” I whispered. 

“It’s okay, Daddy,” Kareen said, her eyes on me. “I know the word. Mark 
told it to me. I can tell you what it is. It’s—” 



26 


I clamped my hand over Kareen’s mouth. “Run!” I cried to Aunt Benna. “Run— 
now!” 

With an angry cry of attack, Aunt Benna lowered her shoulder and barreled 
into Dr. Hawlings. She roared into him like a football player—and sent him 
sprawling against the little shack. 

He uttered a startled yelp. The flashlight flew out of his hand and rolled 
across the ground. 

I spun away from Kareen and followed my aunt. Our shoes thudded over 
the tall grass as we ran for the trees. 

We were nearly to the edge of the clearing when Carolyn stepped in front of 
us. “What’s your hurry?” she demanded, moving to block our way. “The party is 
just starting.” 

Aunt Benna and I whirled around. Dr. Hawlings had moved up behind us. 
We were trapped. 

Carolyn raised her flashlight. Her silvery eyes narrowed at Aunt Benna. 
Carolyn smiled. A cold, unpleasant smile. “How are you, Benna? We missed 
you.” 

“Enough chitchat,” Dr. Hawlings muttered, gesturing with his flashlight. 
“It’s too dark to go back to the headquarters. We’ll have to spend the night here.” 

“How cozy,” Carolyn said, still smiling that cold smile at Aunt Benna. 

Aunt Benna scowled and looked away. “Carolyn, I thought you were my 
friend.” 

“We’re all good friends here,” Dr. Hawlings said. “And good friends like to 
share. That’s why you’re going to share the secret of Jungle Magic with us, 
Benna.” 

“Never!” my aunt declared, crossing her arms in front of her. 

“Never isn’t a word for friends,” Dr. Hawlings scolded. “In the morning, 
we will go back to the headquarters. Then you will share everything, Benna. You 
will share all of your secrets. And you will give the Jungle Magic to Carolyn and 
me.” 

“Like a good friend,” Carolyn added. 

“Let’s go,” Dr. Hawlings said. He put a heavy hand on my back and shoved 



me toward the little shack. Kareen was sitting on the ground, her collar pulled 
up, her back leaning against one wall. 

“You and Benna—in the shack,” Dr. Hawlings ordered, giving me another 
rough shove. “That way, we can keep an eye on you.” 

“You’re wasting your time, Richard,” Aunt Benna told him. She was trying 
to sound tough, but her voice trembled as she said it. 

Dr. Hawlings forced us into the dark shack. Aunt Benna and I stretched out 
on the floor. Through the cracks in the wall, I could see the darting light of their 
flashlights. 

“Are they going to guard us all night?” I whispered. 

Aunt Benna nodded. “We’re their prisoners now,” she whispered back. She 
sighed. “But we can’t let them have the Jungle Magic. We can’t!” 

I slid closer to my aunt. “If we don’t give it to them,” I said softly, “what 
will they do to us?” 

Aunt Benna didn’t reply. 

“What will they do to us?” I repeated. 

She stared down at the floor and didn’t answer. 



27 


A red ball of a sun was rising in the early morning sky when Dr. Hawlings poked 
his head into the shack and woke us up. 

I had slept only a few minutes. The shack had no floor, and the ground was 

hard. 

Whenever I closed my eyes, I dreamed about the shrunken head in my 
pocket. I dreamed that I held it in my hand. It blinked its eyes and its lips began 
to move. 

“You are doomed /” it exclaimed in a horrifying, hoarse whisper. “You are 
doomed. Doomed. Doomed! ” 

Aunt Benna and I scrambled out of the shack, stretching and yawning. Even 
though the sun was still low over the trees, the air already felt hot and wet. 

My whole body ached from lying on the hard ground. My shirt was damp 
and smelly. My stomach growled. I scratched my neck and discovered it was 
covered with mosquito bites. 

Not one of the great mornings. 

And it wasn’t going to get any better. 

We walked for hours through the sweltering jungle. Carolyn and Kareen led 
the way. Dr. Hawlings walked behind Aunt Benna and me, making sure we 
didn’t try to escape. 

No one said a word. The only sounds were the cries of animals, the chirping 
of birds overhead, and the swish of the tall weeds and grass as we pushed 
through. 

Swarms of white gnats flew up off the path, swirling together like small 
tornadoes. The sun beamed down through the trees, burning the back of my 
neck. 

When we finally made it back to the row of cabins, I was hot, sweaty, 
starving, and dying of thirst. 

Dr. Hawlings shoved Aunt Benna and me into an empty cabin. He slammed 
the door behind us and locked it. 

The cabin had two folding chairs and a small bed without sheets or 
blankets. I dropped down wearily onto the bare mattress. “What is he going to do 
to us?” 



Aunt Benna bit her lip. “Don’t worry,” she said softly. “I’ll figure 
something out.” She crossed the small room and tried the window. It was either 
stuck or bolted from the outside. 

“Maybe we can break the glass,” I suggested. 

“No, he’ll hear it,” Aunt Benna replied. 

I rubbed the back of my neck. The mosquito bites were itching like crazy. I 
wiped sweat off my forehead with the back of my hand. 

The door opened. Kareen entered, carrying two small bottles of water. She 
tossed one to me and one to my aunt. Then she turned quickly, closed the door 
hard behind her, and carefully locked it. 

I tilted the bottle to my mouth and gulped down the water without taking a 
breath. There were a few drops left at the bottom. I sprinkled them over the top 
of my head. Then I tossed the bottle to the floor. 

“What are we going to do?” I asked Aunt Benna. 

She was sitting in one of the folding chairs, her feet resting on the other. 
She raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhh.” 

Outside, I heard the rattle of machinery. A metallic clang. I heard the rush 
of water from a hose. 

I hurried to the window and peered out. But it faced the wrong way. I 
couldn’t see anything. 

“We’ve had one lucky break,” Aunt Benna murmured. 

I stared at her. “Excuse me?” 

“One lucky break,” she repeated. “Hawlings didn’t take away the shrunken 
head. It was so dark last night, I don’t think he saw it.” 

I pulled the head out from my pocket. The black hair had become tangled. I 
started to smooth it back. 

“Put it away, Mark,” Aunt Benna ordered sharply. “We don’t want 
Hawlings to see it. He doesn’t know that the head is needed for Jungle Magic.” 

“This particular head?” I asked, shoving it back in the pocket. “Only this 
head?” 

Aunt Benna nodded. “Yes. That head and the magic word. The word I gave 
you when I hypnotized you. When you were four.” 

The head’s black hair fell over my pocket. I carefully tucked it inside. 

Outside, I heard another metallic clank. I heard a splash. The roar of water 
grew louder. 

“We are in terrible danger,” Aunt Benna said softly. “You will have to use 



the Jungle Magic to save us, Mark.” 

I felt a chill of fear. But I muttered, “No problem.” 

“Wait till I give you the signal,” Aunt Benna instructed. “When I blink my 
eyes three times, pull the shrunken head out and shout the word. Keep watching 
me. Watch for the signal—okay?” 

Before I could reply, the door burst open. Dr. Hawlings and Carolyn hurried 
in, their faces grim. 

Dr. Hawlings carried a large silvery pistol. “Outside,” he ordered, waving 
the pistol at Aunt Benna and me. 

Carolyn led the way down the row of cabins. She turned and made us stop 
behind the main headquarters building. Kareen stood against the wall, a wide- 
brimmed straw hat pulled down over her eyes. 

The sun beamed down. The back of my neck prickled and itched. 

Huddling close to my aunt, I squinted into the bright sunlight. To my right, 
the big pile of shrunken heads came into focus. 

The dark eyes on the leathery, purple-and-brown heads seemed to stare at 
me. The mouths were all twisted in ugly expressions of anger and horror. 

I turned away from the terrifying pile of tiny heads—to see something even 
more terrifying. 

An enormous black pot stood behind the headquarters building. Water 
brimmed over the top, bubbling and boiling. 

The pot stood on some kind of electric burner. Like a stove burner. It glared 
red hot. The boiling water inside the pot bubbled and steamed. 

I turned to Aunt Benna and caught the fear on her face. “You can’t do this!” 
she screamed to Dr. Hawlings. “You know you can’t get away with this!” 

“I don’t want to hurt you,” Dr. Hawlings said calmly, without any emotion 
at all. A smile spread over his face. “I don’t want to harm you, Benna. I just want 
to own the Jungle Magic.” 

I kept my eyes locked on my aunt. Waiting for her signal. Waiting for the 
three blinks that meant I should go into action. 

“Give me the Jungle Magic,” Dr. Hawlings insisted. 

Carolyn stepped up beside him, hands on her waist. “Give it to us, Benna. 
We don’t want trouble. We really don’t.” 

“No!” The word shot out of my aunt’s mouth. “No! No! No! You both 
know that I will never give up the secret of Jungle Magic. Not to you. Not ever!” 

Carolyn sighed. “Please, Benna. Don’t make it difficult.” 



My aunt stared back at her. “Never,” she murmured. 

Aunt Benna blinked. 

I swallowed hard, watching for two more blinks. 

No. Not the signal. Not yet. 

Dr. Hawlings stepped forward. “Please, Benna. I’m giving you one last 
chance. Tell us the secret—now.” 

Aunt Benna shook her head. 

“Then I have no choice,” Dr. Hawlings said, shaking his head. “Since you 
two are the only ones in the world who know the secret, you are both too 
dangerous. The secret must die with you.” 

“Wh-what are you going to do to us?” I blurted out. 

“We’re going to shrink your heads,” Dr. Hawlings replied. 



28 


The pot hissed as water boiled over the side. I stared in horror at the billows of 
steam rising up over the pot. 

Was he really going to shrink our heads? 

Was I going to end up shriveled and leathery, with a head the size of a 
doorknob? 

I forced my legs to stop wobbling and stared at Aunt Benna. Stared at her. 
Stared hard. Watching her eyes. Waiting for the three blinks. 

Hurry! I pleaded silently. Hurry—before he tosses us into the boiling water! 

Kareen watched in silence. What was she thinking? I wondered. I couldn’t 
see her expression. Her face was hidden under the brim of the straw hat. 

“Benna, one last chance,” Dr. Hawlings said softly. “Because I like you. 
And I like your nephew. Don’t let me harm your nephew, Benna. Do it for him, 
okay? Tell me the secret—for Mark’s sake.” 

“It isn’t worth it, Benna,” Carolyn chimed in. “It will be so easy for you to 
give the Jungle Magic to us.” 

“I-I can’t,” Aunt Benna stammered. 

“Then we have no choice,” Dr. Hawlings said, almost sadly. “The boy goes 
in first.” 

He took a step toward me. 

Aunt Benna blinked. Once. Twice. Three times. 

Finally! 

With a trembling hand, I tugged the head from my pocket. 

I raised it in front of me. I opened my mouth to shout the secret word. 

But Dr. Hawlings swiped the head from my hand. 

He grabbed it away—and tossed it onto the big pile of heads. 

Then he dove for me, reaching out to grab me with both hands. 

I ducked out from under him. 

And threw myself onto the disgusting pile of heads. 

I began frantically sorting through them with both hands. Picking one up, 
tossing it aside. Grabbing the next one. The next one. The next one. 

They felt sticky and warm. Hard as baseballs. The hair brushed my hands. 



The dark eyes stared up at me blankly. They were so ugly, my stomach 
tightened. My breath came in wheezing gasps. 

Behind me, I could hear my aunt struggling with Dr. Hawlings. Wrestling 
with him. Trying to keep him away from me. 

I heard Carolyn’s shouts. Kareen’s cries of alarm. 

I had to find my shrunken head. 

I had to find it before Dr. Hawlings broke free of my aunt and grabbed me. 

I picked one up. Tossed it down. Picked up another. Tossed it down. 

How could I find mine? 

Which one was it? 

Which one? Which one? 



29 


I grabbed a head. Saw ants crawling over its cheeks. 

Picked up another. 

It stared at me with glassy green eyes. 

Picked up another. 

It had a long white scratch on its ear. 

I started to toss it back onto the pile. 

But stopped. 

A white scratch on its ear? 

Yes! Mine had a scratch! My sister Jessica—she scratched it back home! 

Yes! This head was mine! 

“Thank you, Jessica!” I cried at the top of my lungs. 

With an angry cry, Dr. Hawlings dove at me. He wrapped his arms around 
me and started to drag me off the pile of heads. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I shouted, holding on tightly to the shrunken head. My 
shrunken head. “Kah-lee-ah!” 

Will it save Aunt Benna and me? I wondered. 

Will the Jungle Magic work this time? 

Dr. Hawlings still had his arms around my shoulders. He was still trying to 
pull me toward the boiling pot. 

“Kah-lee-ah!” I screamed. 

His hands slid away. 

They seemed to shrink. His arms seemed to shrink into his body. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry when I realized that he was shrinking. Dr. 
Hawlings’ entire body was shrinking, growing smaller and smaller! 

I raised my eyes to Kareen and Carolyn. They were shrinking, too. 
Shrinking down to the ground. 

Kareen disappeared under the straw hat. Then she came running out from 
under the brim. A tiny Kareen, about the size of a mouse. 

All three of them—Kareen, Carolyn, and Dr. Hawlings—scampered over 
the grass. Mouse-sized. Squeaking angrily in tiny mouse voices. 

I stood beside the pile of heads and watched them scurry over the ground. 



Squeaking and squealing. I watched them until they disappeared into the jungle. 

Then I turned back to Aunt Benna. “It worked!” I cried. “The Jungle Magic 
—it saved us!” 

She rushed forward and wrapped me in a hug. “You did it, Mark. You did 
it! The jungle is safe now! The whole world is safe!” 


* * * 


There were more hugs when Aunt Benna flew me home. Hugs from Mom—and 
even Jessica. 

They met us at the airport. Then Mom drove us home for a big welcome- 
home dinner. I had so many stories to tell, I started telling them in the car. And I 
didn’t stop talking until way past dinner. 

It was nearly bedtime when Aunt Benna led me into the den. She closed the 
door behind us. Then she sat me down on the couch. 

She sat down beside me. “Look into my eyes,” she said softly. “Look 
deeply, Mark. Very deeply.” 

I raised my eyes to hers. “What are you going to do?” I asked. 

I didn’t hear her reply. 

As I stared into her eyes, the room grew fuzzy. The colors all seemed to 
shift and blur. I thought I saw the posters on the den wall flipping over and over. 
I thought I saw the chairs and coffee table sliding across the floor. 

After a while, the room came back into focus. Aunt Benna smiled at me. 
“There,” she said, squeezing my hand. “You’re back to normal, Mark.” 

“Huh?” I squinted at her. “What do you mean?” 

“No more Jungle Magic,” she explained. “I took it back. You’re a normal 
boy again.” 

“You mean, if I shout ‘Kah-lee-ah’ nothing will happen?” I asked. 

“That’s right.” She smiled at me, still holding my hand. “I took back the 
magic. The shrunken head has no powers. And you have no powers. You never 
have to worry about it again.” 

She stood up, yawning. “It’s getting late. Bedtime, don’t you think?” 

I nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” I was still thinking about how I didn’t have 
Jungle Magic anymore. “Aunt Benna?” 

“Yes?” 


“Can I keep the shrunken head?” 



“Of course,” she replied, tugging me to my feet. “Keep the shrunken head. 
As a souvenir. That way, you will always remember your jungle adventure.” 

“I don’t think I could forget it too easily,” I replied. Then I said good night 
and made my way to bed. 

The next morning, I woke up early and pulled on my clothes as fast as I could. I 
couldn’t wait to get to school and show off the shrunken head to Eric and Joel 
and all the other kids. 

I gulped down my cornflakes and chugged my orange juice. I strapped on 
my backpack. Called good-bye to Mom. Grabbed the shrunken head and headed 
out the door. 

Holding the head carefully in my hand, I started to jog along the sidewalk. 
It was a bright, sunny day. The air smelled warm and sweet. 

My school is only three blocks from my house. But as I jogged along, it 
seemed like miles. 

I couldn’t wait to get there and show off to everyone. 

I couldn’t wait to tell my friends about all my jungle adventures. 

I could see the school in the next block. And I could see a bunch of kids 
hanging out by the front door. 

As I ran across the street, I suddenly felt the head move in my hand. 

It twitched. 

“Huh?” I let out a gasp and stared down at it. 

The eyes blinked, then stared up at me. The lips closed, then opened again. 
“Hey, kid,” the head growled. “Let me tell the part about the tiger!”





NIGHT OF THE 
LIVING DUMMY III 


1 


The stairs up to my attic are narrow and steep. The fifth step is loose and 
wobbles when you stand on it. All the other stairs creak and groan. 

My whole house creaks and groans. It’s a big, old house. And it’s kind of 
falling apart. Mom and Dad don’t really have the money to repair it. 

“Trina—hurry!” my brother, Dan, whispered. His words echoed in the steep 
attic stairwell. Dan is ten, and he is always in a hurry. 

He’s short and very skinny. I think he looks like a mouse. He has short 
brown hair, dark eyes, and a pointy little chin. And he’s always scurrying around 
like a mouse searching for a place to hide. 

Sometimes I call him Mouse. You know. Like a nickname. Dan hates it. So 
I only call him Mouse when I want to make him mad. 

Dan and I don’t look at all like brother and sister. I’m tall and I have curly 
red hair and green eyes. I’m a little chubby, but Mom says not to worry about it. 
I’ll probably slim down by the time I’m thirteen, next August. 

Anyway, no one would ever call me Mouse! For one thing, I’m a lot braver 
than Dan. 

You have to be brave to go up to our attic. Not because of the creaking 
stairs. Or the way the wind whistles through the attic windows and makes the 
panes rattle. Not because of the dim light up there. Or the shadows. Or the low 
ceiling covered with cracks. 

You have to be brave because of the eyes. 

The dozens of eyes that stare at you through the darkness. 

The eyes that never blink. The eyes that stare with such eerie, heavy 
silence. 

Dan reached the attic ahead of me. I heard him take a few steps over the 
squeaking, wooden floorboards. Then I heard him stop. 

I knew why he stopped. He was staring back at the eyes, at the grinning 
faces. 

I crept up behind him, moving on tiptoe. I leaned my face close to his ear. 
And I shouted, “BOO!” 

He didn’t jump. 

“Trina, you’re about as funny as a wet sponge,” he said. He shoved me 



away. 

“I think wet sponges are funny,” I replied. I admit it. I like to annoy him. 

“Give me a break,” Dan muttered. 

I grabbed his arm. “Okay.” I pretended to break it in two. 

I know it’s dumb. But that’s the way my brother and I kid around all the 

time. 

Dad says we didn’t get our sense of humor from him. But I think we 
probably did. 

Dad owns a little camera store now. But before that he was a ventriloquist. 
You know. He did a comedy act with a dummy. 

Danny O’Dell and Wilbur. 

That was the name of the act. Wilbur was the dummy, in case you didn’t 
guess it. 

Danny O’Dell is my dad. My brother is Dan, Jr. But he hates the word 
junior, so no one ever calls him that. 

Except me. When I want to make him really mad! 

“Someone left the attic light on,” Dan said, pointing to the ceiling light. The 
only light in the whole attic. 

Our attic is one big room. There are windows at both ends. But they are 
both caked with dust, so not much light gets through. 

Dan and I made our way across the room. The dummies all stared at us, 
their eyes big and blank. Most of them had wide grins on their wooden faces. 
Some of their mouths hung open. Some of their heads tilted down so we couldn’t 
see their faces. 

Wilbur—Dad’s first dummy, the original Wilbur—was perched on an old 
armchair. His hands were draped over the chair arms. His head tilted against the 
chair back. 

Dan laughed. “Wilbur looks just like Dad taking a nap!” 

I laughed, too. With his short brown hair, his black eyeglasses, and his 
goofy grin, Wilbur looked a lot like Dad! 

The old dummy’s black-and-yellow checked sports jacket was worn and 
frayed. But Wilbur’s face was freshly painted. His black leather shoes were 
shiny. 

One wooden hand had part of the thumb chipped out. But Wilbur looked 
great for such an old dummy. 

Dad keeps all of the dummies in good shape. He calls the attic his Dummy 



Museum. Spread around the room are a dozen old ventriloquist’s dummies that 
he has collected. 

He spends all of his spare time fixing them up. Painting them. Giving them 
fresh wigs. Making new suits and pants for them. Working on their insides, 
making sure their eyes and mouths move correctly. 

These days, Dad doesn’t get to use his ventriloquist skills very often. 
Sometimes he’ll take one of the dummies to a kid’s birthday party and put on a 
show. Sometimes people in town will invite him to perform at a party to raise 
money for a school or library. 

But most of the time the dummies just sit up here, staring at each other. 

Some of them are propped against the attic wall. Some are sprawled out on 
the couch. Some of them sit in folding chairs, hands crossed in their laps. Wilbur 
is the only one lucky enough to have his own armchair. 

When Dan and I were little, we were afraid to come up to the attic. I didn’t 
like the way the dummies stared at me. I thought their grins were evil. 

Dan liked to stick his hand into their backs and move their mouths. He 
made the dummies say frightening things. 

“I’m going to get you, Trina!” he would make Rocky growl. Rocky is the 
mean-faced dummy that sneers instead of smiles. He’s dressed like a tough guy 
in a red-and-white striped T-shirt and black jeans. He’s really evil-looking, “I’m 
coming to your room tonight, Trina. And I’m going to GET you!” 

“Stop it, Dan! Stop it!” I would scream. Then I would go running 
downstairs and tell Mom that Dan was scaring me. 

I was only eight or nine. 

I’m a lot older now. And braver. But I still feel a little creeped out when I 
come up here. 

I know it’s dumb. But sometimes I imagine the dummies sitting around up 
here, talking to each other, giggling and laughing. 

Sometimes late at night when I’m lying in bed, the ceiling creaks over my 
head. Footsteps! I picture the dummies walking around in the attic, their heavy 
black shoes clonking over the floorboards. 

I picture them wrestling around on the old couch. Or playing a wild game 
of catch, their wooden hands snapping as they catch the ball. 

Dumb? Of course it’s dumb. 

But I can’t help it. 

They’re supposed to be funny little guys. But they scare me. 



I hate the way they stare at me without blinking. And I hate the red-lipped 
grins frozen on their faces. 

Dan and I come up to the attic because Dan likes to play with them. And 
because I like to see how Dad fixes them up. 

But I really don’t like to come up to the attic alone. 

Dan picked up Miss Lucy. That’s the only girl dummy in the group. She has 
curly blond hair and bright blue eyes. 

My brother stuck his hand into the dummy’s back and perched her on his 
knee. “Hi, Trina,” he made the dummy say in a high, shrill voice. 

Dan started to make her say something else. 

But he stopped suddenly. His mouth dropped open—like a dummy’s—and 
he pointed across the room. 

“Trina—1-look!” Dan stammered. “Over there!” 

I turned quickly. And I saw Rocky, the mean-looking dummy, blink his 

eyes. 

I gasped as the dummy leaned forward and sneered. “Trina, I’m going to 
GET you!” he growled. 



2 


I uttered a startled cry and jumped back. 

I swung around, ready to run to the attic steps—and I saw Dan laughing. 

“Hey—!” I cried out angrily. “What’s going on here?” 

I turned back to see Dad climb to his feet behind Rocky’s chair. He carried 
Rocky in one arm. Dad’s grin was as wide as a dummy’s! 

“Gotcha!” he cried in Rocky’s voice. 

I turned angrily on my brother. “Did you know Dad was back there? Did 
you know Dad was here the whole time?” 

Dan nodded. “Of course.” 

“You two are both dummies!” I cried. I flung my red hair back with both 
hands and let out an exasperated sigh. “That was so stupid!” 

“You fell for it,” Dan shot back, grinning at Dad. 

“Who’s the dummy here?” Dad made Rocky say. “Hey—who’s pulling 
your string? I’m not a dummy—knock on wood!” 

Dan laughed, but I just shook my head. 

Dad refused to give up. “Hey—come over here!” he made Rocky say. 
“Scratch my back. I think I’ve got termites!” 

I gave in and laughed. I’d heard that joke a million times. But I knew Dad 
wouldn’t stop trying until I laughed. 

He’s a really good ventriloquist. You can never see his lips move. But his 
jokes are totally lame. 

I guess that’s why he had to give up the act and open a camera store. I don’t 
know for sure. It all happened before I was born. 

Dad set Rocky back on his chair. The dummy sneered up at us. Such a bad- 
news dummy. Why couldn’t he smile like the others? 

Dad pushed his eyeglasses up on his nose. “Come over here,” he said. “I 
want to show you something.” 

He put one hand on my shoulder and one hand on Dan’s shoulder and led us 
to the other end of the big attic room. This is where Dad has his workshop—his 
worktable and all his tools and supplies for fixing up the dummies. 

Dad reached under the worktable and pulled up a large brown-paper 
shopping bag. I could tell by the smile on his face what he had in the bag. But I 



didn’t say anything to min his surprise. 

Slowly, carefully, Dad reached into the shopping bag. His smile grew wider 
as he lifted out a dummy. “Hey, guys—check this out!” Dad exclaimed. 

The dummy had been folded up inside the bag. Dad set it down flat on the 
worktable and carefully unfolded the arms and legs. He looked like a surgeon 
starting an operation. 

“I found this one in a trash can,” he told us. “Do you believe someone just 
threw it away?” 

He tilted the dummy up so we could see it. I followed Dan up to the 
worktable to get a better look. 

“The head was split in two,” Dad said, placing one hand at the back of the 
dummy’s neck. “But it took two seconds to repair it. Just a little glue.” 

I leaned close to check out Dad’s new treasure. It had wavy brown hair 
painted on top of its head. The face was kind of strange. Kind of intense. 

The eyes were bright blue. They shimmered. Sort of like real eyes. The 
dummy had bright red painted lips, curved up into a smile. 

An ugly smile, I thought. Kind of gross and nasty. 

His lower lip had a chip on one side so that it didn’t quite match the other 
lip. 

The dummy wore a gray double-breasted suit over a white shirt collar. The 
collar was stapled to his neck. 

He didn’t have a shirt. Instead, his wooden chest had been painted white. 
Big black leather shoes—very scuffed up—dangled from his skinny gray pants 
legs. 

“Can you believe someone just tossed him into the trash?” Dad repeated. 
“Isn’t he great?” 

“Yeah. Great,” I murmured. I didn’t like the new dummy at all. I didn’t like 
his face, the way his blue eyes gleamed, the crooked smile. 

Dan must have felt the same way. “He’s kind of tough-looking,” he said. He 
picked up one of the dummy’s wooden hands. It had deep scratches all over it. 
The knuckles appeared cut and bruised. As if the dummy had been in a fight. 

“Not as tough-looking as Rocky over there,” Dad replied. “But he does 
have a strange smile.” He picked at the small chip in the dummy’s lip. “I can fill 
that in with some liquid wood filler. Then I’ll give the whole face a fresh paint 
job.” 

“What’s the dummy’s name?” I asked. 



Dad shrugged. “Beats me. Maybe we’ll call him Smiley.” 

“Smiley?” I made a disgusted face. 

Dad started to reply. But the phone rang downstairs. One ring. Two. Three. 

“I guess your mom is still at that school meeting,” Dad said. He ran to the 
stairs. “I’d better answer it. Don’t touch Smiley till I get back.” He vanished 
down the stairs. 

I picked up the dummy’s head carefully in both hands. “Dad did a great 
gluing job,” I said. 

“He should do your head next!” Dan shot back. 

Typical. 

“I don’t think Smiley is a good name for him,” Dan said, slapping the 
dummy’s hands together. 

“How about Dan Junior?” I suggested. “Or Dan the Third?” 

He ignored me. “How many dummies does Dad have now?” He turned 
back toward the others across the attic and quickly counted them. 

I counted faster. “This new one makes thirteen,” I said. 

Dan’s eyes went wide. “Whoa. That’s an unlucky number.” 

“Well, if we count you, it’s fourteen!” I said. 

Gotcha, Danny Boy! 

Dan stuck out his tongue at me. He set the dummy’s hands down on its 
chest. “Hey—what’s that?” He reached into the pocket of the gray suit jacket and 
pulled out a folded-up slip of paper. 

“Maybe that has the dummy’s name on it,” I said. I grabbed the paper out of 
Dan’s hands and raised it to my face. I unfolded it and started to read. 

“Well?” Dan tried to grab it back. But I swung out of his reach. “What’s the 
name?” 

“It doesn’t say,” I told him. “There are just these weird words. Foreign, I 
guess.” 

I moved my lips silently as I struggled to read them. Then I read the words 
out loud: “Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano. ” 

Dan’s mouth dropped open. “Huh? What’s that supposed to mean?” he 
cried. 

He grabbed the paper from my hand. “I think you read it upside down!” 

“No way!” I protested. 

I glanced down at the dummy. 

The glassy blue eyes stared up at me. 



Then the right eye slowly closed. The dummy winked at me. 

And then his left hand shot straight up—and slapped me in the face. 



3 


“Hey—!” I shouted. I jerked back as pain shot through my jaw. 

“What’s your problem?” Dan demanded, glancing up from the slip of paper. 

“Didn’t you see?” I shrieked. “He—he slapped me!” I rubbed my cheek. 

Dan rolled his eyes. “Yeah. For sure.” 

“No—really!” I cried. “First he winked at me. Then he slapped me.” 

“Tell me another one,” Dan groaned. “You’re such a jerk, Trina. Just 
because you fall for Dad’s jokes doesn’t mean I’m going to fall for yours.” 

“But I’m telling the truth!” I insisted. 

I glanced up to see Dad poke his head up at the top of the stairs. “What’s 
going on, guys?” 

Dan folded up the slip of paper and tucked it back into the dummy’s jacket 
pocket. “Nothing much,” he told Dad. 

“Dad—the new dummy!” I cried, still rubbing my aching jaw. “He slapped 

me!” 

Dad laughed. “Sorry, Trina. You’ll have to do better than that. You can’t kid 
a kidder.” 

That’s one of Dad’s favorite expressions: “You can’t kid a kidder.” 

“But, Dad—” I stopped. I could see he wasn’t going to believe me. I wasn’t 
even sure I believed it myself. 

I glanced down at the dummy. He stared blankly up at the ceiling. Totally 
lifeless. 

“I have news, guys,” Dad said, sitting the new dummy up. “That was my 
brother—your uncle Cal—on the phone. He’s coming for a short visit while 
Aunt Susan’s away on business. And he’s bringing your cousin Zane with him. 
It’s Zane’s spring vacation from school, too.” 

Dan and I both groaned. Dan stuck his finger in his mouth and pretended to 
puke. 

Zane isn’t our favorite cousin. 

He’s our only cousin. 

He’s twelve, but you’d think he was five or six. He’s pretty nerdy. His nose 
mns a lot. And he’s kind of a wimp. 

Kind of a major wimp. 



“Hey, stop groaning,” Dad scolded. “Zane is your only cousin. He’s 
family.” 

Dan and I groaned again. We couldn’t help it. 

“He isn’t a bad kid,” Dad continued, narrowing his eyes at us behind his 
glasses. That meant he was being serious. “You two have to promise me 
something.” 

“What kind of promise?” I asked. 

“You have to promise me that you’ll be nicer to Zane this time.” 

“We were nice to him last time,” Dan insisted. “We talked to him, didn’t 

we?” 

“You scared him to death last time,” Dad said, frowning. “You made him 
believe that this old house is haunted. And you scared him so badly, he ran 
outside and refused to come back in.” 

“Dad, it was all a joke,” I protested. 

“Yeah. It was a scream!” Dan agreed. He poked me in the side with his 
elbow. “A scream. Get it?” 

“Not funny,” Dad said unhappily. “Not funny at all. Listen, guys—Zane 
can’t help it if he’s a little timid. He’ll outgrow it. You just have to be nice to 
him.” 

Dan snickered. “Zane is afraid of your dummies, Dad. Can you believe it?” 
“Then don’t drag him up here and scare the life out of him,” Dad ordered. 
“How about if we just play one or two little jokes on him?” Dan asked. 

“No tricks,” Dad replied firmly. “None.” 

Dan and I exchanged glances. 

“Promise me,” Dad insisted. “I mean it. Right now. Both of you. Promise 
me there will be no tricks. Promise me you won’t try to scare your cousin.” 

“Okay. I promise,” I said. I raised my right hand as if I were swearing an 

oath. 

“I promise, too,” Dan said softly. 

I checked to see if his fingers were crossed. They weren’t. 

Dan and I had both made a solemn promise. We both promised not to terrify 
our cousin. And we meant it. 

But it was a promise we couldn’t keep. 

Before the week was over, our cousin Zane would be terrified. 

And so would we. 



4 


I was playing the piano when Zane arrived. The piano is tucked away in a small 
room in the back of the house. It’s a small black upright piano, kind of beat-up 
and scratched. Dad bought it from my old music teacher who moved to 
Cleveland. 

Two of the pedals don’t work. And the piano really needs to be tuned. But I 
love to play it—especially when I’m stressed out or excited. It always helps to 
calm me down. 

I’m pretty good at it. Even Dan agrees. Most of the time he pushes me off 
the piano bench so he can play “Chopsticks”. But sometimes he stands beside 
me and listens. I’ve been practicing some nice Haydn pieces and some of the 
easy Chopin etudes. 

Anyway, I was in the back of the house banging away on the piano when 
Zane and Uncle Cal arrived. I guess I was a little nervous about seeing Zane 
again. 

Dan and I were really mean to him during his last visit. Like Dad said, Zane 
has always been scared of this old house. And we did everything we could to 
make him even more scared. 

We walked around in the attic every night, howling softly like ghosts, 
making the floor creak. We crept into his bedroom closet in the middle of the 
night and made him think his clothes were dancing. We rigged a pair of Mom’s 
panty hose so they cast a ghostly shadow of legs onto his bedroom floor. 

Poor Zane. I think Dan and I went a little too far. After a few days, he 
jumped at every sound. And his eyes kept darting from side to side like a 
frightened lizard’s. 

I heard him tell Uncle Cal that he never wanted to come back here. 

Dan and I laughed about that. But it wasn’t very nice. 

So I was a little nervous about seeing Zane again. I was playing the piano 
so loudly, I didn’t hear the doorbell. Dan had to come running in and tell me 
Uncle Cal and Zane had arrived. 

I jumped up from the piano bench. “How does Zane look?” I asked my 
brother. 

“Big,” Dan replied. “He grew. A lot. And he let his hair grow long.” 



Zane was always a pretty big guy. That’s why Dan and I thought his being a 
total wimp was so funny. 

He’s big and beefy. Not tall. He’s built kind of like a bulldog. A big blond 
bulldog. 

I guess he’s actually good-looking. He has round blue eyes, wavy blond 
hair, and a nice smile. He looks as if he works out or plays sports. He really 
doesn’t look like the wimp type at all. 

That’s why it’s such a riot to see him quivering in fear. Or wailing like a 
baby. Running to his mom or dad in terror. 

I followed Dan through the back hall. “Did Zane say anything to you?” I 
asked. 

“Just hi,” Dan replied. 

“A friendly ‘hi’ or an unfriendly ‘hi’?” I demanded. 

Dan didn’t have time to answer. We had reached the front hall. 

“Hey—!” Uncle Cal greeted me, stretching out his arms for a hug. Uncle 
Cal looks a lot like a chipmunk. He’s very small. He has a round face, a twitchy 
little nose, and two teeth that poke out from his upper lip. 

“You’re getting so tall!” he exclaimed as I hugged him. “You’ve grown a 
lot, Trina!” 

Why do grown-ups always have to comment on how tall kids are getting? 
Can’t they think of anything else to say? 

I saw Dad lugging their two heavy suitcases up the stairs. 

“I didn’t know if you’d be hungry or not,” Mom told Uncle Cal. “So I made 
a bunch of sandwiches.” 

I turned to say hi to Zane. And a flash of white light made me cry out in 
surprise. 

“Don’t move. One more,” I heard Zane say. 

I blinked rapidly, trying to clear the light from my eyes. When I finally 
focused, I saw that Zane had a camera up to his face. 

He clicked it. Another bright flash of light. 

“That’s good,” he said. “You looked really surprised. I only like to take 
candid shots.” 

“Zane is really into photography,” Uncle Cal said, grinning proudly. 

“I’m blind!” I cried, rubbing my eyes. 

“I needed extra flash because this house is so dark,” Zane said. He lowered 
his head to the camera and fiddled with his lens. 



Dad came shuffling down the stairs. Zane turned and snapped his picture. 

“Zane is really into photography,” Uncle Cal repeated to my father. “I told 
him maybe you’ve got an old camera or two at the shop that he could have.” 

“Uh... maybe,” Dad replied. 

Uncle Cal makes a lot more money than Dad. But whenever he visits, he 
always tries to get Dad to give him stuff. 

“Nice camera,” Dad told Zane. “What kind of photos do you like to take?” 

“Candid shots,” Zane replied, pushing back his blond hair. “And I take a lot 
of still lifes.” He stepped into the hall and flashed a close-up of the banister. 

Dan leaned close and whispered in my ear, “He’s still a pain. Let’s give him 
a really good scare.” 

“No way!” I whispered back. “No scares this time. We promised Dad— 
remember?” 

“I’ve set up a darkroom in the basement,” Dad told Zane. “Sometimes I 
bring developing work home from the store. You can use the darkroom this 
week, if you want to.” 

“Great!” Zane replied. 

“I told Zane maybe you have some sheets of developing paper you can 
spare,” Uncle Cal said to Dad. 

Zane raised his camera and flashed another picture. Then he turned to Dan. 
“Are you still into video games?” he asked. 

“Yeah,” Dan replied. “Mostly sports games. I have the new NBA Jams. And 
I’m saving my allowance to get the new thirty-two-bit system. You still play?” 

Zane shook his head. “Not since I got my camera. I don’t really have time 
for games anymore.” 

“How about some sandwiches, everyone?” Mom asked, moving toward the 
dining room. 

“I think I’d like to unpack first,” Uncle Cal told her. “Zane, you should 
unpack, too.” 

We all split up. Dan and Dad disappeared somewhere. Uncle Cal and Zane 
went up to their rooms to unpack—our big old house has a lot of extra 
bedrooms. 

I was heading into the kitchen to help Mom with the sandwiches when I 
heard Zane scream. 

A shrill scream from upstairs. 

A scream of horror. 



5 


Mom gasped and dropped the sandwich tray she was carrying. 

I spun around and went running to the front hall. 

Dad was already halfway up the stairs. “What’s wrong?” he called. “Zane— 
what’s the matter?” 

When I reached the second floor, I saw Dan step out of his room. Zane 
stood in the hallway. Someone lay stretched across the floor at his feet. 

Even from halfway down the hall, I could see that Zane was trembling. 

I hurried over to him. 

Who was sprawled on the floor like that, legs and arms all twisted? 

“Zane—what happened? What happened?” Dad and Uncle Cal both 
shouted. 

Zane stood there shaking all over. The camera seemed to tremble, too, 
swinging on its strap over his chest. 

I glanced down at the body on the floor. 

A ventriloquist’s dummy. 

Rocky. 

Rocky sneered up at the ceiling. His red-and-white striped shirt had rolled 
up halfway, revealing his wooden body. One leg was bent under him. Both arms 
were stretched out over the floor. 

“That d-dummy—” Zane stammered, pointing down at Rocky. “It—it fell 
on me when I opened the bedroom door.” 

“Huh? It what?” Uncle Cal cried. 

“It dropped down on me,” Zane repeated. “When I pushed the door. I didn’t 
mean to scream. It just scared me, that’s all. It was so heavy. And it fell near my 
head.” 

I turned and saw Dad glaring angrily at Dan. 

Dan raised both hands in protest. “Hey—don’t look at me!” he cried. 

“Dan, you made a promise,” Dad said sharply. 

“I didn’t do it!” Dan cried. “It had to be Trina!” 

“Hey—no way!” I protested. “No way! I didn’t do it!” 

Dad narrowed his eyes at me. “I suppose the dummy climbed up on top of 



the door by himself!” he said, rolling his eyes. 

“It was just a joke,” Uncle Cal chimed in. “You’re okay—right, Zane?” 

“Yeah. Sure.” Zane’s cheeks were red. I could see he was embarrassed by 
all the fuss. “I just wasn’t expecting something to fall on me. You know.” He 
stared at the floor. 

“Let’s finish unpacking,” Uncle Cal suggested. “I’m starting to get hungry.” 
He turned to Dad. “Do you have any extra pillows? There’s only one on my bed. 
And I like to sleep with a lot of pillows.” 

“I’ll see if we have any more,” Dad replied. He frowned at me. “You and 
Dan—take Rocky up to the attic. And no more little jokes. You promised— 
remember?” 

I picked Rocky up carefully and slung him over my shoulder. “Get the attic 
door for me,” I instructed Dan. 

We made our way down the hall. “What is your problem, Mouse?” I 
whispered to my brother. 

“Don’t call me Mouse,” he replied through gritted teeth. “You know I hate 
it.” 

“Well, I hate broken promises,” I told him. “You can’t wait one minute to 
start scaring Zane? You’re going to get us in major trouble.” 

“Me?” Dan put on his innocent act. “I didn’t hide the dummy up there. You 
did—and you know it!” 

“Did not!” I whispered angrily. 

“Hey, guys, can I come with you?” I turned to see Zane right behind us. I 
hadn’t realized he’d followed us. 

“You want to come up to the Dummy Museum?” I asked, unable to hide my 
surprise. Last visit, Zane had been afraid of the dummies. 

“Yeah. I want to take some pictures,” he replied. He raised his camera in 
both hands. 

“Cool,” Dan said. “That’s a cool idea.” I could see that he was trying to be 
friendly to Zane. 

I didn’t want to be left out. “It’s neat that you’re into photography,” I told 
Zane. 

“Yeah. I know,” he replied. 

Dan led the way up the attic stairs. Halfway up, I turned back. I saw Zane 
lingering at the bottom. 

“Are you coming up or not?” I called down. My voice echoed in the 



narrow, dark stairwell. 

I caught a look of fear on Zane’s face. He was trying to be brave, I realized. 
Trying not to be afraid the way he was last time. 

“Coming,” he called up. I saw him take a deep breath. Then he came 
mnning up the stairs. 

He stayed close to Dan and me as we crossed the attic. The eyes peered out 
at us darkly from around the big room. 

I clicked on the light. The dummies all came into view. Propped on chairs 
and the old couch, leaning against the wall, they grinned at us. 

I carried Rocky over to his folding chair. I slid him off my shoulder and set 
him down. I crossed his arms in his lap and straightened his striped shirt. The 
mean-looking dummy sneered up at me. 

“Uncle Danny has a few new guys,” Zane said from across the room. He 
stood close to Dan in front of the couch. He held the camera in his hands, but he 
didn’t take any pictures. “Where does he find them?” 

“He found the newest one in a trash can,” I replied, pointing to the mean¬ 
looking dummy. 

Dan picked up Miss Lucy and held it up to Zane. “Hiya, Zane! Take my 
picture!” Dan made Miss Lucy say in a high, shrill voice. 

Zane obediently raised the camera to his eye. “Say cheese,” he told Miss 
Lucy. 

“Cheese,” Dan said in Miss Lucy’s high voice. 

Zane flashed a picture. 

“Give me a big wet kiss!” Dan made Miss Lucy say. He shoved the 
dummy’s face close to Zane’s. 

Zane backed away. “Yuck.” 

“Put the dummy down,” I told my brother. “We’d better get back 
downstairs. They’re all probably waiting for us.” 

“Okay, okay,” Dan grumbled. He turned to set Miss Lucy down. Zane 
wandered down the row of dummies, studying them. 

I bent down and straightened Wilbur’s bow tie. The old dummy was 
starting to look really ragged. 

I was still working on the bow tie when I heard a hard slap. 

And I heard Zane’s startled cry of pain. 

“Owwww!” 



6 


I spun around and saw Zane rubbing his jaw. 

“Hey—that dummy slapped me!” he cried angrily. 

He pointed to a red-haired dummy on the arm of the couch. 

“I-I don’t believe it!” Zane exclaimed. “It swung its arm up, and it—it 
slapped me!” 

Dan stood behind the couch. I saw a smile spread over his face. Then he 
burst out laughing. “Get serious,” he told Zane. “That’s impossible.” 

“You did it!” Zane accused my brother, still rubbing his jaw. “You moved 
the dummy!” 

“No way!” Dan backed away till he bumped the wall. “How could I? I was 
behind the couch the whole time.” 

I stepped quickly up to the couch. “Which dummy was it?” I demanded. 

Zane pointed to a dummy with red hair and bright red freckles painted all 
over his grinning face. “That guy.” 

“Arnie,” I reported. “One of Dad’s first dummies.” 

“I don’t care what his name is,” Zane snapped. “He slapped me!” 

“But that’s dumb,” I insisted. “It’s just a ventriloquist’s dummy, Zane. Here. 
Look.” 

I picked Arnie up. The old dummy was heavier than I remembered. I started 
to hand him to Zane. But my cousin backed away. 

“Something weird is going on here,” Zane said, keeping his eyes on the 
dummy. “I’m going to tell Uncle Danny.” 

“No. Don’t tell Dad,” I pleaded. “Give us a break, Zane. It’ll get us in big 
trouble.” 

“Yeah. Don’t tell,” Dan chimed in. “The dummy probably just slipped or 
something. You know. It fell over.” 

“It reached up,” Zane insisted. “I saw it swing its arm and—” 

He was interrupted by Mom’s voice from downstairs. “Hurry up, kids. Get 
down here. We’re all waiting for you.” 

“Coming!” I shouted. I dropped Arnie back onto the arm of the couch. He 
fell into the dummy next to him. I left him like that and followed Dan and Zane 
to the stairs. 



I held Dan back and let Zane go down by himself. “What are you trying to 
prove?” I angrily asked my brother. “That wasn’t funny.” 

“Trina, I didn’t do it. I swear!” Dan claimed, raising his right hand. “I 
swear!” 

“So what are you saying?” I demanded. “That the dummy really reached up 
and slapped him?” 

Dan twisted his face. He shrugged. “I don’t know. I just know that I didn’t 
do it. I didn’t swing that dummy’s arm.” 

“Don’t be stupid,” I replied. “Of course you did.” I shoved my brother 
toward the stairs. 

“Hey—give me a break,” he muttered. 

“You’re a total liar,” I told him. “You think you can scare Zane—and me. 
But it isn’t worth it, Dan. We promised Dad, remember? Remember?” 

He ignored me and started down the stairs. 

I felt really angry. I knew that Dan had perched the dummy on top of the 
bedroom door so that it would fall on Zane. And I knew that he had swung the 
dummy’s arm to slap Zane. 

I wondered how far Dan would go to frighten our cousin. 

I knew I had to stop him. If Dan kept this up, he’d get us both grounded for 
life. Or worse. 

But what could I do? 

I was still thinking about it in bed later that night. I couldn’t get to sleep. I 
lay there, staring up at the ceiling, thinking about Dan and what a liar he was. 

Dummies are made of wood and cloth, I told myself. They don’t swing their 
arms and slap people. 

And they don’t get up and walk around the house and climb up onto doors 
on their own. They don’t walk on their own.... 

They don’t... 

I finally started to drift off to sleep when I heard light footsteps on my 
bedroom carpet. 

And then a hoarse whisper close to my ear: 

“Trina... Trina...” 



7 


“Trina... Trina...” 

The hoarse whisper—so near my ear—made me shoot straight up in bed. 

I leaped to my feet. Pulled the covers with me. Lurched forward. 

And nearly knocked Zane onto his back. 

“Zane?” 

He stumbled backwards. “Sorry!” he whispered. “I thought you were 
awake.” 

“Zane!” I repeated. My heart thudded in my chest. “What are you doing in 
here?” 

“Sorry,” he whispered, backing up some more. He stopped a few inches in 
front of my dresser. “I didn’t mean to scare you. I just—” 

I held my hand over my heart. I could feel it start to slow back down to 
normal. “Sorry I jumped out at you like that,” I told him. “I was half asleep, I 
guess. And when you whispered my name...” 

I clicked on the bed-table lamp. I rubbed my eyes and squinted at Zane. 

He was wearing baggy blue pajamas. One pajama leg had rolled up nearly 
to his knee. His blond hair had fallen over his face. He had such a frightened, 
little-boy expression on his face. He looked about six years old! 

“I tried to wake up Dad,” he whispered. “But he’s such a sound sleeper. I 
kept knocking on his bedroom door and calling to him. But he didn’t hear me. So 
I came in here.” 

“What’s your problem?” I asked, stretching my arms over my head. 

“I-I heard voices,” he stammered, glancing to the open bedroom door. 

“Excuse me? Voices?” I pushed my hair back. Straightened my long 
nightshirt. Studied him. 

He nodded. “I heard voices. Upstairs. I mean, I think they were upstairs. 
Funny voices. Talking very fast.” 

I squinted at him. “You heard voices in the attic ? ” 

He nodded again. “Yeah. I’m pretty sure.” 

“I’m pretty sure you were dreaming.” I sighed. I shook my head. 

“No. I was wide awake. Really.” He picked up a little stuffed bear from my 
dresser. He squeezed it between his hands. 



“I never sleep very well in new places,” he told me. “I never sleep very well 
in this house!” He let out an unhappy laugh. “I was wide awake.” 

“There’s no one in the attic,” I said, yawning. I tilted my ear to the ceiling. 
“Listen,” I instructed. “Silent up there. No voices.” 

We both listened to the silence for a while. 

Then Zane set down the stuffed bear. “Do you think I could have a bowl of 
cereal?” he asked. 

“Huh?” I gaped at him. 

“A bowl of cereal always helps calm me down,” he said. An embarrassed 
smile crossed his face. “Just a habit from when I was a kid.” 

I squinted at my clock radio. It was a little after midnight. “You want a 
bowl of cereal now?” 

He nodded. “Is that okay?” he asked shyly. 

Poor guy, I thought. He’s really freaked out. 

“Sure,” I said. “I’ll come down to the kitchen with you. Show you where 
everything is.” 

I found my flip-flops and slipped my feet into them. I keep them under my 
bed. I don’t like walking barefoot on the floorboards in the hall. There are a lot 
of nails that poke up from the floor. 

Mom and Dad keep saying they’re going to buy carpet. But money is tight. 
I don’t think carpet is tops on their list. 

Zane appeared a little calmer. I smiled at him and led the way into the hall. 

He’s not such a bad guy, I thought. He’s a little wimpy—but so what? I 
decided to have a serious talk with Dan first thing in the morning. I planned to 
make Dan promise he wouldn’t pull any more scares on Zane. 

The long hall was so dark, Zane and I both held onto the wall as we made 
our way to the stairs. Mom and Dad used to keep a little night-light at the end of 
the hall. But the bulb burned out, and they never replaced it. 

Holding onto the banister, we made our way slowly down the steps. Pale 
light from outside cast long blue shadows over the living room. In the dim light, 
our old furniture rose up like ghosts around the room. 

“This house always creeps me out,” Zane whispered, staying close by my 
side as we crossed through the front room. 

“I’ve lived here all my life, and sometimes I’m scared of it, too,” I 
confessed. “Old houses make so many strange sounds. Sometimes I think I hear 
the house groaning and moaning.” 



“I really did hear voices,” Zane whispered. 

We crept through the shadows to the kitchen. My flip-flops slapped on the 
linoleum. Silvery moonlight washed through the curtains over the kitchen 
window. 

I started to fumble on the wall for the light switch. 

But I stopped when I saw the dark figure slumped at the kitchen table. 

Zane saw him, too. I heard Zane gasp. He jerked back into the doorway. 
“Dad? Are you still up?” I called. “Why are you sitting in the dark?” 

My hand found the light switch. I clicked on the kitchen light. 

And Zane and I both let out a scream. 



8 


I recognized the red-and-white striped shirt. I didn’t even have to see the face. 

Rocky leaned over the table, his wooden head propped in his hands. 

Zane and I crept closer to the table. I moved to the other side. The dummy 
sneered at me. His glassy eyes were cold and cruel. 

Such a nasty expression. 

“How did he get down here?” Zane asked. He stared hard at the dummy, as 
if expecting the dummy to answer. 

“Only one way,” I murmured. “He sure didn’t walk.” 

Zane turned to me. “You mean Dan?” 

I sighed. “Of course. Who else? Mister Dumb Jokes.” 

“But how did your brother know we’d be coming down to the kitchen 
tonight?” Zane asked. 

“Let’s go ask him,” I replied. 

I knew Dan was awake. Probably sitting on the edge of his bed, waiting 
eagerly to hear us scream from the kitchen. Giggling to himself. So pleased with 
himself. 

So pleased that he broke his promise to Dad. And gave Zane and me a little 
scare. 

I balled both hands into tight fists. I could feel the anger rising in my chest. 

When I get really furious like that, I usually go to the back room and pound 
the piano. I pound out a Sousa march or a hard, fast rock song. I pound the keys 
till I start to calm down. 

Tonight, I decided, I would pound my brother instead. 

“Come on,” I urged Zane. “Upstairs.” 

I took one last glance at Rocky, slouched over the kitchen table. The 
dummy stared blankly back at me. 

I really hate that dummy, I thought. I’m going to ask Dad to put him away 
in a closet or a trunk. 

I forced myself to turn away from the sneering, wooden face. Then I put 
both hands on Zane’s shoulders and guided him back to the stairs. 

“I’m going to tell Dan that we’re both fed up with his dumb jokes,” I 
whispered to my cousin. “Enough is enough. We’ll make him promise to stop 



leaving that dummy everywhere we go.” 

Zane didn’t reply. In the dim light, I could see the grim expression on his 

face. 

I wondered what he was thinking about. Was he remembering his last visit 
to our house? Was he remembering how Dan and I terrified him then? 

Maybe he doesn’t trust me, either, I told myself. 

We climbed the stairs and crept down the dark hallway to my brother’s 
room. 

The door was half open. I pushed it open the rest of the way and stepped 
inside. Zane kept close behind me. 

I expected Dan to be sitting up, waiting for us. I expected to see him 
grinning, enjoying his little joke. 

Silvery moonlight flooded in through his double windows. From the 
doorway, I could see him clearly. Lying on his side in bed. Covers up to his chin. 
Eyes tightly closed. 

Was he faking? Was he really awake? 

“Dan,” I whispered. “Da-an.” 

He didn’t move. His eyes didn’t open. 

“Dan—I’m coming to tickle you!” I whispered. He could never keep a 
straight face when I threatened him. Dan is very ticklish. 

But he didn’t move. 

Zane and I crept closer. Up to the bed. We both stood over my brother, 
staring hard at him, studying him in the silvery light. 

He was breathing softly, in a steady rhythm. His mouth was open a little. 
He made short whistling sounds. Mouse sounds. With his pointy chin and 
upturned nose, he really did look like a little mouse. 

I leaned over him. “Da-an, get ready to be tickled!” I whispered. 

I leaned back, expecting him to leap out at me, to shout “Boo!” or 
something. 

But he continued sleeping, whistling softly with each breath. 

I turned to Zane, who hung back in the center of the room. “He’s really 
asleep,” I reported. 

“Let’s go back to our rooms,” Zane replied in a soft whisper. He yawned. 

I followed him to the bedroom door. “What about your cereal?” I asked. 

“Forget it. I’m too sleepy now.” 

We were nearly to the door when I heard someone move in the hall. 



“Ohhh.” I let out a low moan as a face appeared in the doorway. 
Rocky’s face. 

He had followed us upstairs! 



9 


I grabbed Zane’s arm. We both shouted cries of surprise. 

The dummy moved quickly into the room. 

I cut my cry short as I saw that he wasn’t walking on his own. He was being 
carried. 

Dad had the dummy by the back of the neck. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” Dan called sleepily from behind us. He raised his 
head from the pillow and squinted at us. “Huh? What’s everybody doing in my 
room?” 

“That’s what I’d like to know,” Dad said sharply. He gazed suspiciously 
from Zane to me. 

“You—you woke me up,” Dan murmured. He cleared his throat. Then he 
propped himself up on one elbow. “Why are you carrying that dummy, Dad?” 

“Perhaps one of you would like to answer that question,” Dad growled. He 
had pulled a robe over his pajamas. His hair was matted to his forehead. 

He wasn’t wearing his glasses, so he squinted at us. 

“What’s going on? I don’t understand,” Dan said sleepily. He rubbed his 

eyes. 

Was he putting on an act? I wondered. His innocent-little-boy act? 

“I heard noises downstairs,” Dad said, shifting Rocky to his other hand. “I 
went down to see what was going on. I found this dummy sitting at the kitchen 
table.” 

“I didn’t put him there!” Dan cried, suddenly wide awake. “Really. I 
didn’t!” 

“Neither did Zane or me!” I chimed in. 

Dad turned to me. He sighed. “I’m really sleepy. I don’t like these jokes in 
the middle of the night.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” I cried. 

Dad squinted hard at me. He really couldn’t see at all without his glasses. 
“Do I have to punish you and your brother?” he demanded. “Do I have to ground 
you? Or keep you from going away to camp this summer?” 

“No!” Dan and I both cried at once. Dan and I were both going to summer 
camp for the first time this year. It’s all we’ve talked about since Christmas. 



“Dad, I was asleep. Really,” Dan insisted. 

“No more stories,” Dad replied wearily. “The next time one of my dummies 
is somewhere he shouldn’t be, you’re both in major trouble.” 

“But, Dad—” I started. 

“One last chance,” Dad said. “I mean it. If I see Rocky out of the attic 
again, you’ve both had it!” He waved Zane and me to the door. “Get to your 
rooms. Now. Not another word.” 

“Do you believe me or not?” Dan demanded. 

“I don’t believe that Rocky has been moving around the house on his own,” 
Dad replied. “Now lie down and get back to sleep, Dan. I’m giving you one last 
chance. Don’t blow it.” 

Dad followed Zane and me into the hall. “See you in the morning,” he 
murmured. He made his way to the attic stairs to take Rocky back up to the 
Dummy Museum. I heard him muttering to himself all the way up the stairs. 

I said good night to Zane and headed to my room. I felt sleepy and upset 
and worried and confused—all at once. 

I knew that Dan had to be the one who kept springing Rocky on Zane. But 
why was he doing it? And would he quit now—before Dad grounded us or 
totally ruined our summer? 

I fell asleep, still asking myself question after question. 

The next morning, I woke up early. I pulled on jeans and a sweatshirt and 
hurried downstairs for breakfast. 

And there sat Rocky at the kitchen table. 



10 


I peered around the kitchen. No one else around. 

How lucky that I was the first one downstairs! 

I grabbed Rocky up by the back of the neck. Then I tucked him under one 
arm and dragged him up to the attic as fast as I could. 

When I returned to the kitchen a few moments later, Mom had already 
started breakfast. 

Whew! A close call. 

“Trina—you’re up early,” Mom said, filling the coffee maker with water. 
“Are you okay?” 

I glanced at the table. I had the sick feeling that Rocky would be sitting 
there sneering at me. 

But of course he was upstairs in the attic. I had just carried him up there. 

The table stood empty. 

“I’m fine,” I told her. “Just fine.” 

It was definitely Be Kind to Zane Day. After breakfast, Dad hurried off to the 
camera store. A short while later, Mom and Uncle Cal left for the mall to do 
some shopping. 

It was a bright morning. Yellow sunlight streamed in through the windows. 
The sky stretched clear and cloudless. 

Zane brought down his camera. He decided it was a perfect day to take 
some photographs. 

Dan and I expected him to go outside. But our cousin wanted to stay 
indoors and shoot. 

“I’m very interested in moldings,” he told us. 

We followed him around the house. Dan and I had made a solemn vow to 
be nice to Zane and not to scare him. 

After breakfast, when Zane was upstairs getting his camera, I grabbed my 
brother. I pinned him against the wall. “No tricks,” I told him. 

Dan tried to wriggle away. But I’m stronger than he is. I kept him pinned 
against the wall. “Raise your right hand and swear,” I instructed him. 

“Okay, okay.” He gave in easily. He raised his right hand, and he repeated 



the vow I recited. “No tricks against Zane. No making fun of Zane. No dummies 
— anywhere! ” 

I let him go as Zane returned with his camera. “You have some awesome 
moldings,” Zane said, gazing up at the living room ceiling. 

“Really?” I replied, trying to sound interested. 

What could be interesting about a molding? 

Zane tilted up his camera. He focused for what seemed like hours. Then he 
clicked a photo of the molding above the living room curtains. 

“Do you have a ladder?” he asked Dan. “Td really like to get a closer shot. 
I’m afraid my zoom lens will distort it.” 

And so Dan hurried off to the basement to get Zane a ladder. 

I was proud of my brother. He didn’t complain about having to go get the 
ladder. And he’d lasted a whole ten minutes without cracking any molding jokes 
or making fun of Zane. 

Which wasn’t easy. 

I mean, what kind of a nerd thinks it’s cool to take photos of ceilings and 
walls? 

Meanwhile, we had no school, and it was the sunniest, warmest, most 
beautiful day of March outside. Almost like spring. And Dan and I were stuck 
holding the ladder for Zane so he could use his macro lens and get a really tight 
molding shot. 

“Awesome!” Zane declared, snapping a few more. “Awesome!” 

He climbed down the ladder. He adjusted the lens. Fiddled with some other 
dials on the camera. 

“Want to go outside or something?” I suggested. 

He didn’t seem to hear me. “I’d like to get a few more banister shots,” he 
announced. “See the way the sunlight is pouring through the wooden bars? It 
makes a really interesting pattern on the wall.” 

I started to say something rude. But Dan caught my eye. He shook a finger 
at me. A warning. 

I bit my lip and didn’t say anything. 

This is sooooo boring, I thought. But at least we’re keeping out of trouble. 

We stood beside Zane as he photographed the banister from all angles. 
After about the tenth shot, his camera began to hum and whir. 

“End of the roll,” he announced. His eyes lit up. “Know what would be 
really cool? To go down into the basement to the darkroom and develop these 



right now.” 

“Cool,” I replied. I tried to sound sincere. Dan and I were both trying so 
hard to be nice to this kid! 

“Uncle Danny said I could use his darkroom downstairs,” Zane said, 
watching the camera as it rewound the film roll. “That would be awesome.” 

“Awesome,” I repeated. 

Dan and I exchanged glances. The most beautiful day of the century —and 
we were heading down to a dark closet in the basement. 

“I’ve never watched pictures get developed,” Dan told our cousin. “Can 
you show me how to do it?” 

“It’s pretty easy,” Zane replied, following us down the basement stairs. 
“Once you get the timing down.” 

We made our way through the laundry room, past the furnace, to the 
darkroom against the far wall. We slipped inside, and I clicked on the special red 
light. 

“Close the door tightly,” Zane instructed. “We can’t let in any light at all.” 

I double-checked the darkroom door. Then Zane set to work. He arranged 
the developing pans. He poured bottles of chemicals into the pans. He unspooled 
the film roll and began to develop. 

I’d watched Dad do it a hundred times before. It really was kind of 
interesting. And it was cool when the image began to appear and then darken on 
the developing paper. 

Dan and I stood close to Zane, watching him work. 

“I think I got some very good angles on the living room moldings,” Zane 
said. He dipped the large sheet of paper in one pan. Then he pulled it up, let it 
drip for a few seconds, and lowered it into the pan beside it. 

A grin spread over his face. “Let’s take a look.” 

He leaned over the table. Raised the sheet of paper. Held it up to the red 

light. 

His grin faded quickly. “Hey—who shot this?” he demanded angrily. 

Dan and I moved closer to see the photo. 

“Who shot this?” Zane repeated. He furiously picked up another sheet from 
the developing pan. Another one. Another one. 

“How did these get on the roll?” he cried. He shoved them all toward Dan 
and me. 

Photos of Rocky. 



Close-up portraits. 

Photo after photo of the sneering dummy. 

“Who shot them? Who?” Zane demanded angrily, shoving the wet photos in 
our faces. 

“I didn’t!” Dan declared, pulling back. 

“I didn’t either!” I protested. 

But then, who did? I asked myself, staring hard at the ugly, sneering face on 
each sheet. 

Who did? 



11 


“What’s going on up here, guys?” 

The dummies stared back at me blankly. None of them replied. 

“What’s the story?” I demanded. My eyes moved from one dummy to the 
next. “Come on, guys. Speak up or I’ll come back here with a buzz saw and give 
you all haircuts!” 

Silence. 

I paced back and forth in front of them, gazing at them sternly, my arms 
crossed in front of my chest. 

It was late in the afternoon. The sun had begun to lower itself behind the 
trees. Orange light washed in through the dusty attic windows. 

I had crept up to the attic to search for clues. Something weird was going 
on. 

How did all those photos of Rocky get onto Zane’s roll of film? Who took 
those photos? 

The same person who kept carrying Rocky downstairs and sitting him 
where he would frighten Zane. 

“It was Dan—right, guys?” I asked the wide-eyed dummies. “Dan came up 
here—right?” 

I searched the floor. The couch. Under all the chairs. 

I didn’t find a single clue. 

Now I was questioning the dummies. But of course they weren’t being very 
helpful. 

Stop wasting time and get back downstairs, I told myself. 

I turned and started to the stairs—when I heard soft laughter. 

“Huh?” I uttered a startled cry and spun around. 

Another quiet laugh. A snicker. 

And then a hoarse voice: “Is your hair red? Or are you starting to rust? ,, 

“Excuse me?” I cried, raising a hand to my mouth. My eyes swept quickly 
from dummy to dummy. 

Who said that? 

“Hey, Trina... you’re pretty. Pretty ugly!” That was followed by another 



soft snicker. Evil laughter. 

“I like your perfume. What is it... flea and tick spray?” 

My eyes stopped on the new dummy, the one Dad called Smiley. He sat 
straight up in the center of the couch. The voice seemed to be coming from him. 
“Pinch me. I’m having a nightmare. Or is that really your face?” 

I froze. A cold shiver ran down my back. 

The hoarse voice did come from the new dummy! 

He stared blankly at me. His mouth hung open in a stiff, unpleasant grin. 

But the voice came from Smiley. The rude insults came from Smiley. 

But that’s impossible! I told myself. 

Impossible! 

Ventriloquist’s dummies can’t talk without a ventriloquist. 

“Th-this is crazy!” I stammered out loud. 

And then the dummy started to move. 



12 


I let out a scream. 

Dan popped up from behind the couch. 

The dummy toppled onto its side. 

“You-you-you—!” I sputtered, pointing furiously at my brother. 

My heart was pounding. I felt cold all over. “That’s not funny! You—you 
scared me to death!” I shrieked. 

To my surprise, Dan didn’t laugh. His eyes were narrowed. His mouth hung 
open. “Who was making those jokes?” he demanded. His eyes darted from 
dummy to dummy. 

“Give me a break!” I shot back. “Are you going to tell me it wasn’t you?” 

He scratched his short brown hair. “I didn’t say a word.” 

“Dan, you’re the biggest liar!” I cried. “How long have you been up here? 
What are you doing here? You were spying on me—right?” 

He shook his head and stepped out from behind the couch. “What are you 
doing up here, Trina?” he asked. “Did you come up to get Rocky? To take Rocky 
downstairs again and try to scare Zane?” 

I let out an angry growl and shoved Dan with all my might. 

He stumbled backwards and fell onto the couch. He cried out as he landed 
on top of the new dummy. He and the dummy appeared to wrestle for a moment 
as Dan struggled to climb to his feet. 

I stepped up close to the couch and blocked his way. As he tried to get up, I 
pushed him back down. 

“You know I’m not the one who’s been moving Rocky around,” I shouted. 
“We all know you’ve been doing it, Dan. And you’re going to get the two of us 
in real trouble with Dad.” 

“You’re wrong!” Dan declared angrily. His little mouse face turned bright 
red. “Wrong! Wrong! Wrong!” 

He burst up from the couch. The dummy bounced on the cushion. Its head 
turned. It appeared to grin up at me. 

I turned to my brother. “If you weren’t planning more trouble, what were 
you doing up here?” 

“Waiting,” he replied. 



“Excuse me? Waiting for whom?” I demanded, crossing my arms over my 
chest. 

“Just waiting,” he insisted. “Don’t you get it, Trina?” 

I kicked at a ball of dust on the floor. It stuck to the toe of my sneaker. “Get 
it? Get what?” 

“Don’t you see what’s going on?” Dan demanded. “Haven’t you caught on 

yet?” 

I bent down and pulled the dust ball off my sneaker. Now it stuck to my 
fingers. “What is in your little mouse brain?” I asked. I rolled my eyes. “This 
should be good.” 

My brother stepped up beside me. He lowered his voice to a whisper. “Zane 
is doing it all,” he said. 

I laughed. I wasn’t sure I’d heard him. 

“No. Really.” He grabbed my arm. “I know I’m right, Trina. Zane is doing 
everything. Zane is moving the dummy, bringing it downstairs, then pretending 
to be scared. Zane made it slap him. Zane carried it to the kitchen table both of 
those times.” 

I shoved Dan’s hand off my arm. Then I spread my hand over his forehead 
and pretended to check his temperature. “You are totally losing it,” I told him. 
“Go lie down. I’ll tell Mom you’re running a high fever.” 

“Listen to me!” Dan screeched. “I’m serious! I’m right. I know I’m right!” 

“Why?” I demanded. “Why would Zane do that, Dan? Why would he scare 
himself?” 

“To pay us back for last time,” Dan replied. “Don’t you get it? Zane is 
trying to get us in trouble.” 

I dropped down onto the couch beside Smiley. I thought hard about what 
my brother was saying. “You mean Zane wants Dad to think that you and I are 
using the dummies to scare Zane.” 

“Yes!” Dan cried. “But Zane is doing it all. He’s scaring himself. And 
making it look as if we’re doing it—to get us in big trouble.” 

I fiddled with the dummy’s hand as I thought about it some more. “Zane 
scare himself? I don’t think so,” I replied finally. “What gave you this idea? 
What proof do you have?” 

Dan dropped down on the couch arm. “First of all,” he started, “you didn’t 
carry Rocky downstairs all those times, did you?” 

I shook my head. “No way.” 



“Well, neither did I,” Dan declared. “So who does that leave? Rocky isn’t 
walking around by himself—right?” 

“Of course not. But—” 

“It was the camera that gave it away,” Dan said. “The photos Zane 
developed of Rocky were the biggest clue.” 

I let the dummy hand fall to the couch. “What do you mean?” I asked. I 
really wasn’t following my brother’s thinking at all. 

“That camera is never out of Zane’s sight,” Dan replied. “Most of the time, 
he keeps it around his neck. So who else could have snapped all those photos of 
Rocky?” 

I swallowed hard. “You mean that Zane—?” 

Dan nodded. “Zane was the only one who could have taken those pictures 
of Rocky. He sneaked up to the attic. He snapped them. Then he acted scared 
and angry when he developed them.” 

“But it was all an act?” I asked. 

“For sure,” Dan replied. “It’s all been an act. To scare us. And to get us in 
trouble with Dad. Zane is trying to pay us back for how we scared him last 
time.” 

I still had my doubts. “It isn’t like Zane,” I argued. “He’s so wimpy, so 
quiet and shy. He’s not the kind of boy who plays tricks on people.” 

“He’s had months to plan it!” Dan exclaimed. “Months to plan his revenge. 
We can prove it, Trina. We can hide up here and wait for him. That’s why I was 
up here. Hiding behind the couch.” 

“To catch him in the act?” 

Dan nodded. He whispered even though we were alone. “After everyone 
goes to bed tonight, let’s sneak up here and wait. Wait and see if Zane comes.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “It’s worth a try... I guess.” 

Was Dan right? 

Would we catch Zane in the act? 

I couldn’t wait for everyone to go to sleep. I was dying to find out. 



13 


Gusts of wind rattled the attic windowpanes. Heavy clouds covered the moon. 

We crept up the attic stairs into the darkness. Up a step. Then stop. Up a 
step. Then stop. Trying to be silent. 

The old house moaned and groaned beneath us. 

The attic stretched blacker than the stairway. 

I reached for the light switch. But Dan slapped my hand away. “Are you 
crazy?” he whispered. “It has to be dark. Totally dark. Or else Zane will know 
that someone is up here.” 

“I know that,” I whispered sleepily. “I just wanted to take one look at the 
dummies. You know. Make sure they’re all here.” 

“They’re all here,” Dan replied impatiently. “Just keep moving. We’ll hide 
behind the couch.” 

We crept on tiptoe over the attic floorboards. I couldn’t see a thing. The 
heavy clouds kept any light from washing in through the windows. 

Finally, my eyes adjusted to the darkness. I could see the arms of the couch. 
I saw dummy heads. Dummy shoulders. Shadows against shadows. 

“Dan—where are you?” I whispered. 

“Back here. Hurry.” His whisper came from behind the couch. 

I could feel the dummy eyes on me as I made my way around the couch. I 
thought I heard a soft snicker. The evil laughter again. 

But that had to be my imagination. 

I trailed my hand over the couch arm. Felt a wooden dummy hand resting 
on the arm. The dummy hand felt surprisingly warm. 

Humanly warm. 

Don’t start imagining things, Trina, I scolded myself. 

That dummy hand is warm because it’s hot up in this attic. 

The wind rattled the glass. Strong gusts roared against the roof, so low over 
our heads. 

I heard a loud groan. A soft chuckle. A strange whistling sound. 

Ignoring all the attic noises, I ducked down on the floor beside my brother. 
“Well? Here we are,” I whispered. “Now what?” 



“Sssshhhh.” In the darkness, I could see him raise a finger to his lips. “Now 
we wait. And listen.” 

We both turned and rested our backs against the back of the couch. I raised 
my knees and wrapped my arms around them. 

“He isn’t coming,” I whispered. “This is a waste of time.” 

“Ssshhh. Just wait, Trina,” Dan scolded. “Give him time.” 

I yawned. I felt so sleepy. The heat of the attic was making me even 
sleepier. 

I shut my eyes and thought about Zane. 

At dinner, he couldn’t wait to pass around the photographs of Rocky. “I 
don’t know who took these shots,” Zane complained to my dad. “But they 
wasted half a roll of film.” 

Dad glared angrily at Dan and me. But he didn’t make a fuss. “Can we talk 
about it after dinner?” he suggested quietly. 

“I’m kind of scared,” Zane told Dad in a trembling voice. “So many weird 
things have been happening. It’s like the dummies have lives of their own.” He 
shook his head. “Wow. I hope I don’t have nightmares tonight.” 

“Let’s not talk about the dummies now,” Mom chimed in. “Zane, tell us 
about your school. Who is your teacher this year? What are you studying?” 

“Could I have a second helping of potatoes?” Uncle Cal interrupted. He 
reached for the bowl. “They’re so good. I may have to make a pig of myself.” 

Dad took another quick glance at the close-up snapshots of Rocky. He 
flashed Dan and me another angry scowl. Then he set the photos down on the 
floor. 

After dinner, Dan and I were careful to keep as far away from Dad as we 
could. No way we wanted to hear another lecture about how we were terrifying 
our poor cousin. And how we’d be punished if we didn’t stop it at once. 

Now it was a little before midnight. And we were huddled in the dark attic. 
Listening to the swirling wind and the moans and groans of the house. Backs 
pressed against the couch. Waiting... 

I kept my eyes closed. Thinking hard. Thinking about Zane. About Rocky. 

Dan and I aren’t alone up here, I thought drowsily. There are thirteen 
wooden dummies up here with us. Thirteen pairs of eyes staring into the heavy 
darkness. Thirteen frozen grins. Except for Rocky’s sneer, of course. 

Empty, lifeless bodies... 

Heavy, wooden heads and hands... 



Thinking about the dummies, the dummies all around, I guess I drifted off 
to sleep. 

Did I dream about the dummies? 

Maybe I did. 

I don’t know how long I slept. 

I was awakened by footsteps. Soft, shuffling footsteps across the attic floor. 
And I knew the dummies had come alive. 



14 


I jerked my head up, listening hard. 

My hands were still wrapped around my knees. Both hands had fallen 
asleep. They tingled. The back of my neck ached. My mouth felt dry and sour. 

I uttered a silent gasp as I heard the shuffling, scraping footsteps move 
closer. 

Not dummies walking around, I realized. 

A single figure. One. One person. Moving slowly, carefully toward the 
couch. 

Why did I think I heard dummies moving? It must have been a picture left 
over from my dream. 

I shook my hands, trying to make them stop tingling. 

I was wide awake now. Totally alert. 

The footsteps scraped closer. 

Could it be Dan? Where was Dan? 

Had he climbed up while I slept? Was he making his way back to the 
couch? 

No. 

Squinting into the darkness, I saw Dan beside me. 

He had climbed to his knees. He saw me move. He waved his hand and 
signaled for me to be silent. 

Dan gripped the back of the couch with both hands. Then he leaned forward 
and peered out into the room. 

I crawled to the other end of the couch. Then, keeping low, I poked my 
head out and squinted into the deep shadows. All grays and blacks. 

The wind howled around the house. Across the big attic room, the 
windowpanes rattled and shook. 

I wanted to jump out. To scream and jump out. And flash on the light. 

But I felt Dan’s hand on my arm. He must have read my thoughts. He raised 
a finger to his lips. 

We both waited. Frozen there behind the couch. Crouching low. Listening 
to each footstep. Each creak of the floorboards. 



The dark figure stopped in front of the folding chair next to the couch. He 
stood inches from Dan and me. If I wanted to, I could reach out and grab his leg. 

I struggled to see his face. But it was hidden by the couch. And I didn’t dare 
raise myself up higher. 

I heard the clonk of wood against wood. Two dummy hands hitting each 
other. 

I heard the rustle of heavy cloth. The thud of leather shoes bumping each 
other. 

The intruder had picked up a dummy off the chair. 

Squinting into the deep blackness, I could see him swing the dummy over 
his shoulder. I could see the dummy arms swaying, swaying at his back. 

The dark figure turned away quickly. And began walking to the attic stairs. 

I crept out from behind the couch. Moving on tiptoe, I began to follow the 
intruder. 

Pressed against the wall, tiptoeing as silently as I could, I moved across the 
room. I held my breath. I could hear Dan close behind me. 

I reached the light switch just as the intruder made it to the stairs. 

My hand fumbled against the wall as I reached. 

Reached... reached for the light switch with a trembling hand. 

Yes! 

I flicked on the light. And Dan and I both shrieked at the same time. 



15 


“Zane!” 

My brother and I both screamed his name. 

Zane’s eyes bulged. His mouth opened in a high, frightened wail. 

I saw his knees bend. I think he nearly crumpled to the floor. 

He uttered several squeaks. Then his mouth hung open. I could see he was 
gasping for breath. 

“Zane—we caught you!” I managed to choke out. 

He had Rocky draped over his shoulder. 

“What—what—?” Zane struggled to speak, but no words came out. He 
sputtered and started to choke. The sneering dummy bounced on his shoulder. 

“Zane—we figured it out,” Dan told him. “Your little tricks aren’t going to 
work.” 

Our cousin was still sputtering and coughing. 

“We know it’s been you all along,” Dan told him. 

He stepped over and slapped Zane hard on the back a few times. 

After a few seconds, Zane stopped sputtering. 

Dan picked Rocky up off Zane’s shoulder and started to carry him back to 
his chair. 

“How-how-how did you know?” Zane stammered. 

“We just figured it out,” I told him. “What’s the big idea, anyway?” 

Zane shrugged. He lowered his eyes to the floor. “You know. Just having 
some fun.” 

I glared at him. “Some fun?” I cried angrily. “You tried to get us in huge 
trouble. You—you could have ruined our whole summer!” 

Zane shrugged again. “It was kind of my turn. You know?” 

“Well, we’re even now,” Dan chimed in. 

“Right,” I agreed quickly. “We’re all even now—right, Zane?” 

He nodded. “Yeah. I guess.” A grin spread slowly over his face. “I had you 
guys going, didn’t I? With that stupid dummy popping up everywhere you 
looked.” 

Dan and I didn’t grin back. 



“You fooled us,” I murmured. 

“You fooled everyone,” my brother added. 

Zane grinned. A gleeful grin. I could see how pleased he was with himself. 
“I guess Dan and I deserved it,” I confessed. 

“Guess you did,” Zane shot back. Would he ever stop grinning? 

“So now that we’re even, do we have a truce?” I demanded. “No more 
joking around with the dummies? No more trying to scare each other or get 
anyone in trouble?” 

Zane bit his lower lip. He thought about it a long, long time. “Okay. Truce,” 
he said finally. 

We all shook hands solemnly. Then we slapped each other high fives. Then 
the three of us started laughing. I’m not sure why. The laughter just burst out of 
us. 

Crazy giggling. 

I guess because it was so late and we were so sleepy. And we were so glad 
we could be friends now. We didn’t have to play tricks on each other anymore. 

As we made our way down the stairs, I felt really happy. 

I thought all the scary stuff with the dummies was over. 

I had no way of knowing that it was just beginning. 



16 


The next morning, Dan, Zane, and I went for a long bike ride. The strong winds 
had faded away during the night. A soft breeze, warm and fresh-smelling, 
followed us as we pedaled along the path. 

The trees were still winter bare. The ground glistened with a silvery 
morning frost. But the sweet, warm air told me that spring was on its way. 

We hiked slowly, following a dirt path that curved into the woods. The sun, 
still low in the sky, warmed our faces. I stopped to unzip my jacket. And pointed 
to a patch of green daffodil leaves just beginning to poke up from the ground. 

“Only three more months of school!” Dan cried. He raised both fists in the 
air and let out a cheer. 

“We’re going to camp this summer for the first time,” I told Zane. “Up in 
Massachusetts.” 

“For eight weeks!” Dan added happily. 

Zane brushed back his blond hair. He leaned over the handlebars of my 
dad’s bike and began pedaling harder. “I don’t know what I’m doing this 
summer,” he said. “Probably just hanging out.” 

“What do you want to do this summer?” I asked him. 

He grinned at me. “Just hang out.” 

We all laughed. I was in a great mood and so were the guys. 

Dan kept pulling wheelies, leaning way back and raising his front tire off 
the ground. Zane tried to do it—and crashed into a tree. 

He went sailing to the ground, and the bike fell on top of him. I expected 
him to whine and complain. That’s his usual style. But he picked himself up, 
muttering, “Smooth move, Zane.” 

“I want to see that one again!” Dan joked. 

Zane laughed. “You try it!” 

He brushed the dirt off his jeans and climbed back onto the bike. We 
pedaled on down the path, joking and laughing. 

I think we were in such great moods because of the truce. We could finally 
relax and not worry about who was trying to terrify who. 

The dirt path ended at a small, round pond. The pond gleamed in the 
sunlight, still half-frozen from the long winter. 



Zane climbed off his bike and rested it on the tall grass. Then he stepped up 
to the edge of the pond to take photos. 

“Look at the weeds poking up from the melting ice!” he exclaimed, clicking 
away. “Awesome. Awesome!” He knelt down low and snapped a bunch of weed 
photos. 

Dan and I exchanged glances. I couldn’t see what was so special about the 
weeds. But I guess that’s why I’m not a photographer. 

As Zane stood up, a tiny brown-and-black chipmunk scampered along the 
edge of the pond. Zane swung his camera and clicked off a couple of shots. 

“Hey! I think I got him!” he declared happily. 

“Great!” I cried. Everything seemed great this morning. 

We hung out at the pond for a while. We took a short walk through the 
woods. Then we started to get hungry for lunch. So we rode back to the house. 

We were about to return the bikes to the garage when Zane spotted the old 
well at the back of our yard. “Cool!” he cried, his blue eyes lighting up. “Let’s 
check it out!” 

Holding his camera in one hand, he hopped off his bike and went running 
across the grass to the well. 

It’s a round, stone well with green moss covering the smooth gray stones. It 
used to have a pointed red roof over it. But the roof blew off during a bad storm, 
and Dad hauled it away. 

When we were little, Dan and I used to scare each other by pretending that 
monsters and trolls lived down inside it. But we hadn’t paid much attention to 
the old well in years. Dad kept saying he was going to tear it down and cover it 
up. But he never got around to it. 

Zane clicked a bunch of photos. “Is there still water down there?” he asked. 

I shrugged. “I don’t know.” 

Dan grabbed Zane around the waist. “We could toss you down and see if 
you make a splash!” he declared. 

Zane wrestled himself out of my brother’s grasp. “I’ve got a better idea.” 
He picked up a stone and dropped it down the well. 

After a long wait, we heard a splash far down below. 

“Cool!” Zane exclaimed. He took several more pictures until he had 
finished the roll. 

Then we made our way inside the house for lunch. We hurried upstairs to 
clean up. 



Zane stopped at the doorway to his room. 

I saw his eyes bulge and his mouth drop open. I saw his face go white. 
Dan and I ran up next to him. 

We stared into the bedroom—and cried out in horror. 



17 


“The r-room—it’s been trashed /” Dan stammered. 

The three of us huddled in the doorway, staring into the bedroom. Staring at 
an unbelievable mess. 

At first I thought maybe Zane had left the windows open all night, and the 
strong winds had blown everything around. 

But that didn’t make any sense. 

All of the clothes had been pulled out of the closet and tossed over the floor. 
The dresser drawers had all been pulled out and dumped over the carpet. 

The bookshelves had been emptied. Books littered the floor, the bed—they 
were tossed everywhere. One bed table was turned on its side. The other stood 
upside down on top of the bed. A lamp lay on the floor in front of the closet. Its 
shade was ripped and broken. 

“Look—!” Zane pointed into the center of the room. 

Sitting on a tangled hill of clothes was Rocky. The dummy sat straight up, 
his legs crossed casually in front of him. He sneered at us as if daring us to enter. 

“I-I really don’t believe this!” I cried, tugging at the sides of my hair. 

“What don’t you believe?” 

Mom’s voice made me jump. 

I turned to see her coming out of her bedroom. She tucked her blue sweater 
into her jeans as she walked toward us. 

“Mom—!” I cried. “Something terrible has happened!” 

Her smile faded. “What on earth—?” she started. 

I stepped aside so she could see into Zane’s room. 

“Oh, no!” Mom cried out and raised both hands to her cheeks. She 
swallowed hard. “Did someone break in?” Her voice sounded tiny and 
frightened. 

I peered quickly into my room across the hall. “No. I don’t think so,” I 
reported. “This is the only room that’s messed up.” 

“But—but—” Mom sputtered. Then her eyes stopped on Rocky on top of 
the pile of clothes. “What is he doing down here?” Mom demanded. 

“We don’t know,” I told her. 

“But who did this?” Mom cried, still pressing her hands against her cheeks. 



“We didn’t!” Dan declared. 

“We’ve been outside all morning,” Zane added breathlessly. “It wasn’t 
Trina, or Dan, or me. We weren’t home. We were riding bikes.” 

“But—someone had to do this!” Mom declared. “Someone deliberately tore 
this room apart.” 

But who was it? I wondered. My eyes darted around the mess, landing on 
the sneering dummy. 

Who was it? 



18 


We all pitched in and helped get the room back together. It took the rest of the 
afternoon. 

The lamp in front of the closet was broken. Everything else just had to be 
picked up and put back where it belonged. 

We worked in silence. None of us knew what to say. 

At first, Mom wanted to call the police. But there was no sign that someone 
had broken into the house. All the other rooms were perfectly okay. 

Dad returned home from the camera shop while we were still cleaning up. 
He, of course, was furious. “What do I have to do? Bolt the attic door?” he 
shouted at Dan and me. 

He grabbed up Rocky and slung the dummy over his shoulder. “This isn’t a 
joke anymore,” Dad said, narrowing his eyes at both of us. “This isn’t funny. 
This is serious.” 

“But we didn’t do it!” I protested for the hundredth time. 

“Well, the dummy didn’t do it,” Dad shot back. “That’s one thing I know 
for sure.” 

I don’t know anything for sure, I thought. I stared at Rocky’s sneering face 
as Dad started down the hall to the attic stairs. Then I bent down to pick up the 
broken lamp from the floor. 

That night I dreamed once again about ventriloquist’s dummies. 

I saw them dancing. A dozen of them. All of Dad’s dummies from upstairs. 

I saw them dancing in Zane’s room. Dancing over the tangled piles of 
clothes and books. Dancing over the bed. Over the toppled bed table. 

I saw Rocky dancing with Miss Lucy. I saw Wilbur doing a frantic, crazy 
dance on top of the dresser. And I saw Smiley, the new dummy, clapping his 
wooden hands, bobbing his head, grinning, grinning from the middle of the room 
as the other dummies danced around him. 

They waved their big hands over their heads. Their skinny legs twisted and 

bent. 

They danced in silence. No music. No sound at all. 

And as their bodies twisted and swayed, their faces remained frozen. They 



grinned at one another with blank, unblinking eyes. Grinned their frightening, 
red-lipped grins. 

Bobbed and bent, tilted and swayed, grinning, grinning, grinning the whole 
time in the eerie silence. 

And then the grins faded as I pulled myself out of the dream. 

I opened my eyes. Slowly woke up. 

Felt the heavy hands on my neck. 

Stared up into Rocky’s ugly face. 

Rocky on top of me. The dummy on top of my blanket. Over me. 

Reaching. Reaching his heavy wooden hands for my throat! 



19 


I opened my mouth in a shrill scream of horror. 

My hands shot out. I grabbed the dummy’s hands. 

I thrashed my legs. Kicked off the blanket. Kicked at the dummy. 

The big eyes stared at me as if startled. 

I grabbed his head. Shoved him down. 

I sat up, my entire body trembling. Then I grabbed the dummy’s waist. 

And flung him to the floor. 

The ceiling light flashed on. Mom and Dad burst into my room together. 

“What’s happening?” 

“Trina—what’s wrong?” 

They both stopped short when they saw the dummy sprawled on the floor 
beside my bed. 

“He—he—” I gasped, pointing down at Rocky. I struggled to catch my 
breath. “Rocky—he jumped on me. He tried to choke me. I-I woke up and—” 

Dad let out a loud growl and tore at his hair. “This has got to stop!” he 
bellowed. 

Mom dropped down beside me on the bed and wrapped me in a hug. I 
couldn’t stop my shoulders from trembling. 

“It was so scary!” I choked out. “I woke up—and there he was!” 

“This is out of control!” Dad screamed, shaking his fist in the air. “Out of 
control!” 

Mom calmed me down. Then she and I both had to calm Dad down. 

Finally, after everyone was calm, they turned out the light and made their 
way out of the room. They closed the door. I heard Dad carrying Rocky back up 
to the attic. 

Maybe Dad should get a lock for the attic door, I thought. 

I shut my eyes and tried not to think about Rocky, or Zane, or the dummies 
—or anything at all. 

After a while, I must have drifted back to sleep. 

I don’t know how much time passed. 

I was awakened by a knock on the door. Two sharp knocks and then two 



more. 

I sat straight up with a gasp. 

I knew that Rocky had come back. 



20 


The bedroom door creaked open slowly. 

I took a deep breath and held it, staring through the dark. 

“Trina—?” a voice whispered. “Trina—are you awake?” 

As the door opened, a rectangle of gray light spilled into the room from the 
hallway. Dan poked his head in, then took a few steps across the floor. 

“Trina? It’s me.” 

I let out my breath in a long whoosh. “Dan—what do you want?” My voice 
was hoarse from sleep. 

“I heard everything,” Dan said, stepping up beside the bed. He pulled down 
one pajama sleeve. Then he raised his eyes to me. “Zane put Rocky on your bed. 
Zane did it!” Dan whispered. 

“Huh? Why do you say that? We all have a truce—remember? Zane agreed 
the tricks were all over.” 

“Right,” Dan whispered. “And now Zane thinks he can really scare us. 
Because we don’t suspect him any longer. Zane hasn’t given up, Trina. I’m sure 
of it.” 

I bit my lower lip. I tried to think about what Dan was saying. But I was so 
sleepy! 

Dan leaned close and whispered excitedly. “This morning before we went 
biking, Zane went up to his room—remember? He said he forgot his camera. 
So... he had time to mess up his room. Before he left the house.” 

“Yeah. Maybe,” I murmured. 

“And tonight he brought Rocky down and set him up on your bed. I’m sure 
of it,” Dan insisted. “I’m sure it’s Zane. We have to hide up in the attic again. 
Tomorrow night. We’ll catch Zane again. I know we will.” 

“Hide up there again? No way!” I cried. “It’s hot up there. And too creepy. 
And I’m staying as far away from those dummies as I can.” 

My brother sighed. “I know I’m right,” he whispered. 

“I don’t know what I know,” I replied. “I don’t know anything about 
anything.” I slid under the covers, pulled the blanket over my head, and tried to 
get back to sleep. 



The next night, Mom and Dad had a dinner party in honor of Zane and Uncle 
Cal. They invited the Birches and the Canfields from down the street, and 
Cousin Robin and her husband Fred. 

Fred is a great guy. Everyone calls him Froggy because he can puff out his 
cheeks like a frog. Froggy is short and very round and really looks like a frog. 

He always makes me laugh. He knows a million great jokes. Robin is 
always trying to get him to shut up. But he never does. 

Mom and Dad don’t have many dinner parties. So they had to work all day 
to get the dining room ready. To set the table. And to cook the dinner. 

Mom made a leg of lamb. Dad cooked up his specialty—Caribbean-style 
scalloped potatoes. Very spicy. 

Mom bought flowers for the table. She and Dad brought out all the fancy 
plates and glasses that we usually see only on holidays. 

The dining room really looked awesome as we all sat down to dinner. Dan, 
Zane, and I were down at the far end of the table. Froggy sat at our end. I guess, 
because he’s just a big kid. 

Froggy told me a moron joke. Someone asks a moron: “Can you stand on 
your head?” And the moron says, “No, I can’t. It’s up too high.” 

I started to laugh when I saw Zane jump up from the table. “Where are you 
going?” I called after him. 

Zane turned back at the dining room doorway. “To get my camera,” he 
replied. “I want to take some pictures of the table before it gets all messed up.” 

He disappeared upstairs. 

A few seconds later, we all heard him scream. 

Chairs scraped the floor as everyone jumped up. We all went running up the 
stairs. 

I reached Zane’s room first. From the doorway, I saw him standing in the 
center of the room. 

I saw the sick look on Zane’s face. 

And then I saw the camera in his hand. 

Or what was left of the camera. 

It looked as if it had been run over by a truck. The film door had been 
twisted off and lay on the floor. The lens was smashed. The whole camera body 
was bent and broken. 

Zane turned the camera over in his hands, gazing down at it sadly, shaking 



his head. 

I raised my eyes to the bed. And saw Rocky sitting on the bedspread. A roll 
of gray film unspooled across his lap. 

Dad burst into the room. All of our other guests pushed in after him. 

“What happened?” someone asked. 

“Is that Zane’s camera?” 

“What’s going on?” 

“That’s what happens when you try to take my picture!” Froggy joked. 

No one laughed. It wasn’t funny. 

Dad’s face turned dark red as he took the camera from Zane’s hand. Dad 
examined it carefully. His expression remained grim. 

“This isn’t mischief anymore,” he murmured. I could barely hear him over 
all the other voices in the room. Everyone had begun talking at once. 

“This cannot be allowed,” Dad said solemnly. He raised his eyes to Dan, 
then me. He stared at us both for the longest time without saying anything. 

Zane let out a long sigh. I turned and saw that he was about to cry. 

“Zane—” I started. 

But he uttered an angry shout. Then he pushed past Froggy and Mr. and 
Mrs. Birch. And went running from the room. 

“Someone here has done a very sick thing,” Dad said sadly. He raised the 
camera to his face, running a finger over the broken lens. “This is a very 
expensive camera. It was Zane’s most prized possession.” 

All of our guests became very quiet. 

Dad kept his eyes on Dan and me. He started to say something else. 

But then we all heard the deafening crash from downstairs. 



21 


“What is going on here?” Dad cried. He tossed the broken camera onto the bed 
and darted from the room. 

The others went hurrying after him. All talking at once. I heard their shoes 
pounding down the stairs. 

I turned to Dan. “Still think Zane is doing these things?” 

Dan shrugged. “Maybe.” 

“No way,” I told him. “No way Zane is going to smash his own camera. He 
loved his camera. No way he would smash it just to get you and me in trouble.” 

Dan raised troubled eyes to me. “Then I don’t get it,” he said in a tiny 
voice. I could see the fear on his face. 

I heard startled shouts and cries of alarm from downstairs. “Let’s check out 
the next disaster,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

We reached the bedroom door at the same time and squeezed through 
together. Then I led the way along the hall and down the stairs. 

I fought back my own fear as we approached the dining room. 

Something very strange was going on in this house, I knew. Dad was right 
when he said it was no joke. 

Tearing Zane’s room apart wasn’t a joke. It was evil. 

Wrecking Zane’s camera was evil, too. 

Thinking about Rocky gave me a chill. The dummy was always there. 
Whenever something evil happened, there sat Rocky. 

Trina, don’t be crazy! I scolded myself. Don’t start thinking that a wooden 
ventriloquist’s dummy can be evil. 

That’s crazy thinking. That’s really messed up. 

But what could I think? 

My throat tightened. My mouth suddenly felt very dry. 

I took a deep breath and led the way into the dining room. 

I saw Dad in the kitchen doorway. He had his arm around Mom’s shoulders. 
Mom had her head buried against Dad’s shirtsleeve. 

Was she crying? 

Yes. 



The guests all stood against the wall, shaking their heads, their expressions 
grim and confused. They muttered quietly, staring at the disaster. 

The disaster. The terrible disaster. 

The dining room table. 

I saw the overturned platters first. Dad’s scalloped potatoes smeared over 
the tablecloth. Clumps of potatoes stuck to the wall and the front of the china 
hutch. 

The salad poured over the floor and the chairs. The bread ripped into small 
chunks, the chunks tossed over the table. The flowers ripped off their stems. The 
vase on its side, water pouring over the tablecloth, puddling on the floor. 

The glasses all turned over. A bottle of red wine tipped over, a dark red 
stain spreading over the tablecloth. 

I heard Mom’s sobs. I heard the sounds of Dad’s muttered attempts to calm 
her down. I saw the other guests shaking their heads, their faces so upset, so 
concerned, so puzzled. 

And then Dan grabbed my shoulder and pointed me toward the head of the 
table. And I saw two dummies sitting there on dining room chairs. 

Wilbur and the new dummy. Wilbur and Smiley. 

They sat at the table, grinning at each other, wine glasses in their hands. As 
if celebrating. As if toasting each other. 



22 


That night, Dan and I hid behind the couch in the attic once again. The attic 
stretched dark and silent. So dark, I could barely see my brother sitting beside 
me. 

We were both in pajamas. The air was hot and dry. But my hands and my 
bare feet felt cold and clammy. 

We talked softly, our legs stretched out on the floor, resting against the back 
of the couch. As we talked, we waited—and listened. Listened to every sound. 

It was nearly midnight, but I didn’t feel sleepy. I felt alert. Ready for 
anything. 

Ready to catch Zane in the act once again. 

This time, I brought my little flash camera with me. When Zane crept up 
here to carry one of the dummies downstairs, I’d snap his photo. Then I’d have 
proof to show Mom and Dad. 

Yes, I finally decided that Dan was right. Zane had to be the one who was 
destroying our house. 

Destroying our house and trying to scare everyone into thinking the 
dummies had come to life. 

“But why?” I whispered to Dan. “Did we scare Zane so badly the last time 
he was here? So badly that he’ll do anything to pay us back?” 

“He’s sick,” Dan muttered. “That’s the only answer. He’s totally messed 

up.” 

“So messed up that he wrecked his own camera,” I murmured, shaking my 
head. 

“So messed up that he ran downstairs and trashed the dining room,” Dan 
added. 

The dining room. That’s what convinced me that Zane was guilty. 

All of us were upstairs in Zane’s room, examining his broken camera. 

Zane was the only other person downstairs. 

Zane was the only person in the house who could have trashed the dining 
room and wrecked the dinner. 

Of course he acted horrified and shocked. Of course he acted as if he didn’t 
have a clue about what had happened. 



What a sad, sad night. 

The dinner guests didn’t know what to say to Mom and Dad. It was such a 
frightening mystery. No one had an answer. 

The guests helped clean up the mess. The food was ruined. It couldn’t be 
eaten. No one felt like eating, anyway. 

Everyone left as soon as the dining room was cleaned and cleared. 

As the last guest left, I turned to Dan. “Uh-oh,” I whispered. “Family 
Conference Time. We’re in for a major lecture now.” 

But I was wrong. Mom hurried up to her room. And Dad said he was too 
disgusted to talk to anyone. 

Uncle Cal asked if Dad would like him to take the car and pick up some 
fried chicken or hamburgers or something. 

Dad just scowled at him and stomped away. He carried Smiley and Wilbur 
up to the attic. I heard him slam the attic door. Then he disappeared into the 
bedroom to help comfort Mom. 

Zane turned to his dad. “I-I can’t believe my good camera is smashed,” he 
whimpered. 

Uncle Cal placed a hand on Zane’s shoulder. “I’ll bet your uncle Danny has 
a new camera at his shop that he’ll want to give you.” 

“But I liked my old camera!” Zane wailed. 

And that’s when I decided he was guilty. He’s a phony, I decided. He’s 
carrying on like this—putting on a show for Dan and me. 

But I wasn’t going to fall for it. No way. 

I made sure I had film in my little camera. Then I grabbed Dan and we 
crept up to the attic to wait. To wait in the darkness and catch Zane. 

To end the disasters in our house once and for all. 

We didn’t have to wait long. 

After about half an hour, I heard the tap of soft footsteps on the attic floor. 

I sucked in my breath. My whole body tensed, and I nearly dropped the 
camera. 

Beside me, Dan raised himself to his knees. 

My heart pounding, I crept to the edge of the couch. 

Tap tap. Shuffling footsteps on the bare floorboards. 

I saw a dark figure bend down and lift a dummy off a chair. 

“It’s Zane,” I whispered to Dan. “I knew it!” 

In the heavy darkness, I could see him carrying the dummy to the stairs. 



I stood up. My legs trembled. But I moved quickly. 

I raised the camera. Stepped in front of the couch. 

Pushed the shutter button. 

The room flashed in an explosion of white light. 

I clicked off another one. 

Another bright white flash. 

And in the flash, I saw Rocky dangling over Zane’s shoulder. 

No. 

Not Zane! 

Not Zane. Not Zane. 

In the flash of light, I saw Rocky dangling over another dummy’s shoulder! 
Smiley! The new dummy. 

The new dummy was shuffling toward the stairs, carrying Rocky away. 



23 


The dummy turned. 

My hand fumbled for the light switch. I clicked on the light. 

I stood frozen in front of the couch. Too startled to move. 

“Smiley—stop!” I screamed. 

The dummy’s grin faded. The eyes narrowed at me. “I’m not Smiley,” he 
croaked. He had a hoarse, raspy voice. “My name is Slappy.” 

He turned back to the stairs. 

“Stop him!” I cried to my brother. 

We both made a dive for the dummy. 

Slappy spun around. He pulled Rocky off his shoulder—and heaved him at 

Dan. 

I grabbed Slappy around the waist and tackled him to the floor. 

He swung both hands hard. One of them slammed into my forehead. 

“Unh.” I let out a groan as the pain shot through me. 

My hands slid off the dummy’s slender waist. Slappy jumped nimbly to his 
feet, his grin wide and leering. 

He was enjoying this! 

He kicked me in the side with the toe of his big leather shoe. 

My head still throbbing, I rolled out of the way. And turned back in time to 
see Dan grab the dummy from behind. 

Dan drove his head into the dummy’s back. They both dropped hard to the 
floor. 

“Let go of me, slave!” Slappy demanded in his ugly, hoarse voice. “You are 
my slave now! Let go of me! I order you!” 

I pulled myself to my knees as Dan and Slappy wrestled over the floor. 

“He’s so... strong!” Dan called out to me. 

Slappy rolled on top of him. Started to pound him with his wooden fists. 

I grabbed Slappy by the shoulders and tugged with all my strength. Slappy 
swung his arms, thrashing at my brother. 

I pulled hard, trying to tug him off Dan’s stomach. 

“Let go! Let go!” the dummy shrieked. “Let go, slave!” 



“Get off him!” I cried. 

We were making such a racket, I didn’t hear the attic door open downstairs. 
And I didn’t hear the footsteps running up the stairs. 

A face appeared. And then a large body. 

“Dad!” I cried breathlessly. “Dad—look!” 

“What on earth—!” Dad exclaimed. 

“Dad—it’s alive! The dummy is alive!” I shrieked. 

“Huh?” Squinting through his glasses, Dad lowered his gaze to the dummy 
on the floor. 

The dummy sprawled lifelessly on its back beside Dan. One arm was 
twisted beneath its back. Both legs were bent in two. 

The mouth hung open in its painted grin. The eyes stared blankly at the 
ceiling. 

“It is alive!” Dan insisted. “It really is!” 

Dad stared down at the still, silent dummy. 

“The dummy picked up Rocky!” Dan declared in a high, excited voice. “He 
said his name was Slappy. He picked up Rocky. He was carrying him 
downstairs.” 

Dad tsk-tsked and shook his head. “Give it up, Dan,” he murmured angrily. 
“Just stop it right now.” He raised his eyes to Dan, then to me. “I knew you two 
were the troublemakers.” 

“But, Dad—” I protested. 

“I’m not an idiot,” Dad snapped, scowling at me. “You can’t expect me to 
believe a dumb story about a dummy coming to life and carrying another 
dummy around. Have you both lost your minds entirely?” 

“It’s true,” Dan insisted. 

We both gazed down at Slappy. He sure didn’t look alive. For a moment, I 
had the frightening feeling that I’d dreamed the whole scene. 

But then I remembered something. “I have proof!” I cried. “Dad, I can 
prove to you that Dan and I aren’t lying.” 

Dad rubbed the back of his neck. “I’m so tired,” he moaned. “It’s been such 
a long, horrible day. Please. Give me a break, Trina.” 

“But I took some pictures!” I told him. “I have pictures of Slappy carrying 
Rocky!” 

“Trina, I’m warning you—” Dad started. 

But I spun away, searching for my camera. Where was it? Where? 



It took me a few seconds to spot it on the floor against the wall back by the 
couch. I hurried across the room to grab it. 

And stopped halfway. 

The back of the camera—it had sprung open. The film was exposed. The 
pictures were ruined. 

The camera must have flown out of my hand when I tried to tackle Slappy, I 
realized. I picked it up and examined it sadly. 

No pictures. No proof. 

I turned back to find Dad scowling at me. “No more wasting my time, 
Trina. You two are grounded until further notice. I’m so disgusted with both of 
you. Your mother and I will think of other punishments after your cousin 
leaves.” 

Then Dad waved a hand at Slappy and Rocky. “Put them away. Right now. 
And stay out of the attic. Stay away from my dummies. That’s all I have to say 
to you. Good night.” 

Dad turned away sharply and stomped down the stairs. 

I glanced at Dan and shrugged. I didn’t know what to say. 

My heart was pounding. I was so angry. So upset. So hurt. My chest felt 
about to explode. 

I bent down to pick up Slappy. 

The dummy winked at me. 

His ugly grin grew wider. And then he puckered his red lips and made 
disgusting, wet kissing sounds. 



24 


“Don’t touch me, slave,” Slappy growled. 

I gasped and jumped back. I still couldn’t believe this was happening. I 
wrapped my arms around myself to stop my body from trembling. 

“You—you really are alive?” Dan asked softly. 

“You bet your soft head lam!” the dummy roared. 

“What do you want?” I cried. “Why are you doing this to us? Why are you 
getting us in all this trouble?” 

The ugly grin spread over his face. “If you treat me nice, slaves, maybe I 
won’t get you in any more trouble. Maybe you’ll get lucky.” He tapped his head 
and added, “Knock on wood.” 

“We’re not your slaves!” I insisted. 

He tossed back his head and let out a dry laugh. “Who’s the dummy here?” 
he cried. “You or me?” 

“You carried Rocky downstairs all those times?” Dan asked. I could see that 
my brother was having a hard time believing this, too. 

“You don’t think that bag of kindling can move on his own, do you?” 
Slappy sneered. “I had some fun with that ugly guy. I put him at the scene of the 
crimes to throw you off the track. To keep you slaves guessing.” 

“And you smashed Zane’s camera and ruined the dinner party?” I 
demanded. 

He narrowed his eyes to evil slits. “I’ll do much worse if you slaves don’t 
obey me.” 

I could feel the anger rising through my body. “You—you’re going to ruin 
everything!” I screamed at him. “You’re going to ruin our lives! You’re going to 
keep us from going to camp this summer!” 

Slappy snickered. “You won’t be going to camp. You’ll be staying home to 
take good care of me!” 

And then I exploded. 

“Nooooo!” I uttered a long wail of protest. 

I grabbed his head in both hands. I started to tug. 

I remembered his head had been split in two when Dad found him. I 
planned to pull his head apart—to split it in two again! 



He kicked his legs frantically and thrashed his arms. 

His heavy shoes kicked at my legs. 

But I held on tight. Pulling. Pulling. Struggling to pull his head apart. 

“Let me try! Let me try!” Dan called. 

I let out a sigh and dropped the dummy to the floor. “It’s no use,” I told 
Dan. “Dad did too good a job. It’s glued tight.” 

Slappy scrambled to his feet. He shook his head. “Thanks for the head 
massage, slave! Now rub my back!” He laughed, an ugly dry laugh that sounded 
more like a cough. 

Dan stared at the dummy in wide-eyed horror. “Trina—what are we going 
to do?” he cried, his voice just above a whisper. 

“How about a game of Kick the Dummy Down the Stairs?” Slappy 
suggested, leering at us. “We’ll take turns being the dummy. You can go first!” 

“We—we have to do something!” Dan stammered. “He’s a monster! He’s 
evil! We have to get rid of him!” 

But how? I wondered. 

How? 

And then I had an idea. 



25 


Slappy must have read my thoughts. He turned and started to run. 

But I dove fast—and wrapped my hands around his skinny legs. 

He let out a harsh, angry cry as I began twisting his legs around each other, 
struggling to tie them in a knot. 

He swung an arm. The wooden hand caught me on the ear. 

But I held on. 

“Dan—grab his arms! Hurry!” 

My brother moved quickly. Slappy tried to bat him away. But Dan ducked 
low. And when he came up, he grabbed Slappy’s wrists and held on. 

“Let me go, slaves!” the dummy rasped. “Let me go now. You’ll be sorry! 
You’ll pay!” 

I saw the fear on Dan’s face. 

Slappy swung a hand free. He tried to swipe at Dan’s throat. 

But Dan reached out and grabbed onto the loose arm again. 

I felt eyes on me. I glanced up to see the other dummies around the room. 
They appeared to watch us struggle. A silent, still audience. 

I pulled a red kerchief off a dummy’s neck. And I stuffed it into Slappy’s 
mouth to keep him quiet. 

“Downstairs! Hurry!” I instructed my brother. 

The dummy twisted and squirmed, trying to break free. 

But I had his legs tied around each other. And Dan kept a tight grip on his 
arms. 

We began making our way to the attic stairs. “Where are we taking him?” 
Dan demanded. 

“Outside,” I replied. The dummy bucked and squirmed. I nearly dropped 

him. 

“In our pajamas?” Dan asked. 

I nodded and began backing down the stairs. Slappy struggled hard to get 
free. I nearly lost my balance and toppled over backwards. 

“We’re not going far,” I groaned. 

Somehow we made it all the way downstairs. I had to let go with one hand 



to open the front door. Slappy bucked his knees, trying to untangle his legs. 

I pushed the door open. Grabbed the legs again. 

Dan and I carried the squirming dummy outside. 

A cold, clear night. A light, silvery frost over the grass. A half moon high 
over the trees. 

“Ohhh.” I let out a moan as my bare feet touched the frozen grass. 

“It’s c-cold!” Dan stammered. “I can’t hold on much longer.” 

I saw him shiver. The front lawn suddenly darkened as clouds rolled over 
the moon. My legs trembled. The damp cold seeped through my thin pajamas. 

“Where are we taking him?” Dan whispered. 

“Around to the back.” 

Slappy kicked hard. But I held on tightly. 

Something scampered past my bare feet. I heard scurrying footsteps over 
the frosty ground. 

A rabbit? A raccoon? 

I didn’t stop to see. Gripping Slappy’s ankles with both hands, I backed up. 
Backed along the side of the house. 

“My feet are numb!” Dan complained. 

“Almost there,” I replied. 

Slappy uttered hoarse cries beneath the kerchief that gagged his mouth. His 
round eyes rolled wildly. Again, he tried to kick free. 

Dan and I hauled him to the back of the yard. By the time we got to the old 
well, my feet were frozen numb, too. And my whole body shook from the cold. 

“What are we going to do?” Dan asked in a tiny voice. 

The clouds rolled away. Shadows pulled back. The silvery moonlight lit up 
the old stone well. 

“We’re going to toss him down the well,” I groaned. 

Dan stared at me, surprised. 

“He’s evil,” I explained. “We have no choice.” 

Dan nodded. 

We lifted Slappy onto the smooth stones at the top of the well. He bucked 
and kicked. He tried to scream through his gag. 

I saw Dan shiver again. 

“It’s a wooden dummy,” I told him. “It isn’t a person. It’s an evil wooden 
dummy.” 

We both shoved hard at the same time. 



The dummy slid off the stone wall and dropped into the well. 

Dan and I both waited until we heard the splash from far below. 

Then we ran side by side back to the house. 

He’s gone! I thought gratefully. Joyfully. The evil thing is gone for good. 

I slept really well that night. And I didn’t dream about dummies. 

The next morning, Dan and I met in the hall. We both were smiling. We felt 
so good. 

I was actually singing as I followed Dan down the stairs for breakfast. 

Dad greeted us at the kitchen door with an angry frown. “What is he doing 
down here?” Dad demanded. 

He pointed into the kitchen. 

Pointed at the breakfast table. 

Pointed to Slappy, sitting at the breakfast table, grinning his ugly painted 
grin, his eyes wide and innocent. 



26 


Dan’s mouth dropped open. 

I let out a sharp cry. 

“Don’t act stunned. Just get him out of here,” Dad said angrily. “And why is 
he all wet? Did you have him out in the rain?” 

I glanced out the kitchen window. Lightning flashed through a dark gray 
sky. Sheets of rain pounded the glass. Thunder rumbled overhead. 

“Not a very nice morning,” Uncle Cal said, stepping up behind Dan and me. 

“I’ve got coffee ready,” Dad told him. 

“I see your friend here beat us down to breakfast,” Uncle Cal said, 
motioning to Slappy. 

The dummy’s grin seemed to grow wider. 

“Get him out of here, Trina,” Dad repeated sharply. “Anyone want pancakes 
this morning?” He moved to the cabinet and started searching for a frying pan. 

“Make a few extra for me. I’m starving,” Uncle Cal said. “I’ll go see if 
Zane is up.” He turned and hurried out of the kitchen. 

Dad leaned into the cabinet, banging pots and pans, searching for the one he 
always used for pancakes. 

“Dad, I have to tell you something,” I said softly. I couldn’t hold it in any 
longer. I had to tell Dad the truth. I had to tell him the whole story. 

“Dad, Slappy is evil,” I told him. “He’s alive, and he’s evil. Dan and I threw 
him down the well last night. We had to get rid of him. But now—he’s back. You 
have to help us, Dad. We have to get rid of him—now.” 

I took a deep breath and let it out. It felt so good to get the story off my 
chest. 

Dad pulled his head from the cabinet and turned to me. “Did you say 
something, Trina? I was making such a racket, I couldn’t hear you.” 

“Dad, I-I—” I stammered. 

“Get that dummy out of here—now!” Dad shouted. He stuck his head back 
into the cabinet. “How can a whole frying pan disappear into thin air?” 

I let out a disappointed sigh. A loud burst of thunder made me jump. 

I motioned with my head for Dan to help me. We lifted Slappy off the chair. 
I held him around the waist, as far away from me as possible. 



His gray suit was sopping wet. Water dripped off his black leather shoes. 

We were halfway up the attic stairs when Slappy blinked and let out a soft 
chuckle. “Nice try, slaves,” he rasped. “But give up. I’m never going away. 
Never!” 



27 


What a dreary morning. 

Rain pounded the windows. Lightning crackled through the charcoal-gray 
sky. Thunder boomed so close it rocked the house. 

I felt as if the storm were inside my head. As if the heavy, heavy storm 
clouds were weighing me down. As if the thunder erupted inside my brain, 
drowning out my thoughts. 

Dan and I slumped on the couch in the den, watching the storm through the 
Venetian blinds over the big window. We were trying to come up with an idea, a 
way to get rid of Slappy. 

The room was chilly. Damp, cold air leaked through the old window. I 
mbbed the sleeves of my sweater, trying to warm myself. 

We were alone in the house. Mom, Dad, Uncle Cal, and Zane had gone into 
town. 

“I tried to tell Dad,” I said. “You heard me, Dan. I tried to tell him about 
Slappy. But he didn’t hear me.” 

“Dad wouldn’t believe you anyway, Trina,” Dan replied glumly. He sighed. 
“Who would believe it?” 

“How can a wooden dummy come to life?” I asked, shaking my head. 
“How?” 

And then I remembered. 

And then I had an idea. 

I jumped up from the couch. I tugged my brother by the arm. “Come on.” 

He pulled back. “Where?” 

“To the attic. I think I know how to put Slappy to sleep—for good.” 

I stopped at the attic door and held Dan back. “Be very quiet,” I instructed 
him. “Maybe Slappy is asleep. If he’s asleep, my plan will go a whole lot better.” 

Thunder roared as I opened the door. I led the way up the stairs, moving 
slowly, carefully, one step at a time. I could hear the rain pounding down on the 
roof. And I could see the flicker of lightning on the low ceiling. 

I stopped as I reached the top of the stairs and turned toward the dummy 
collection. A flash of lightning through the window cast the shadows of their 
heads on the wall. As the lightning flickered, the shadows all seemed to be 



moving. 

Dan stepped up behind me. “Here we are. Now what?” he whispered. 

I raised a finger to my lips and began to tiptoe across the floor. Thunder 
boomed. It sounded so much louder up here under the roof! 

When Dan and I dragged Slappy up here this morning, we had tossed him 
down on the floor. We were too freaked and frightened to spend the time 
propping him up on his chair. We just wanted to dump him and get away from 
the attic. 

I saw Slappy in the flickering white lightning. Lying on his back in the 
center of the floor. The other dummies sat around him, grinning their silent grins. 

I took a step closer. And then another. Moving as silently as I could. 

I peered down at the evil dummy. His arms were at his sides. His legs were 
twisted around each other. 

And his eyes were closed. 

Yes! 

His eyes were closed. He was asleep. 

I took another few steps toward Slappy. But I felt Dan’s hand on my arm, 
tugging me back. “Trina—what are you going to do?” he whispered. 

My eyes darted to Slappy. Still asleep. Thunder roared all around. It 
sounded as if we were standing in the middle of it. 

“Remember those weird words I read?” I whispered to my brother, keeping 
my eyes on the evil dummy. “Remember those weird words on that slip of 
paper?” 

Dan thought for a moment. Then he nodded. 

“Well, maybe it was those words that brought him to life,” I whispered. 
“Maybe it’s some kind of secret chant.” 

Dan shrugged. “Maybe.” He didn’t sound too hopeful. 

“I saw you tuck that slip of paper back into Slappy’s jacket pocket,” I told 
my brother. “I’m going to take it out and read the words again. Maybe the same 
words that bring him to life will also put him back to sleep.” 

Of course it was a crazy idea. 

But a dummy coming to life was crazy, too. And a dummy trying to turn 
you into his slave was crazy. 

It was all crazy. So maybe my idea was just crazy enough to work. 

“Good luck,” my brother whispered, his eyes on the sleeping dummy on the 


floor. 



I made my way over to Slappy. 

I knelt down on my knees beside him. 

I took a deep breath and held it. Then slowly, slowly, I began to reach my 
hand down to his jacket pocket. 

I knew the slip of paper was inside that pocket. Could I pull it out without 
waking up Slappy? 

I lowered my hand. Lowered it. 

My fingers touched the top of the jacket pocket. 

Still holding my breath, I began to slip two fingers inside. 

“Gotcha!” Slappy shrieked as his hands shot up. He grabbed both of my 
wrists and began to squeeze. 



28 


I was so stunned, I nearly fell on top of him. 

As I struggled to keep my balance, his wooden hands dug into my wrists. 
They tightened around me, cutting into my skin. 

“Let go of me!” I screamed. I struggled to pull my arms away. But he was 
too strong. Too strong. 

The hard fingers dug into my wrists. They squeezed harder, harder—until 
they cut off all circulation. 

“Let go of me! Let go!” My cry came out a shrill wail. 

“I give the orders, ssssslave!” Slappy hissed. “You will obey me. Obey me 
forever! Or you will pay!” 

“Let go! Let me go!” I shrieked. I tugged. I struggled to my feet. I jerked 
my arms up and down. 

But Slappy didn’t loosen his hold. 

His whole body bounced in the air. Hit the floor. Bounced back up as I 
pulled. 

But his hands gripped even harder. 

I couldn’t free myself. And the pain—the intense pain—shot down my 
arms. Down my sides. Down my whole body. 

“Pick me up, sssslave!” the dummy hissed. “Pick me up and put me on my 
chair.” 

“Let go!” I cried. “You’re breaking my wrists! Let go!” 

The dummy uttered a cold laugh in reply. 

The pain shot through my body. My legs wobbled. I dropped back to my 
knees. 

I turned in time to see Dan dive toward us. 

I thought he was going to grab the dummy’s hand and try to set me free. 

Instead, Dan grabbed for the jacket pocket. 

Slappy let go of my wrists. But not in time. 

Dan pulled the slip of paper from the pocket. 

Slappy swiped at Dan’s hand, trying to grab the paper away. 

But Dan swung around. He unfolded the paper and raised it to his face. And 



then he shouted out the mysterious words that were written there 
“Karru marri odonna loma molonu karrano. ” 

Would it work? 

Would it put Slappy back to sleep? 



29 


I rubbed my aching wrists and stared down at the grinning dummy. 

He gazed back at me. And then winked. 

His laughter roared over the thunder, over the hard, steady drumming of 
rain on the roof. 

“You cannot defeat me that way, slave!” Slappy cried gleefully. 

I took a step back. A chill ran down my back, making my whole body 
shudder. 

My plan hadn’t worked. 

My only plan. My last, desperate plan. A total failure. 

I caught the disappointment on Dan’s face. The slip of paper fell from his 
fingers and floated to the floor. 

“You will pay for this!” Slappy threatened. “You will pay for your foolish 
attempt to defeat me.” 

He pushed his hands against the floor and started to climb to his feet. 

I backed up. 

And saw the other dummies move. 

All of them. They were sliding off their chairs. Lowering themselves from 
the couch. 

They stretched their skinny arms. Flexed their big, wooden hands. 

Their heads bobbed, their knees bent as they started to shuffle toward us. 

They had all come to life! Twelve dummies, brought to life by those strange 
words Dan had cried out. 

Twelve dummies staggering toward Dan and me. 

We were trapped between them. Trapped in the circle as they shuffled, 
dragging their heavy shoes. Their eyes wide. Locked on Dan and me. 

As they staggered and shuffled. Moving stiffly, grinning, grinning so coldly. 

Closing in on Dan and me. 



30 


Wilbur limped toward us, his big, chipped hands stretched out, ready to grab us. 
Lucy’s big blue eyes gleamed coldly as she staggered toward us. Arnie let out a 
high-pitched giggle as he pulled himself closer. 

Closer. 

Dan and I spun around. But we had nowhere to turn. Nowhere to escape. 

The dummies’ big shoes scraped heavily over the wooden floorboards. 
Their knees bent with each step. They looked as if they would tumble to the 
floor. 

But they kept coming. Lurching forward. Bodies bending. Heads bobbing. 

Alive. Wooden creatures. Alive! 

Dan raised his hands over his face as if to shield himself. 

I took a step back. But the dummies behind me were closing in, too. 

I took a long, deep breath and held it. 

Then I waited. 

Waited for their wooden hands to grab us. 

I uttered a loud gasp as Wilbur and Arnie staggered right past me. 

The dummies all brushed past Dan and me. 

As if we weren’t there. 

I stared in shock as they circled Slappy. I saw Rocky grab Slappy by the 
collar. I saw Lucy grab Slappy’s shoes. 

Then the circle of dummies moved in closer. Tighter. 

I couldn’t see what they were doing to Slappy. But I saw their skinny arms 
jerking and tugging. I saw them all struggling together. 

Wrestling with him. 

Were they pulling him apart? 

I couldn’t see. But I heard Slappy’s scream of terror. 

Dan and I clung to each other, watching the strange sight. It looked like a 
football huddle. A huddle of dummies. 

The dummies grunted and groaned, muttering in low tones as they worked 
over Slappy. 

We couldn’t see Slappy in the middle. 



We heard only one scream. 

We didn’t hear him scream again. 
And then I heard the attic door open. 
Footsteps on the stairs! 

Someone was coming up. 



31 


I poked Dan and turned him to the stairs. 

We both cried out as Zane climbed up to the attic and squinted across the 
long room at us. 

Did he see the struggling dummies? Did he see that they were all alive? 

I turned back—in time to see the dummies all collapse in a heap. 

“Whoa!” I cried, my heart pounding. I blinked several times. I didn’t 
believe what I saw. 

The twelve dummies lay lifeless on the floor, arms and legs in a wild tangle. 
Mouths open. Eyes gazing up blankly at the low ceiling. 

Slappy lay sprawled in the middle. His head tilted to one side. I saw the 
blank stare in his eyes. Saw the open-mouthed, wooden grin. 

He was completely lifeless now. As lifeless as all the others. 

Had the other dummies somehow destroyed his evil? 

Would Slappy remain a lifeless block of wood forever? 

I didn’t have time to think about it. Zane came hurrying across the attic, an 
angry scowl on his face. His eyes were on the pile of dummies. 

“Caught you!” Zane cried to Dan and me. “Caught you both! Planning your 
next trick! I knew you two were the ones! I’m telling Uncle Danny what you’re 
doing!” 



32 


Of course no one believed Dan and me. 

Of course everyone believed Zane. 

We were in the worst trouble of our lives. Dan and I were grounded forever. 
We probably won’t be allowed to leave the house until we are in our forties! 

The next day, Zane and Uncle Cal were at the front door, saying good-bye. 
It’s a terrible thing to say—but Dan and I were not sad to see Zane go. 

“I hope I never have to come back here,” he whispered to me in the hall. 
Then he put on a big, phony smile for Mom and Dad. 

“Zane, what kind of camera would you like?” Dad asked, putting a hand on 
Zane’s shoulder. “You have a birthday coming up. I’d like to send you a new 
camera for your birthday.” 

Zane shrugged his big shoulders. “Thanks,” he told my Dad. “But I’m 
really not into photography anymore.” 

Mom and Dad raised their eyebrows in surprise. 

“Well, what would you like for your birthday, Zane?” Mom asked. “Is there 
something else you’re interested in?” 

Zane shyly lowered his eyes to the floor. “Well... I’d kind of like to try 
being a ventriloquist—like you, Uncle Danny.” 

Dad beamed happily. 

That creep Zane had said just the right thing. 

“Maybe you have a spare dummy you can lend Zane,” Uncle Cal suggested. 

Dad rubbed his chin. “Well... maybe I do.” He turned to me. “Trina, mn up 
to the attic. And pick out a good dummy for Zane to take home. Not one of the 
old ones. But a nice one that Zane can enjoy.” 

“No problem, Dad,” I replied eagerly. I hurried up to the attic. I hoped they 
didn’t see the enormous grin on my face. 

Can you guess which dummy I picked out for Zane? 

I know it’s horribly mean. But I really had no choice—did I? 

“Here’s a good one, Zane,” I said a few seconds later. I placed the grinning 
dummy in Zane’s arms. “His name is Slappy. I think you two will be very happy 
together.” 

I hope Zane has fun learning to be a ventriloquist. 



But I have the feeling he may have a few problems. Because as Zane 
carried Slappy into the car, I saw the dummy wink at me. 




BAD HARE DAY 


1 


“Pick a card, any card.” I spread out the deck of cards in front of Sue Mailer, 
facedown. She giggled and picked one. 

“Don’t show it to me,” I warned her. She glanced at the card, keeping it 
hidden from me. 

A small crowd of kids gathered on the school steps to watch. School was 
out for the day. Sue showed them her card. 

I love doing magic tricks—especially in front of an audience. My dream is 
to be a great magician like my idol, Amaz-O. 

I’ve been playing around with stage names. My real name is Tim Swanson 
—but that’s way too boring for a professional magician. I’ve been thinking of 
calling myself Swanz-O. My best friend, Foz, thinks Swanz-0 sounds like a 
laundry detergent. 

“Now, Sue,” I said in a louder voice, so everybody could hear me. “Put the 
card back in the deck.” 

Sue slipped the card in with the others. I shuffled the deck and tapped it 
three times. “I will now make your card rise to the top of the deck,” I announced. 

Tap, tap, tap. I picked up the top card and showed it to Sue. “Was this your 
card?” I asked her. 

Her eyebrows shot up in amazement. “The three of clubs!” she cried. “That 
was my card!” 

“How’d you do that?” Jesse Brown asked. 

“Magicians never reveal their secrets,” I said, bowing. “And now, for my 
next trick—” 

“I know how he did it.” My little sister, Ginny, suddenly popped up in the 
crowd. The sound of her scratchy voice made my hair stand on end. She loves to 
spoil my magic shows. 

But a true magician doesn’t let anything throw him. I grinned my biggest, 
fakest grin at the little brat. 

“Ladies and gentlemen, my lovely assistant, Ginny!” 

“I’m not your assistant, freak-face,” Ginny snarled. “You won’t catch me 
doing nerdy magic tricks. I’m into karate. Hi-ya!” She demonstrated her karate 
chop. 



Some of the kids laughed. I pretended to laugh, too. “Ha, ha. Isn’t she a 
riot?” 

Everybody says Ginny looks like an angel. She has long, wavy blond hair, 
rosy cheeks, big blue eyes. People always ooh and aah over her. 

No one ever oohs and aahs over me. I’ve got curly light-brown hair and 
hazel eyes. I’m twelve, which Mom says isn’t a “cute age”. 

My nose is long and curves up at the end like a hot dog. Ginny likes to flick 
the end of my nose with her finger and say, “Boi-oi-oing.” 

Her nose is small and perfect, of course. 

I tried to continue my show, Ginny or no Ginny. I slipped the deck of cards 
into my pocket and yanked out my magic scarf. “Now, be amazed as I—” 

Ginny reached into my pocket and snatched out the cards. “Look, 
everybody!” she cried, showing them the cards. “All the cards are the three of 
clubs!” 

Ginny started passing the cards around so everyone could see. 

“Hey! Give those back!” I protested. I grabbed the cards away. It was true. 
Every single card in the deck was the three of clubs. But no one was supposed to 
know that. 

“You’re a phony,” Sue mumbled. 

“No—wait!” I cried. “Watch this!” 

I whipped out my magic rings—two large silver hoops hooked together. 
The kids quieted down a little. 

“These silver rings are locked together,” I declared. “They’re completely 
solid—linked together forever!” I tugged on them to show that they wouldn’t 
come apart. 

Then I handed them to Jesse. “Try to pull the rings apart,” I told him. He 
pulled hard. He pulled lightly. He pulled hard again. He jangled them around. 
The rings stayed hooked together. 

I took them back. “The rings will never come apart,” I said. “Unless I say 
the magic words.” I waved one hand over the rings. “Hocus pocus!” I gently 
pulled the rings apart. A couple of kids clapped. 

“You’re not going to fall for that old trick, are you?” Ginny mocked. “You 
want to know how he does it?” She grabbed the rings away and began to 
demonstrate. “They’re trick rings—” 

“I will now make my lovely assistant disappear!” I cried, shoving Ginny 
aside. “Beat it!” 



“Stop pushing me!” she shouted. “Hi-ya!” 

She karate-kicked me in the stomach. 

“Oof!” I doubled over. Everybody laughed and clapped. 

“That’s a great trick!” Sue said. 

I clutched my stomach. Some trick. 

Stupid Ginny and her karate kicks. Why did Mom have to take her to that 
martial-arts school? My life has been miserable ever since. She’s only ten, and 
she fights way better than I do. I’ve got the bruises to show it. 

“Kick him again!” somebody yelled. 

Ginny crouched, ready to attack. 

“Try it, and I’ll tell Mom where that dent in the refrigerator door came 
from,” I warned her. 

She backed off. She knew Mom would kill her for karate-chopping the 
fridge just because we were out of ice cream. 

“She’s not going to kick him,” Jesse said. “Show’s over.” 

The kids drifted away. 

“Wait!” I cried. “Come back!” 

“See you tomorrow, Tim,” Sue said. Everybody began to head for home. 

“Thanks for wrecking everything, Ginny,” I snapped. 

She flicked my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.” 

“Stop it!” I swatted her away. “You’re definitely going to get it. I’m telling 
Mom about the fridge for sure.” 

“Go ahead,” she taunted. “But if you do, I’ll give you the freezer chop.” 
She waved her arms through the air, making those weird karate noises. “Wah 
wah wee — ah! Right to the neck. You’ll never walk again!” 

She trotted away. “See you at home, Swanz-O!” 

This is what I have to deal with every day of my life. A little sister who 
could kill me if she wanted to. What can I do? I’m helpless against her. 

That’s one reason I want to be a magician. Maybe Ginny can karate-chop 
my arms off—but not if I make her disappear first! 

I sighed and buttoned up my denim jacket. It was almost four o’clock and 
getting chilly. The wind had picked up, too. When is it going to get warm? I 
wondered. It’s the end of March—it’s supposed to be spring already. 

The school door burst open. “I’m outta here!” Foz shouted. 

Foz’s real name is Foster Martin. But he doesn’t look like a Foster. He’s a 
Foz. He’s chubby, with a brown buzz cut. His shirt is always untucked. 



“Where 5 ve you been?” I asked him. 

“Mrs. Pratt made me stay after school,” he replied, making a disgusted face. 

“Why?” I asked. 

“No reason,” Foz said. 

Foz has to stay after school almost every day. He always says it’s for no 
reason. 

I picked up my magic kit and started down the school steps. Foz followed. 
We left the school grounds and walked toward town. 

“What were you doing at school so late?” he asked. 

“I was trying out a few magic tricks. Ginny told everybody how they work. 
It was a disaster.” 

“You need better tricks,” Foz said. “Lots of kids have the same magic kit as 
yours.” 

“You’re right,” I agreed, rattling my kit. “This is amateur stuff. I’m ready 
for some real magic tricks. Professional ones.” 

“Like a hat you can pull a rabbit out of.” 

“Or that spinning box Amaz-0 has,” I added. 

Amaz-0 was my hero—the greatest magician ever. “Did you see him on 
TV last week? His assistant stepped into a big black box. Amaz-0 spun it around 
three times, and she disappeared!” 

“He’s doing a show at Midnight Mansion,” Foz said. Midnight Mansion is a 
club in town where magicians perform every night. 

“I know. I wish I could go. But the tickets cost twenty-five dollars.” 

We turned onto Bank Street and headed toward the center of town. It wasn’t 
on the way home, but Foz knew what I was doing. Malik’s Magic Shoppe was 
on Bank Street. I stopped in there at least once a week, just to drool over the cool 
tricks they had. 

“Malik’s has a bunch of new tricks,” I told Foz. “Designed by Amaz-0 
himself.” 

“I’ll bet they’re expensive,” Foz said. 

“They are.” I reached into my pocket to see how much money I had. Five 
bucks. 

“That’ll buy you a squirting flower,” Foz said. “Maybe.” 

I stuffed the bill back into my pocket. “You’ve got to see this stuff, anyway. 
There’s a table—you put a plate or something on it—it can be anything you 
want. The plate will rise up over the table and float!” 



“How does it work?” Foz asked. 

“I don’t know. Mr. Malik wouldn’t tell me. He said you have to buy the 
trick to find out.” 

“How much does it cost?” 

“Five hundred dollars.” 

Foz rolled his eyes. “I guess you’ll have to stick with card tricks.” 

“I guess.” I sighed. 

A little bell rang as we opened the door to Malik’s. I breathed in the musty 
smell of the shop. It was jam-packed with old tricks, new tricks, magic books, 
and costumes. There were even cages in the back for rabbits and doves. Mr. 
Malik sold everything. 

I called out, “Hi, Mr. Malik.” He stood behind the cash register. He was a 
short, bald old man with a fat stomach. 

I waited for Mr. Malik to say, “What’s new, Magoo?” in his gravelly voice. 
That’s how he greets all his regular customers. 

I called out, “Hi!” again, but he didn’t answer. He just stood there and 
grunted. 

“Mr. Malik?” Foz and I crept closer to the counter. 

“Unh!” Mr. Malik grunted. He stumbled forward. 

Something was sticking out of his stomach. A sword! 

“Mr. Malik?” I asked. “Are you okay?” 

He clutched the handle of the sword and moaned in pain. 

Someone had stabbed him! 

“Help me!” he groaned. “Please—help!” 

Foz and I froze in fear. I let out a gasp—but I was too frightened to move. 
Foz’s whole body trembled. 

Mr. Malik uttered another groan. Then his expression changed. He pulled 
out the sword—and he tossed it to me. 

“Hey!” I cried. “It’s a fake!” 

Mr. Malik laughed. He rubbed his round stomach, which hadn’t been 
stabbed at all. “What’s new, Magoo?” he chuckled. “Get a load of that trick 
sword. Just got it in today.” 

I tested the sword against my own stomach. It had a sliding blade. I pushed 
the blade into the handle, then let go. It popped out again. Very cool. 

Foz fingered the blade. “Think of the tricks you could play on Ginny with a 
sword like this! ” 



“Like it, Tim?” Mr. Malik asked. “Only twenty bucks.” 

I shook my head. “We’re just looking, Mr. Malik.” 

He hung the sword on the wall behind him. “All right. Take your time and 
look around. But would it kill you to actually buy something once in a while?” 

Mr. Malik always said that, too. 

I wandered to the back of the shop. I checked out a rack of magician’s 
jackets. I pulled a sparkly blue tuxedo jacket off the rack and tried it on. It had a 
trick sleeve for hiding things. 

I stared at myself in the mirror. I pretended to announce myself. “The 
Amazing Swanz-O!” 

Foz shook his head in disgust. “That name is so lame.” 

“Yeah, you’re right.” I thought of another name. “How about ‘Swanson the 
Magnificent’?” 

“It’s okay,” Foz said. “A little boring, but okay.” 

He tried on a top hat and added, “You need something cooler, like ‘Tim the 
Destroyer’.” 

“That sounds like a wrestler,” I commented. 

“At least it’s not wimpy,” Foz retorted. “Like Swanz-O.” 

“Hey, boys.” Mr. Malik shuffled toward us. He held out two tickets. 

“Take these, if you want them,” he said. “Two free passes to Amaz-O’s 
magic show tomorrow night.” 

“Wow!” I cried. I took a ticket and read it. 

Admit One 
An Evening of Magic 
with the Great Amaz-0 
March 23 
10 P.M. 

Midnight Mansion 

“Thanks Mr. Malik! I can’t believe we’ll get to see Amaz-0 in person!” I 
gushed. “Tomorrow night!” 

“Tomorrow night?” Foz frowned at his ticket. “I can’t go. My aunt and 
uncle are coming over. It’s my mother’s birthday.” 

“So? This is a once-in-a-lifetime chance! Your mother has a birthday every 
year.” 



Foz stuffed the ticket into my palm, shaking his head. “I know my mom— 
and she won’t see it that way. Anyway, tomorrow night is a school night.” 

I’d forgotten about that. I hoped my mom would let me go. Ten o’clock was 
pretty late to go out on a school night. 

She has to let me go, I decided. She just has to. What kind of horrible 
mother would keep her son from seeing his hero in person? Only a really mean, 
monstery mother. 

My mother is a grump, but she’s not a monster. 

I took off the blue jacket and hung it back up on the rack. A large wooden 
box caught my eye. It was the size of a coffin, brightly painted with red and 
yellow stars. I lifted the lid. 

The box was empty, lined with blue velvet on the inside. “What’s the box 
do, Mr. Malik?” I asked. 

“That’s for sawing people in half,” Mr. Malik replied. 

I examined the inside of the box, trying to figure out how it worked. I found 
no secret compartments or panels or anything. 

“How does it work?” I asked Mr. Malik. 

“You going to buy it?” he demanded. 

“Well—how much does it cost?” 

“Two-fifty.” 

“Two dollars and fifty cents? I can afford that.” 

Mr. Malik waved me away and started toward the stockroom at the back of 
the shop. “Two dollars and fifty cents,” he muttered. “In your dreams.” 

“He meant two hundred and fifty dollars, Brainz-O,” Foz said. 

I tried to cover myself. “I knew that. I was joking.” 

Foz fiddled with a cool-looking trick in the corner. I moved closer to see. 

“It’s a guillotine,” Foz said. “For chopping off heads.” 

The guillotine had a place for the victim to rest his head at the bottom—and 
a razor-sharp blade at the top. 

Mr. Malik emerged from the back room. “I’m closing up soon, boys,” he 
called. 

“I just want to see how this works,” Foz said. He twisted a lever on the 
guillotine. 

“Foz—no!” I cried. 

The blade slid down the guillotine. 

And landed with a horrifying thunk. 



“My hand!” Foz shrieked. “My hand!” 



2 


Mr. Malik gasped. “I’ll call an ambulance! Nine-one-one!” He grabbed the 
phone. 

The guillotine blade had sliced right through Foz’s hand. He screamed in 

pain. 

“Oh!” Foz moaned. “I cut off my hand!” he wailed. “I’ll never write again!” 

I started laughing. 

“Why are you laughing?” Mr. Malik demanded. “This is an emergency!” 

“No, it’s not.” Foz held up his hands to show that he was fine. “Got a paper 
towel? I need to wipe off this fake blood.” 

“Fake?” Mr. Malik stammered. “Fake blood?” 

“We got you back for that sword trick,” I told him. 

Mr. Malik clutched his sweaty forehead in his hands. “I’m so stupid! I 
know that’s a trick guillotine. Why did I fall for such a dumb joke?” 

“Hey,” Foz protested. “It was a lot funnier than your sword-in-the-stomach 
joke.” 

Mr. Malik wiped his brow and smiled. “All right, boys. Enough tricks. It’s 
five o’clock. Get out of here.” He shoved us toward the door. 

“Thanks for the tickets, Mr. Malik,” I called. “See you next week.” 

“Sure. Next week, when I’ll have a new shipment of magic tricks you won’t 
buy.” 

The bell on the door jangled as we left the shop. Foz and I walked down 
Bank Street toward home. 

“Sure you won’t go to Midnight Mansion tomorrow night?” I asked him. 

“I can’t. Your mom will never let you go, either.” 

“I’ll find a way,” I insisted. “You’ll see.” 

We paused in front of Foz’s house. “Come over to my house after school 
tomorrow,” I said. “I’m giving another magic show. Only this time Ginny won’t 
wreck it.” 

“I’ll be there,” Foz promised. 

“And bring your sister’s rabbit,” I added. 

Foz shuffled his feet uncomfortably. “Clare is not going to like that...” he 



began. 

“Please, Foz,” I begged. “I’m going to finish building my rabbit table 
tonight. The rabbit trick is going to be so amazing—” 

“I’ll try to bring the rabbit,” Foz said. “But if anything happens to it, Clare 
will kill me.” 

“Nothing will happen to it—I promise.” 

I waved good-bye to Foz and went home. “The Great Swanzini is here!” I 
announced as I burst into the kitchen. 

“You mean the Great Jerk,” Ginny mumbled. She sat at the kitchen table, 
folding napkins. She reached up and flicked at my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.” 

“Get off me.” I slapped her hand away. 

Mom set a plate of chicken on the table. “Go wash up, Tim,” she ordered. 
“And tell your father supper is ready.” 

“Look, Mom.” I held up a quarter. Then, with a flick of my wrist, I slipped 
it up my sleeve. “I made the quarter disappear!” 

I showed her my two empty hands. 

“Very nice. I see two hands that haven’t been washed yet,” Mom said 
impatiently. 

“I saw the quarter go up your sleeve,” Ginny sneered. 

“No one appreciates me around here,” I complained. “Someday I’m going 
to be the greatest magician in the world. And my own family doesn’t care!” 

Mom strode to the kitchen door. “Bill!” she called upstairs to my dad. 
“Supper!” 

I made my way out of the kitchen to wash my hands. My parents didn’t take 
my magic act seriously. They thought it was just a hobby. 

But Ginny’s karate lessons were the most important thing in the world, of 
course. Mom always said, “Girls need to know how to defend themselves.” Now 
I needed to defend myself against my own sister! 

I returned to the kitchen and sat down. Mom plunked a piece of chicken 
down beside the rice on my plate. Dad and Ginny were already eating. 

“I had a terrible day at work today,” Mom grumbled, ripping into her 
chicken. She’s a high school guidance counselor. “First Michael Lamb 
threatened to beat up another boy. His teacher yelled at him, and he threatened to 
beat her up, too. She sent him to my office. When I tried to talk to him, he said 
he’d beat me up. So I called his mother in—and she tried to beat me up. I had to 
call the police!” 



“That’s a piece of cake next to my day,” Dad complained. Dad sells cars. 
“Some guy came in and said he wanted to test-drive the new minivan. I handed 
him the keys, and he took off. He never came back. He stole the car!” 

I sighed and shoveled rice into my mouth. Dinner is like this every night. 
Both of my parents hate their jobs. 

“I had a really tough day, too,” Ginny put in. “Michael Franklin teased me. 
So I had to karate-kick him in the leg!” 

I smirked. “Poor you.” 

Mom’s forehead wrinkled—her concerned look. “You didn’t hurt yourself, 
did you, Ginny?” 

“No,” Ginny replied. “But I could have.” 

“What about me?” I protested. “I’m the one who got kicked in the stomach. 
And it hurt a lot!” 

“You seem to be fine now,” Dad chimed in. 

I gave up. I knew that arguing would get me nowhere. Mom and Dad 
always take Ginny’s side. 

“Is there any dessert?” Ginny demanded. 

“Ice cream,” Mom answered. 

“I’ll clear the table,” I offered, hoping it would put Mom in a better mood. I 
needed both Mom and Dad to be in a good mood. 

Because I was about to ask the big question. 

Would they let me go to Midnight Mansion tomorrow night? 

Would they? 



3 


I stood up, collecting dirty plates. “Guess what? Amaz-0 is doing his act at 
Midnight Mansion tomorrow night. Mr. Malik gave me two free passes.” I held 
my breath, waiting for their answer. 

“Excellent!” Ginny cried. “That means I can go too!” 

“I’m not taking you,” I told her. “I’ll ask Mark or Jesse or somebody. 
Anybody but you.” I dropped the plates in the sink. They crashed but didn’t 
break. 

“Careful, Tim,” Mom warned. 

Ginny slithered over to the sink and tried to hug me. “Please, Tim. I’m your 
sister. Your only sister in the whole world. I’d do anything for you. You have to 
take me with you!” 

“Neither one of you is going,” Dad said quietly. “It’s a school night.” 

“But Dad, it’s free!” I protested. “Just this once. Amaz-0 is my hero. I’ll 
never get another chance to see him in person!” 

“What time does the show start?” Mom asked. 

“Ten o’clock,” I told her. 

She shook her head. “Absolutely not. You’re not going out at ten o’clock on 
a school night. Especially not to a nightclub. You’re much too young.” She 
furiously spooned ice cream into a bowl. 

“Mom—please!” I begged. “I’m twelve. I can handle it.” 

“You heard your mother,” Dad said. “You’ll have other chances to see 
Amaz-O, Tim. Don’t worry.” 

Mom offered me a bowl of ice cream. “I don’t want it,” I grumbled. I 
stormed out of the kitchen. As I left, I heard Ginny say, “Good. Now I’ll get two 
bowls of ice cream.” 

Stupid Ginny, I thought. Stupid Mom and stupid Dad. My one chance to see 
my idol, the great Amaz-0—and they won’t let me go. 

I wandered into the garage. In the corner stood a new trick I was building— 
the rabbit table. It was a square table that came up to my waist. The top had a 
hole in it that led to a secret compartment under the table. 

I planned to hide a rabbit in the compartment and cover the hole with my 
magic top hat. When I pressed a pedal at the foot of the table, the bottom of the 



secret compartment would rise up. Then I’d lift my hat—and there would be the 
rabbit! 

The table was almost finished. I turned it upside down and hammered on 
the bottom of the secret compartment. 

This trick is going to knock everybody out tomorrow afternoon, I thought. 
I’ll be almost as amazing as Amaz-O! 

I was so busy hammering I didn’t hear the garage door open. Two baby blue 
high-tops suddenly appeared in front of me. I didn’t have to look up. I knew 
Ginny’s smelly sneakers when I saw them. 

“Go away,” I commanded. 

She never listens to me. “You going to do the rabbit trick tomorrow?” she 
asked. 

“Uh-huh. Now go away.” 

“Where are you going to get the rabbit?” 

I set down my hammer. “I’m going to turn you into a rabbit.” 

“Ha ha.” She flipped her wavy blond hair. “You know what this table would 
be perfect for?” she asked. “Karate-chopping. I’ll bet I could chop it in half with 
one hand.” 

“Try it and I’ll—” 

“You’ll what?” she taunted. 

What could I do to her? Not much. “I’ll turn you into a rabbit for real,” I 
threatened. 

“Oh, yeah? How are you going to do that?” 

“It’s easy,” I replied. “Mr. Malik showed me how. Tonight, while you’re 
sleeping, I’m going to sneak into your room and turn you into a rabbit.” 

“Give me a break,” Ginny said. “That is so dumb.” 

“Maybe. Maybe not. I guess we’ll find out tonight.” I picked up my 
hammer again. “I hope you like carrots,” I told her. 

“You’re crazy,” she said. She hurried out of the garage. 

Well, I thought. At least that got rid of her for a while. 

I set the table on its legs again. All I had to do was paint it, and it would be 
ready. 

Wouldn’t it be great? I thought as I opened a can of blue paint. Wouldn’t it 
be great if I really could turn Ginny into a rabbit? 

But that was impossible. Wasn’t it? 



4 


“We want the rabbit trick! We want the rabbit trick!” 

Ginny sat in the grass in our backyard. Six or seven other kids sat around. I 
was in the middle of my magic act. Ginny was stirring up trouble. 

She knew I didn’t have a rabbit for the trick. I was still waiting for Foz to 
show up. 

Where is he? I wondered. He’s ruining my show! 

The other kids joined in Ginny’s chant. “The rabbit trick! The rabbit trick!” 

I tried to stall them. “The amazing, incredible rabbit trick is coming up,” I 
promised. “But first—wouldn’t you like to see me pull a quarter out of Ginny’s 
ear again?” 

“No!” the kids yelled. “Boo!” 

“Karate fight!” Sue called. “We want a karate fight. Ginny versus Tim!” 

Things were getting ugly. 

At last I glimpsed Foz at the side of the house. He waved at me frantically. 

“Intermission!” I announced. “I’ll be back in two minutes. And then—I’ll 
pull a rabbit out of my hat!” 

I hurried over to Foz. A big cardboard box sat at his feet. 

“What took you so long?” I demanded. 

“I’m sorry,” Foz said. “I almost had to rip the rabbit out of Clare’s hands.” 

I opened the box. Clare’s big white rabbit lifted its nose and sniffed at me. I 
grabbed it and stuffed it under my jacket. 

“Be careful!” Foz warned. “If anything happens to it, my sister will chop 
me into rabbit food!” 

“The rabbit will be fine,” I told him. “What could happen to it?” 

I sneaked the rabbit to the table. With my back to the audience, I stuffed it 
into the secret compartment and plopped my hat on top. 

Then I turned to face the kids. None of them had seen the rabbit. Perfect. 

“Ladies and gentlemen!” I called. “Thanks for being so patient. Here is the 
moment you’ve all been waiting for—” 

“Karate fight!” Ginny called. 

“Even better than a karate fight!” I said. “I, the Great Timothini, will now 



pull a rabbit out of my hat!” 

Ginny snorted. “The Great Timothini?” 

I pointed at her. “You, in the front row. Quiet!” 

“You be quiet!” Ginny shot back. 

“Get on with it!” Jesse called. 

“Okay. I need complete silence now. I must concentrate.” 

To my surprise, the kids actually quieted down. Even Ginny. Everyone 
stared up at me, waiting. 

I lifted my hat off the table. “As you can see, my hat is empty. It’s an 
ordinary, everyday top hat. Sue, will you please examine the hat?” 

I passed the hat to Sue. She turned it over. “It looks like a regular hat to 
me,” she declared. 

I set the hat on the table, covering the secret compartment. “Thank you, 
Sue. Now—watch carefully.” 

I waved my arms over the hat. “Abracadabra, abracadeer, rabbit, rabbit, 
rabbit— appear! ” 

I stepped on the pedal to make the rabbit rise up. Then I lifted the hat with a 
flourish. 

Nothing there. The hat stood empty. 

I checked the secret compartment. No rabbit there, either. 

My heart pounded. How could this be? 

“The rabbit!” I cried. “It’s gone!” 



5 


What have I done? I thought in horror. 

My trick must have worked better than I thought! 

I glanced up and saw Ginny pointing across the backyard. “There it goes!” 
she cried. “There’s the rabbit!” 

I whirled around. Clare’s white rabbit was hopping away. 

How could that happen? I wondered. I glanced into the secret compartment 
again. 

I’d left one side of the secret compartment open. How could I have been so 
stupid? 

“Tim—you promised!” Foz screamed. “Grab it!” 

I chased after the rabbit. Foz huffed behind me. The rabbit had already 
hopped halfway across our next-door neighbors’ backyard. I glanced back. 
Ginny and the other kids were yelling and running after us. 

The rabbit stopped behind a bush. I sped up—and pounced. 

“Got him!” I cried. But the rabbit slipped out of my hands and bounded 
away. 

“He’s headed for the stream!” Ginny shouted. 

A muddy stream ran behind all the backyards on our block. The rabbit 
disappeared behind the trees that hid the stream. 

Whooping like crazy, Ginny led the kids after the rabbit. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re scaring it away!” 

But none of them listened to me. There was nothing to do but keep chasing. 

“Don’t let the rabbit hop into the water!” Foz screamed. “He’ll drown!” 

“He won’t drown,” I told Foz. “That stream is only about two inches deep.” 

“Just catch the rabbit!” Foz ordered. He was in a total panic. Maybe his 
sister really would chop him into rabbit food. 

The rabbit hopped through the mud and across the stream into the Darbys’ 
yard. I shoved the other kids aside. I splashed through the stream. 

The rabbit stopped. Its ears twitched. 

I motioned to the others to keep still. I squatted down and crept toward the 
rabbit. 



I saw why it had stopped. The Darbys’ cat, Boo Boo, crouched low in the 
grass, waiting to pounce. 

The rabbit was trapped between us. I crawled closer. Closer. I was almost 
there.... 

“Watch out for the cat!” Foz shrieked. 

With a yowl, the cat leaped. The rabbit bounced about a foot in the air. I 
missed him. 

Everybody raced after him again. I threw Foz a dirty look. 

“You’re ruining everything!” I shouted. 

“You’re the one who lost him in the first place!” Foz yelled back. 

“Hey!” Sue called. “Look at Ginny!” 

Ginny had raced to the head of the pack. The rabbit paused, then started 
mnning again. Ginny took a flying leap. “Yaw, hee ha how!” she screeched in 
her weirdo karate voice. 

She landed on her feet in front of the rabbit. It tried to change course. Too 

late. 

“Hiii—ya!” Ginny swooped down and grabbed the rabbit. She held him 
over her head like a trophy. 

“I got him!” she cried. “I got him!” 

“Yay, Ginny!” Everyone crowded around her, slapping her on the back. 

“Don’t let him go!” Foz cried. He hurried over to Ginny and snatched the 
rabbit away. 

We all started back to my yard. “Awesome trick, Tim.” Jesse patted me on 
the back. “You almost made the rabbit really disappear!” 

Everybody laughed. “You should change your stage name, Timothini,” Sue 
chimed in. “How about ‘The Great Goofballini’?” 

“Or ‘Mess-Up the Magnificent’!” Jesse suggested. 

I sighed and shut my eyes. Another magic show—another disaster. 

“I can’t believe you almost lost my sister’s rabbit,” Foz grumbled. 

“I’m sorry, Foz. I’ll be more careful next time.” 

He clutched the rabbit tightly to his chest. “Next time, get your own rabbit.” 

He hurried to the side of the house and stuffed the rabbit into the box. 

“Anybody want to come over to my house?” Jesse called. He lived next 
door. “I’ve got a great trick to show you—the disappearing dog. I let go of his 
leash, and he runs away!” 

Laughing, the other kids drifted over to Jesse’s house. Foz took the rabbit 



home to his sister. 

“You going over to Jesse’s?” Ginny asked. 

I shook my head. “I’m going inside for a snack.” 

“Maybe you should do your magic act inside from now on,” Ginny said. 
“Then your tricks won’t be able to escape from you!” She giggled. 

“Very funny,” I mumbled. “You won’t be laughing so hard when I turn you 
into a rabbit. I don’t think rabbits know how to laugh.” 

“Ooh. I’m scared.” She rolled her eyes. 

“You’d better be.” I leaned close to her and whispered. “Tonight’s the night. 
Tonight, while you’re sleeping, I’ll turn you into a rabbit. And if you try to run 
away, the Darbys’ cat will get you.” 

She rolled her eyes again. Then she reached up to tweak my nose. “Boi-oi- 
oing.” 

She trotted off to Jesse’s house. 

I definitely need better magic tricks, I thought as I dragged myself into the 
house. Better equipment, too. So I can do really cool tricks. Tricks that actually 
work. 

I thought of all the stuff Mr. Malik sold in his shop. If I could have just one 
of those tricks, I could do a great act. I’ve got to get one somehow. 

But how? 

That night everybody went to bed early. Mom and Dad were exhausted and 
crabby after another bad day at work. 

“Today was the worst day ever!” Mom grumbled. “I’m so exhausted. 
Everybody to bed!” 

Ginny and I knew better than to protest. We didn’t want to stay up, anyway, 
with Mom and Dad grouching around all evening. 

I lay in bed with the lights off, trying to sleep. Amaz-O’s show is tonight, I 
thought miserably. He’s performing tonight, only a few miles away from my 
house. I have free passes. And I can’t go. It’s not fair! 

How am I ever going to be a great magician if I never see any magic 
shows? Amaz-0 is the greatest of the great—and I have to miss my one chance 
to see him! 

Or do I? A wicked thought popped into my head. Why should I miss the 
show? 

I’ve got the tickets. I can ride to Midnight Mansion on my bike. I could 



sneak out of the house for a couple of hours—and Mom and Dad would never 
have to know. 

I rolled over in bed and peered at my alarm clock. The dial glowed in the 
dark. Nine-forty. 

The show would start in twenty minutes, I knew. I could still make it if I 
left right now. 

I couldn’t stand to think about it any longer. I had to go. 

I slid out of bed, hoping my mattress wouldn’t creak. I tiptoed across the 
room to my dresser. I silently pulled on a pair of jeans and a shirt. 

Sneakers in hand, I carefully opened my bedroom door. The house was 
dark. I heard Dad snoring in my parents’ room down the hall. 

I crept toward the stairs. Am I really doing this? I thought, suddenly 
nervous. Am I really sneaking out in the middle of the night to go to Midnight 
Mansion? 



6 


Yes—I’m really doing it, I thought. I’ll do anything to see Amaz-O. It’s totally 
worth the risk. 

What’s the worst that could happen? 

Mom and Dad could find out. Then what? Maybe they’d ground me. But I 
will have seen the great Amaz-0 in person. And while I’m grounded, I can try to 
learn some of Amaz-O’s tricks. 

Anyway, I won’t get caught. I won’t. 

I paused at the top of the stairs. The stairs in my house are the creakiest 
stairs in the universe. 

Once when I was little, I tried to sneak downstairs on Christmas Eve to see 
what Santa had left me. I barely touched the top step with my foot 
— CRRREEEEAAAK! Mom burst out of her room before I even had a chance to 
try the second step. 

It’s not going to happen this time, I told myself. I’ll take each step very 
slowly. I’ll lean on the banister to keep them from creaking. No one will wake 
up. No one will hear me. 

I put both my hands on the banister and rested my weight on it. Then I set 
my right foot carefully—the toe, then the heel—on the top step. 

Crick. Just a tiny little sound. I’m sure no one heard it, I thought. 

I shifted my hands down the banister and took another step. This one made 
no creak at all. 

So far, so good. 

I took the third step. Creak. Not a rip-roaring loud creak, but louder than the 
first. I froze. 

I listened for the sound of someone stirring in the house. 

Silence. All clear. 

If Amaz-0 only knew what I’m going through to see him, I thought. I must 
be his biggest fan on the face of the earth. 

I made it all the way down the stairs with only one more creak. I breathed a 
sigh of relief. 

I’m safe now, I thought. I’ll wait until I get outside to put my shoes on. 
Then I’ll grab my bike and go. 



I tiptoed across the cold hallway floor. I reached for the handle of the front 
door. Twisted it. 

Almost there. 

Almost. 

Then a shrill voice demanded, “Tim—where do you think you’re going?” 



7 


I spun around. Ginny! 

She was dressed in jeans and a sweater, all ready to go out. She bounded 
down the stairs. 

“Ssshhhhhhhh! You’ll wake up Mom and Dad!” 

I grabbed her by the arm and yanked her out the front door. 

“What are you doing up?” I demanded. 

“I was waiting for you to come into my room and turn me into a rabbit,” 
she replied. “Or pretend to, anyway.” 

“I’m not going to do that tonight,” I said. “Go back to bed.” 

“What are you doing up? Where are you going?” 

I sat on the front steps and pulled on my sneakers. “Out to the garage,” I 
lied. “To practice a new trick.” 

“You are not. I know where you’re going. To Midnight Mansion!” 

I grabbed her by the shoulders. “Okay. You’re right. I’m going to Midnight 
Mansion. Don’t tell Mom and Dad—promise?” 

“I want to go!” she insisted. “Let me go with you.” 

“No. Go back to bed—and don’t tell. Or you’ll be sorry.” 

“You have to take me!” she declared. “If you don’t, I’ll run upstairs and tell 
Mom and Dad right now. Then you’ll never get to see Amaz-O.” 

“You wouldn’t.” 

“I would.” 

I knew she would. 

“All right,” I agreed. “You can come. But you have to be good and do 
everything I tell you to do.” 

“Maybe I will—and maybe I won’t.” 

I sighed. I had to take her, no matter how bratty she was. If I did, she’d 
never tell—because then she’d be in as much trouble as me. 

“Let’s go,” I whispered. 

We sneaked into the garage and got our bikes. Then we pedaled off into the 
night. 

It felt strange riding down Bank Street late at night. The shops were all 



closed and dark. Hardly any traffic on the street. 

Oh, no. A police car up ahead—cruising toward us down Bank Street. If he 
spotted us, he’d stop us for sure. And then he’d take us home. And then we’d 
really be in trouble. 

I searched desperately for a place to hide. The police couldn’t miss us— 
Bank Street was lined with streetlights. 

“Ginny!” I called. “Quick—out of the light!” I swerved into the dark 
doorway of a dress shop. Ginny followed. We leaped off our bikes and pressed 
ourselves into the shadows. 

The police car glided past. I held my breath as the headlights brushed across 
us. The car stopped. 

“He saw us!” Ginny whispered. “Run!” 

I grabbed her arm to stop her. “Wait.” I peeked out into the street. 

The police car was idling, but the driver stayed inside. 

“It’s a red light,” I told Ginny. A few seconds later the light turned green, 
and the police car rolled away. 

“We’re safe now,” I said. We hopped back onto our bikes and rode off. 

Midnight Mansion loomed huge and dark at the edge of town. People said 
that a crazy old woman had lived alone in the mansion for forty years. She was 
rich, but so stingy she wore ragged old clothes and ate nothing but peanut butter, 
right out of the jar. 

When people tried to visit her, she screamed, “Go away!” and threw rocks 
at them. She had about fifty cats. When she died, a businessman bought the 
mansion and turned it into a nightclub. 

I braked in front of the old house and stared at it. Midnight Mansion. 

It looked like a spooky old castle made of sooty black stone. Three stories 
tall, with two towers shooting up into the night sky. Vines crept across the roof. 
A floodlight threw creepy shadows over the house. 

I’d seen the mansion a million times before. But late at night it looked 
bigger and darker than usual. I thought I saw bats fluttering around the two 
towers. 

“No wonder the old lady went crazy,” Ginny whispered. “Living in a 
spooky place like that.” 

“Do you think she kept prisoners in those towers?” I wondered. 

“I think she had a torture chamber in the basement,” Ginny said. 

We walked our bikes up to the entrance. People hurried inside to see Amaz- 



O’s magic show. Three men in long black capes breezed past us. A woman with 
long black hair, black lipstick, and pointy black fingernails smiled at me. 

“Where did all these weird people come from?” Ginny asked. 

I shrugged. “Let’s go in. The show is about to start.” 

We locked our bikes and ran up the long stone steps. We entered a big hall 
lit by a crystal chandelier. We crossed the hall to a doorway covered by a heavy 
red curtain. 

A tall, thin man in a black tuxedo guarded the curtain. He reached out a 
long, bony finger to stop us. 

He had no hair, a pencil neck, and dark, hollow eye sockets. “He looks like 
a skeleton,” Ginny whispered to me. 

I pulled the two tickets out of my back pocket and handed them to him. 

“Very good,” he croaked in a low voice. “But where are your parents? I 
can’t seat children without their parents.” 

My parents? Think fast, Swanz-O, I told myself. “Um—my parents. Yes. 
Well, my parents, you see...” I had a feeling he didn’t want to hear that my 
parents were home sleeping. 

“They’re outside, parking the car,” I lied. “They’ll be here in a minute. 
They told us to come in and get a table.” 

The man’s hollow black eyes seemed to burn a hole in my brain. Would he 
buy it? 

“I don’t like it. But all right.” He led us through the red curtain. The 
houselights went down just as we walked in. He showed us to a table right next 
to the stage. 

“Excellent!” I said to Ginny as we sat down. “The best seats in the whole 
place!” 

“This is so exciting!” she exclaimed. “I can’t believe we’re in a real, grown¬ 
up nightclub. By ourselves!” 

The eerie-looking host stood by the red curtain, watching us. “We may not 
be here long,” I warned her. “That skeleton guy’s got his eye on us. When he 
realizes we’re not here with our parents—” 

“Shh! The show’s starting.” 

A voice came over a loudspeaker. “Ladies and gentlemen! Midnight 
Mansion is proud to present the most famous magician in America. The 
fabulous, the incredible, the mind-boggling Amaz-O!” 

A drum roll, and then horns bleating “Ta da!” The audience clapped and 



cheered. The curtain rose. 

I gasped when I saw the stage. It was filled with wonderful equipment—a 
tall, shiny black box with a door in the front, a platform suspended from the 
ceiling, a glittering box with holes in it for a head, arms, and legs to stick out of. 
And a big white rabbit sitting beside a vase of blue flowers on a table covered 
with a red scarf. 

The rabbit wasn’t tied up or caged or anything. “I wonder how he keeps that 
rabbit from running away,” Ginny whispered. “That’s a trick you need to learn.” 

“You’re so funny, Ginny,” I said, rolling my eyes. “My sides are splitting 
with laughter.” 

“You have no sense of humor,” Ginny jeered. “That’s your problem.” 

“No. You’re my problem,” I snapped. 

Amaz-0 strode onstage. He was tall and slim, and his top hat made him 
seem even taller. He had long black hair and wore a black cape lined with red 
satin over a black tuxedo. 

He tossed the cape over his shoulders and bowed. 

I can’t believe I’m seeing Amaz-0 in person! I thought, my heart pounding 
with excitement. And so close—I could almost touch him! 

Maybe I’ll even see how some of his tricks are done, I thought. Maybe, 
sitting so close, I’ll catch some of his secrets! 

Without saying a word, Amaz-0 scanned the audience. He trained his eyes 
on me. 

My whole body shook. He’s staring right at me! I gasped. 

Amaz-0 took a step forward and leaned toward me. 

What’s he doing? I thought. Is he going to talk to me? 

Amaz-0 leaned closer. His face was right next to mine! I cowered in my 

seat. 

He scowled and whispered in a deep, menacing voice, “Disappear! 
Disappear!” 



8 


I shrank back. 

“Disappear!” he growled again. 

“Excuse me?” I gasped. I stared up at him. On TV he seemed friendly. But 
in person he was definitely frightening. 

“Disappear!” he whispered. “I’m going to make you disappear at the end of 
the show. I will ask for volunteers—and I will choose you.” 

He didn’t want me to disappear for real. He wanted me to be part of his act! 
I couldn’t believe it! 

I’ll find out how he does his famous disappearing trick! I thought. Maybe 
I’ll get to meet him after the show. Maybe he’ll even tell me some of his secrets! 

Ginny leaned across the table. “He’s going to make you disappear forever!” 
she teased. “What will I tell Mom and Dad?” 

I paid no attention to her. Nothing Ginny did or said could bother me now. 

This was too cool! Just seeing Amaz-0 was exciting enough. But he chose 
me to be in his show! 

Maybe he could tell that I’m a magician, too, I thought. 

Amaz-0 began his act. “Good evening, ladies and gentlemen,” he crooned. 
“Tonight you will see some amazing feats. You will see me do things you always 
thought were impossible. Are these feats real—or are they illusions? It’s up to 
you to decide.” 

He waved his hands, and a wand appeared out of thin air. The audience 
clapped. 

Then Amaz-0 began to fidget with his hat, as if it felt uncomfortable on his 
head. “Something is wrong with my hat,” he said. “It feels strange—almost as 
if...” 

He lifted the hat off his head and peered into it. He showed us the inside of 
it. It looked perfectly normal. There was nothing inside it. 

He placed it back on his head. “It’s funny,” he chuckled. “I thought for a 
minute there might be something inside my hat. I thought I felt—oh, I don’t 
know—a flock of birds fluttering around in there.” 

The hat jiggled. Amaz-0 appeared annoyed. “There it goes again!” 

He whipped the hat off his head and stared into it. On top of his head sat a 



large white feather. People in the audience giggled. 

“What’s so funny?” Amaz-0 asked. He felt the top of his head and found 
the feather. “Where did that come from?” he gasped, acting amazed. Everyone 
laughed. 

“Well, I’ll try not to let this bother me,” he went on, replacing his hat. 
“Back to the show. For my first trick—” 

The hat began to shake again—slightly at first, then harder. It practically 
jumped off his head. The audience cracked up. Amaz-0 pretended to be 
horrified. 

He yanked the hat off his head—and out flew a whole flock of doves! They 
swooped over the audience and flew up to the rafters. 

“I knew something was going on in there!” Amaz-0 joked. Loud laughter 
and clapping. 

He’s the greatest, I thought, clapping along. How did he get all those birds 
inside his hat? 

I glanced at the rabbit on stage. It sat calmly on the table, staring at Amaz- 
O. It almost seemed to be watching the act. 

I can’t wait to see his rabbit trick, I thought. Will he make the rabbit 
disappear? Or pull off some kind of twist? 

“For my next trick I need a needle and thread,” Amaz-0 announced. He 
produced a packet of needles and a long, thick thread from one of his pockets. 
He picked out a needle and squinted, trying to push the thread through the eye. 

“I always have trouble threading a needle,” he said. He licked the end of the 
thread and tried again. He couldn’t get the thread to go through. 

He threw up his hands in frustration. “It’s impossible!” he cried. “How do 
tailors do it?” 

The audience chuckled. I waited to see what would come next. I knew all 
this needle-and-thread business was a buildup to something incredible. 

“So much for the hard way to thread a needle,” Amaz-0 said. “I’ll show 
you a better way.” 

He snatched up the packet of needles. There must have been at least twenty 
needles stuck into a piece of cardboard. He popped the whole thing into his 
mouth. Then he dangled the long string over his mouth like a piece of spaghetti. 

He slowly drew the string into his mouth, chewing. It looked as if he were 
eating a piece of spaghetti—with a packet of needles in his mouth, too. 

“Don’t you think that hurts?” Ginny whispered. “Chewing up all those 



needles?” 

I barely nodded. I watched Amaz-O, spellbound. 

Amaz-0 nearly swallowed the whole string. About an inch of string stuck 
out between his lips. The audience waited, hushed. 

He paused. Then he opened his mouth and tugged at the string. Slowly, 
slowly, he pulled it out of his mouth. 

One by one the needles appeared—dangling from the string! Somehow he 
had threaded twenty needles with his tongue! 

The audience gasped, then applauded. The needles flashed as Amaz-0 held 
up the string. 

“Threading needles the easy way!” he cried as he took another bow. 

I’ve got to find out how he did that, I thought. Maybe I’ll ask him after the 
show. 

“How’s the show going?” Amaz-0 asked the audience. We all cheered. “I 
wonder how much time we have left?” He strode across the stage to the table 
where the rabbit and the blue flowers sat on top of the red scarf. 

With a flick of his wrist, he yanked the scarf out from under the rabbit. 

The rabbit didn’t move. Neither did the vase of flowers. The table was now 

bare. 

The rabbit blinked calmly. Amaz-0 waved the scarf over his left hand. He 
let it drop—and a big red alarm clock appeared in his hand! 

He glanced at the clock. “I suppose we have time for a few more tricks.” He 
covered the clock with the scarf—and the clock disappeared. 

A loud ringing suddenly erupted from the other side of the stage. I turned 
toward it. 

The red alarm clock—floating in midair! It seemed to have flown across the 
stage by itself. 

Amaz-0 crossed the stage, grabbed the clock, and shut off the alarm. 

“My clock is a little fast,” he joked. “It’s not time for the show to end. Not 

yet.” 

I hope not, I thought. This is the greatest magic act I’ve ever seen in my 

life! 

The rest of the show was fantastic, too. Amaz-0 escaped from a locked 
safe. He walked through a brick wall. He tapped his hat with his magic wand— 
and in a puff of smoke his tuxedo changed from black to yellow! 

“And now for my big finale,” Amaz-0 announced. “I am going to make a 



member of the audience disappear. Are there any volunteers?” 

He gazed out over the audience. No one said a word. Ginny kicked me 
under the table. 

“Ow!” I whispered, rubbing my skin. “What did you do that for?” 

“He asked for volunteers, you moron,” she said. “That means you.” 

I’d been so caught up in the show, I almost forgot. I stood up. “I’d like to 
volunteer.” 

Amaz-0 smiled. “Excellent, young man. Please step up on stage.” 

My stomach suddenly jolted with terror. I stumbled up to the stage. 

Here I go, I thought nervously. Amaz-0 is going to make me disappear. 

I hope nothing goes wrong. 



9 


Amaz-0 towered over me on stage. This is unbelievable, I thought. I’m on stage 
with the great Amaz-O. I’m about to be part of one of his famous tricks. 

He’s going to make me disappear! 

I clutched my stomach, wondering, Why do I feel so scared? 

“Thanks for volunteering, young man,” Amaz-0 said to me. “You must be 
very brave. Are your parents here tonight?” 

My parents? Uh-oh. “Um—they’re here. Sure they’re here,” I stammered. 
“But—uh—they had to make a phone call.” 

Amaz-0 frowned. “A phone call? In the middle of my show?” 

“Well—it was an emergency,” I explained. 

“Never mind. I’m glad they’ve stepped away. If they knew what was about 
to happen to you, they might try to stop me.” 

“Stop you?” My heart skittered nervously. But I heard the audience 
laughing. 

Don’t let him scare you, I told myself. This is just part of the act. He’s 
joking. 

I faked a laugh. “What—um—exactly—is about to happen to me?” 

“I’m going to make you disappear,” Amaz-0 replied. “You will be 
transported into another dimension. I will try my best to bring you back, of 
course—but it doesn’t always work.” 

“It doesn’t?” I gulped. 

He patted me on the back. “Don’t worry. I’ve done this hundreds of times. 
I’ve only missed once or twice.” 

The audience chuckled. They figured he was kidding. I hoped they were 
right. 

“Is that your sister sitting at the front table?” Amaz-0 asked. 

I nodded. 

“Better wave good-bye to her, just in case,” he warned me. 

Ginny smiled and waved at me. 

She can’t wait for me to disappear! I thought bitterly. She hopes I’ll never 
come back. 



“Go on,” Amaz-0 urged. “Wave to her.” 

I smiled weakly and waved at Ginny. The audience laughed. Then Amaz-0 
led me to a tall black box in the center of the stage. He threw open the door. It 
looked like a closet inside. 

“Step inside here if you would, please,” he said. 

I stepped inside the box. Amaz-0 shut the door firmly. 

It was pitch-black inside that box. I stood still, waiting for something to 
happen. I could hear Amaz-0 talking to the audience. 

“Ladies and gentlemen, this box is my own invention—the Fifth Dimension 
Spin-o-Rama.” I heard him slap his hand against the side of the box. 

“Here’s how it works: my brave volunteer steps inside the box. I lock him 
in. I spin the box ten times —very fast. 

“A magical force inside the box will send the boy into another dimension. 
He will disappear! 

“I must ask for absolute silence while I do this trick. I need complete 
concentration.” 

For several seconds I heard nothing. 

Then the box began to spin. “Whoa!” I cried. My body slammed against the 
back of the box. 

It whirled around faster than any ride in an amusement park. I shut my eyes. 
I felt so dizzy. 

I hope I don’t puke, I thought. That would spoil everything. 

The box kept spinning, spinning. How will the trick work? I wondered. 
How will I disappear? 

What if he really sends me into another dimension? 

But that’s just talk, I told myself. Magician talk—to entertain the audience. 

Isn’t it? 



10 


The box spun faster and faster. I clutched my stomach. I saw stars dancing 
before my eyes. 

When is it going to stop? I thought. I’m really going to be sick. 

Then, suddenly, the bottom of the box dropped out from under me. 

“Help!” I cried as I fell down, down, down. 

“Whoa!” 

I slid down a long wooden chute and landed— thunk !—on some kind of 
mattress. 

I lay on my back in a daze. I heard water dripping somewhere. A dim 
yellow light flickered from a bare bulb on the ceiling. 

I sat up, gazing around me. The room was nearly empty, dark and damp, 
with a cement floor. I spotted a furnace in the corner. 

I’m in the basement of Midnight Mansion, I realized. 

I stood up and examined the chute. So that’s how the trick works, I thought. 
Amaz-0 sets up his spinning box over a trap door in the floor of the stage. The 
bottom of the box drops out, and the volunteer slides down the chute and out of 
sight. When Amaz-0 opens the door of the box— presto !—the volunteer has 
disappeared. It’s so simple. 

But how do I get back upstairs? I wondered. How will Amaz-0 make me 
reappear? 

Muffled applause drifted down from overhead. I could hear Amaz-O’s 
voice, faintly. “Thank you very much, ladies and gentlemen. I must be going 
now. I’ve got to disappear into the fifth dimension and find that boy! Good 
night!” 

The audience laughed. Then I heard music, an explosion, and loud 
clapping. 

Amaz-0 must have made himself disappear, I thought. He’ll probably come 
sliding down this chute any minute. 

I waited. 

No one came sliding down the chute. 

I waited a few more minutes. 

Nothing. 



He must have disappeared some other way, I figured. 

He’ll show up soon, I thought. He’ll come and let me out of here. And then 
I’ll ask him how he does that trick with the alarm clock. Maybe he’ll even give 
me his autograph! 

A few minutes later I heard chairs scraping across the floor upstairs and a 
stampede of footsteps. The show was over. The audience was leaving. 

Is somebody going to let me out of here? I wondered. I was getting a little 
nervous. I sat down on the mattress to wait. 

What’s taking Amaz-0 so long? 

Maybe he wants to wait until everyone is gone, so no one will figure out 
how he did the trick. That must be it. 

I waited a little longer. I heard a rustling, scuttling noise. A rat! I thought, 
jumping up off the mattress. I stared at the floor, watching for the rat. 

The noise stopped. 

Maybe it wasn’t a rat, I thought, trying to calm myself. My muscles were all 
tense. Maybe it was only a mouse. Or a cockroach. Or my imagination. 

The drip, drip, drip of the water somewhere in the basement was starting to 
drive me crazy. Drip, drip, drip. Like some kind of water torture. 

Where is Amaz-O? When is he going to let me out of here? 

I listened for signs of life upstairs. Nothing. Everything was silent up there 

now. 

Okay, I said to myself. Everyone is gone. You can let me out now, Amaz-O. 

I listened hard. I didn’t hear anyone in the building. 

What if Amaz-O is gone, too? I thought, panicking. What if he forgot about 
me and left me here? 

I’ve got to find a way out myself, I decided. 

I crept across the cement floor, keeping an eye out for rats. 

It sure is dark down here, I thought. 

I drifted toward the dripping sound and found myself in a room with a big 
laundry sink. I crossed the laundry room. On the other side I found a steep flight 
of steps leading to a door at the top. 

Aha, I thought, feeling better now. A way out. 

I climbed the rickety stairs. I reached for the doorknob and pushed. 

The door didn’t open. I turned the knob again and pulled. 

Nothing. 

The door was locked! 



I rattled the door as hard as I could. I pounded on it with my fists. 
“Let me out of here!” I cried. “Can anyone hear me? 

“Let me out of here!” 



11 


“Hey!” I shouted. I rattled the door. “Somebody! Get me out of here!” 

How could Amaz-0 do this? I thought angrily. How could he forget all 
about me like this? 

He wouldn’t lock me in the basement on purpose—would he? 

No, I told myself. Why would he want to do that? 

It’s all just a big mistake. 

I shook the door again. It loosened a little. I pushed on it, and it opened a 
crack. 

The door was bolted from the outside with a metal hook. But the hook 
wasn’t secure. 

I’ll bet I can break the door open, I realized. 

I backed partway down the stairs. Then I ran to the top and threw myself 
against the door. 

“Ow!” I grunted. The door loosened a little more. But it didn’t open. And 
now my shoulder ached. 

Then I thought the unthinkable. I couldn’t believe I was thinking this—but I 
sure wished Ginny were with me. 

She could’ve karate-kicked through that door in about five seconds. I know, 
because she’s kicked her way into my bedroom lots of times. 

Where is Ginny, anyway? I thought. She must be outside in the parking lot, 
waiting for me. 

I had to try again. I rammed my shoulder against the door as hard as I 
could. 

Bang! The hook broke, and the door flew open. 

Excellent, I thought, rubbing my shoulder. I’m out of that horrible basement 
at last. 

But where am I now? 

A long, dark corridor. 

“Hello?” I called. No answer. “Hello?” 

Where is everybody? I wondered. Shouldn’t there be stagehands bustling 
around or something? 



I tiptoed down the hall. The place appeared deserted. 

How could they have left me down in the basement like that? I thought 
angrily. How could they leave me here alone—and just go home? 

At the end of the hall I saw a sliver of light. It came from under a door. 

Someone’s still here, I realized. Maybe it’s Amaz-O! 

I crept down the hall. The door had a star on it. It must be Amaz-O’s 
dressing room! I thought. This is fantastic! I’m alone in Midnight Mansion with 
the great Amaz-O! We’ll probably stay up all night talking about magic. If I 
could get him to show me a few of his secrets... 

I felt so excited and nervous my hands shook. I almost forgot about being 
left in the basement. 

That was just a mistake, I thought. A stagehand forgot to come get me. 
Amaz-O must have thought I was all right. He’ll probably be really glad to see 
me. 

I stared at the star on the door. What should I do? I wondered. Should I 
knock? Should I call out his name? 

I’ll knock, I decided. I stepped to the door. Thunk! I tripped over something 
propped against the wall. A large black case with PROPERTY OF AMAZ-O 
written on the side. 

Wow, I thought, running my fingers along the gold letters. This must be 
Amaz-O’s magic kit! I’m touching it with my own hands! 

I turned back to the door. I was about to meet my idol, my all-time hero. It 
was the biggest moment of my life. 

I reached for the door. My hand trembled. I knocked lightly. 

I waited. 

Maybe he didn’t hear me, I thought. I knocked again, harder this time. 

Nothing. 

“Hello?” I called softly, peeking into the room. Amaz-O’s big white rabbit 
perched on the couch. 

Amaz-O sat on a chair across from the rabbit. I could see his legs. 

“Hello?” I called again. “It’s me. From the disappearing act. Can I come 

in?” 

I paused at the door. Amaz-O didn’t answer me. Suddenly the door 
slammed shut in my face! 

“Hey!” I cried in surprise. 

A voice growled at me from the other side. “Beat it!” 



“But—I’m your biggest fan! I’d just like to shake hands—” 
“Beat it!” the voice snarled again. “Beat it, punk!” 



12 


Punk? Punk? 

Did the great Amaz-0 call me a punk? 

I couldn’t believe it. I stood staring at the star on the door in shock. 

How could Amaz-0 talk to me this way? After I volunteered for his 
disappearing trick—and he left me locked in the basement! 

What’s his problem, anyway? 

For a few seconds I couldn’t move. I couldn’t think. My hero had called me 
a punk. The greatest magician in the world—and he turned out to be a big fat 
jerk! 

Okay, so he wasn’t fat. But he was the biggest jerk I’d ever met in my 
whole life. 

I hung my head and turned away from the door to leave. Then I saw it again 
—the big black case. 

Amaz-O’s magic kit. 

Without thinking, I grabbed the case and ran. 

It was heavy and awkward, but I lugged it down the hall as quickly and 
quietly as I could. 

Why am I doing this? I wondered as I burst into the stage area. 

I’m still not sure why I did it. I’d gone through so much trouble to get to the 
show—sneaking out of the house to meet Amaz-O. And then he was so mean to 
me. Maybe I wanted to get back at him. 

It doesn’t matter why I did it. I did it. I stole Amaz-O’s magic tricks. 

In the back of my mind, I knew I was headed for trouble. 

I paused near the stage. Was Amaz-0 following me? I listened. 

Not a sound. No one coming. I swallowed hard and started running again. 

I passed under the chandelier in the lobby and burst through the front door. 
I hope Amaz-0 was the last person in the club, I thought. I hope there aren’t any 
guards lurking around. 

I didn’t have time to check. I dragged the case across the gravel parking lot 
toward my bike. 

Almost there, I told myself, panting. The parking lot was empty now. The 
floodlights that lit up the mansion were off. The old house lay hidden in 



darkness. 

It must be really late, I thought. I’d better hurry home. 

My bike stood where I’d left it, leaning against a rail. 

I was reaching for the handlebars when a voice called “Stop 
I froze. 

I knew I was caught. 



13 


I heard heavy footsteps crunch toward me across the gravel parking lot. 

Here they come, I thought. They’ve caught me red-handed with Amaz-O’s 
bag. They’ll probably arrest me. 

“Where were you?” the voice called. 

Ginny! I’d completely forgotten about her. Oops. 

“Why are you leaving without me?” she demanded. 

“Wh-why?” I stammered. What could I say? I didn’t want to admit I’d 
forgotten all about her. “I-I wasn’t leaving without you. I was looking for you. 
Where have you been?” 

“Looking for you, Tim,” she snapped. “What happened to you? You 
disappeared—and you never came back!” 

“It’s a long story,” I said. 

She leaned forward to read the lettering on Amaz-O’s black case. 
“'Property of Amaz-O.’ Where did you get that?” 

“He gave it to me,” I lied. “Wasn’t that nice of him?” 

She reached out to open the clasp that held the case shut. “Cool. What’s 
inside?” 

I stopped her hand. “I’ll show it to you when we get home. It’s filled with 
tricks. Amaz-0 said I could keep it. He was grateful to me for being such a good 
sport in the disappearing act.” 

Ginny looked puzzled. “If Amaz-0 gave you that case,” she began, “why 
are those guards running this way?” 

I glanced toward the mansion. Two guards charged across the parking lot, 
waving flashlights. Uh-oh. 

I grabbed the case. “Let’s get out of here!” I cried. “Quick—get on your 
bike. Let’s ride!” 

“I can’t!” Ginny cried. 

“Huh? Why not?” 

“My bike is gone!” 



14 


I jumped on my bike. “Too bad!” I cried. “See you at home!” 

“Tim!” Ginny wailed. “You can’t leave me here!” 

I would have left her there if I could. She can take care of herself. But I 
knew Mom and Dad would kill me. 

Besides, when the guards caught her, she’d tell on me. I’d still get in 
trouble. 

I sat on my bike, watching the guards run right for us. Then I spotted her 
bike on the edge of the parking lot. “It’s over there!” I told her. “Hurry!” 

She raced to her bike. I balanced the case on top of my handlebars. It wasn’t 

easy. 

“Stop!” a guard yelled. Ginny and I sped out of the parking lot and down 
the dark street. 

“Hey—stop!” the guards shouted. The beams of their flashlights blinded me 
for a second. I pedaled as hard as I could. Ginny darted ahead of me. 

I clutched the black case with one hand and steered with the other. The case 
slowed me down. The guards were gaining on us. At the first corner I zoomed 
left. Ginny followed. 

I glanced back. The guards had stopped running. One of them bent over, 
panting. 

“They’ll never catch us now!” Ginny shouted. We hiked home as fast as we 
could. The streets were empty and really dark. The lights were out in most of the 
houses. 

It’s after midnight, I realized. Please let Mom and Dad be asleep. If they 
catch us, they’ll ground us till we’re thirty-five! I’d almost rather be arrested. 

But then, if I got arrested, Mom and Dad would still ground me. 

We braked at our street and walked our bikes into the driveway. 

“Sshhh,” Ginny whispered. 

“Sshhh yourself,” I whispered back. 

We parked the bikes in the garage. It was hard to see without the lights on. 
On the way into the house, Ginny tripped over the lawn mower. 

“Ow!” she yelped. 

“Quiet!” I snapped. 



We both froze. Did Mom and Dad hear us? 

Silence. “I think it’s okay,” I whispered. 

“That hurt,” Ginny whined. 

“Ssshhhh!” 

We sneaked into the house. “Til hide the case in my room,” I whispered. 

“I want to look at it now,” Ginny protested. 

I shook my head. “It’s mine.” 

“No, it’s not. You have to share it with me.” 

“Amaz-0 gave it to me,” I insisted, even though it wasn’t exactly true. 

“I’m going to tell Mom and Dad,” Ginny threatened. “I’ll tell them you 
woke me up and forced me to go with you to Midnight Mansion.” 

“You little brat!” I cried angrily. Stupid Ginny. “Okay, I’ll share it with 
you.” 

“Promise?” 

“If you promise not to tell Mom and Dad.” 

“I promise. But you can’t keep the case in your room. It’s both of ours 
now.” 

I sighed. “All right. I’ll hide it in the attic. Okay?” 

She nodded. 

“But we won’t touch it until Saturday,” I said. “On Saturday, we’ll have 
plenty of time to try everything out and do it right. Deal?” 

“Deal. On Saturday we’ll both open the case, at the same time, together. ” 

“Right. Now go to bed. I’ll sneak it up to the attic.” 

We tried to be careful going up the creaky stairs. It took us about ten 
minutes. At the top I paused to listen for sounds from Mom and Dad’s room. 

“Everything is okay,” Ginny whispered. “Dad is snoring.” 

She crept into her room and shut the door. I tiptoed up to the attic, lugging 
the black case. 

I shut the attic door and switched on the light. Where can I hide this? I 
wondered, gazing around at all the junk. I stepped over piles of old magazines. 
In one corner sat my old toy chest. 

Perfect, I thought, opening the chest. I pulled out a toy school bus and a 
couple of trucks to make room for the case. 

What’s in here, anyway? I wondered as I hefted Amaz-O’s case. I held 
Amaz-O’s magic kit in my hands. How could I go to sleep without seeing what’s 
in it? How could I wait two whole days until Saturday? 



Maybe I’ll take a little peek inside, I thought. Just a quick one. Then I’ll go 
to bed. 

I set the case on the floor. My hands trembled as I fumbled with the clasp. 
Here goes, I thought, tugging open the clasp. I pulled the case open— 

And it blew up in my face! 



15 


I fell over backwards. I lay sprawled on the floor, covering my eyes. 

What happened? 

Am I dead? 

I opened my eyes. I squeezed my arms. I grabbed my chest. 

I’m okay, I realized. 

I sat up. The case sat on the floor. No signs of an explosion. 

Carefully I crawled over to the case. I could have sworn it had blown up. 
But I didn’t see anything that would blow up. 

Then, taped to the inside of the top flap, I saw a little metal disk. I tapped it. 
It made a muffled roar. 

I examined the metal disk. It was an electronic chip. It made an explosion 
sound effect when I shook it or tapped it. 

Just one of Amaz-O’s tricks. 

What else is in here? I wondered. 

I pulled out all kinds of cool stuff. A pair of trick handcuffs. A pocket watch 
for hypnotizing people. Three different decks of trick cards. A rope. And a long 
chain of silk scarves tied together. 

I wonder how all this stuff works, I thought. I’ll have to fool around with it 
on Saturday and figure it out. 

I found a small black sack that held three oval shells and a little red ball. 
The shell game, I realized. One of my favorite tricks. You hide the ball under one 
of the shells and shift them around. The audience has to guess which shell the 
ball is under. 

They always guess wrong, because the ball isn’t under any of the shells. 
The magician secretly palms the ball while he’s shifting the shells around. 

Gets ’em every time. 

I reached into the case again. My hand brushed against something silky. I 
pulled it out. It was a black tuxedo jacket. 

“Wow!” I gasped. “Amaz-O’s own jacket!” 

I had to try it on. I pulled it over my shoulders. It was too big. The 
shoulders drooped halfway down my arms, and the sleeves covered my hands. 

But it felt great. I ran my hands over the satin lapels. 



I stood up and walked around in it. A real magician’s jacket. I wonder what 
he’s got in the pockets? 

I stuck my hands in the pockets. But suddenly I felt something wiggle. 
Along the back of the jacket, near my neck. 

I shook my shoulders. The wiggling stopped. 

But then I felt it again. Something came sliding down the sleeve! 

I shook my arm. What is it? I thought. Is it alive? 

The thing crawled along my arm. “Yuck!” I sputtered. “Get off me!” I 
squirmed inside the coat, trying to shake the thing off. 

I had to get the jacket off—right away! I struggled to get my arms out of the 
sleeves. 

Then something poked its head out. Out of the sleeve, near my hand. 

A snake. 

Alive snake. 



16 


I clamped my mouth shut to keep from screaming. The snake felt warm and 
creepy against my arm. I shook my arm hard. The snake clung to me! 

I gritted my teeth and shook my arm again. And again. I brushed at my 
sleeve with my free hand. 

It wasn’t working! 

I shook my arm once more, as hard as I could. The snake uncoiled and 
slithered out of the sleeve. It dropped to the floor. 

It hissed and curved around the toy chest. I watched it with a shiver. 

Then I felt it again—that slippery, wriggling feeling. Something hissed near 
my ear and squirmed across my shoulder. 

“Ohhh!” I moaned. Another snake! I slapped at it. “Get off me!” 

As I tried to brush the snake away, another one slithered down my sleeve. 
Something slimy wriggled across my stomach and down my back. A snake 
popped out of an inner pocket and plopped to the floor. It started to coil around 
my leg. 

The jacket is crammed with snakes! I realized with horror. 

I thrashed my arms, frantically trying to tear off the jacket. A snake slid 
down the front of my shirt. 

I thrashed harder, shaking my arms and legs. Now I was covered with 
snakes! My whole body! 

I wanted to scream—but I couldn’t wake Mom and Dad. A snake curled up 
my neck and around my head. I squirmed, desperately trying to get out of the 
jacket. 

“Help!” I moaned. “Ohhhh—help!” 



17 


Snakes everywhere! 

One slithered over my head. With a trembling hand, I grabbed at it and 
heaved it away. 

Gasping in terror, I struggled out of the jacket. I tossed it on the floor. 
Snakes wriggled over it. Snakes wriggled over my feet. I hopped up and down. 
Then I hopped onto a chair. A snake coiled up the leg of the chair. It crept closer. 
“Go away!” I whispered. “Leave me alone!” 

The snake hissed. I jumped off the chair. 

Squish! My stomach turned. Did I step on a snake? I was afraid to look. 

I lifted my foot and glanced down. I hadn’t stepped on a snake. It was one 
of Ginny’s old dolls. 

A snake slid over the doll’s face and around its neck. Another snake 
slithered over my shoe. 

There’s no escape! I realized. I’ve got no choice—I have to wake up Mom 
and Dad. What else can I do? 

I hopped around the squirming, hissing snakes. 

I’ll get into trouble, I thought. But at least I’ll be out of this snake pit! 

A snake darted toward me—then suddenly froze. The room fell silent. No 
more hissing. 

All around me the snakes stopped moving. They lay stiff on the floor. Their 
cold eyes stared. 

What happened? Were they dead? 

I glanced around, afraid to move. The floor was littered with dead snakes. 

How could they all die at once? I wondered. It’s so weird! 

I stood there, not moving a muscle. My eyes darted around the room. 

I slowly reached out my leg and tapped one of the snakes with my foot. It 
jiggled a little. 

I took a deep breath. Should I touch it? 

I got up the courage to bend close to the snake. I stuck out a finger and 
poked at it. Nothing happened. My heart pounded. I picked up the snake. 

It lay limp in my hand. It didn’t seem real. 



I twisted the body. It was rubber! I examined the eyes. They were made of 
glass. 

They’re mechanical snakes, I realized. 

I turned the snake over. I found a tiny wind-up key hidden under a rubber 

flap. 

Amaz-O’s jacket was rigged with wind-up snakes. 

I began to breathe again. Everything is okay, I told myself. I don’t have to 
wake up Mom and Dad. I’m not going to get into trouble. I’m not going to be 
eaten alive by snakes. 

When will I learn? I scolded myself. All of these things are just tricks. None 
of them is real. Amaz-0 is a magician. 

I gathered up the snakes and stuffed them back inside the jacket. Then I 
jammed the jacket into Amaz-O’s magic kit. I took one last look inside the bag. 

This is amazing, I thought. I’ve got some of Amaz-O’s best tricks—right 
here in my own house! 

I forced myself to close the kit. I’d better stop fooling around with this 
stuff, I thought—before anything else happens! 

I’ll check it all out on Saturday. In daylight, when I have plenty of time to 
see how it all works. 

Then I’ll give the kit back to Amaz-O. On Monday. 

I knew I had to return the kit. It had been wrong to take it. And crazy. 

If only Amaz-0 hadn’t been so mean to me! He used me in his act—and 
then he locked me in the basement! He told me to get lost. He called me a punk! 

I started to get angry all over again. Amaz-0 doesn’t deserve to get his 
magic kit back, I thought. 

But deep down I knew I had to return it. I wanted to do the right thing. I’d 
check out the tricks, then give them back. 

Of course, I didn’t know then how dangerous the kit was. I didn’t know the 
trouble it would cause. 

If I had known, I would have returned the case that night! 



18 


“Another day of work,” Mom sighed at the breakfast table the next morning. 
“I’m absolutely dreading it. Those students just drive me crazy.” 

Dad grabbed a doughnut and gazed out the window. “It’s raining,” he said 
unhappily. “I probably won’t sell a single car today.” 

Ginny and I exchanged glances. Mom and Dad had no idea we had sneaked 
out the night before. 

I slumped into a chair and ate my cereal. I was sleepy. I’m not used to 
staying up so late. 

“You look tired, Tim,” Mom said, sitting across from me. She glanced at 
Ginny. “So do you, honey.” 

“Didn’t you two get any sleep?” Dad asked. 

“Sure we did,” I replied. 

Ginny grinned. “Not that much sleep. Tim and I have a secret!” 

The little brat! I kicked her under the table. 

“Ow!” she cried. “Tim kicked me!” 

“Don’t kick your sister,” Dad scolded. “I have to leave.” He picked up his 
briefcase and kissed Mom good-bye. “Off to another day of torture. See you 
tonight, kids.” 

Dad left. Mom started clearing away the breakfast dishes. “Did you say 
something about a secret?” she asked. 

“No!” I insisted. “Ginny didn’t say anything about a secret. She said, 'Tim 
and I want a wee pet.’” 

Mom shot me a weird look. “A what? A wee pet?” 

“Yeah,” I said. “You know, a little pet. A nice little kitten or something. 
Ginny’s learning about Scotland in school now. She’s picked up some Scottish 
words, right, Ginny? She’s been running around calling everything ‘wee’.” 

“I have not,” Ginny protested. “I’ve never called anything ‘wee’ in my life! 
And I’m not learning about Scotland in school!” 

“Yes, you are, ” I insisted. 

“What in the world are you two talking about?” Mom carried the pile of 
cereal bowls to the sink. 

“We did a bad thing, Mom,” Ginny blurted out. “Ow!” I kicked her again, 



but that didn’t stop her. 

“We sneaked out last night, Mom. We rode our bikes to Midnight Mansion 
to see the magic show. We didn’t get back until after midnight. I’m sorry, Mom. 
Please don’t get angry. Tim made me do it. I didn’t want to.” 

I covered my face with my hands. Why does Ginny have to be such a big 
mouth? 

I’m doomed, I thought. Doomed! 



19 


“What did you say, Ginny?” Mom asked, wiping her hands on a towel. “I was 
running water in the sink, and I couldn’t hear you.” 

I let out a long breath. I couldn’t believe my luck. I glared at Ginny and 
kicked her again—really hard this time. 

“Nothing, Mom,” Ginny murmured. “I didn’t say anything.” 

“You two better get ready for school,” Mom said. 

I pushed my chair away from the table and dragged Ginny out of hers. 
“We’ll be ready in a minute, Mom,” I said. 

“What is your problem?” I whispered to Ginny in the hall. “You could’ve 
gotten us in big trouble!” 

“You would get in trouble. Not me,” Ginny replied. “You’re the big brother. 
You made me go.” 

“I didn’t make you do anything. And anyway, you promised not to tell!” 

“You promised not to peek into Amaz-O’s kit until Saturday,” Ginny 
reminded me. “But I sneaked up to the attic this morning—and I know you 
looked! You opened that bag! You even played with some of the stuff!” 

“Me? I did not!” I lied. 

“Yes, you did. One of the sleeves of a jacket was sticking out of the kit. 
And I found a scarf on the floor. You big fat liar!” 

“So what? You’ll still get to see the stuff on Saturday.” 

“You promised,” Ginny repeated. She flicked my nose. “Boi-oi-oing.” 

I stormed into my room. There’s no arguing with Ginny. She does whatever 
she wants—promise or no promise. 

She’s always getting me into trouble, I thought angrily. She drives me 
crazy! I wish there were some way I could pay her back. Some way to pay her 
back for everything. 

Little did I realize I would soon find it. 



20 


“Are you sure you kids don’t want to go to the antiques show with us?” Dad 
asked. “You might see some neat old junk there.” 

“We’re sure,” I insisted. Saturday morning had arrived, and all I could think 
about was Amaz-O’s magic kit. I couldn’t wait to get my hands on it. 

I wished my parents would hurry up and leave. 

“All right,” Mom said, kissing Ginny and then me. “There’s tuna salad in 
the fridge for lunch. We won’t be back until dinnertime.” 

“Be good,” Dad added. 

“I'll be good,” Ginny declared. “I don’t know about Tim. ” 

I tried to shove her, but she dodged me. “I’ll be good,” I promised. “I’m 
always good.” 

Mom rolled her eyes. “Just don’t fight too much,” she said. “’Bye.” 

Ah. At last. As soon as they were gone, I raced to the phone and dialed 
Foz’s number. 

“The coast is clear,” I told him. “Come on over.” 

I’d told Foz all about the show at Midnight Mansion and Amaz-O’s magic 
kit. He begged me to let him see the cool tricks in Amaz-O’s bag. 

As soon as Foz arrived, we all trooped up to the attic. Ginny made a beeline 
for the magic kit. I blocked her. 

“Heee-ya!” She leaped into a pre-karate chop stance. “Out of my way!” 

“Ginny—wait!” I pleaded. “There’s a lot of weird stuff in that bag. Let me 
show it to you my way.” 

“Okay.” She relaxed. “But don’t forget you’re supposed to share it with 

me.” 

I pulled up two chairs. “You guys sit here,” I said to Ginny and Foz. “And 
get ready for the greatest magic show in the history of the world!” 

I reached into the toy chest and pulled out Amaz-O’s magic kit. I held it up 
in front of Foz and Ginny. “First,” I began in my magician voice, “gaze deeply 
into the magic trove.” 

I held the bag near their faces. They stared at it. I yanked it open. 

Kaboom! It made the exploding sound, just as it did the first time I opened 
it. 



Ginny and Foz fell off their chairs! 

“What happened?” Foz moaned, clutching his head. “That thing blew up in 
my face!” 

I cracked up. “It’s only a sound effect,” I explained. 

“Not funny,” Ginny complained. 

“You should have seen your faces,” I said gleefully. I reached into the black 
sack that held the three shells and the red ball. I set the shells in a row on a small 
table. 

“Watch closely,” I said. I held up the red ball. “See this ball? I’ll place it 
under one of these shells.” I pretended to tuck the ball under the middle shell. 
But secretly I palmed the ball and flicked it up my sleeve. 

I began moving the shells over the table, shifting their places. 

“Keep your eyes on the middle shell,” I instmcted. Then I stopped moving 
the shells. 

“Which shell is the ball under?” I asked. 

“That one,” Ginny said, pointing to the shell on the right. 

“Are you sure?” I prompted. “Foz, where do you think the ball is?” 

“The same one as Ginny,” he said. “I watched it the whole time.” 

“If you say so,” I said. I was sure the ball wasn’t under that shell—it wasn’t 
under any of them. I felt the ball rubbing against my wrist. 

I lifted the shell—and gasped. There was a ball under there. A red ball, just 
like the one I’d palmed. 

“I was right!” Ginny crowed. “That’s a stupid trick.” 

“But this is impossible!” I cried. I let the first ball fall out of my sleeve. I 
had palmed it. 

“This is very strange,” I muttered. “Let me try again.” 

I dropped the first ball on the floor. I picked up the second ball and 
pretended to slip it under a different shell. I palmed the ball and tucked it up my 
sleeve again. 

“Here we go,” I said, shifting the shells all over the table. I slid the shells 
around a little longer, then stopped. 

“The ball is under the first shell,” Foz said. 

“Yes, the first shell,” Ginny agreed. 

“This time you’re wrong!” I cried. I lifted the first shell. Another red ball! 

Ginny sneered. “You’re a real ace, Tim.” 

“Wait a second,” I said. I lifted up the other two shells. All three of them 



had red balls under them! 

“This isn’t working at all,” I grumbled. I set the shells down, then lifted 
them again. More balls! There were now three balls under each shell! 

“This isn’t the shell game I know.” I was mystified. “This must be some 
other trick.” 

“It’s way better than your dumb trick,” Ginny said. “Those balls are coming 
out of nowhere!” 

The shells began to dance as balls bubbled out of them like popcorn. Ten 
balls. Twenty balls. 

Little red balls covered the table and bounced to the floor. 

“They’re still coming!” Foz cried in amazement. “We’re going to be up to 
our necks in red balls!” 

“How do I stop this thing?” I wondered. 

Can I stop it? 



21 


I snatched up the shells and tossed them into their black sack. Then I grabbed all 
the red balls I could and stuffed them in, too. 

“Help me, you guys!” I pleaded. 

Ginny and Foz fell to their knees, gathering up red balls. We shoved them 
all into the sack. I pulled the string that closed it and dropped it into the magic 
kit. 

The black sack kept bubbling. Red balls started bursting out of it. 

“Stop that!” I yelled. I reached into the magic case and pulled out the first 
thing I touched. Then I snapped the case shut. 

“I don’t really get that trick,” Ginny complained. 

“Here’s another trick,” I said. “This one will be better.” In my hand I held a 
flattened top hat. “Let’s see what this does.” 

I punched the top hat open and placed it on my head. 

“It’s just a hat,” Foz said, fidgeting. “It’s kind of hot up here. Can we go 
down to the kitchen and get something to eat?” 

“You guys don’t get it,” I said. “This is Amaz-O’s magic case! Okay, so I 
don’t know how anything works yet. Once we figure it out, we could put on the 
best magic show ever! I could become a famous magician!” 

“And I could be a famous magician’s sister.” Ginny yawned. “Big deal.” 

“That hat looks way cool on you,” Foz said. “Now can we get something to 

eat?” 

“I’m hungry, too,” Ginny added. 

“Wait!” I cried. I felt something move under the hat. I whipped it off. 

“A white dove!” Foz cried. 

“That’s a good trick,” Ginny admitted. 

I shook the dove off my head. “How do you get it back in the hat?” I asked. 
Before I had a chance to try, another dove popped out of the hat. 

I set the second dove on the floor. “There’s another one!” Foz shouted. 

A third dove flew out of the hat and settled on top of an old lamp. Out 
popped a fourth, and a fifth... 

Foz started laughing. “These tricks are totally out of control!” 



“This is no joke, Foz!” I snapped. 

“We’re going to be in major trouble,” Ginny warned. “We’ve got to find a 
way to get rid of these birds!” 

The attic was quickly filling up with flapping, fluttering doves—and they 
kept coming. I knew we had to get rid of them—but how? 

“Maybe there’s something in here that will help.” I ripped open the magic 
case. Kaboom! It made that stupid exploding sound again. Dozens of little red 
balls flew into my face. 

“I’m really getting sick of this,” I muttered. 

I brushed away piles of balls. I pulled out a long black stick with a white 
tip. A magic wand! 

“Maybe this will help!” I cried. I hoped it would. The attic was a total mess 
—white doves and red balls everywhere. 

“This is the answer,” I declared. “Amaz-0 probably uses this wand to make 
the magic stop.” 

“I hope you’re right,” Ginny said. “If that doesn’t work, you and I are going 
to have to run away from home.” 

“It’ll work,” I insisted. “It’s got to.” 

I waved the wand in the air. “Stop!” I shouted. “Everything stop!” 



22 


Did it work? 

No. 

More doves flew out of the hat. More red balls bubbled out of the black 

sack. 

“That magic wand is the only thing in there that doesn’t work!” Foz joked. 

“Be quiet!” I snapped. “I’ve got to think!” 

“Yikes!” Ginny screamed. “A snake!” 

She pointed at the magic case. A snake slithered out of it. Then a second, a 

third. 

The mechanical snakes had come back to life! 

Hissing snakes soon covered the floor, wriggling over the bouncing red 
balls. Dove feathers fell from the ceiling. The attic was so crowded I could 
hardly see across the room. 

Ginny yelped as a snake began to crawl up her leg. “Let’s get out of here!” 
she cried. 

She yanked open the attic door. She and Foz hurried downstairs. I grabbed 
the magic case and followed them. A snake slithered after me. 

“Get back in there!” I yelled. I picked up the snake and threw it into the 
attic room. I shut the door. I pushed on it to make sure it was closed. Then I ran 
downstairs and out to the backyard. 

A gust of March wind slapped my face. Ginny’s long hair flew out behind 
her. 

“Snakes—ick!” she squealed. “Tim—what are we going to do? When Mom 
and Dad see the attic, we’re dead meat!” 

Foz stared at the magic case. “What did you bring that out for? It’s 
dangerous!” 

“It’s okay if we stay outside,” I told him. “So what if a bunch of birds 
comes out? They’ll fly away.” 

I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But I couldn’t give Amaz-O’s case 
back without seeing everything in it first. I just couldn’t. 

“Hurry up, Tim,” Ginny whined. “I’m starving. It’s lunchtime!” 

“Wait. Wait.” I opened the magic case. Ka-boom! It didn’t sound so loud 



outside—especially with the wind blowing as hard as it was. 

I held the magic wand poised between my fingers. What does this thing do? 
I wondered. 

I waved it around, trying out new magician names. “The Great Incredible- 
O. Mister Terrifico—that’s not bad. Get out of there, Ginny!” She was 
rummaging through the magic kit. 

“You promised we’d share it, remember?” she snapped. Then her face 
brightened. “Hey! Great!” 

She pulled a carrot out of Amaz-O’s bag. “Just what I needed—something 
to eat.” 

“Put that back!” I ordered. 

“It’s still fresh,” she said. “Yum!” 

She opened her mouth, ready to bite the carrot. 

“Ginny—no!” I cried. “Maybe you shouldn’t eat that. Maybe—” 

Ginny never listens to me. 

She crunched down on the carrot. 

A flash of white light blinded me for a moment. 

When my eyes focused, I saw the most amazing thing I’d ever seen in my 


life! 



23 


The carrot dropped to the grass. Ginny’s nose twitched. Then she began to 
shrink. 

As she shrank, her hair turned from blond to white. Her nose turned pink. 
White fur and whiskers sprouted from her face. She grew smaller, furrier, 
whiter.... 

“I don’t believe it!” Foz gasped. “Your sister—she’s a rabbit!” 

Ginny sat on the grass, twitching her little pink nose. She stared at me with 
her rabbity eyes. She waved her little paws and made angry, rabbity noises. 

“Man, she is steamed! ” Foz cried. 

I was stunned. “I wished it,” I murmured. “And now it’s come true.” 

“What are you talking about?” Foz demanded. He grabbed me by the 
shoulders. “Get it together, Tim. We’ve got to do something! What’s going to 
happen when your parents get home?” 

“I told Ginny I’d turn her into a rabbit,” I explained, still dazed. “To get 
back at her for ruining all my magic shows. And now she is a rabbit!” 

Ginny the rabbit rose on her hind legs, gesturing angrily at me. Then she 
bounced up and thumped my shin with one of her big rabbit feet. 

“Ow!” I cried. “That hurts as much as one of her karate kicks!” 

“Look in the kit, Tim,” Foz urged me. “There’s got to be some way to 
change her back.” 

“You’re right. There’s got to be!” My eyes fell on the carrot in the grass. 
“The carrot,” I said. “When Ginny bit it, she turned into a rabbit. But maybe if a 
rabbit bites it, it turns into a girl!” 

Foz shook his head. “Huh?” 

I snatched up the carrot. “We’ve got to try it. There’s nothing to lose, right? 
She’s already a rabbit. What else could happen to her?” 

I shoved the end of the carrot toward Ginny’s mouth. “Come on, Ginny. 
Take another bite.” 

She stared at the carrot suspiciously. She clamped her mouth shut and 
turned her face away. 

“You little brat!” I shouted. “You want me to get in trouble, don’t you! You 
want to stay a rabbit just to get me in trouble!” 



Foz grabbed the carrot out of my hand. “Calm down, Tim. You’re scaring 

her!” 

Ginny’s long rabbit ears perked up—she heard something. I heard it, too. A 
car coming. Pulling into the driveway! 

“Hurry, Ginny!” I cried. “I think Mom and Dad are home. Take a bite of the 
carrot. It’ll turn you back into a girl. I know it will!” 

Ginny eyed me suspiciously. She sniffed the carrot with her twitchy pink 

nose. 

“Hurry!” I shouted again. 

She opened her mouth and took a nibble of carrot. 

Foz and I watched her in a panic. “Please let it work,” I prayed. “Please let 
it work!” 



24 


Ginny’s rabbit nose twitched. Her ears stood straight up. Then they flopped 
down. 

Nothing happened. She was still a rabbit. 

“Mom and Dad!” I cried. “They’re here! Foz—stay with Ginny. If Mom 
and Dad ask, say she’s your sister’s rabbit!” 

I ran to the driveway. A car was backing out—not Mom and Dad. Just 
somebody turning around in our driveway. 

Whew. Close one. 

The wind gusted as I ran back to Foz and Ginny. Foz was on his knees, 
digging through the magic kit. Ginny hopped up and down impatiently. 

The magic wand lay in the grass. Maybe this will work now, I hoped, 
picking it up. I’ve got to change her back! 

I waved the wand over Ginny. “Turn my sister back into a girl!” I cried. 

Nothing. 

“Maybe you need to say the spell in a rhyme,” Foz suggested. “Magicians 
always do that.” 

“Okay.” I waved the wand again. “Let me think.... Magic wand, winds that 
whirl, turn Ginny back into a girl!” 

The wand began to shake. “Something’s happening!” I shouted. 

The white tip of the wand broke open. Out popped a white silk 
handkerchief. 

“Wow!” Foz gasped. A blue one flew out, then a red one, then a yellow one. 
The wind blew them away before I could catch them. 

I turned back to Ginny. Still a rabbit. 

“It didn’t work,” I said unhappily. I tossed the wand into the grass. “It only 
makes stupid handkerchiefs.” 

I crossed over to the magic case. Ginny leaped at me, trying to bite my leg. 

“Watch out!” I warned her. “I’m trying to help you!” 

She twitched her nose in disgust. 

Foz moved aside as I dove into the magic kit. I dumped everything out. A 
slip of paper tumbled out of a pocket in the case. 



I snatched it up. At the top of the paper I saw the word INSTRUCTIONS. 

“Look!” I cried. “Instructions!” I patted Ginny between the ears. “HI have 
you back to normal in a second.” 

I raised the paper to read what it said. “'Instructions. To use the magic top 
hat...’ No. That’s not what I need right now....” 

“Hurry, Tim!” Foz said. 

I scanned the paper, searching for anything about rabbits. “Here’s 
something!” I announced. “‘The magic carrot...’” 

Just then a strong gust of wind blasted across the yard. The paper flew out 
of my hands. 

“No!” I shouted, grasping for the paper. “I need that!” I watched helplessly 
as it flew out of my reach—high up into the sky. 



25 


“Get that paper!” I screamed. The wind blew it across the yard. I darted after it. 

Foz zoomed ahead of me, yelling, “I’ve got it! I’ve got it!” The paper 
floated within his reach. He dove for it. 

Whoosh! Another strong gust of wind. The paper fluttered away. Foz fell 
flat on his face. 

I ran past him, following the paper. It blew across my neighbor’s yard. 

“Get it!” Foz shouted, racing after me. “It’s headed for the woods!” 

The wind died for a minute. The paper settled on the grass. 

I pounced on it. But the wind picked up before I landed. The paper blew 
away again. 

“Rats! ” I cried. 

“There it goes!” Foz shouted. The paper drifted toward the stream. 

The paper floated above the stream, then landed in the water. Foz zipped 
across the yard to grab it. 

“Don’t let it get wet!” I screamed. 

Too late. The paper was soaked. 

“I’ve got it!” Foz shouted. He leaned over the stream and snatched at the 
paper. But the current carried it away. 

Foz and I chased it down the stream, panting. But we couldn’t run as fast as 
the current. 

“It’s getting away,” I huffed. A few seconds later we lost sight of it. 

Foz and I collapsed on the ground. 

“That’s it,” I groaned. “We’ll never get it back now. So how do I turn Ginny 
back into a girl?” 

Foz heaved himself to his feet and pulled me up by the hand. “Don’t panic, 
Tim. Panicking isn’t going to help.” 

Great advice. 

We hurried back to Ginny. I hoped maybe she’d magically turned back into 
a girl while we were gone. No such luck. 

Ginny knew we hadn’t found the instructions. She bounced around the yard, 
squealing angry rabbit squeals. 



Foz rubbed his short hair as he watched her. “Boy, she’s really stressed,” he 

said. 

I fell to my knees to talk to her. “Don’t worry, Ginny,” I soothed. “I’ve got 
an idea. I’m going to take you to Amaz-0 right now. He’ll turn you back into a 
girl. I’m sure he will.” 

With one of her long rabbit ears, Ginny flicked my nose. She couldn’t say 
“Boi-oi-oing.” She didn’t have to. I knew what she meant. 

“Let’s pick this stuff up,” I said to Foz. We began to gather all the tricks off 
the grass and pile them into Amaz-O’s magic case. “Amaz-0 won’t want to help 
us if I don’t give him back his magic kit.” 

Foz took my bike, balancing the magic kit on the handlebars. I picked up 
Ginny. “Come on, little rabbit sister,” I cooed. She let me pull her up by the back 
—then nipped me on the wrist! 

“Ow!” I dropped her. “Do you want me to help you or not?” 

She hopped up and down angrily. I knew what she was thinking. If I didn’t 
change her back into a girl, I’d be in as much trouble as she was. I had no 
choice. 

I reached for her again. “Don’t bite me this time,” I warned her. “Or I’ll put 
a muzzle over that little snout of yours.” 

She squirmed in my arms but didn’t bite. I set her in the basket on her bike. 

“To Midnight Mansion,” I told Foz. We set off, pedaling hard against the 
strong wind. 

I rode through town in a daze. Ginny’s long white ears waved in my face. 

Amaz-O’s words rang in my ears. “Beat it, punk!” he’d said. I wondered if 
he’d really help me. 

He’s got to, I told myself. He’ll be glad to get his magic kit back. 

I’ll make him help, I decided. I won’t give him the kit until he turns Ginny 
back into a girl. 

We pulled into the parking lot in front of Midnight Mansion. The old castle 
looked just as scary in the daytime as it did at night. There were no floodlights 
casting shadows on the stone towers. But the gray, vine-covered walls gave the 
place a spooky, abandoned feeling. 

I skidded to a stop in front of the mansion. Foz carried the magic kit. I 
grabbed Ginny out of the bike basket. 

“Behave,” I warned her as we climbed the front steps to the mansion. 
“Remember, I’m trying to help you. Don’t go biting me or anything.” 



She twitched her nose at me. She lifted her little rabbit lips and bared her 
tiny rabbit teeth. 

“Go ahead—bite me,” I whispered. “See how you like spending the rest of 
your life as a rabbit. You don’t even like lettuce!” 

She closed her mouth and twitched her nose again. It doesn’t matter 
whether she’s a girl or a rabbit, I thought. Either way she’s a pain in the neck. 

We stopped at the top of the steps. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “I don’t believe it!” 

The sign on the front door read SORRY, WE’RE CLOSED. 



26 


“No!” I cried. I banged my forehead against the door. 

Foz said, “This place gives me the creeps. It looks like Count Dracula’s 
castle.” He shivered. “Let’s get out of here.” 

He set the magic case down. “Amaz-O’s magic kit is so heavy. Do you 
think we can leave it by the door?” 

I glared at him. “No, we can’t leave it by the door. And we’re not going 
home. Not yet.” 

I squeezed Ginny in my arms, thinking. “Okay, so the place is closed. But 
Amaz-0 could be in there, rehearsing or something. Right?” 

“He could be, I guess,” Foz said. “But chances are—” 

“We’ve got to take that chance,” I insisted. I tried the front door. Locked. 
Of course. 

“There must be another way in,” I said. “A back door or something.” I 
dashed down the steps and around the side of the club. 

“Bring the case, Foz!” I ordered. 

He followed me, lugging the kit. I kept my eyes peeled for guards. 

At the back of the mansion we found a door. I tried it. It opened easily! 

We crept inside. We found ourselves in the club’s kitchen. It was long, 
narrow, and shiny clean. The lights were off, but we could see by the light from a 
window at one end. 

Foz paused in front of a huge, stainless steel refrigerator. “I’ll bet they’ve 
got some great food in here,” he whispered. “Lemon meringue pie or 
something.” 

I tugged at his arm. “This is no time for a snack!” I snapped. “Come on!” 

We left the kitchen and entered a long, dark hallway. I recognized that hall. 
It was the same hallway I’d walked down after my escape from the basement— 
the first time Amaz-0 let me down. 

“There’d better not be a second time,” I muttered under my breath. 

We tiptoed down the dark hall. Up ahead I saw the door to Amaz-O’s 
dressing room. It was half-open. A dim light spilled out into the hallway. 

Yes! I thought to myself. That’s a good sign. 

With Ginny in my arms, I crept up to the door. Please, please let him be in 



there, I prayed. Please be here, Amaz-O. Please help us. 
I stopped in front of the door. I took a deep breath. 
“Mr. Amaz-O? Are you here?” 



27 


No reply. 

I tried again. “Mr. Amaz-O? Hello?” 

“He’s not here,” Foz said. “Let’s go.” 

“Shhh!” I pushed the door open and crept into the dressing room. One small 
lamp cast a dim pool of light on the dressing table. The great Amaz-0 sat on the 
couch, his left side facing the door. He was staring at the wall. He didn’t seem to 
notice us. 

“Mr. Amaz-O?” I said politely. “It’s me again. The kid you made disappear 
in your magic show.” 

I thought Amaz-O would turn his head to face us now, but he didn’t. He 
didn’t do anything. He just sat there. 

Man, I thought. He really hates kids. Or he hates his fans. Or he hates all 
people. Or something. 

When I become a great magician, I vowed, I won’t be like Amaz-O. I won’t 
let my fame go to my head. I’ll be nice to people. This is ridiculous. 

I didn’t care what Amaz-O’s problem was. I needed his help—badly. And I 
wouldn’t give up until I got it. 

I stepped farther into the dressing room. “Mr. Amaz-O, I’m sorry to bother 
you. But I really need your help. It’s important.” 

Amaz-O didn’t move. He stared at the wall. Silent. 

“Do you think he’s asleep?” Foz whispered. 

I shrugged. I took another breath and crept closer to the couch. 

“I know you told me to beat it,” I said. “I wouldn’t bother you if it wasn’t a 
matter of life and death—I swear.” 

Still no response. I turned back to Foz, who cowered in the doorway. He 
looked as if he were ready to run for it. I waved him into the room. 

Foz stepped in. He set the magic kit on the floor, shaking. 

I stared at Amaz-O. He ignored me. Who does he think he is? I thought 
angrily. He can’t treat me this way! I’m not leaving until he helps me turn Ginny 
back into a girl. 

I steeled myself and approached the magician. He didn’t look at me. I 
tapped him on the shoulder. 



He toppled over onto his side. Thunk! 

Foz gasped. “Is he—? Is he—?” 

I peered at the body on the couch. “He isn’t alive!” I cried. “Amaz-0 isn’t 
alive!” 

“Oh, no!” Foz was wringing his hands in terror. “Oh, no! He’s dead! He’s 
dead! Help!” 

“He’s not dead,” I said. “He’s a dummy! 

“Amaz-0 is nothing but a big wooden puppet!” 



28 


How could it be possible? I stared at the puppet on the couch. I couldn’t resist 
touching its cheek—then pinching it—just to be sure. 

Oh, wow! 

It was true. Amaz-0 was made of wood. 

Foz sputtered, “But—I saw him on TV. He looked totally real.” 

“And I saw him live,” I said. “On stage. I stood right next to him, and he 
made me disappear!” 

How can this be? I wondered. How can the greatest magician in the world 
be a puppet? 

“This can’t be the guy you saw,” Foz insisted, poking at the dummy. “This 
is probably just a dummy he keeps around for fun. The real Amaz-0 has got to 
be around here somewhere.” 

Rabbit Ginny squirmed angrily in my arms. “Calm down,” I ordered, trying 
to pet her. 

She growled. I’ve never heard of a rabbit growling before. Only a Ginny- 
rabbit would growl. 

Amaz-O, my idol, I thought bitterly. What a fake he turned out to be. Not 
only was he a jerk to me—he’s not even a real person! He’s a puppet! 

“What are we going to do?” Foz asked. 

I shook my head. I had no idea. “Now I’ll never get Ginny changed back 
into a girl,” I said. “Mom and Dad are going to murder me.” 

“Why don’t you tell them she ran away?” Foz suggested. “They’ll never 
believe you turned her into a rabbit, anyway.” 

“Why would she run away?” I demanded. “She was their little darling. She 
could do no wrong. I’m the one who should run away.” 

Foz lifted the Amaz-0 puppet’s head, studying it. “I wonder how this thing 
works....” he said. 

Alow voice suddenly growled, “Hey, punk—I told you to beat it!” 

I froze. “Did you say something, Foz?” I asked. 

He shook his head, eyes wide. He’d heard the voice, too. 

“So beat it! Get out of here!” the voice growled. 

I glanced around the room. I didn’t see anyone. 



“Did the puppet talk?” I asked Foz. 

“I—I don’t think so,” he stammered. “The voice came from the other side 
of the room.” 

“The puppet didn’t talk, dummy,” the voice grumbled. I turned to find it. I 
gazed across the room. Amaz-O’s white rabbit sat on a chair in front of the 
dressing table. 

“I told you to get lost. Now get lost!” the rabbit growled. 

“Tim—did—did you see that?” Foz stammered. “I think that rabbit talked.” 

“Of course I talked, stupid,” the rabbit snarled. 

“You talked?” I echoed in amazement. 

“I guess that thing on the couch isn’t the only dummy in this room,” the 
rabbit snapped. “I can do lots of things. I’m a magician.” 

Foz and I stared at the rabbit, stunned. Even Ginny stopped squirming in 
my arms. 

“You’re not a magician,” Foz said. “You’re a rabbit.” 

The rabbit’s ears twisted. “Duh. You guys are really quick. You know that?” 

“You don’t have to be so mean,” I protested. 

“You don’t have to be so stupid,” the rabbit replied. “I may look like a 
rabbit. But so does your little sister. Am I right?” 

“He’s got a point,” Foz admitted. 

“I am the great Amaz-O,” the rabbit announced. “In person. That dummy 
on the couch is a puppet I had built to look like me—the old me.” 

My jaw fell open. “You’re Amaz-O? What happened to you?” 

The rabbit sighed. “It’s a long story. Let’s just say I had a rival—a real 
powerful one. A sorcerer, actually.” 

Foz gasped. “A sorcerer? Do they really exist?” 

“I’m telling you about one, aren’t I?” the rabbit shouted. 

“Yes, but—” 

“So be quiet and listen to the story,” Amaz-O, the rabbit, grumbled. “If 
you’d stop talking you might learn something.” 

Amaz-O sure was a grouch. 

“Anyway, long story short,” Amaz-O went on. “This sorcerer guy—Frank 

“A sorcerer named Frank?” I cut in. I didn’t mean to interrupt. It just 
slipped out. 

The rabbit glared at me. “Yes, a sorcerer named Frank. You got a problem 



with that?” 

I shook my head. 

“Can I finish talking now? You got any more stupid questions?” 

Foz and I both shook our heads. 

“This guy’s named Foz—” Amaz-0 gestured toward Foz “—and you want 
to make fun of a guy named Frank.” 

“I’m sorry,” I said. “I didn’t mean to make fun of Frank.” 

“He’s a very powerful guy,” Amaz-0 said. “I’m proof of that.” 

The rabbit hopped out of the chair, crossed the dressing room, and sat on 
the couch next to the dummy. 

“Here’s what happened,” he began. “I was at the height of my fame. I was 
the most brilliant magician in the world. I made appearances on all the top TV 
shows. I had millions of fans. Dopey little kids like you looked up to me.” 

“Hey!” I protested. “Stop calling us dopey.” 

Amaz-0 ignored me. He continued, “My tricks were the most amazing 
anyone had ever seen. And Frank was jealous. He was a sorcerer, working alone 
in a basement. He could cast amazing spells—but he was kind of ugly, with a 
high-pitched voice. People didn’t take him seriously. 

“He wanted to be famous like me, but he wasn’t. So he turned me into a 
rabbit. Very funny, right? Ha ha. Turn the magician into a rabbit. Yuk, yuk, yuk.” 

Foz and I exchanged baffled glances. Amaz-0 was turning out to be a little 
weird. 

“I’m not powerful enough to reverse Frank’s spell,” Amaz-0 went on. “I’m 
a magician, not a sorcerer. But I refused to let him stop me. So I built that 
mechanical dummy over there. I made him look just like me. And I kept on 
doing my shows, just as before.” 

“So you control the puppet?” Foz asked. “You make it look as if he’s the 
magician, performing all the tricks?” 

“I just said that, didn’t I?” Amaz-0 snapped. “Are you hard-of-hearing, 
kid?” 

“You’re really mde, you know that, Amaz-O?” I said. I was getting sick of 
his put-downs. “You’re the rudest person—or rabbit, or whatever—I ever met in 
my life!” 

Amaz-O’s long ears drooped. “Hey—I’m sorry,” he said. “Being a rabbit 
gets on my nerves. But also, I can’t let people get too close—you know? I don’t 
want anyone to find out my secret. It could ruin me.” 



Ginny squirmed in my arms again. I’d nearly forgotten all about her. I 
realized I’d better hurry up and ask Amaz-0 to help me change her back. 

“We’re in terrible trouble, Amaz-O,” I said, holding Ginny toward him. 
“This is my sister, Ginny. She ate some of the carrot that was in your magic kit 

55 

“So you confess, do you? You stole my magic kit!” 

“I—I only borrowed it,” I stammered. “I brought it back—see? I’m sorry.” 
“I’ll bet you are,” Amaz-0 snapped. 

“Can you help us, Amaz-O?” I pleaded. “Please, can you help me turn 
Ginny back into a girl?” 

Amaz-0 studied Ginny with his beady rabbit eyes. I held my breath waiting 
for his answer. 

He settled deeper into the couch and shook his head. “Sorry,” he said. 
“There’s nothing I can do for her.” 



29 


“Noooo!” I moaned, sinking into a chair. “You were my last chance. I’m 
doomed!” 

“You didn’t let me finish,” Amaz-0 said. “There’s nothing I can do for her 
—because the magic will wear off by itself.” 

“Yo! All right!” Foz exclaimed happily. He shot both fists into the air. 

“But when?” I asked. “My parents are coming home soon.” 

“How many bites of the carrot did she eat?” Amaz-0 asked. 

“Two,” I replied. 

“How long ago?” 

“About an hour ago,” I answered. 

“Okay,” Amaz-0 said. “She should turn back into a girl in half an hour. Do 
you feel better now?” 

I nodded and sighed with relief. That was a close one, I thought. But 
everything is going to be okay. 

“Hey—” Foz said, jumping up. “We’d better hurry up and take Ginny home 
—before she turns back into a girl. We don’t have enough bikes to go around!” 

I pushed Ginny into his arms. “Take her home, Foz,” I said. “I’ll be there in 
a few minutes.” I wanted to talk to Amaz-0 a little longer. 

Clutching Ginny in his arms, Foz hurried out of the dressing room. “Don’t 
stay too long,” he called over his shoulder. “I don’t want to be alone with Ginny 
when she turns back into a girl. I have a feeling she’s going to be in the mood to 
karate-chop somebody!” 

In reply, Ginny beat her hind legs against his chest. 

“I’m right behind you,” I promised. Foz disappeared down the dark 
hallway. 

“Listen, Amaz-O,” I said. “I’m really sorry I stole your magic bag. I know 
it was a terrible thing to do.” 

“Shove this stupid dummy aside and sit down on the couch,” Amaz-0 said. 
I moved the dummy and sat down next to Amaz-O. 

“You really love magic, don’t you?” he said. 

My heart started pounding. This was the heart-to-heart magician talk I’d 
been hoping to have with Amaz-0 all along! 



“It’s my dream to be a magician,” I told him. “A great magician like you. 
I’d do anything. Anything!” 

“Well, you were great in the show the other night,” Amaz-0 said. “You 
disappeared very well, kid.” 

“Thanks.” 

Amaz-0 sat quietly for a moment. He seemed to be thinking. 

“Say, kid—” he said at last. “How would you like to join the act? I’m 
getting really tired of working with that big wooden dummy over there.” 

“Me?” Now my heart was really racing. “You want me to join the act?” I 
got so excited I jumped off the couch. Then I quickly sat down again. “Do you 
mean it, Amaz-O? Do you think I could?” 

Amaz-0 hopped over to the dressing room door. He kicked it shut. 

“Why don’t we give you a try....” 



30 


And that’s how I joined Amaz-O’s act. I was so excited about being a magician, 
I said yes without even thinking about it. I guess I should’ve asked a few 
questions first. 

Don’t get me wrong. I love being on stage in front of clapping, cheering 
audiences. 

But I don’t like hiding inside the black top hat. And I hate it when the 
Amaz-0 dummy pulls me up too hard by the ears. That really hurts. 

I also hate it when they forget to clean my cage. Sometimes they forget 
about it for days! 

I guess I made a little mistake. See, when Amaz-0 said he was tired of 
working with the big dummy, I thought he wanted me to take the dummy’s 
place. 

I didn’t realize he wanted to retire—and have me take his place! 

I’m not complaining. Amaz-0 gives me plenty of juicy lettuce and all the 
carrots I can eat. I even have a stage name of my own now. At last. It may not be 
my first choice, but it’s still a professional name—“Fluffy.” 

The best part is, I’m on stage every night in a real magic act! My dream— 
my all-time dream! 

How many kids—er—I mean, rabbits—can say their all-time dream came 
true at age twelve? 

I’m really lucky—don’t you agree? 

 

EGG MONSTERS 
FROM MARS 

1 


My sister, Brandy, asked for an egg hunt for her tenth birthday party. And 
Brandy always gets what she wants. 

She flashes her smile, the one that makes the dimples pop up in her cheeks. 
And she puts on her little baby face. Opens her green eyes wide and tugs at her 
curly red hair. “Please? Please? Can I have an egg hunt at my party?” 

No way Mom and Dad can ever say no to her. 

If Brandy asked for a red, white, and blue ostrich for her birthday, Dad 
would be out in the garage right now, painting an ostrich. 

Brandy is good at getting her way. Real good. I’m her older brother, Dana 
Johnson. And I admit it. Even I have trouble saying no to Brandy. 

I’m not little and cute like my sister. I have straight black hair that falls over 
my forehead. And I wear glasses. And I’m a little chubby. “Dana, don’t look so 
serious.” That’s what Mom is always telling me. 

“Dana has an old soul,” Grandma Evelyn always says. 

I don’t really know what that means. I guess she means I’m more serious 
than most twelve-year-olds. 

Maybe that’s true. I’m not really serious all the time. I’m just curious about 
a lot of things. I’m very interested in science. I like studying bugs and plants and 
animals. I have an ant farm in my room. And two tarantulas. 

And I have my own microscope. Last night I studied a toenail under the 
microscope. It was a lot more interesting than you might think. 

I want to be a research scientist when I’m older. I’ll have my own lab, and 
I’ll study anything I want to. 

Dad is a kind of chemist. He works for a perfume company. He mixes 
things together to make new smells. He calls them fragrances. 

Before Mom met Dad, she worked in a lab. She did things with white rats. 

So both of my parents are happy that I’m into science. They encourage me. 
But that doesn’t mean they give me whatever I ask for. 

If I asked Dad for a red, white, and blue ostrich for my birthday, do you 
know what he’d say? He’d say, “Go play with your sister’s!” 

Anyway, Brandy asked for an egg hunt for her birthday. Her birthday is a 
week before Easter, so it wasn’t a crazy idea. 



We have a very large backyard. It stretches all the way back to a small, 
trickling creek. 

The yard is filled with bushes and trees and flower beds. And there’s a big 
old doghouse, even though we don’t have a dog. 

Lots of good egg-hiding places. 

So Brandy got her egg hunt. She invited her entire class. 

You may not think that egg hunts are exciting. 

But Brandy’s was. 

Brandy’s birthday came on a warm and sunny day. Only a few small cumulus 
clouds high in the sky. (I study clouds.) 

Mom hurried out to the backyard after breakfast, lugging a big bucket of 
eggs. “I’ll help you hide them,” I told her. 

“That wouldn’t be fair, Dana,” Mom replied. “You’re going to be in the egg 
hunt too—remember?” 

I almost forgot. Brandy usually doesn’t want me hanging around when her 
friends come over. But today she said that I could be in the egg hunt. And so 
could my best friend, Anne Gravel. 

Anne lives in the house next door. My mom is best friends with Anne’s 
mom. Mrs. Gravel agreed to let Mom hide eggs all over their backyard too. So 
it’s only fair that Anne gets to join in. 

Anne is tall and skinny, and has long red-brown hair. She’s nearly a head 
taller than me. So everyone thinks she’s older. But she’s twelve too. 

Anne is very funny. She’s always cracking jokes. She makes fun of me 
because I’m so serious. But I don’t mind. I know she’s only joking. 

That afternoon Anne and I stood on the driveway and watched the kids 
from Brandy’s class arrive at the party. Brandy handed each one of them a little 
straw basket. 

They were really excited when Brandy told them about the egg hunt. And 
the girls got even more excited when Brandy told them the grand prize—one of 
those expensive American Girl dolls. 

Of course the boys started to grumble. Brandy should have had a prize a 
boy might like. Some of the boys started using their baskets as Frisbees. And 
others began wrestling in the grass. 

“I was a lot more sophisticated when I was ten,” I muttered to Anne. 

“When you were ten, you liked Ninja Turtles,” Anne replied, rolling her 



eyes. 

“I did not!” I protested. 

“Yes, you did,” Anne insisted. “You wore a Ninja Turtle T-shirt to school 
every day.” 

I kicked some gravel across the driveway. “Just because I wore the shirt 
doesn’t mean I liked them,” I replied. 

Anne flung back her long hair. She sneered at me. I hate it when Anne 
sneers at me. “You had Ninja Turtle cups and plates at your tenth birthday party, 
Dana. And a Ninja Turtle tablecloth. And we played some kind of Ninja Turtle 
Pizza Pie-throwing game.” 

“But that doesn’t mean I liked them!” I declared. 

Three more girls from Brandy’s class came running across the lawn. I 
recognized them. They were the girls I call the Hair Sisters. They’re not sisters. 
But they spend all their time in Brandy’s room after school doing each other’s 
hair. 

Dad moved slowly across the grass toward them. He had his camcorder up 
to his face. The three Hair Sisters waved to the camera and yelled, “Happy 
Birthday, Brandy!” 

Dad tapes all our birthdays and vacations and big events. He keeps the tapes 
on a shelf in the den. We never watch them. 

The sun beamed down. The grass smelled sweet and fresh. The spring 
leaves on the trees were just starting to unfurl. 

“Okay—everyone follow me to the back!” Brandy ordered. 

The kids lined up in twos and threes, carrying their baskets. Anne and I 
followed behind them. Dad walked backwards, busily taping everything. 

Brandy led the way to the backyard. Mom was waiting there. “The eggs are 
hidden everywhere,” Mom announced, sweeping her hand in the air. 
“Everywhere you can imagine.” 

“Okay, everyone!” Brandy cried. “At the count of three, the egg hunt 
begins! One —” 

Anne leaned down and whispered in my ear. “Bet you five dollars I collect 
more eggs than you.” 

I smiled. Anne always knows how to make things more interesting. 

“Two—” 

“You’ve got a bet!” I told her. 

“Three!” Brandy called. 



The kids all cheered. The hunt for hidden eggs was on. 

They all began hurrying through the backyard, bending down to pick up 
eggs. Some of them moved on hands and knees through the grass. Some worked 
in groups. Some searched through the yard on their own. 

I turned and saw Anne stooping down, moving quickly along the side of the 
garage. She already had three eggs in her basket. 

I can’t let her win! I told myself. I sprang into action. 

I ran past a cluster of girls around the old doghouse. And I kept moving. 

I wanted to find an area of my own. A place where I could grab up a bunch 
of eggs without having to compete with the others. 

I jogged across the tall grass, making my way to the back. I was all alone, 
nearly to the creek, when I started my search. 

I spotted an egg hidden behind a small rock. I had to move fast. I wanted to 
win the bet. 

I bent down, picked it up, and quickly dropped it into my basket. 

Then I knelt down, set my basket on the ground, and started to search for 
more eggs. 

But I jumped up when I heard a scream. 



2 


“Aaaaaiiiiii!” 

The scream rang through the air. 

I turned back toward the house. One of the Hair Sisters was waving her 
hand wildly, calling to the other girls. I grabbed up my basket and ran toward 
her. 

“They’re not hard-boiled!” I heard her cry as I came closer. And I saw the 
drippy yellow yolk running down the front of her white T-shirt. 

“Mom didn’t have time to hard-boil them,” Brandy announced. “Or to paint 
them. I know it’s weird. But there just wasn’t time.” 

I raised my eyes to the house. Mom and Dad had both disappeared inside. 

“Be careful,” Brandy warned her party guests. “If you crack them—” 

She didn’t finish her sentence. I heard a wet splat. 

Then laughter. 

A boy had tossed an egg against the side of the doghouse. 

“Cool!” one of the girls exclaimed. 

Anne’s big sheepdog, Stubby, came running out of the doghouse. I don’t 
know why he likes to sleep in there. He’s almost as big as the house. 

But I didn’t have time to think about Stubby. 

Splat. 

Another egg exploded, this time against the garage wall. 

More laughter. Brandy’s friends thought it was really hilarious. 

“Egg fight! Egg fight!” two boys started to chant. 

I ducked as an egg went sailing over my head. It landed with a craaack on 
the driveway. 

Eggs were flying everywhere now. I stood there and gaped in amazement. 

I heard a shrill shriek. I spun around to see that two of the Hair Sisters had 
mnny yellow egg oozing in their hair. They were shouting and tugging at their 
hair and trying to pull the yellow gunk off with both hands. 

Splat! Another egg hit the garage. 

Craaack! Eggs bounced over the driveway. 

I ducked down and searched for Anne. She probably went home, I figured. 




Anne enjoys a good laugh. But she’s twelve, much too sophisticated for a 
babyish egg fight. 

Well, when I’m wrong, I’m wrong. 

“Think fast, Dana!” Anne screamed from behind me. I threw myself to the 
ground just in time. She heaved two eggs at once. They both whirred over my 
head and dropped onto the grass with a sickening crack. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” I heard Brandy shrieking desperately. “It’s my birthday! 
Stop it! It’s my birthday!” 

Thunk! Somebody hit Brandy in the chest with an egg. 

Wild laughter rang out. Sticky yellow puddles covered the back lawn. 

I raised my eyes to Anne. She was grinning back at me, about to let me 
have it again. 

Time for action. I reached into my basket and pulled out the one and only 
egg I had picked up. 

I raised it high above my head. Started to throw—but stopped. 

The egg. 

I lowered it and stared at it. 

Stared hard at it. 

Something was wrong with the egg. 

Something was terribly wrong. 



3 


The egg was too big. Bigger than a normal egg. About the size of a softball. 

I held it carefully, studying it. The color wasn’t right either. It wasn’t egg- 
colored. That creamy off-white. And it wasn’t brown. 

The egg was pale green. I raised it to the sunlight to make sure I was seeing 
correctly. 

Yes. Green. 

And what were those thick cracks up and down the shell? 

I ran my pointer finger over the dark, jagged lines. 

No. Not cracks. Some kind of veins. Blue-and-purple veins crisscrossing 
the green eggshell. 

“Weird!” I muttered out loud. 

Brandy’s friends were shouting and shrieking. Eggs were flying all around 
me. An egg splattered over my sneakers. The yellow yolk oozed over my laces. 

But I didn’t care. 

I rolled the strange egg over and over slowly between my hands. I brought 
it close to my face and squinted hard at the blue-and-purple veins. 

“Ooh.” I let out a low cry when I felt it pulsing. 

The veins throbbed. I could feel a steady beat. 

Thud. Thud. Thud. 

“Oh wow. It’s alivel” I cried. 

What had I found? It was totally weird. I couldn’t wait to get it to my 
worktable and examine it. 

But first I had to show it to Anne. 

“Anne! Hey—Anne!” I called and started jogging toward her, holding the 
egg high in both hands. 

I was staring at the egg. So I didn’t see Stubby, her big sheepdog, run in 
front of me. 

“Whooooa!” 

I let out a cry as I fell over the dog. 

And landed with a sickening crunch on top of my egg. 



4 


I jumped up quickly. Stubby started to lick my face. That dog has the worst 
breath! 

I shoved him away and bent down to examine my egg. 

“Hey!” I cried out in amazement. The egg wasn’t broken. I picked it up 
carefully and rolled it in my hands. 

Not a crack. 

What a tough shell! I thought. My chest had landed on top of the egg. 
Pushed it into the ground. But the shell hadn’t broken. 

I wrapped my hands around the big egg as if soothing it. 

I could feel the blue-and-purple veins pulsing. 

Is something inside getting ready to hatch? I wondered. What kind of bird 
was inside it? Not a chicken, I knew. This was definitely not a hen’s egg. Splat! 
Another egg smacked the side of the garage. 

Kids were wrestling in the runny puddles of yolk on the grass. I turned in 
time to see a boy crack an egg over another boy’s head. 

“Stop it! Stop it!” 

Brandy was screaming at the top of her lungs, trying to stop the egg fight 
before every single egg was smashed. I turned and saw Mom and Dad running 
across the yard. 

“Hey, Anne—!” I called. I climbed to my feet, holding the weird egg 
carefully. Anne was frantically tossing eggs at three girls. The girls were 
bombarding her. Three to one—but Anne wasn’t retreating. 

“Anne—check this out!” I called, hurrying over to her. “You won’t believe 
this egg!” 

I stepped up beside her and held the egg out to her. 

“No! Wait—!” I cried. 

Too late. 

Anne grabbed my egg and heaved it at the three girls. 



5 


“No—stop!” I wailed. 

As I stared in horror, one of the three girls caught the egg in midair—and 
tossed it back. 

I dove for it, making a headfirst slide. And grabbed the egg in one hand 
before it hit the gravel. 

Was it broken? 

No. 

This shell must be made of steel! I told myself. I pulled myself to my feet, 
gripping the egg carefully. To my surprise, it felt hot. Burning hot. 

“Whoa!” I nearly dropped it. 

Throb. Throb. Throb. 

It pulsed rapidly. I could feel the veins beating against my fingers. 

I wanted to show the egg to Mom and Dad. But they were busy breaking up 
the egg fight. 

Dad’s face was bright red. He was shouting at Brandy and pointing to the 
yellow stains up and down the side of the garage. 

Mom was trying to calm down two girls who were crying. They had egg 
yolk stuck to their hair and all over their clothes. They even had it stuck to their 
eyebrows. I guess that’s why they were crying. 

Behind them Stubby was having a feast. He was running around in circles, 
lapping up egg after egg from the grass, his bushy tail wagging like crazy. 

What a party! 

I decided to take my weird egg inside. I wanted to study it later. Maybe I’d 
break off a tiny piece of shell and look at it under the microscope. Then I’d make 
a tiny hole in the shell and try to see inside. 

Throb. Throb. 

The veins pounded against my hand. The egg still felt hot. 

It might be a turtle egg, I decided. I walked carefully to the house, cradling 
it in both hands. 

One morning last fall, Anne found a big box turtle on the curb in front of 
her house. She carried it into her backyard and called me over. She knew I’d 
want to study it. 



It was a pretty big turtle. About the size of a lunch box. Anne and I 
wondered how it got to her curb. 

Up in my room I had a book about turtles. I knew the book would help me 
identify it. I had hurried home to get the book. But Mom wouldn’t let me go 
back out. I had to stay inside and have lunch. 

When I got back to Anne’s backyard, the turtle had vanished. I guess it 
wandered away. 

Turtles can be pretty fast when they want to be. 

As I carried my treasure into the house, I thought it might be a turtle egg. 
But why was it so hot? And why did it have those yucky veins all over it? 

Eggs don’t have veins—do they? 

I hid the egg in my dresser drawer. I surrounded it with my balled-up socks 
to protect it. Then I closed the drawer slowly, carefully, and returned to the 
backyard. 

Brandy’s guests were all leaving as I stepped outside. They were covered in 
sticky eggs. They didn’t look too happy. 

Brandy didn’t look too happy, either. Dad was busy shouting at her, angrily 
waving his arms, pointing to the gloppy egg stains all over the lawn. 

“Why did you let this happen?” he screamed at her. “Why didn’t you stop 

it?” 

“I tried!” Brandy wailed. “I tried to stop it!” 

“We’ll have to have the garage painted,” Mom murmured, shaking her 
head. “How will we ever mow the lawn?” 

“This was the worst party I ever had!” Brandy cried. She bent down and 
pulled chunks of eggshell from her sneaker laces. Then she glared up at Mom. 
“It’s all your fault!” 

“Huh?” Mom gasped. “My fault?” 

“You didn’t hard-boil the eggs,” Brandy accused. “So it’s all your fault.” 
Mom started to protest—but bit her lip instead. 

Brandy stood up and tossed the bits of eggshell to the ground. She flashed 
Mom her best dimpled smile. “Next year for my birthday, can we have a Make 
Your Own Ice-Cream Sundae party?” 

That evening I wanted to study my weird green egg. But we had to go visit 
Grandma Evelyn and Grandpa Harry and take them out to dinner. They always 
make a big fuss about Brandy’s birthday. 



First, Brandy had to open her presents. Grandma Evelyn bought her a pair 
of pink fuzzy slippers that Brandy will never wear. She’ll probably give them to 
Stubby as chew toys. 

Brandy opened the biggest box next. She pulled out a pair of pink-and- 
white pajamas. Brandy made a big fuss about them and said she really needed 
pajamas. She did a pretty good acting job. 

But how excited can you get over pajamas? 

Her last present was a twenty-five-dollar gift certificate to the CD store at 
the mall. Nice present. “I’ll go with you to make sure you don’t pick out 
anything lame,” I offered. 

Brandy pretended she didn’t hear me. 

She gave our grandparents big hugs. Brandy is a big hugger. Then we all 
went out for dinner at the new Italian restaurant on the corner. 

What did we talk about at dinner? Brandy’s wild birthday party. When we 
told Grandma and Grandpa about the egg fight, they laughed and laughed. 

It wasn’t so funny in the afternoon. But a few hours later at dinner, we all 
had to admit it was pretty funny. Even Dad managed a smile or two. 

I kept thinking about the egg in my dresser drawer. When we got back 
home, would I find a baby turtle on my socks? 

Dinner stretched on and on. Grandpa Harry told all of his funny golfing 
stories. He tells them every time we visit. We always laugh anyway. 

We didn’t return home till really late. Brandy fell asleep in the car. And I 
could barely keep my eyes open. 

I slunk up to my room and changed into pajamas. Then, with a loud yawn, I 
turned off the light. I knew I’d fall asleep the moment my head hit the pillow. 

I fluffed my pillow the way I liked it. Then I slid into bed and pulled the 
quilt up to my chin. 

I started to settle my head on the pillow when I heard the sound. 

Thump. Thump. Thump. 

Steady like a heartbeat. Only louder. 

Much louder. 

THUMP. THUMP. THUMP. 

So loud, I could hear the dresser drawers rattling. 

I sat straight up. Wide awake now. I stared through the darkness to my 
dresser. 

THUMP. THUMP. THUMP. 



I turned and lowered my feet to the floor. 

Should I open the dresser drawer? 

I sat in the darkness, trembling with excitement. With fear. 
Listening to the steady thud. 

Should I open the drawer and check it out? 

Or should I run as far away as I could? 



6 


Thump, thump, THUMP. 

I had to see what was happening in my dresser drawer. 

Had the egg hatched? Was the turtle bumping up against the sides of the 
drawer, trying to climb out? 

Was it a turtle? 

Or was it something weird? 

Suddenly I felt very afraid of it. 

I took a deep breath and rose to my feet. My legs felt rubbery and weak as I 
made my way across the room. My mouth was suddenly as dry as cotton. 

Thump, THUMP, thump. 

I clicked on the light. Blinked several times, struggling to force my eyes to 
focus. 

The steady thuds grew louder as I approached the dresser. 

Heartbeats, I told myself. 

Heartbeats of the creature inside the egg. 

I grabbed the drawer handles with both hands. Took another deep breath. 

Dana, this is your last chance to run away, I warned myself. 

This is your last chance to leave the drawer safely closed. 

Thump, thump, thump, thump, thump. 

I tugged open the drawer and peered inside. 

I stared in, amazed that nothing had changed. The egg sat exactly where I 
had left it. The blue-and-purple veins along the shell pulsed as before. 

Feeling a little calmer, I picked it up. 

“Ouch!” 

I nearly dropped it. The shell was burning hot. 

I cupped it in my hands and blew on it. “This is so totally weird,” I 
murmured to myself. 

Mom and Dad have to see it, I decided. Right now. Maybe they can tell me 
what it is. 

They were still awake. I could hear them talking in their room down the 


hall. 



I carried the egg carefully, cradling it in both hands. I had to knock on their 
door with my elbow. “It’s me,” I said. 

“Dana, what is it?” Dad demanded grumpily. “It’s been a long day. We’re 
all very tired.” 

I pushed open their door a crack. “I have an egg I want to show you,” I 
started. 

“No eggs!” they both cried at once. 

“Haven’t we seen enough eggs for one day?” Mom griped. 

“It’s a very strange egg,” I insisted. “I can’t identify it. I think—” 

“Good night, Dana,” Dad interrupted. 

“Please don’t ever mention eggs again,” Mom added. “Promise?” 

“Well, I...” I stared down at the pulsing green egg in my hand. “It’ll only 
take a second. If you’ll just—” 

“Dana!” Dad yelled. “Why don’t you go sit on it and hatch it?” 

“Clark—don’t talk to Dana that way!” Mom scolded. 

“He’s twelve years old. He can take a joke,” Dad protested. 

They started arguing about how Dad should talk to me. 

I muttered good night and started back to my room. 

I mean, I can take a hint. 

Thump. Thump. The egg pulsed in my hand. 

I had a sudden impulse to crack it open and see what was inside. But of 
course I would never do that. 

I stopped outside Brandy’s room. I was desperate to show my weird 
treasure to somebody. I knocked on her door. 

No answer. 

I knocked again, a little harder. Brandy is a very heavy sleeper. 

Still no answer. 

I started to knock a third time—and the door flew open. Brandy greeted me 
with an open-mouthed yawn. “What’s wrong? Why’d you wake me?” 

“I want to show you this egg,” I told her. 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “You’re serious? After what happened at my 
party? After the worst birthday party in the history of America, you really want 
to show me an egg?” 

I held it up. “Yeah. Here it is.” 

She slammed the door in my face. 

“You mean you don’t want to see it?” I called in. 



No reply. 

Once again, I could take a hint. I carried the egg back to my room and set it 
down carefully in the dresser drawer. Then I closed the drawer and climbed back 
into bed. 

Thump. Thump. Thump. 

I fell asleep to the steady throbbing. 

The next morning, I woke up just in time to watch the egg hatch. 



7 


A loud cracking sound woke me up. 

Blinking, I pulled myself up on one elbow. Still half-asleep, I thought I 
heard Brandy cracking her knuckles. 

That’s one of Brandy’s secret talents. She never does it when adults are 
around. But when we’re alone, she can crack out entire symphonies on her 
knuckles. 

Another loud crack snapped me alert. 

The dresser. The noises were coming from my dresser. 

I heard a long rip, like Velcro ripping open. Then more cracks. Like 
cracking bones. 

And I knew it had to be the egg. 

My heart started to pound. I leaped up. Grabbed my glasses and slapped 
them onto my face. My legs got tangled in the bedsheet, and I nearly went 
sprawling over the floor. 

I hurtled across the room. The egg was hatching—and I had to be there in 
time to watch. 

I grabbed the drawer handles and eagerly pulled the drawer open. I was so 
eager, I nearly pulled the drawer out of the dresser! 

Catching my balance, I gripped the dresser top with both hands and stared 
down at the egg. 

Craaaaack. 

The blue-and-purple veins throbbed. A long, jagged crack split across the 
green shell. 

Unh unh. 

I heard a low grunt from inside the egg. The grunt of a creature working 
hard to push out. 

Unnnnnh. 

What a struggle! 

It doesn’t sound like a turtle, I told myself. Is it some kind of exotic bird? 
Like a parrot? Or a flamingo maybe? 

How would a flamingo egg get in my backyard? 

How would any weird egg get in my backyard? 



Unnnh unnnnh. 

Craaaaack. 

The sounds were really gross. 

I rubbed my eyes and squinted down at the egg. It was bouncing and 
bobbing in the drawer now. Each grunt made the egg move. 

The veins throbbed. Another crack split along the front of the shell. And 
thick yellow goo poured out into the drawer, seeping onto my socks. 

“Yuck!” I cried. 

The egg shook. Another crack. More of the thick liquid oozed down the egg 
and onto my socks. 

The egg bobbed and bounced. I heard more hard grunting. Unnnnh. 
Unnnnh. The egg trembled with each grunt. 

Yellow slime oozed as the cracks in the shell grew wider. The veins pulsed. 
The egg shook. 

And then a large triangle of shell broke off. It fell into the drawer. 

I leaned closer to stare into the hole in the egg. I couldn’t really see what 
was inside. I could see only wet yellow blobby stuff. 

Unnh unnnnnh. 

Another grunt—and the eggshell crackled and fell apart. Yellow liquid 
spilled into the drawer, soaking my socks. 

I held my breath as a weird creature pushed itself out of the breaking shell. 
A yellow, lumpy thing. 

A baby chicken? 

No way. 

I couldn’t see a head. Or wings. Or feet. 

I gripped the dresser top and stared down at it. The strange animal pushed 
away the last section of shell. This was amazing! 

It rolled wetly over my socks. 

A blob. A sticky, shiny yellow blob. 

It looked like a pile of very runny scrambled eggs. 

Except it had tiny green veins crisscrossing all over it. 

My chest felt about to explode. I finally remembered to breathe. I let out my 
breath in a long whoosh. My heart was thudding. 

The yellow blob throbbed. It made sick, wet sucking sounds. 

It turned slowly. And I saw round black eyes near its top. 

No head. No face. Just two tiny black eyes on top of the lumpy yellow 



body. 

“You’re not a chicken,” I murmured out loud. My voice came out in a 
choked whisper. “You’re definitely not a chicken.” 

But what was it? 

“Hey—Mom! Dad!” I shouted. 

They had to see this creature. They had to see the scientific discovery of the 
century! 

“Mom! Dad! Hurry!” 

No response. 

The lumpy creature stared up at me. Throbbing. Its tiny green veins pulsing. 
Its eggy body bouncing. 

“Mom? Dad?” 

Silence. 

I stared into my drawer. 

What should I do? 



8 


I had to show it to Mom and Dad. I carefully closed the dresser drawer so it 
couldn’t bounce out and escape. Then I went running downstairs, shouting at the 
top of my voice. 

My pajama pants were twisted, and I nearly fell down the stairs. “Mom! 
Dad! Where are you?” 

The house was silent. The vacuum cleaner had been pulled out of the closet. 
But no one was around to use it. 

I burst into the kitchen. Were they still having breakfast? 

“Mom? Dad? Brandy?” 

No one there. 

Sunlight streamed in through the kitchen window. The breakfast dishes— 
three cereal bowls and two coffee cups—were stacked beside the sink. 

Where did they go? I wondered, my heart pounding. How could they leave 
when I had the most amazing thing in the history of the known universe to show 
them? 

I turned to leave the kitchen when I saw the note on the refrigerator. It was 
written in blue ink in Mom’s handwriting. I snatched it off the magnet and read 
it: 

“Dad and I took Brandy to her piano lesson. Make yourself some cereal. 
Love, M.” 

Cereal? 

Cereal ? 

How could I think about cereal at a time like this? 

What should I do now? 

I leaned my forehead against the cool refrigerator, struggling to think. I 
couldn’t leave the throbbing egg blob locked up in the dresser drawer all 
morning. Maybe it needed fresh air. Maybe it needed exercise. Maybe it needed 
food. 

Food? I swallowed hard. What would it eat? What could it eat? It was just a 
lump of scrambled eggs with eyes. 

I’ve got to take it out of there, I decided. I’ve got to show it to someone. 

I thought instantly of Anne. 



“Yes!” I exclaimed to myself. I’ll take it next door and show it to Anne. She 
has a dog. She’s really good with pets and animals. Maybe she’ll have some idea 
of what I should do with it. 

I hurried back upstairs and pulled on the jeans and T-shirt I had tossed on 
the floor the night before. Then I made my way to the dresser and slid open the 
drawer. 

“Yuck!” 

The egg blob sat in its own yellow slime. Its whole body throbbed. The 
tiny, round eyes stared up at me. 

“I’m taking you to Anne’s,” I told it. “Maybe the two of us can figure out 
what you are.” 

Only one problem. 

How do I take it there? 

I rubbed my chin, staring down at it. Do I carry it on a plate? No. It might 
tumble off. 

A bowl? 

No. Ajar? 

No. It couldn’t breathe. 

A box. 

Yes. I’ll put it in a box, I decided. I opened my closet, dropped to my hands 
and knees, and shuffled through all the junk piled on the floor. 

That’s how I clean my room. I toss everything into the closet and shut the 
door. I have the cleanest room in the house. No problem. 

The only problem is finding things in my closet. If I’m searching for 
something to wear, sometimes it takes a few days. 

Today I got lucky. I found what I was looking for right away. It was a shoe 
box. The box my new sneakers came in. 

I picked up the shoe box from the clutter and climbed to my feet. Then I 
kicked a bunch of stuff back into the closet so I could get the door closed. 

“Okay!” I cried happily. I returned to the throbbing egg glob. “I’m carrying 
you to Anne’s in this box. Ready?” 

I didn’t expect it to answer. And it didn’t. 

I pulled off the shoe box lid and set it on the dresser top. Then I lowered the 
box to the drawer. 

“Now what?” I asked myself out loud. 

How do I get it in the box? Do I just pick it up? 



Pick it up in my hand? 

I held the box in my left hand and started to reach into the drawer with my 
right. But then I jerked my hand away. 

Will it bite me? I wondered. 

How can it? It doesn’t have a mouth. 

Will it sting me? Will it hurt me somehow? 

My throat tightened. My hand started to tremble. It was so gross—so wet 
and eggy. 

Pick it up, Dana, I told myself. Stop being such a wimp. You’re a scientist 
—remember? You have to be bold. You have to be daring. 

That’s true, I knew. Scientists can’t back away from something just because 
it’s yucky and gross. 

I took a deep breath. 

I counted to three. 

Then I reached for it. 



9 


As my hand moved toward it, the creature began to tremble. It shook like a glob 
of yellow Jell-O. 

I pulled back once again. 

I can’t do it, I decided. I can’t pick it up barehanded. It might be too 
dangerous. 

I watched it shake and throb. Wet bubbles formed on its eggy skin. 

Is it scared of me? I wondered. Or is it trying to warn me away? 

I had to find something to pick it up. I turned and glanced around the room. 
My eyes landed on my baseball glove tucked on the top shelf of my bookcase. 

Maybe I could pick up the egg creature in the glove and drop it into the 
shoe box. I was halfway across the room when I decided I didn’t want to get my 
glove all wet and gloppy. 

I need to shovel it into the box, I thought. 

A little shovel would make the job easy. I walked back to the dresser. The 
egg creature was still shaking like crazy. I closed the drawer. Maybe the darkness 
will calm it down, I thought. 

I made my way down to the basement. Mom and Dad keep all their 
gardening supplies down there. I found a small metal trowel and carried it back 
up to my room. 

When I pulled open the drawer, the eggy blob was still shaking. “Don’t 
worry, fella,” I told it. “I’m a scientist. I’ll be real gentle.” 

I don’t think it understood English. As I lowered the trowel into the drawer, 
the green veins on the throbbing body began to pulse. 

The creature started bobbing up and down. The little black eyes bulged up 
at me. I had the feeling the little guy was about to explode or something. 

“Easy. Easy,” I whispered. 

I lowered the trowel carefully beside it. Then I slowly, slowly slid it under 
the throbbing creature. 

“There. Gotcha,” I said softly. 

It wiggled and shook on the blade of the trowel. I began to lift it carefully 
from the drawer. 

The shoe box sat on the top of the dresser. I had the trowel in my right 



hand. I reached for the shoe box with my left. 

Up, up. Slowly. Very slowly, I raised the egg creature toward the box. 
Up. Up. 

Almost to the box. 

And the creature growled at me! 

A low, gruff growl—like an angry dog. 

“Ohhh!” I uttered a startled cry—and the trowel dropped from my hand. 
“Yaaiii!” I let out another cry as it clanged across the floor—and the 
creature plopped wetly onto my sneaker. 

“No!” 

Without thinking, I bent down and grabbed it up in my hand. 

I’m holding it! I realized, my heart pounding. 

I’m holding it. 

What’s going to happen to me? 



10 


Nothing happened. 

No shock jolted my body. No rash spread instantly over my skin. My hand 
didn’t fall off. 

The creature felt warm and soft, like runny scrambled eggs. 

I realized I was squeezing it tightly. Too tightly? I loosened my grip. 

And lowered it into the shoe box. And fastened the lid over the top. 

I set the shoe box down on the dresser top and examined my hand. It felt 
wet and sticky. But the skin hadn’t turned yellow or peeled off or anything. 

I could hear the creature pulsing inside the box. 

“Don’t growl like that again,” I told it. “You scared me.” 

I grabbed some tissues and wiped off my hand. I kept my eyes on the box. 
The creature was bouncing around in there. 

What kind of animal is it? I wondered. 

I wished Mom and Dad were home. I really, really wanted to show it to 
them. 

I glanced at the clock radio on my bedside table. Only nine o’clock. Anne 
might still be sleeping. Sometimes she slept until noon on Saturdays. I’m not 
really sure why. She said it made the day go faster. Anne is a pretty weird girl. 

I lifted the box with both hands. The egg creature felt surprisingly heavy. I 
made sure the lid was on tight. Then I carried it down the stairs and out the back 
door. 

It was a sunny, warm day. A soft breeze made the fresh spring leaves 
tremble on the trees. Two houses down Mr. Simpson was already mowing his 
back lawn. Near the garage two robins were having a tug-of-war over a fat 
brown earthworm. 

I carried the box to Anne’s back door. The door was open. I peered through 
the screen. 

“Hi, Dana. Come in,” Anne’s mother called from in front of the sink. 

Balancing the box against my chest, I pulled open the screen door and 
stepped into the kitchen. Anne sat at the breakfast table. She wore a big blue T- 
shirt over black bike shorts. Her red-brown hair was tied behind her head in a 
long ponytail. 



Three guesses what she was eating for breakfast. 

You got it. Scrambled eggs. 

“Yo, Dana!” she greeted me. “What’s up?” 

“Well—” 

Mrs. Gravel moved to the stove. “Dana, have you had breakfast? Can I 
make you some scrambled eggs?” 

My stomach did a flip-flop. I swallowed hard. “No. I don’t think so.” 

“Nice fresh eggs,” Mrs. Gravel insisted. “I could make them fried if you 
don’t like scrambled.” 

“No thanks,” I replied weakly. 

I felt the eggy blob bounce inside the box. 

“I might need some more,” Anne told her mom, shoveling in a big glob. 
“These eggs are great, Mom.” 

Mrs. Gravel cracked an egg on the side of the skillet. “Maybe I’ll make one 
for myself,” she said. 

All this egg talk was making me sick. 

Anne finished her orange juice. “Hey—what’s in the box? New sneakers?” 

“Uh... no,” I replied. “Check this out, Anne. You won’t believe what I 
found.” 

I was so eager to show it to her! Holding the box in front of me with both 
hands, I started across the kitchen. 

And tripped over Stubby. 

Again! 

That big dumb sheepdog always got underfoot. 

“Whooooaaa!” I let out a cry as I fell over the dog—and watched the shoe 
box fly into the air. 

I landed on top of Stubby. Got a mouthful of fur. 

Struggled frantically to my feet. 

And saw the egg creature sail out of the box and drop onto Anne’s breakfast 
plate. 

Anne’s mouth dropped open. Her face twisted in disgust. “Oh, yuck!” she 
wailed. “Rotten eggs! Gross! Rotten eggs!” 

“No—it’s alive!” I protested. 

But I don’t think anyone heard me. Stubby jumped up on me as I started to 
explain, and nearly knocked me down again. 

“Down, boy! Down!” Mrs. Gravel scolded. “You know better than that.” 



“Get this away!” Anne demanded, shoving her plate across the table. 

Her mom examined the plate, then glared at me. “Dana, what’s wrong with 
you? This isn’t funny. You ruined perfectly good scrambled eggs.” 

“You spoiled my breakfast!” Anne cried angrily. 

“No, wait—” I protested. 

But I wasn’t fast enough. 

Mrs. Gravel grabbed up the plate. She carried it to the sink, clicked on the 
garbage disposal—and started to empty the egg creature into the roaring drain. 



11 


“Nooooo!” 

I let out a shriek—and dove for the sink. 

I made a wild grab and pulled the creature from the drain. 

No. I pulled a handful of scrambled eggs from the drain! 

The egg creature rolled around the sink and started to slide toward the 
gurgling drain. I tossed the scrambled eggs down and grabbed the creature as it 
started to drop toward the grinding blades. 

The lumpy yellow blob felt hot in my hands. I could feel the veins 
throbbing. The whole creature pulsed rapidly, like a racing heart. 

I raised it up to my face and examined it. Still in one piece. “I saved your 
life!” I told it. “Whew! What a close one!” 

I balanced it carefully in my palm. It shuddered and throbbed. Wet bubbles 
rolled down its lumpy sides. The black eyes stared up at me. 

“What is that thing?” Anne demanded, getting up from the breakfast table. 
She straightened her long ponytail. “Is it a puppet? Did you make it out of an old 
sock or something?” 

Before I could answer, Mrs. Gravel gave me a gentle push toward the 
kitchen door. “Get it out of here, Dana,” she ordered. “It’s disgusting.” She 
pointed down. “Look. It’s dripping some kind of eggy goo all over my kitchen 
floor.” 

“I—I found it out back,” I started. “I don’t really know what it is, but—” 

“Out,” Anne’s mom insisted. She held open the screen door for me. “Out. I 
mean it. I don’t want to have to wash the whole floor.” 

I didn’t have a choice. I carried the egg creature out into the backyard. It 
seemed a little calmer. At least it wasn’t trembling and pulsing so hard. 

Anne followed me to the driveway. The bright sun made the egg creature 
gleam. My hands felt slimy and wet. I didn’t want to squeeze it too tightly. But I 
also didn’t want to let it fall. 

“Is it a puppet?” Anne demanded. She bent down to see it better. “Yuck. It’s 
alive?” 

I nodded. “I don’t know what it is. But it’s definitely alive. I found it 
yesterday. At Brandy’s party.” 



Anne continued to study the yellow blob. “You found it? Where?” 

“I found an egg back by the creek,” I told her. “A very weird-looking egg. I 
took it home, and it hatched this morning. And this is what came out.” 

“But what is it?” Anne asked. She gingerly poked its side with a pointer 
finger. “Oh, yuck. It’s wet and mushy.” 

“It’s not a chicken,” I replied. 

“Duhhh,” Anne said, rolling her eyes. “Did you figure that out all by 
yourself?” 

“I thought it might be a turtle egg,” I said, ignoring her sarcasm. 

She squinted harder at it. “Do you think it’s a turtle without its shell? Do 
turtles hatch without their shells?” 

“I don’t think so,” I replied. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of mistake,” Anne suggested. “A freak of nature. 
You know. Like you!” She laughed. 

Anne has a great sense of humor. 

She poked the egg creature again. The creature let out a soft wheeze of air. 
“Maybe you discovered a new species,” Anne suggested. “A whole new kind of 
animal that’s never been seen before.” 

“Maybe,” I replied. That was an exciting idea. 

“They’ll name it after you,” Anne teased. “They’ll call it the Dodo!” She 
laughed again. 

“You’re not being very helpful,” I said sharply. 

And then I had an idea. 

“Know what I’m going to do with it?” I said, cupping it carefully between 
my hands. “I’m going to take it to that little science lab.” 

She narrowed her eyes at me. “What science lab?” 

“You know that little lab,” I replied impatiently. “The one on Denver Street. 
Just three blocks from here.” 

“I don’t hang out at weird little science labs,” Anne said. 

“Well, I don’t, either,” I told her. “But I’ve passed by that lab a million 
times, riding my bike to school. I’m going to take this thing there. Someone will 
tell me what it is.” 

“I’m not going with you,” Anne said, crossing her skinny arms in front of 
her chest. “I have better things to do.” 

“I didn’t invite you,” I sneered. 

She sneered back at me. 



I think she was jealous that I found the mysterious creature and she didn’t. 

“Please get me the shoe box,” I said. “I left it in your kitchen. I’m going to 
ride my bike over to that lab right now.” 

Anne went inside and came back with the shoe box. “It’s all sticky inside,” 
she said, making a disgusted face. “Whatever that thing is, it sure sweats a lot.” 

“Maybe your face scared it!” I declared. My turn to laugh. I’m usually the 
serious one. I don’t get off too many jokes. But that was a pretty good one. 

Anne ignored it. She watched as I lowered the creature into the box. Then 
she raised her eyes to me. “You sure that isn’t some kind of wind-up toy? This 
thing is all a big joke—isn’t it, Dana?” 

I shook my head. “No way. It’s no joke. I’ll stop by later and tell you what 
the scientists at the lab say about it.” 

I fit the lid on the shoe box. Then I hurried to the garage to get my bike. 

I couldn’t wait to get to the science lab. 

As it turned out, I should have stayed as far away from that place as 
possible. 

But how could I know what was waiting for me there? 



12 


“Look out!” 

Anne’s stupid sheepdog ran in front of my bike just as I started down the 
driveway. 

I jammed on the hand brake. My bike squealed to a sharp stop—and the 
shoe box nearly toppled off the handlebars. 

“Stubby—you moron!” I shrieked. 

The dog loped off across the backyard, probably laughing to himself. I 
think Stubby gets a real thrill by tripping me up whenever he sees me. 

I waited for my heart to stop thudding in my chest. Then I steadied the shoe 
box on the handlebars. 

I started pedaling along the street, steering with one hand, keeping the other 
hand on top of the box. 

“The scientists at the lab have got to know what this thing is,” I told myself. 
“They’ve got to.” 

I usually speed down my street. But this morning I pedaled slowly. I 
stopped at each corner to make sure no cars were coming. 

I tried to steer away from bumps in the street. But my street has a lot of 
potholes. Each time I hit a bump, I could hear the egg creature bouncing inside 
the carton. 

Just don’t bounce out, I thought. 

I pictured it bouncing out of the box, dropping onto the street, and being run 
over by a car. 

I stopped to balance it better on the handlebars. Then I began pedaling 
slowly again. 

Some kids from school were starting up a softball game on the playground 
on the next block. They called to me. I think they wanted me to join the game. 

But I pretended I didn’t hear them. I didn’t have time for softball. I was on a 
scientific mission. I didn’t look back. I kept pedaling. 

As I turned the corner onto Denver, a city bus roared past. The whoosh of 
air from the bus nearly knocked me over. 

As I steadied the bike, I saw the lid push up from the shoe box. 

The egg creature was trying to escape! 



I grabbed the box and tried to push down the lid. I pedaled faster. The lab 
was only a block away. 

The creature pushed up against the lid. 

I pushed back. 

I didn’t want to crush it. But I didn’t want it to escape, either. 

I could feel it bouncing inside the box. Pushing up against the lid. 

I kept my hand on the lid, struggling to hold it down. 

A station wagon filled with kids rumbled past. One of the kids yelled 
something to me. I didn’t really hear him. I was concentrating as hard as I could 
on keeping the egg creature inside the box. 

I rolled through a stop sign. I didn’t even see it. Luckily no cars were 
approaching. 

The lab came into view on the next corner. It was a white shingled building. 
Very low. Only one story tall. But very long. With a row of small, square 
windows along the front. It looked like a very long train car. 

I bumped up the curb and rode my bike onto the grass. Then I grabbed the 
shoe box with both hands and hopped off. The bike fell to the ground, both 
wheels spinning. 

Gripping the box tightly in both hands, I ran across the front lawn, up to the 
white double doors in front. 

I found a doorbell on the wall to the right of the doors. I pushed it. Pushed it 
again. Kept my finger on it. 

When no one came to the door, I tried the knob. Pushed. Then pulled. 

No. The door was locked. 

I tried knocking. I pounded as hard as I could with my fist. 

Then I rang the bell again. 

Where was everyone? 

I was about to start pounding again when I saw the sign over the door. A 
small, hand-printed black-and-white sign that sent my heart sinking. It read: 

CLOSED SATURDAYS AND SUNDAYS. 



13 


I let out a long sigh and shoved the box under my arm. I was so disappointed. 
What was I going to do with this weird egg creature now? 

Shaking my head unhappily, I turned and started back to my bike. I was 
halfway across the grass when I heard the front door open. 

I turned to see an older man in a white lab coat. He had shiny white hair, 
parted in the middle and slicked down on the sides. His moustache was salt-and- 
pepper. He had pale blue eyes that peered out at me from his pale, wrinkly face. 

His smile made his eyes crinkle up at the sides. “Can I help you?” he asked. 

“Uh... yeah,” I stammered. I raised the shoe box in front of me and started 
back across the grass. I could feel the egg creature bouncing around in there. 

“Is that a sick bird?” the man asked, squinting at the box. “I’m afraid I can’t 
help you with that. This is a science lab. I’m not a vet.” 

“No. It’s not a bird,” I told him. I carried the box to the doorway. My heart 
was pounding. For some reason, I felt really nervous. 

I guess I was excited about talking to a real scientist. I respect and admire 
scientists so much. 

Also, I was excited about finally finding out what had hatched from that 
weird egg. And finding out what I should do with it. 

The man smiled at me again. He had a warm, friendly smile that made me 
feel a little calmer. “Well, if it isn’t a bird in there, what is it?” he asked softly. 

“I was hoping you could tell me!” I replied. I shoved the shoe box toward 
him, but he didn’t take it. 

“It’s something I found,” I continued. “I mean, I found an egg. In my 
backyard.” 

“An egg? What kind of egg, son?” 

“I don’t know,” I told him. “It was very big. And it had veins all over it. 
And it kind of breathed.” 

He stared at me. “An egg that breathed.” 

I nodded. “I put it in my dresser drawer. And then it hatched this morning. 
And—” 

“Come in, son,” the man said. “Come right in.” His expression changed. 
His eyes flashed. He suddenly looked very interested. 



He put a hand on my shoulder and guided me into the lab. I had to blink a 
few times and wait for my eyes to adjust to the dim light inside. 

The walls were all white. I saw a desk and chairs. A low table with some 
science magazines on it. This was a waiting room, I decided. It was all very 
clean and modern-looking. A lot of chrome and glass and white leather. 

The man had his eyes on the box in my hands. He rubbed his moustache 
with his fingers. “I’m Dr. Gray,” he announced. “I’m the managing lab scientist 
here.” 

I switched the box to my left hand so I could shake hands with him. “I want 
to be a scientist when I’m older,” I blurted out. I could feel my face turning red. 

“What’s your name, son?” Dr. Gray asked. 

“Oh. Uh. Dana Johnson. I live a few blocks away. On Melrose.” 

“It’s nice to meet you, Dana,” Dr. Gray said, straightening the front of his 
white lab coat. He moved to the front door. He closed it, locked it, and bolted it. 

That’s weird, I thought, feeling a shiver of fear. 

Why did he do that? 

Then I remembered that the lab was closed on weekends. He probably bolts 
the doors when the place is closed. 

“Follow me,” Dr. Gray said. He led the way down the narrow white 
hallway. I followed him into a small lab. I saw a long table cluttered with all 
kinds of test tubes, specimen jars, and electronic equipment. 

“Set the box down there,” he instructed, pointing to an empty spot on the 
table. 

I set the box down. He reached in front of me to remove the lid. “You found 
this in your backyard?” 

I nodded. “Back by the creek.” 

He carefully pulled the lid off the box. 

“Oh my goodness!” he murmured. 



14 


The egg creature stared up at us. It quivered and bubbled against the side of the 
box. The bottom of the box was puddled with a sticky yellow goo. 

“So you found one,” Dr. Gray murmured, tilting the box. The yellow blob 
slid to the other end. 

“Found one?” I replied. “You mean you know what it is?” 

“I thought I rounded them all up,” Dr. Gray replied, rubbing his moustache. 
He turned his pale blue eyes on me. “But I guess I missed one.” 

“What is it?” I demanded. “What kind of animal is it?” 

He shrugged. He tilted the box the other way, making the egg creature slide 
to the other end. Then he gently poked the eggy blob in the back. “This is a 
young one,” he said softly. 

“A young what?” I asked impatiently. 

“The eggs fell all over town,” Dr. Gray said, poking the egg creature. “Like 
a meteor shower. Only on this town.” 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “They fell from the sky?” I wanted desperately to 
understand. But so far, nothing made sense. 

Dr. Gray turned to me and put a hand on my shoulder. “We believe the eggs 
fell all the way from Mars, Dana. There was a big storm on Mars. Two years 
ago. It set off something like a meteor shower. The storm sent these eggs 
hurtling through space.” 

My mouth dropped open. I gazed down at the quivering yellow blob in the 
shoe box. “This—this is a Martian?” I stammered. 

Dr. Gray smiled. “We think it came from Mars. We think the eggs flew 
through space for two years.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. My heart was racing. My hands were suddenly 
ice cold. 

Was I really staring at a creature from Mars? 

Had I actually touched a Martian? 

Then I had an even weirder thought: I found it. I picked it up from my 
backyard. 

Did that mean it belonged to me? 

Did I own a Martian? 



Dr. Gray bounced the creature —my creature—in the box. Its veins pulsed. 
Its black eyes stared back at us. “We don’t know how the eggs made it through 
the earth’s atmosphere,” the scientist continued. 

“You mean they should have burned up?” I asked. 

He nodded. “Most everything burns up when it hits our atmosphere. But the 
eggs seem to be very tough. So tough they weren’t destroyed.” 

The egg creature made a gurgling sound. It plopped wetly against the side 
of the shoe box. 

Dr. Gray chuckled. “This is a cute one.” 

“You have a lot of others?” I asked. 

“Let me show you something, Dana.” Holding the box in front of him, Dr. 
Gray led the way through a large metal door. The door clanged heavily behind 
us. 

A long, narrow hallway—the walls painted white—led past several small 
rooms. Dr. Gray’s lab coat made a starchy, scratchy sound as he walked. At the 
end of the hall, we stopped in front of a wide window. 

“In there,” Dr. Gray said softly. 

I stared into the window. 

Then I stared harder. 

Was he crazy? Was he playing some kind of joke on me? 

“I—I can’t see anything at all!” I cried. 



15 


“Hold on a second. I forgot something,” Dr. Gray said. He stepped over to the 
wall and flicked a light switch. 

A light above our heads in the hallway flashed on. And now I could see 
through the window. 

“Oh, wow!” I exclaimed as my eyes swept over the large room on the other 
side of the glass. I stared at a crowd of egg creatures! 

Dozens of them. 

Yellow, eggy blobs. All pulsing and quivering. Green veins throbbing. 

The egg creatures huddled on the white tile floor. They looked like big 
globs of cookie dough on a baking sheet. Dozens of tiny, round black eyes stared 
out at us. 

Unreal! 

As I stared at them in amazement, I kept thinking they were like stuffed 
animals. But they weren’t. They were alive. They breathed. They shook and 
bounced and bubbled. 

“Would you like to go in?” Dr. Gray asked. 

He didn’t wait for me to answer. He pulled out a small black control unit 
from his pocket. He pushed a button, and the door swung open. Then he opened 
the door wider and guided me inside. 

“Whoa!” I uttered a cry when I felt a blast of cold air. “It’s freezing in 
here!” I exclaimed. 

Dr. Gray smiled. “We keep it very cold. It seems to keep them more alert.” 

He held the shoe box in one hand. He motioned to the egg creatures with 
the other. “Once they hatch, the creatures don’t like heat. If the temperature goes 
too high, they melt,” he explained. 

He lowered the box to the floor. “We don’t want them to melt,” he said. “If 
they melt, we can’t study them.” 

Leaning over the box, he lifted my egg creature out gently. He placed it 
beside three or four other egg creatures. All of the yellow blobs began bouncing 
excitedly. 

Dr. Gray picked up the box and stood back up. He smiled down at the new 
arrival. “We don’t want you to melt, do we?” he told it. “We want you to be nice 



and alert. So we keep it as cold in here as we can.” 

I shivered and rubbed my arms. I had goose-bumps all over my skin. From 
the excitement? Or from the cold? 

I wished I had worn something warmer than a T-shirt! 

The egg creatures bobbed and bubbled. I couldn’t take my eyes off them. 
Real creatures from Mars! 

I watched them start to bounce toward us. They moved surprisingly fast. 
They kind of rolled, kind of inched their way forward. They left slimy, yellow 
trails behind them as they moved. 

I wanted to ask Dr. Gray a million questions. “Do they have brains?” I 
asked. “Are they smart? Can they communicate? Have you tried talking to them? 
Do they talk to each other? How can they breathe our air?” 

He chuckled. “You have a good scientific mind, Dana,” he said. “Let’s take 
one question at a time. Which would you like me to answer first?” 

“Well—” I started to reply. But I stopped when I realized what the egg 
creatures had done. 

While Dr. Gray and I talked, they had all moved quickly into a circle. 

And now they had the two of us surrounded. 

I spun around. 

The egg creatures had moved behind us. They blocked the door. And now 
they were closing in on us, bubbling and throbbing, leaving a trail of slime as 
they slid forward. 

What were they planning to do? 



16 


In a panic, I turned to Dr. Gray. To my shock, he was grinning. 

“They—they’ve trapped us!” I stammered. 

He shook his head. “Sometimes they move like that. But don’t be scared, 
Dana. They’re harmless.” 

“Harmless?” I cried. My voice came out shrill and tiny. “But—but—” 

“What can they do?” Dr. Gray asked, placing a comforting hand on my 
trembling shoulder. “They’re only blobs of egg. They can’t bite you—can they? 
They don’t appear to have mouths. They can’t grab you. Or punch you. Or kick 
you. They have no hands or legs.” 

The egg creatures moved their circle closer. I watched them, my throat still 
tight, my legs shaking. 

I knew that what Dr. Gray was telling me was true. 

But why were they doing this? 

Why did they form a circle? Why were they closing in on us? 

“Sometimes they form triangles,” Dr. Gray told me. “Sometimes rectangles 
or squares. It’s as if they’re trying out different shapes they’ve seen. Maybe this 
is a way they’re trying to communicate with us.” 

“Maybe,” I agreed softly. I wished the egg creatures would back up. They 
were little, wet blobs. But they were really giving me the creeps! 

I shivered again. My breath steamed up in front of me. 

It was so cold, my glasses started to fog! 

I stared down at the egg creature I had brought. It had joined the circle. It 
bobbed and bounced with all the others. 

Dr. Gray turned and started to the door. I turned with him. I wanted to get 
out of that freezer as fast as I could! 

“Thank you for bringing that one in,” Dr. Gray said. He shook his head. “I 
thought I had collected them all. What a surprise that I missed one.” He 
scratched his hair. “You say you found it in your backyard?” 

I nodded. “It was an egg. But then it hatched in my dresser drawer.” My 
teeth chattered. I was so cold! 

“Does that mean it’s mine?” I asked Dr. Gray. “I mean, does it belong to 


me?” 



His smile faded. “I’m not really sure. I don’t know what the law is about 
alien creatures from outer space.” He frowned. “Maybe there is no law.” 

I glanced down at the little blob. The green veins along its side were 
bulging. Its whole body was throbbing like crazy. 

Was it sorry to see me go? 

No way. That’s really dumb, I told myself. 

“I guess you’ll want to keep it for a while and study it,” I said to Dr. Gray. 

He nodded. “Yes. I’m doing every kind of test I can think of.” 

“But can I come back and visit it?” I asked. 

Dr. Gray narrowed his eyes at me. “Come back? Dana, what do you mean 
by come back? You’re not leaving.” 



17 


“Excuse me?” I choked out. I knew I hadn’t heard him correctly. 

My whole body shook in a wild shiver. I rubbed my bare arms, trying to 
warm them. 

“Did you say I’m not leaving?” I managed to ask. 

Dr. Gray locked his pale blue eyes on mine. “I’m afraid you can’t leave, 
Dana. You must stay here.” 

A frightened cry escaped my throat. He wasn’t serious! He couldn’t be 
serious. 

He can’t keep me here, I told myself. 

No way. He can’t keep me here against my will. That’s against the law. 

“But... why?” I demanded weakly. “Why can’t I go home?” 

“You can understand—can’t you?” Dr. Gray replied calmly. “We don’t want 
anyone to know about these space aliens. We don’t want anyone to know that 
we’ve been invaded by Martians.” 

He sighed. “You don’t want to throw the whole world into a panic—do you, 
Dana?” 

“I—I—I—” I tried to answer. But I was too frightened. Too startled. Too 

cold. 

I glared angrily at Dr. Gray. “You have to let me go,” I insisted in a 
trembling whisper. 

His expression softened. “Please don’t stare at me like that,” he said. “I’m 
not a bad guy. I don’t want to frighten you. And I don’t want to keep you in this 
lab against your will. But what choice do I have? I’m a scientist, Dana. I have to 
do my job.” 

I stared back at him, my whole body shaking. I didn’t know what to say. 
My eyes moved to the metal door. It was shut. But he hadn’t bolted it. 

I wondered if I could get to the door before he did. 

“I have to study you too,” Dr. Gray continued. He tucked his hands into the 
pockets of his lab coat. “It’s my job, Dana.” 

“Study me?” I squeaked. “Why?” 

He motioned to my egg creature. “You touched it—didn’t you? You 
handled it? You picked it up?” 



I shrugged. “Well, yeah. I picked it up. So what?” 

“Well, we don’t know what kind of dangerous germs it gave you,” he 
replied. “We don’t know what kind of germs or bacteria or strange diseases these 
things carried with them from Mars.” 

I swallowed hard. “Huh? Diseases?” 

He scratched his moustache. “I don’t want to scare you. You’re probably 
perfectly okay. You feel okay—right?” 

My teeth chattered. “Yeah. I guess. Just cold.” 

“Well, I have to keep you here and study you. You know. Watch you 
carefully. Make sure that touching the egg creature didn’t harm you or change 
you.” 

No way, I thought. 

I don’t care about strange germs from Mars. I don’t care about egg diseases. 
I don’t care about science. 

All I care about is getting out of here. Getting home to my family. 

You’re not keeping me here, Dr. Gray. You’re not studying me. 

Because I’m outta here! 

Dr. Gray was saying something. I guess he was still explaining why he 
planned to keep me prisoner in this freezing cold lab. 

But I didn’t listen to him. Instead, I took off. 

I ran toward the big metal door. 

The circle of egg creatures blocked my way. But I leaped over them easily. 
And kept running. 

Gasping for breath, shivering, I reached the door. 

I grabbed the handle. And glanced back. 

Was Dr. Gray chasing after me? 

No. He hadn’t moved. 

Good! I thought. I caught him by surprise. 

I’m gone! 

I turned the door handle. Pulled hard. 

The door didn’t open. 

I pulled harder. 

It didn’t budge. 

I tried pushing it. 

No go. 

Dr. Gray’s voice rang in my ears. “The door is controlled electronically,” he 



said calmly. “It’s locked. It cannot be opened unless you have the control unit.” 

I didn’t believe him. I tugged again. Then I pushed again. 

He was telling the truth. The door was electronically sealed. 

I gave up with a loud cry of protest. I spun around to face him. “How long 
do I have to stay here?” I demanded. 

He replied in a low, icy voice. “Probably for a very long time.” 



18 


“Step away from the door, Dana,” Dr. Gray ordered. “Try to calm down.” 

Calm down? 

“YouTl be okay,” the scientist said. “I take very good care of my 
specimens.” 

Specimens ? 

I didn’t want to calm down. And I didn’t want to be a specimen. 

“I’m a boy. Not a specimen,” I told him angrily. 

I don’t think he heard me. He lifted me out of the way. Then he clicked the 
small remote unit in his hand. The door opened just long enough for him to slide 
through. 

It made a loud click as it snapped shut behind him. 

Locked in. I was locked in this freezer with three dozen Martians. 

My heart pounded. I heard a shrill whistle in my ears. My temples throbbed 
with pain. My whole head felt ready to explode! 

I’d never been so angry in my life. 

I let out a cry of rage. 

The egg creatures all began to chatter. I spun around in surprise. They 
sounded a little like chimps. 

A roomful of chimps, chattering away. 

Only they weren’t chimps. They were monsters from Mars. And I was 
locked in, all alone with them. 

A specimen. 

“Noooo!” I let out another howl and ran to the long window. 

“You can’t leave me here!” I shrieked. I pounded on the glass with both 

fists. 

I wanted to cry. I wanted to scream until my throat was raw. I’d never felt 
so angry and so frightened all at once. 

“Let me out! Dr. Gray—let me out of here! You can’t keep me here!” I 
screamed. I banged on the window as hard as I could. 

I’ll pound till I break the glass, I told myself. 

I’ll break through. Then I’ll climb out and escape. 



I beat my fists frantically against the glass. “Let me out of here! You can’t 
do this!” 

The glass was thick and hard. No way I could break through. 

“Let me out! ” I uttered a final scream. 

When I turned back into the room, the egg creatures stopped chattering. 
They stared up at me with their black, button eyes. 

They didn’t quiver or bounce. They stood totally still. As if they had frozen. 

I’m going to freeze! I realized. I rubbed my bare arms. But it didn’t help 
warm me. My hands were ice cold. 

Icicles are going to form on me, I thought. I’m going to freeze to death in 
here. I’m going to turn into a human Popsicle. 

The egg creatures stood so still. Their eyes were all locked on me. As if 
they were studying me. As if they were trying to decide what to do about me. 

Suddenly my egg creature broke the silence. I recognized it by the blue 
veins down its front. It started to chatter loudly. 

The other egg creatures turned, as if listening to it. 

Was it talking to them? Was it communicating in some weird Martian 
chatter language? 

“I hope you’re telling them all how I saved your life!” I called to it. “I hope 
you’re telling them what a good guy I am. You almost went down the drain— 
remember?” 

Of course the egg creature couldn’t understand me. 

I don’t know why I was shouting at it like that. I guess I was totally losing 
it. Totally freaked. 

As the egg creature chattered on, I stared at the others. They all listened in 
silence. I started to count them. There were so many of them—and so few of me! 

Were they friendly? Did they like strangers? Did they like humans? 

How did they feel about being locked up in this freezing cold room? 

Did they feel anything at all? 

These were questions I didn’t really want to know the answers to. 

I just wanted to get out of there. 

I decided to try the window again. But before I could move, my egg 
creature stopped talking. 

And the others started to move. 

Silently, they huddled together. Pressed together into a wide yellow wedge. 

And rolling faster than I could imagine, they attacked. 



19 


“Hey—!” I uttered a startled cry and backed up. 

The wedge of egg creatures rolled forward. Their bodies slapped the floor 
wetly as they bounced toward me. 

I retreated until my back hit the window. 

Nowhere to run. 

“What do you want?” I screamed. My voice came out high and tight in 
panic. “What are you going to do?” 

I turned and banged on the window again, pounding with open hands. “Dr. 
Gray! Dr. Gray! Help me!” 

Did they plan to roll over me? To swallow me up? 

To my surprise, the egg creatures stopped a few inches in front of me. They 
twirled and bounced until they had formed a circle once again. 

Then, moving quickly and silently, they shifted back into a big yellow 
triangle. 

I stared down at them, shivering, my teeth chattering. 

They’re not attacking, I decided. 

But what are they doing? 

Why are they forming these shapes? Are they trying to talk to me? 

I took a deep breath, trying to calm my panic. 

You’re a scientist, Dana, I reminded myself. Act like a scientist. Not a 
frightened kid. Try to talk back to them. 

I thought hard for a few seconds. Then I raised my hands in front of me. 
And I formed a circle with my pointer fingers and thumbs. 

I held the circle up so the egg creatures could all see it. And waited to see if 
they did anything. 

The yellow blobs had formed a wide triangle that nearly filled the room. I 
saw their round black eyes go up to the circle I had formed. 

And then I watched them bounce and roll—into a circle! 

Were they copying me? 

I straightened my fingers and thumbs into a triangle. 

And the egg creatures formed a triangle. 



Yes! 

We’re communicating! I realized. We’re talking to each other! 

I suddenly felt really excited. I felt like some kind of pioneer. 

I’m the first person on earth to communicate with Martians! I told myself. 
These creatures are friendly, I decided. They’re not dangerous. 

I didn’t really know that for sure. But I was so excited that I had 
communicated with them, I didn’t want to think anything bad about them. 

Dr. Gray has no right to keep them prisoner here, I thought. 

And he has no right to lock me up with them. 

I didn’t believe his excuse for keeping me here. Not for a minute. 

Just because I touched one? Just because I handled one? 

Did he really expect me to believe that touching an egg creature could harm 

me? 

Did he really think it would rot my skin off or something? 

Did he really think that touching an egg creature would give me a weird 
disease or change me in some way? 

That was just stupid. 

I carried that little yellow blob in my hands—and I felt perfectly fine. 

These creatures are my friends, I told myself. Touching them isn’t going to 
harm me in any way. 

But I’m a scientist. At least, I want to be a scientist. So I have to be 
scientific, I realized. 

I decided to check myself out—just to make sure. 

I raised my hands and inspected them carefully, first one, then the other. 
They looked okay to me. No strange rashes. No skin peeling off. I still had four 
fingers and a thumb on each hand. 

I rubbed my arms. They were the same too. Perfectly okay. 

Might as well check myself out all over, I told myself. 

I reached down and grabbed my left leg. 

Soft and mushy! 

“Oh no!” I wailed. 

I squeezed my leg again. Soft and lumpy. 

I didn’t have to look. I knew what was happening. 

I was slowly turning into one of them. I was turning into a lump of 
scrambled eggs! 



20 


“No. Oh, please—no.” 

I squeezed my mushy ankle. I couldn’t bear to look down. I didn’t want to 
see what was happening to me. 

But I had to. 

Slowly, I lowered my gaze. 

And saw that I was squeezing one of the egg creatures. Not my leg. 

I let go instantly and raised my hand. A relieved laugh escaped my throat. 
“Oh wow!” 

How could I think that mushy blob was my leg? 

I watched the little Martian scurry back to its pals. 

I shook my head. Even though no one else was around, I felt like a total 

jerk. 

Just calm down, Dana, I scolded myself. 

But how could I? 

The air in the lab seemed to get colder. I couldn’t stop shivering. I clamped 
my jaws tightly. But I couldn’t stop my teeth from chattering. 

I squeezed my nose. Cold and numb. I rubbed my ears. They were numb 

too. 

This is no joke, I thought, my throat tightening. I’m going to get frostbite. 
I’m really going to freeze. 

I tried thinking warm thoughts. I thought about the beach in summer. I 
thought about a blazing fire in the fireplace in our den. 

It didn’t help. 

A hard shiver made my whole body twitch. 

I’ve got to do something to take my mind off the cold, I decided. 

The egg creatures had spread out over the room. I raised my hands again 
and formed a triangle. 

They stared up at it, but didn’t move. 

I curled my fingers into a circle. 

They ignored this one too. 

“I guess you guys got bored, huh?” I asked them. 



I tried to bend my fingers and thumbs into a rectangle. But it was too hard. 
Fingers and thumbs can’t really bend into a rectangle. 

Besides, the egg creatures weren’t paying much attention to me. 

I’m going to freeze, I told myself again. Freeze. Freeze. Freeze. The word 
repeated in my mind until it became an unhappy chant. 

I lowered myself to the floor and pressed into the corner. I curled up, trying 
to save body warmth. Or what was left of it. 

A sound on the other side of the window made me jump up. 

Someone was coming. Dr. Gray? To let me out? 

I turned eagerly to the door. I heard footsteps out in the hall. Then a clink of 
metal. 

A slot opened just above the floor to the left of the door. A food tray slid in. 
It plopped onto the floor. 

I hurried over to it. Macaroni and cheese and a small container of milk. 

“But I hate macaroni and cheese!” I screeched. 

No reply. 

“I hate it! I hate it! I hate it!” I wailed. 

I was starting to lose it again. But I didn’t care. 

I leaned over the tray and held my hands over the plate of macaroni. The 
steam warmed my hands. 

At least it’s hot, I thought. 

I sat down on the floor and lifted the tray to my lap. Then I gulped down the 
macaroni, just for the warmth. 

It tasted horrible. I hate that wet, clotted, cheesy taste. But it did warm me 
up a little. 

I didn’t open the milk. Too cold. 

Feeling a little better, I shoved the tray aside and climbed to my feet. I 
strode over to the window and started pounding the glass with my fists. 

“Dr. Gray—let me out!” I shouted. “Dr. Gray—I know you can hear me. 
Let me out! You can’t lock me in here and make me eat macaroni and cheese! 
Let me out!” 

I screamed until my voice was hoarse. I didn’t hear a reply. Not a sound 
from the other side of the glass. 

I turned away from the window in disgust. 

“I’ve got to find a way out of here,” I said out loud. “I’ve got to!” 

And then, I had an idea. 



21 


Sad to say, it was a bad idea. 

The kind of idea you think of when you’re freezing to death in a total panic. 

What was the idea? To call home and tell Mom and Dad to come get me. 

The only problem with that idea was that there were no phones in the room. 

I searched carefully. There were metal shelves up to the ceiling against the 
back wall. They contained only scientific books and files. There was a desk in 
one corner. The desktop was bare. 

Nothing else. 

Nothing else in the whole room. Except for the dozens of egg creatures and 
me. 

I needed another idea, an idea that didn’t call for a telephone. 

But I was stumped. I tried the door again. I thought Dr. Gray might have 
gotten careless and left it unlocked. 

No such luck. 

I checked out the slot where my food tray had been delivered. It was only a 
few inches tall. Way too narrow for me to slip through. 

I was trapped. A prisoner. A specimen. 

I dropped glumly down to the floor and rested my back against the wall. I 
pulled up my knees and wrapped my arms around them. I curled into a ball, 
trying to stay warm. 

How long did Dr. Gray plan to keep me here? 

Forever? 

I let out a miserable sigh. But then a thought helped to cheer me. I suddenly 
had a little hope. 

I remembered something I had forgotten. I had told Anne where I was 
going! 

This morning in her backyard, I had told Anne I was going to take the egg 
creature to the science lab. 

I’m going to be rescued! I realized. 

I leaped to my feet and shot both fists into the air. I opened my mouth in a 
happy cheer. “Yesssss!” 



I knew exactly what would happen. 

When I don’t show up for dinner, Mom or Dad will call Anne. Because 
that’s where I’m always hanging out when I should be home for dinner. 

Anne will tell them I went to the science lab on Denver. 

Mom will say, “He should be back by now.” 

Dad will say, “I’d better go get him.” 

And Dad will come and rescue me. 

Only a matter of time, I knew. Only a matter of a few hours, and Dad will 
be here to get me out of this freezer. 

I felt so much better. 

I lowered myself back to the floor and leaned against the wall to wait. The 
egg creatures all stared at me. Watched me in silence. Trying to figure me out, I 
guess. 

I didn’t realize that I fell asleep. I guess I was worn out from all the 
excitement—and the fear. 

I’m not sure how long I slept. 

Voices woke me up. Voices from out in the hall. 

I sat up, instantly alert. And I listened. 

And heard Dad’s voice. 

Yes! 

He was here. He was about to rescue me. 

Yes! 

I climbed to my feet. I stretched. I got ready to greet Dad. 

And then, from the front hall, I heard Dr. Gray say, “I’m sorry, Mr. Johnson. 
Your son never stopped here.” 



22 


“Are you sure?” I heard Dad ask. 

“Very sure,” Dr. Gray replied. “I’m the only one here today. We’re closed. 
We had no visitors.” 

“He’s about this tall,” I heard Dad say. “He has dark hair, and he wears 
glasses.” 

“No. Sorry,” Dr. Gray insisted. 

“But he told his friend that he was coming here. He had something he 
wanted to show to a scientist. His bike is gone from the garage.” 

“Well, you can check outside for your son’s bike,” Dr. Gray told Dad. “But 
I don’t think you’ll find it.” 

He moved it! I realized. Dr. Gray moved my bike so no one would find it! 

I let out a shout of rage and ran to the window. “Dad—I’m in here!” I 
shouted. I cupped my hands around my mouth so my voice would be even 
louder. “Dad! Can you hear me? I’m in here! Dad?” 

I took a deep breath and listened. My heart was thudding so loudly, I could 
barely hear their voices from the front. 

Dad and Dr. Gray continued talking in low, calm voices. 

“Dad! Can’t you hear me?” I screamed. “It’s me, Dana! Come back here, 
Dad! I’m here! Come let me out!” 

My voice cracked. My throat ached from screaming so loud. 

“Dad— please! ” 

My chest heaving, I pressed my ear against the window and listened again. 

“Well, it’s very strange, Mr. Johnson,” Dr. Gray was saying. “The boy never 
came here. Would you like to look around the lab?” 

Yes, Dad! I pleaded silently. Say yes. 

Tell him that you’d like to look around the lab, Dad! Please! 

“No, thanks,” I heard Dad say. “I’d better keep searching. Thank you, Dr. 
Gray.” 

I heard Dad say good-bye. 

I heard the front door close. 

And I knew I was doomed. 



23 


“I don’t believe this,” I murmured out loud. “Dad was so close. So close!” 

I sank back to the floor. I felt as if my heart were sinking too. I wanted to 
keep dropping, down onto the floor, into the ground. Just keep sinking till I 
disappeared forever. 

My throat ached from screaming. Why couldn’t Dad hear me? I could hear 

him. 

And why did he believe Dr. Gray’s lies? Why didn’t Dad check out the lab 
for himself? 

He would see me through the window. And I would be rescued. 

Dr. Gray is evil, I realized. He pretends to be interested only in science. He 
pretended to be worried about my health, about my safety. He said that’s why he 
was keeping me here—to make sure I was safe. 

But he lied to my father. 

And he was lying to me. 

Crouched on the floor, I shivered as the frigid air seemed to seep right 
through my skin. I shut my eyes and lowered my head. 

I wanted to stay calm. I knew I had to stay calm to think clearly. But I 
couldn’t. The chills I felt running down my back weren’t just from the cold. 
They were also from terror. 

Voices in the front snapped me to attention. I held my breath and listened. 

Was that my dad? 

Or was I starting to hear things? 

“Maybe I will take a look around.” That’s what I thought I heard Dad say. 

Was I dreaming it? 

No. I heard Dr. Gray mumble something. Then I heard Dad say, 
“Sometimes Dana sneaks into places where he doesn’t belong. He’s so interested 
in science, he may have sneaked in through a back door, Dr. Gray.” 

“Yes!” I cried happily. Every time I lost all hope, I somehow got another 
chance. 

I jumped up and hurried to the window. I crossed my fingers and prayed 
Dad would walk to the back and see me. 

After a few seconds, I saw Dad and Dr. Gray at the far end of the long, 



white hall. Dr. Gray was leading him slowly, opening doors. They peered into 
each lab, then moved on. 

“Dad!” I called. “Can you hear me? I’m back here!” 

Even though I had my face pressed up to the window glass, he couldn’t hear 
me. 

I banged on the glass. Dad kept walking with Dr. Gray. He didn’t look up. 

I waited for them to come closer. My heart was banging against my chest 
now. My mouth was dry. I pressed up close to the window. 

In a few seconds, Dad would peer into the window and see me standing 

here. 

And then I would be out—and Dr. Gray would have some real explaining to 
do. 

With my hands and nose pressed against the glass, I watched them move 
forward. The hall was dark on this end. But I could see them clearly as they 
peeked into the labs at the other end. 

“Dad!” I shouted. “Dad—over here!” 

I knew he couldn’t hear me. But I had to shout anyway. 

The two men disappeared into a lab for a few seconds. Then they came out 
and stepped toward me. 

They were talking in low tones. I couldn’t hear what they were saying. 

Dad had his eyes on Dr. Gray. 

Turn this way, Dad, I silently urged. Please—look to the end of the hall 
Look in the window. 

Chatting softly, they disappeared through another door. 

What on earth are they talking about? I wondered. 

A few seconds later, they were back in the hall. Moving this way. 

Dad — please! Here I am! I pressed up eagerly against the glass. 

I pounded my fists on the window. 

Dad looked up. 

And stared into the window. 

He stared right at me. 

I’m rescued! I realized. 

I’m outta here! 

Dad stared at me for a few seconds. 

Then he turned back to Dr. Gray. “Thanks for showing me around,” he said. 
“Dana definitely isn’t here. Sorry I wasted your time.” 



24 


“Dad—I’m right here!” I shrieked. “You’re looking right at me!” 

Was I invisible? 

Why didn’t he see me? 

“Sorry I wasted your time, Dr. Gray,” I heard Dad say again. 

“Good luck in finding Dana,” Dr. Gray replied. “I’m sure he’ll turn up 
really soon. He’s probably at a friend’s house and forgot the time. You know 
how kids are.” 

“Nooooooo!” I let out a long wail. “Dad—come back! Dad!” 

As I stared in horror, Dad turned away and started back down the long hall. 
With another cry, I began to pound on the window glass with both fists. 
“Dad! Dad! Dad!” I chanted with each slam of my fist. 

Dad turned around. “What’s that noise?” he asked Dr. Gray. 

Dr. Gray turned too. 

I pounded the glass even harder. I pounded until my knuckles were raw and 
throbbing. “Dad! Dad! Dad!” I continued to chant. 

“What’s that pounding noise?” Dad demanded from halfway down the hall. 
“It’s the pipes,” Dr. Gray told him. “I’ve been having a lot of trouble with 
the pipes. The plumber is coming on Monday.” 

Dad nodded. 

He kept walking. I heard him say good-bye to the scientist. Then I heard the 
door close behind him. 

I knew that this time he wouldn’t come back. 

I didn’t move from the window. I stared through the glass down the long 

hall. 

A few seconds later, I saw Dr. Gray coming toward me. He had an angry 
scowl on his face. 

I’m his prisoner now, I thought glumly. 

What does he plan to do? 



25 


He stopped outside the window. He clicked on the hall light. 

In the bright light, I could see beads of sweat on his forehead. He frowned 
and stared in at me with those cold blue eyes. 

“Nice try, Dana,” he said sourly. 

“Huh? What do you mean?” I choked out. My legs were trembling. Not 
from the cold. I was really terrified now. 

“You almost got your father’s attention,” Dr. Gray replied. “That wouldn’t 
have been nice. That would have spoiled my plans.” 

I pressed both palms against the glass. I tried to force myself to stop 
trembling. 

“Why couldn’t Dad see me?” I demanded. 

Dr. Gray rubbed a hand over his side of the window. “It’s one-way glass,” 
he explained. “No one can see into the room from the hall—unless I turn on the 
bright hall light.” 

I let out a long sigh. “You mean—?” 

“Your father saw only blackness,” the scientist said with a pleased grin. “He 
thought he was staring into an empty room. Just the way you did—until I turned 
on the light.” 

“But why didn’t he hear me?” I demanded. “I was shouting my head off.” 

Dr. Gray shook his head. “A waste of time. The room you are in is totally 
soundproof. Not a sound escapes into the hall.” 

“But I can hear you!” I declared. “I could hear every word you and Dad 
said. And now you can hear me.” 

“There is a speaker system in the wall,” he explained. “I can turn it on and 
off with the same control unit that locks the door.” 

“So I could hear you, but you couldn’t hear me,” I murmured. 

“You’re a very smart boy,” he replied. His blue eyes flashed. “I know 
you’re smart enough not to try any more tricks in there.” 

“You have to let me out!” I screamed. “You can’t keep me here!” 

“Yes, I can,” he replied softly. “I can keep you here as long as I like, Dana.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. I was so frightened, I couldn’t speak. 

“It’s my duty to keep you in there,” Dr. Gray said calmly. He didn’t care 



that I was so scared and upset. He didn’t care about me at all, I realized. 

He must be crazy, I decided. 

Crazy and evil. 

“It’s my duty to keep you here,” he repeated. “I must make sure that the egg 
creatures haven’t harmed you. I must make sure that the egg creatures haven’t 
given you strange germs that you might pass on to others.” 

“Let me out!” I shrieked. I was too frightened and angry to argue with him 
now. Too angry and frightened to think clearly. “Let me out! Let me out!” I 
demanded, pounding on the glass with my aching fists. 

“Get some rest, Dana,” he instructed. “Don’t tire yourself out, son. I want to 
start doing tests on you in the morning. I have many, many tests to perform.” 

“But I’m f-freezing!” I stammered. “Let me out of here. At least let me stay 
somewhere warm. Please?” 

He ignored my plea. He clicked off the hall light and turned away. 

I watched him make his way down the long hall. He disappeared through a 
door in front. And closed the door hard behind him. 

I stood there, trembling, my heart pounding. 

I was cold—and very scared. 

I had no way of knowing things were about to get a lot scarier! 



26 


I was so desperate to get Dad’s attention, I nearly forgot about the egg creatures. 
Now I turned from the window to find them scattered around the room. 

They stood still as statues. They didn’t bounce or quiver. They all seemed to 
be staring at me. 

Dr. Gray had turned off all the lights except for a tiny, dim bulb in the 
ceiling. The little egg blobs appeared pale and gray in the dim light. 

I felt a chill at the back of my neck. 

Was it safe to go to sleep in the same room with them? 

I suddenly felt exhausted. So tired that all my muscles ached. My head 
spun. 

I needed sleep. 

I knew I had to rest so I could be alert and sharp tomorrow. Alert and sharp 
so I could find a way to escape. 

But if I fell asleep, what would the egg creatures do? 

Would they leave me alone? Would they sleep too? 

Or would they try to harm me in some way? 

Were they good? Were they evil? 

Were they intelligent at all? 

I had no way of knowing. 

I only knew I couldn’t stay awake much longer. 

I dropped down to the floor and curled up in the corner. I tried to stay warm 
by tucking myself into a ball. 

But it didn’t help. The cold swept over me. My nose was frozen. My ears 
were numb. My glasses were frozen to my face. 

Even wrapped up tightly, I couldn’t stop shaking. 

I’m going to freeze to death, I realized. 

When Dr. Gray comes back tomorrow morning, he’ll find me on the floor. 
A solid lump of ice. 

I gazed at the egg creatures. They stared back at me in the dim light. 

Silence. 

Such heavy silence in the room that I wanted to scream. 



“Aren’t you cold?” I cried out to them. My voice came out hoarse, weak 
from all the screaming I had done. “Aren’t you freezing to death too?” I asked 
them. “How can you guys stand it?” 

Of course they didn’t reply. 

“Dana, you’re totally losing it,” I scolded myself out loud. 

I was trying to talk to a bunch of egg lumps from another planet! Did I 
really expect them to answer me? 

They stared back in silence. None of them quivered. None of them moved. 
Their little dark eyes glowed in the dim light from the ceiling. 

Maybe they’re asleep, I thought. 

Maybe they sleep with their eyes open. That’s why they’re not moving. 
That’s why they’ve stopped bouncing. They’re sound asleep. 

That made me feel a little better. 

I tucked myself into a tighter ball, and I tried to fall asleep too. If only I 
could stop shivering. 

I closed my eyes and silently repeated the word, “sleep, sleep, sleep” in my 
mind. 

It didn’t help. 

And when I opened my eyes, I saw the egg creatures start to move. 

I was wrong. They weren’t asleep. 

They were wide awake. And they were all moving together. All moving at 
once. 

Coming to get me. 



27 


“Ohhh.” A low moan escaped from my throat. 

I was already shaking all over from the cold. But now my entire body 
shuddered from fear. 

The egg creatures moved with surprising speed. 

They were bunching together in the center of the room. Pressing into each 
other, making wet smacking sounds. 

I tried to climb to my feet. But my legs didn’t work. 

My knees bent like rubber, and I landed back on the floor. I pressed back 
into the corner—and watched them move. 

They slapped up against each other. Loud, wet slaps. 

And as they pushed together, they rolled forward. Rolled toward me. 

“What are you doing?” I cried in a high, shrill voice. “What are you going 
to do to me?” 

They didn’t reply. 

The wet smacks echoed through the room as the eggy creatures threw 
themselves into each other. 

“Leave me alone!” I shrieked. Once again I tried to stand. I made it to my 
knees. But I was trembling too hard to balance on two feet. 

“Leave me alone—please! I’ll help you guys escape too!” I promised. 
“Really. I’ll help you escape—tomorrow. Just let me make it through the night.” 

They didn’t seem to understand. 

They didn’t seem to hear me! 

What are they doing? I asked myself, watching them creep forward. Why 
are they doing this? 

They had waited until I nearly fell asleep, I realized. 

That means they wanted to catch me off guard. They wanted to sneak up on 
me. 

Because they were about to do something I wasn’t going to like. Something 
I wasn’t going to like at all. 

I pressed my back against the wall. 

The egg creatures moved quickly now, pale in the gray light. 



Squinting hard at them, I realized to my horror that they had all stuck 
themselves together. 

They were no longer dozens of little egg creatures. 

Now they had joined together to form one enormous egg creature! 

I was staring at a big, quivering wall of egg! A wall so big it nearly covered 
the floor of the room. 

A wall that was rolling toward me. Rolling to get me. 

“Whoa! Please—whoa!” I choked out. 

I knew I should climb to my feet. I knew I should try to run. 

But where could I run? 

How could I escape from this huge, solid egg wall? 

I couldn’t. 

So I lay there and watched it come. Too frozen. Too frozen to move. 
“Ohhhh.” I moaned as the front of the wall of eggs rose up over my shoes. 

It was moving so fast now. Crawling somehow. 

Crawling over me. 

The egg wall swept over my shoes. Over the legs of my jeans. Over my 
waist. 

I lay there helpless as it swept over me. 

Too frozen. Too frozen. 

Helpless, as it poured over me. 

Trapping me beneath it. 

Smothering me. 



28 


I should have moved. 

I should have fought it. 

Too late. Too late now. 

The sticky, warm egg creatures—all glued together—rolled over me like a 
heavy carpet. 

I pushed up both arms. I raised my knees. I tried to squirm away. 

Too late. 

I tried to roll out from underneath. But the heavy, living carpet had me 
pinned on my back. Pinned to the floor. 

It rolled over my waist. And then quickly, over my chest. 

Was it going to sweep over my head? Was it going to smother me? 

I punched at it with both fists. 

But it was too late to push it away. Too late to do it any harm. 

Too late to stop it as it crept closer to my neck. So warm and heavy. 

I twisted my head from side to side. I tried to roll away. 

But it was no use. 

Too late. Too late to fight back. 

And now I lay there, trapped. And felt it creep up to my chin. 

Felt it throbbing. Pulsing. 

Dozens of eggy monsters all pressed together. Alive. A living sheet of egg 
creatures. Covering me. 

Covering me. 

I took a deep breath and held it as the heavy, warm carpet pressed itself 
against my chin. My arms and legs were pinned to the floor. I couldn’t squirm 
away. 

I couldn’t move. 

To my surprise, the egg carpet stopped under my chin. 

I let out a long whoosh of air. 

And waited. 

Had it really stopped? 

Yes. 



It didn’t crawl over my head. It rested heavily on top of me. Throbbing 
steadily, as if it had two dozen heartbeats. 

So warm. 

I felt so warm beneath it. Almost cozy. 

I let out a sigh. For the first time, I had stopped shivering. My hands and 
feet were no longer frozen. No chills ran down my back. 

Warm. I felt toasty and warm. 

A smile spread over my face. I could feel my fear fading away with the 

cold. 

The egg creatures weren’t trying to harm me, I realized. 

They wanted to help me. 

They pressed themselves together to form a blanket. A warm and cozy 
blanket. 

They worked together to keep me from freezing. 

They saved my life! 

With the warm, pulsing blanket on top of me, I suddenly felt calm. And 
sleepy. I drifted into a peaceful, dreamless sleep. 

Such a wonderful, soothing sleep. 

But it didn’t help get me ready for the horrors of the next morning. 



29 


I awoke a couple of times during the night. At first, I felt alarmed and frightened 
when I saw that I wasn’t home in bed. 

But the pulsing, warm egg blanket relaxed me. I shut my eyes and drifted 
back to sleep. 

Some time in the morning, I was aroused from a deep sleep by an angry 
voice. I felt hands grab my shoulders roughly. 

Someone was shaking me hard. Shaking me awake. 

I opened my eyes to find Dr. Gray bending over me in his white lab coat. 
His face was twisted in anger. He shook me hard, shouting furiously. 

“Dana—what have you done? What have you done to the egg monsters?” 

“Huh?” I was still half asleep. My eyes struggled to focus. My head bobbed 
loosely on my shoulders as the angry scientist shook me. 

“Let go!” I finally managed to choke out. 

“What have you done to them?” Dr. Gray demanded. “How did you turn 
them into a blanket?” 

“I—I didn’t!” I stammered. 

He uttered a furious growl. “You’ve ruined everything!” he shrieked. 

“Please—” I started, struggling to wake up. 

He let go of me and grabbed the egg blanket in both hands. “What have you 
done, Dana?” he repeated. “Why did you do this?” 

With another cry of rage, he ripped the blanket off me—and heaved it 
against the wall. 

The egg creatures made a soft splat as they hit the lab wall. I heard them 
utter tiny squeals of pain. The blanket folded limply to the floor. 

“You shouldn’t do that, Dr. Gray!” I screamed, finally finding my voice. I 
jumped to my feet. I could still feel the warmth of the egg blanket on my skin. 

“You hurt them!” I shrieked. 

I gazed down at the yellow blanket. It bubbled silently where it had been 
thrown. It didn’t move. 

“You let them touch you?” Dr. Gray demanded, twisting his face in disgust. 
“You let them cover you up?” 

“They saved my life!” I declared. “They pushed together to make a warm 



blanket—and they saved my life!” 

I glanced down again. The egg creatures remained stuck together. The 
blanket appeared to be seething now. Throbbing hard. As if excited. Or angry. 

“Are you crazy?” Dr. Gray cried, his face red with anger. “Are you crazy? 
You let these monsters rest on top of you? You touched them? You handled 
them? Are you trying to destroy my discovery? Are you trying to destroy my 
work?” 

He’s the crazy one, I realized. Dr. Gray isn’t making any sense. He isn’t 
making any sense at all. 

He moved quickly—and grabbed me again. Held me in a tight grip so I 
couldn’t escape. And pulled me to the door. 

“Let go of me! Where are you taking me?” I demanded. 

“I thought you could be trusted,” Dr. Gray replied in a menacing growl. 
“But I was wrong. I’m so sorry, Dana. So sorry. I had hoped to keep you alive. 
But I see now that is impossible.” 



30 


He dragged me to the door. He stopped and reached into the pocket of his lab 
coat. Reached for the control unit to open the door. 

I saw my chance. He had me by only one hand. 

With a hard burst of strength, I pulled away. 

He let out a cry. Reached both hands for me. 

Missed. 

I ran to the other side of the lab. I turned at the wall to face him. 

He had a strange smile on his face. “Dana, there’s nowhere to run,” he said 
softly. 

My eyes flashed around the room. I don’t know what I was searching for. I 
had seen it all. And I knew that he was telling the truth. 

Dr. Gray stood blocking the only door. The long window was too heavy and 
thick to break through. And it didn’t open. 

There were no other windows. No other doors. 

No ways to escape. 

“What are you going to do now, Dana?” Dr. Gray asked softly, the strange 
smile stuck on his face. His blue eyes locked coldly on mine. “Where are you 
going to go?” 

I opened my mouth to reply. But I had nothing to say. 

“I’ll tell you what’s going to happen,” Dr. Gray said softly, calmly. “You’re 
going to stay in here. In this cold, cold room. I’m going to leave you now and 
make sure you’re locked in.” 

His smile grew wider. “Then do you know what I’m going to do? Do you?” 

“What?” I choked out. 

“I’m going to make it colder in here. I’m going to make it colder than a 
freezer.” 

“No—!” I protested. 

His smile faded. “I trusted you, Dana. I trusted you. But you broke that 
trust. You let them touch you. You let them form this—this carpet! You ruined 
them, Dana! You ruined my egg monsters!” 

“I—I didn’t do anything!” I stammered. I balled my hands into fists. But I 
felt so helpless. Helpless and afraid. 



“You can’t freeze me in here!” I cried. “I didn’t do anything! You can’t 
leave me in here to freeze!” 

“Of course I can,” Dr. Gray replied coldly. “This is my lab. My own little 
world. I can do whatever I want.” 

He pulled the little black remote unit from his lab coat pocket. He pointed it 
at the door and pushed a button. 

The door swung open. 

He started to leave. “Good-bye, Dana,” he called. 



31 


“No—stop!” I called. 

Dr. Gray turned from the doorway. 

And as he turned, the blanket of egg creatures rose up. 

It stood straight up—and flung itself over him. It dropped on top of the 
scientist with a hard thud. 

“Hey—” He let out an angry cry. The cry was muffled by the heavy yellow 
blanket of egg creatures. 

The egg blanket covered him. I watched him struggle underneath it. And I 
listened to his muffled cries. 

He was squirming and twisting beneath the blanket. But he couldn’t toss it 
off. And he couldn’t slide out from under it. 

He crumpled to the floor, and the blanket crumpled with him. 

I watched it seething and bubbling on top of him. 

Then I didn’t wait another second. I took a deep breath—and I ran across 
the room. I darted past the egg blanket with Dr. Gray twisting and thrashing 
underneath it. 

Out the door. 

Down the long hall to the front of the lab. 

Yes! A few seconds later, I pushed open the front door and burst outside. 
Breathing hard, sucking in the sweet, fresh air. 

A beautiful morning. A red ball of a sun still rising over the spring-green 
trees. The sky clear and blue. 

I glanced around. I could see a paperboy on his bike halfway up the block. 
No one else on the street. 

I turned and ran around to the side of the building. The grass smelled so 
wonderful! The morning air so warm and fresh. I was so thrilled to be outside! 

I had to get home. 

I had a hunch—and the hunch was right. I spotted my bike, resting against 
the back wall of the lab, hidden by a large Dumpster. 

I leaped onto it and started to pedal. Riding a bike never felt as exciting, so 
thrilling! 

I was getting away, away from the horror of crazy Dr. Gray and his freezing 



lab. 


I pedaled faster. I rode without stopping. Without seeing! The world was a 
blur of green. 

I must have set a speed record for getting home. 

I roared up the driveway, the tires sending gravel flying on both sides. 

Then I jumped off my bike and let it topple to the grass. I dove for the 
kitchen door and burst into the kitchen. “Mom!” I cried. 

She jumped up from the breakfast table. I caught the worried expression on 
her face. It melted away as I ran into the room. 

“Dana!” she cried. “Where were you? We’ve all been so terrified. The 
police are looking for you and—and—” 

“I’m okay!” I told her. I gave her a quick hug. 

Dad ran in from the hallway. “Dana—you’re okay? Where were you all 
night? Your mother and I—” 

“Egg monsters!” I cried. “Egg monsters from Mars! Hurry!” I grabbed 
Dad’s hand and tugged. “Come on!” 

“Huh?” Dad spun around. He narrowed his eyes, studying me. “What did 
you say?” 

“No time to explain!” I gasped. “They’ve got Dr. Gray. He’s evil, Dad. He’s 
so evil!” 

“Who has what?” Mom demanded. 

“The egg creatures! From Mars! Hurry! There’s no time!” 

They didn’t move. I saw them exchange glances. 

Mom stepped forward and placed a hand on my forehead. “Do you have a 
fever, Dana? Are you sick?” 

“No!” I screamed. “Listen to me! Egg creatures from Mars! Follow me!” 

I know I wasn’t explaining myself too well. But I was frantic. 

“Dana—come lie down,” Mom instructed. “I’ll call Dr. Martin.” 

“No—please! I don’t need a doctor!” I protested. “Just follow me—okay? 
You’ve got to see them. You’ve got to see the egg creatures. You’ve got to 
hurry.” 

Mom and Dad exchanged worried glances again. 

“I’m not crazy!” I shrieked. “I want you to come with me to the science 

lab!” 

“Okay, okay,” Dad finally agreed. “You were in that lab last night?” 

“Yes,” I told him, shoving him to the kitchen door. “I called and called. But 



you couldn’t hear me.” 

“Oh, wow,” Dad murmured, shaking his head. “Wow.” 

The three of us climbed into the car. 

It took about three minutes to drive to the lab. Dad parked in front. I 
jumped out of the car before he stopped. 

The front door to the lab stood wide open, as I’d left it. 

I ran inside with Mom and Dad close behind me. 

“They’re egg creatures,” I told them breathlessly. “They dropped down 
from Mars. They captured Dr. Gray.” 

I led the way down the long hall. 

I pushed open the door to the freezing back room. 

Mom and Dad stepped in behind me. 

I gazed around the room—and gasped in amazement! 



32 


I saw Mom and Dad staring at me. They had worried expressions on their faces. 
“Where are the egg creatures?” Mom demanded softly. 

Dad rested a hand gently on my shoulder. “Where are they, Dana?” he 
asked in a whisper. 

“Uh... they’re gone,” I choked out. 

The lab stood empty. 

No Dr. Gray. No egg creatures. No one. 

Bare white walls. Nothing on the floor. 

Nothing. 

“Maybe they went back to Mars,” I murmured, shaking my head. 

“And Dr. Gray? What about Dr. Gray?” Dad asked. 

“Maybe they took Dr. Gray with them,” I replied. 

“Let’s go home,” Mom sighed. “Let’s get you into bed, Dana.” 

Dad guided me from the room, his hands on my shoulders. “I’ll call Dr. 
Martin,” he said softly. “I’m sure we can get him to come to the house this 
morning.” 

“I—I do feel a little strange,” I admitted. 

So they drove me home and tucked me into bed. 

The doctor came later that morning and examined me. He didn’t find 
anything wrong. But he said I should stay in bed and rest for a while. 

I knew that Mom and Dad didn’t believe my story. I felt bad about that. But 
I didn’t know how to convince them I was telling the truth. 

I did feel a little weird. 

Just tired, I guess. 

I dozed off and woke up and dozed off again. 

In the afternoon, I woke up to hear my sister Brandy talking to some friends 
outside my room. “Dana totally freaked out,” I heard Brandy say. “He says he 
was kidnapped by egg monsters from Mars.” 

I heard Brandy’s friends giggling. 

Oh great, I thought bitterly. Now everyone thinks I’m a nut case. 



I wanted to call Brandy into my room and tell her what really happened. I 
wanted to make her believe me. I wanted to make someone believe me. 

But how? 

I fell asleep again. 

I was awakened by a voice calling my name. I sat up in bed. The voice 
floated in from my open bedroom window. 

I climbed out of bed and made my way to the window. Anne was calling me 
from the driveway. “Dana—are you okay? Do you want to come over? I got a 
new CD-ROM version of Battle Chess. ” 

“Cool!” I called down to Anne. “I’ll be right over.” 

I pulled on a T-shirt and a pair of jeans. I was feeling pretty good. Rested. 
Like my old self. 

So happy that everything was back to normal. 

I hummed to myself as I brushed my hair. I stared at myself in the mirror. 

You had an amazing adventure, Dana, I told myself. Imagine—you spent a 
night with egg creatures from Mars! 

But now you’re okay, and your life is back to normal. 

I felt so happy, I gave Brandy a hug on my way down the stairs. She stared 
at me as if I truly were crazy! 

Humming loudly, I made my way out the kitchen door and started across 
the yard to Anne’s house. 

Everything looked so beautiful to me. The grass. The trees. The spring 
flowers. The sun setting behind the trees. 

What a day! What a beautiful, perfect, normal day! 

And then halfway across Anne’s lawn, I stopped. 

I crouched down on the grass—and I laid the biggest egg you ever saw! 




THE BEAST 
FROM THE EAST 

1 


When I was a really little girl, my mom would tuck me into bed at night. She 
would whisper, “Good night, Ginger. Good night. Don’t let the bedbugs bite.” 

I didn’t know what bedbugs were. I pictured fat red bugs with big eyes and 
spidery legs, crawling under the sheet. Just thinking about them made me itchy 
all over. 

After Mom kissed me on the forehead and left, Dad would step into my 
room and sing to me. Very softly. The same song every night. “The Teddy Bears’ 
Picnic.” 

I don’t know why he thought that song made a good lullaby. It was about 
going into the woods and finding hundreds and hundreds of bears. 

The song gave me the shivers. What were the bears eating at their picnic? 
Children? 

After Dad kissed me on the forehead and left the room, I’d be itching and 
shaking for hours. 

Then I’d have nightmares about bedbugs and bears. 

Until a few years ago, I was afraid to go into the woods. 

I’m twelve now, and I’m not scared any longer. 

At least, I wasn’t scared until our family camping trip this summer. That’s 
when I discovered that there are a lot scarier creatures than bears in the woods! 

But I guess I’d better begin at the beginning. 

The first thing I remember about our camping trip is Dad yelling at my 
brothers. I have two ten-year-old brothers—Pat and Nat. You guessed it. They’re 
twins. 

Lucky me—huh? 

Pat and Nat aren’t just twins. They’re identical twins. They look so much 
alike, they confuse each other ! 

They are both short and skinny. They both have round faces and big brown 
eyes. They both wear their brown hair parted in the middle and straight down the 
sides. They both wear baggy, faded jeans and black-and-red skater T-shirts with 
slogans no one can understand. 

There is only one way to tell Pat from Nat or Nat from Pat. You have to ask 
them who they are! 



I remember that our camping trip began on a beautiful, sunny day. The air 
smelled piney and fresh. Twigs and dead leaves crackled under our shoes as we 
followed a twisting path through the woods. 

Dad led the way. He carried the tent over his shoulder, and he had a bulging 
backpack on his back. Mom followed him. She was also loaded down with stuff 
we needed. 

The path led through a grassy clearing. The sun felt hot on my face. My 
backpack began to feel heavy. I wondered how much deeper into the woods 
Mom and Dad wanted to go. 

Pat and Nat followed behind us. Dad kept turning around to yell at them. 
We all had to yell at Pat and Nat. Otherwise, they never seemed to hear us. They 
only heard each other. 

Why was Dad yelling? 

Well, for one thing, Nat kept disappearing. Nat likes to climb trees. If he 
sees a good tree, he climbs it. I think he’s part chimpanzee. 

I tell him that as often as I can. Then he scratches his chest and makes 
chimp noises. He thinks he’s really funny. 

So there we were, hiking through the woods. And every time we turned 
around, Nat would be up a tree somewhere. It was slowing us down. So Dad had 
to yell at him. 

Then Dad had to yell at Pat because of his Game Boy. “I told you not to 
bring that thing!” Dad shouted. Dad is big and broad, kind of like a bear. And he 
has a booming voice. 

It doesn’t do him much good. Pat and Nat never listen to him. 

Pat walked along, eyes on his Game Boy, his fingers hammering the 
controls. 

“Why are we hiking in the woods?” Dad asked him. “You could be home in 
your room doing that. Put it away, Pat, and check out the scenery.” 

“I can’t, Dad,” Pat protested. “I can’t quit now. I’m on Level Six! I’ve never 
made it to Level Six before!” 

“There goes a chipmunk,” Mom chimed in, pointing. Mom is the wildlife 
guide. She points out everything that moves. 

Pat didn’t raise his eyes from his Game Boy. 

“Where’s Nat?” Dad demanded, his eyes searching the clearing. 

“Up here, Dad,” Nat called. I shielded my eyes with one hand and saw him 
on a high branch of a tall oak tree. 



“Get down from there!” Dad shouted. “That branch won’t hold you!” 

“Hey—I made it to Level Seven!” Pat declared, fingering frantically. 

“Look—two bunny rabbits!” Mom cried. “See them in the tall grass?” 

“Let’s keep walking,” I groaned. “It’s too hot here.” I wanted to get out of 
the clearing and back under the cool shade of the trees. 

“Ginger is the only sensible one,” Dad said, shaking his head. 

“Ginger is a freak!” Nat called, sliding down from the oak tree. 

We made our way through the woods. I don’t know how long we walked. It 
was so beautiful! So peaceful. Beams of sunlight poked through the high 
branches, making the ground sparkle. 

I found myself humming that song about the bears in the woods. I don’t 
know what made it pop into my head. Dad hadn’t sung it to me in years and 
years. 

We stopped for lunch by a clear, trickling stream. “This would make a nice 
camping spot,” Mom suggested. “We can set up the tent on the grass here by the 
shore.” 

Mom and Dad started to unpack the equipment and set up the tent. I helped 
them. Pat and Nat threw stones into the stream. Then they got into a wrestling 
match and tried to shove each other into the water. 

“Take them into the woods,” Dad instructed me. “Try to lose them—okay?” 

He was joking, of course. 

He had no way of knowing that Pat, Nat, and I would soon be lost for real 
—with little hope of ever returning. 



2 


“What do you want to do?” Nat demanded. He had picked up a thin tree branch 
to use as a walking stick. Pat kept slapping at it, trying to make Nat stumble. 

We had followed the stream for a while. I saw a million tiny, silver 
minnows swimming near the surface. Now we were making our own path 
through the tangle of trees, low shrubs, and rocks. 

“Hide-and-seek!” Pat declared. He slapped Nat. “You’re It!” 

Nat slapped him back. “You’re It.” 

“You’re It!” 

“You’re It!” 

“You’re It!” 

The slaps kept getting harder. 

“I’ll be It!” I cried. Anything to keep them from murdering each other. 
“Hurry. Go hide. But don’t go too far.” 

I leaned against a tree, shut my eyes, and started to count to one hundred. I 
could hear them scampering into the trees. 

After thirty, I counted by tens. I didn’t want to give them too big a head 
start. “Ready or not, here I come!” I called. 

I found Pat after only a few minutes. He had crouched behind a large white 
mound of sand. He thought he was hidden. But I spotted his brown hair poking 
up over the top of the sand. 

I tagged him easily. 

Nat was harder to find. He had climbed a tree, of course. He was way up at 
the top, completely hidden by thick clumps of green leaves. 

I never would have found him if he hadn’t spit on me. 

“Get down, creep!” I shouted angrily. I waved a fist up at him. “You’re 
disgusting! Get down—right now!” 

He giggled and peered down at me. “Did I hit you?” 

I didn’t answer. I waited for him to climb down to the ground. Then I 
mbbed a handful of dried leaves in his face until he was sputtering and choking. 

Just a typical Wald family hide-and-seek game. 

After that, we chased a squirrel through the woods. The poor thing kept 
glancing back at us as if he didn’t believe we were chasing after him. He finally 



got tired of the race and scurried up a tall pine tree. 

I glanced around. The trees in this part of the woods grew close together. 
Their leaves blocked most of the sunlight. The air felt cooler here. In their shade, 
it was nearly as dark as evening. 

“Let’s go back,” I suggested. “Mom and Dad might be getting worried.” 

The boys didn’t argue. “Which way?” Nat asked. 

I glanced around, making a complete circle with my eyes. “Uh... that way.” 
I pointed. I was guessing. But I felt ninety-nine percent sure. 

“Are you sure?” Pat asked. He eyed me suspiciously. I could see he was a 
little worried. Pat didn’t like the outdoors as much as Nat and me. 

“Sure I’m sure,” I told him. 

I led the way. They followed close behind. They had both picked up 
walking sticks. After we had walked a few minutes, they started fighting a duel 
with them. 

I ignored them. I had my own worries. I wasn’t sure we were walking in the 
right direction. In fact, I felt totally turned around. 

“Hey—there’s the stream!” I cried happily. 

I immediately felt better. We weren’t lost. I had picked the right direction. 

Now all we had to do was follow the stream back to the clearing where we 
had set up camp. 

I began to hum again. The boys tossed their sticks into the stream. We 
began to jog along the grassy shore. 

“Whoa!” I cried out when my left boot started to sink. I nearly fell into a 
deep mud patch. I pulled my hiking boot up. Soaked in wet, brown mud up over 
the ankle. 

Pat and Nat thought that was a riot. They laughed and slapped each other 
high fives. 

I growled at them, but I didn’t waste any words. They’re both hopeless. So 
totally immature. 

Now I couldn’t wait to get back to camp and clean the thick mud off my 
boot. We jogged along the shore, then cut through the skinny, white-trunked 
trees and into the clearing. 

“Mom! Dad!” I called, hurrying over the grass. “We’re back!” 

I stopped so short, both boys tumbled into me. 

My eyes searched the clearing. 

“Mom? Dad?” 



They were gone. 



3 


“They left us!” Pat exclaimed. He ran frantically around the clearing. “Mom! 
Dad!” 

“Earth to Pat,” Nat called. He waved his hand in front of Pat’s face. “We’re 
in the wrong place, you wimp.” 

“Nat is right,” I replied, glancing around. There were no footprints, no tent 
markers. We were in a different clearing. 

“I thought you knew the way, Ginger,” Pat complained. “Didn’t they teach 
you anything at that nature camp?” 

Nature camp! Last summer my parents forced me to spend two weeks at an 
“Explore the Great Outdoors” camp. I got poison ivy the first day. After that, I 
didn’t listen to anything the counselors said. 

Now I wished I had. 

“We should have left markers on the trees,” I said, “to find our way back.” 

“Now you think of it?” Nat groaned, rolling his eyes. He picked up a long, 
crooked stick and waved it in my face. 

“Give me that,” I ordered. 

Nat handed me the stick. Yellow sap oozed onto my palm. It smelled sour. 

“Gross!” I shouted. I tossed the stick away. I rubbed my hands on my jeans. 
But the yellow stain wouldn’t come off my palm. 

That’s weird, I thought. I wondered what the stuff was. I definitely didn’t 
like it on my skin. 

“Let’s follow the stream,” I suggested. “Mom and Dad can’t be too far.” 

I tried to sound calm. But I was totally twisted around. In fact, I had no idea 
where we were. 

We headed out of the clearing and back to the shore. The sun fell lower in 
the sky. It prickled the back of my neck. 

Pat and Nat tossed pebbles into the water. After a few minutes, they tossed 
them at each other. 

I ignored them. At least they weren’t throwing anything at me. 

As we walked along, the air became cooler. The path grew narrower. 

The water turned dark and murky. Silvery-blue fish snapped at the air. The 
skinny branches of the tall trees reached down toward us. 



A feeling of dread swept over me. Nat and Pat grew quiet. They actually 
stopped picking on each other. 

“I don’t remember any of these bushes near our campsite,” Pat said 
nervously. He pointed to a short, squat plant. Its strange blue leaves looked like 
open umbrellas stacked one on top of the other. “Are you sure we’re going the 
right way?” 

By now I was sure we weren’t headed in the right direction. I didn’t 
remember those strange bushes, either. 

Then we heard a noise on the other side of the shrubs. 

“Maybe that’s Mom and Dad!” Pat exclaimed. 

We pushed our way through the plants. And ran into another deserted 
clearing. 

I glanced around. This grassy field was enormous. Large enough for a 
hundred tents. 

My heart hammered against my chest. 

We stood on rust-colored grass. It stuck up over my ankle. A clump of 
gigantic purple cabbage plants grew to our right. 

“This place is cool!” Nat cried. “Everything is so big.” 

To me, the clearing wasn’t cool at all. It gave me the creeps. 

Strange trees surrounded us on all sides. Their branches shot out at right 
angles to the trunk. They resembled stairs going up and up and up. Up into the 
clouds. 

They were the tallest trees I’d ever seen. And perfect for climbing. 

Red moss clung to the branches. Yellow gourds hung from braided vines, 
swaying in the air. 

Where were we? This looked like a weird jungle—not the woods! Why 
were all the trees and plants so strange? 

A knot formed in the pit of my stomach. 

Where was our clearing? Where were Mom and Dad? 

Nat jogged over to a tree. “I’m climbing up,” he said. 

“No, you don’t,” I protested. I rushed over and pulled his arm from the 
branch. 

The red moss rubbed against my palm. My skin turned red where I touched 
it. Now I had a yellow-and-red design on my hand. 

What’s going on here? I wondered. 

Before I could show my hand to my brothers, the tree started to shake. 



“Whoa! Watch out!” I cried. 

A small furry animal jumped out of the branches and landed at my feet. I 
had never seen anything like it before. It was the size of a chipmunk, brown all 
over except for a white patch around one eye. 

It had a bushy tail and floppy ears like a bunny. And two big front teeth like 
a beaver. Its flat nose twitched. It stared at me with gray eyes, round with fear. I 
watched it scurry away. 

“What was that?” Pat asked. 

I shrugged. I wondered what other kinds of weird creatures lived in these 
woods. 

“I’m kind of scared,” Pat admitted, huddling close to me. 

I felt scared too. But I knew I was the big sister. So I told him everything 
was okay. 

Then I glanced down. “Nat! Pat!” I shouted. “Look!” 

My muddy boot stood inside a footprint three times the size of mine. No— 
even bigger. What kind of animal had a footprint that huge? 

A bear? A giant gorilla? 

I didn’t have time to think about it. 

The ground started to tremble. 

“Do you feel that?” I asked my brothers. 

“It’s Dad!” Pat shouted. 

It definitely was not Dad. He’s a big guy. But no way could he make the 
ground shake that way! 

I heard grumbles and growls from somewhere in the distance. And then a 
roar. Twigs and branches snapped loudly in the air. 

All three of us gasped as a tall beast stomped through the trees. It was huge. 
So tall that its head touched the middle branches. 

It had a narrow, pointy head over a long neck. Its eyes shone like bright 
green marbles. Shaggy blue fur covered every part of its body. Its long, furry tail 
thumped heavily on the ground. 

The weirdest creature I’d ever seen in my life! 

The beast entered the far side of the clearing. 

I sucked in my breath as it drew closer. Close enough for me to see its long 
snout. Its nostrils flared in and out as it sniffed the air. 

My brothers hung back, hiding behind me. We huddled together. Trembling. 

The beast opened its mouth. Two rows of sharp, yellow teeth rose up from 



purple gums. One long, jagged fang slid down over the creature’s chin. 

I crouched on my hands and knees. Pulled my brothers down with me. 

The beast spun around in circles. It sniffed the air and wiggled its hairy, 
pointed ears. Had it smelled us? Was it searching for us? 

I couldn’t think. I couldn’t move. 

The beast turned its ugly head. It stared at me. 

It saw me. 



4 


My eyes on the creature, I grabbed my brothers by their T-shirts. I dragged them 
behind some of the huge cabbage plants. 

The beast stayed on the other side of the clearing, sniffing the air. It 
stomped back and forth, sniffing hard. The ground seemed to shake each time 
one of its furry paws hit the ground. I could feel Nat and Pat shiver with fear. 

The beast turned away from us. 

Whew! I thought. It hasn’t seen us. I bit my bottom lip and held onto Pat 
and Nat. 

“Argggh,” the beast grunted. It dropped to all fours. It pressed its snout to 
the ground and crept along, making loud snuffling noises. 

I didn’t tell Pat or Nat what I was thinking. The beast hadn’t seen us—but 
there was no way we could keep it from smelling us. 

Its long tail swished back and forth. The tail banged against the trees. 
Gourds fell to the ground. 

The beast crawled into the center of the clearing. Closer. 

I dug my fingernails into my palm. 

Turn around, beast, I prayed. Go back into the woods. The blue creature 
stopped. It sniffed again. And then it turned. It began to creep in our direction. 

I swallowed. Hard. My mouth suddenly felt so dry. 

The creature’s tail pushed against one of the cabbage plants near us. The 
leaves rustled. 

“Get down!” I whispered, shoving my brothers. We stretched out flat on the 
ground. 

The beast stopped a few feet from our hiding place. 

Its tail brushed my arm. The fur felt rough and scratchy. 

I jerked my arm away. Could he feel me? Was I like a tiny animal to him? 
One he could pick up and squeeze the way my brothers teased our dog? 

The beast rose up on its hind legs and sniffed. It towered over the cabbage 
plant. It had to be at least eight feet tall! 

It picked at its fur with a clawed thumb—and placed whatever it found in 
his mouth. 

A pleased grin formed under its twitching snout. It peered around the 



clearing. 

Don’t look down, I prayed. Don’t see us. 

My body tensed. 

The creature growled and ran its long tongue over its fang. Then it tromped 
off into the trees. 

I let out a sigh of relief. 

“We’d better wait a few minutes,” I told my brothers. I counted to one 
hundred. Then I crawled out from behind the plant. No sign of the creature. 

But then I felt the earth shake. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “Here it comes again!” 



5 


The beast’s enormous blue head bobbed up between the trees. How had it come 
back so fast? And from the other direction? 

We scrambled back to our hiding place behind the huge cabbage plant. 

“We have to get away from here,” I whispered. “If it keeps searching back 
and forth, it’s bound to find us.” 

“How do we get away?” Nat demanded. 

I picked up a gourd from the ground. “I’ll throw this gourd. The beast will 
turn its head to see what the noise is. Then we’ll run—in the other direction.” 

“But, what if it sees us? What if it chases us?” Nat asked. He didn’t seem 
happy about my plan. 

Nat and Pat exchanged nervous glances. 

“Yeah. What if it runs faster than us?” Pat demanded. 

“It won’t,” I said. I was bluffing. But my brothers didn’t know that. 

I peeked over the top of the cabbage. The creature stood closer than ever. It 
sniffed the air, its pink snout coiling like a snake. 

I glanced at the gourd in my hand, then brought my arm back, ready to 
throw. 

“Wait!” Pat whispered. “Look!” 

My arm froze where it was. Another beast had tromped into the clearing. 

And another. 

And another. 

I gulped. More blue beasts clomped into the clearing. 

No way could we make a run for it now. 

The enormous creatures tromped around the clearing. They growled and 
grunted to each other. 

One stopped and jabbered loudly in a deep and gravelly voice. The folds of 
hairless skin under its chin wobbled back and forth. 

“Look at them all!” Nat murmured. “There must be at least two dozen.” 

A small beast jogged into the clearing. Its fur shone a brighter blue than the 
rest. It stood only about three feet tall. 

Was it a child? A young beast? 



The tiny beast placed its short, pink snout on the ground and sniffed. Dirt 
and dried-up bits of leaves stuck to its snout. 

“It looks hungry,” Pat whispered. 

“Shhh!” I warned. 

The tiny beast glanced up eagerly. In our direction. 

It did look hungry. But for what? 

I held my breath. 

The small beast suddenly scooped a gourd off the ground. It shoved the 
whole thing into its mouth and crunched down. Yellow juice squirted between its 
lips and soaked down its shaggy blue fur. 

It eats fruit! I cheered silently. That was a good sign. Maybe they are 
vegetarians, I thought. Maybe they don’t eat meat. 

I knew that most wild animals ate only one type of food. Either meat, or 
else fruits and vegetables. 

Except for bears, I suddenly remembered. Bears will eat both. 

A large beast thudded over to the kid. It yanked the little creature to its feet 
and began jabbering angrily at it. It dragged the kid back toward the woods. 

The beast with the hairless folds of skin stepped into the center of the 
clearing. 

“Ghrughl” It snorted at the others. It waved a furry paw in a circle. It 
waved and grunted and jabbered. 

The other creatures nodded and grunted to one another. They seemed to 
understand each other. They seemed to be grunting some kind of language. 

The big beast gave a final grunt. The other creatures turned back toward the 
woods. They spread out and began to creep silently into the trees. I felt the earth 
trembling under the pounding of their feet. Twigs and leaves crackled and 
cracked. 

In a few seconds, they had vanished. The clearing stood empty. 

I let out another long sigh of relief. 

“What are they doing, anyway?” Pat asked. 

Nat wiped sweat off his forehead. “They act as if they’re searching for 
something,” he answered. “Hunting.” 

I swallowed hard. 

I knew what they were hunting for. 

They were hunting for us. 

And now there were so many of them. Spreading out in every direction. 



We don’t stand a chance, I realized. 
They’re going to catch us. 

And then what? 



6 


I stood up slowly. I turned in a full circle, checking everywhere for a sign of the 
hairy creatures. 

Their low grumbles and growls faded into the distance. The ground stopped 
shaking. 

A gust of cool wind blew through the clearing. It made the gourds in the 
trees knock against each other. An eerie melody whistled through the trees. 

I shuddered. 

“Let’s get out of here. Now!” Nat cried. 

“Wait!” I told him. I grabbed his arm and held him back. “Those beasts are 
too near. They’ll hear us or see us.” 

“Yeah, well, I’m not going to stick around. I’m going to run as hard as I 
can. I’m outta here!” 

“I’m with you.” Pat leaped to his feet. “But which way do we go?” he 
asked. 

“We can’t go anywhere now,” I argued. “We’re lost. We don’t know which 
way to go. So we have to stay right here. Mom and Dad will come find us. I 
know they will.” 

“And what if they don’t? What if they’re in trouble, too?” Nat asked. 

“Dad knows how to survive in the woods,” I said firmly. “And we don’t.” 

At least I didn’t. If only I had listened at that outdoors camp. 

“I do, too!” Pat whined. “I can take care of myself. Right Nat? Let’s get 
going!” 

Who was he kidding? Pat didn’t even like the woods. 

But he’s stubborn. When he gets an idea, no one can change his mind. And 
Nat always agrees with him. Twins! 

“Ginger—are you coming or not?” Pat demanded. 

“You’re crazy,” I told him. “We have to stay here. That’s the rule, 
remember?” 

Mom and Dad always told us, if we ever get lost, stay where we are. 

“But there are only two of Mom and Dad—and there’s three of us,” Pat 
argued. “So we should go find them.” 

“But they’re not the ones who are lost!” I cried. 



“I think we should go,” Pat repeated. “We have to get away from those ugly 
creatures!” 

“Okay,” I told them. “We’ll go. At least we’ll be together.” 

I still thought they were wrong. But I couldn’t let them go off without me. 
What if something horrible happened to them? 

Besides, I didn’t want to stay in these strange woods alone. 

As I turned to follow them, I glimpsed something move in the tall grass. 
“It’s... it’s... them!” Nat stammered. “They’re back!” 

I stared at the grass in horror. 

“Run!” Pat shrieked. He bolted across the clearing. 

A squirrel scurried out of the grass. 

“Pat, wait!” Nat yelled. 

“It’s only a squirrel!” I shouted. 

He didn’t hear us. 

Nat and I took off, chasing after Pat. 

“Pat! Hey—Pat!” 

I didn’t see the thick, twisted root that poked out of the ground. I tripped 
over it and hit the ground hard. I lay there stunned. 

Nat knelt down beside me. He grabbed my arm and helped me to my feet. 

I glanced up ahead. Pat had already vanished into the woods. I couldn’t see 
him anywhere. 

“We have to catch up to him,” I told Nat breathlessly. I straightened up, 
brushing dirt off my knees. 

The earth started to tremble again. 

“Oh, no!” Nat moaned. 

The creatures were back. 

I whirled around. Big blue beasts pushed back through the trees. I counted 
four behind us. Three on my left. Five to our right. 

I gave up counting. 

There were too many of them. 

The big one grunted and raised its furry paws high in the air. It pointed at 
us. The other creatures grunted and uttered cries of excitement. 

“They’ve caught us!” I groaned. 

“Ginger...” Nat whimpered. His eyes opened wide with terror. I clutched at 
his hand and held it tight. 

The beasts drew closer. And formed a circle around us. 



Nowhere to run now. 

“We’re trapped,” I whispered. 
The beasts began to growl. 



7 


Over the drone of their low growls, I heard the eerie melody whistling through 
the gourds again. 

Nat huddled close to me. “They’ve got us,” he whispered. “Do you think— 
do you think they got Pat?” 

I couldn’t answer. I couldn’t talk. 

I felt weak and helpless. Sweat ran down my face into my eyes. I wanted to 
wipe the sweat away, but I couldn’t lift my hand to do it. 

I was too scared to move. 

Then the beast with the flabby chin stepped forward. It stopped a few 
inches away from me. 

I slowly raised my eyes. I stared at its furry belly. Then its broad chest. I 
saw shiny, black insects crawling in its fur. 

I raised my eyes to its face. Its green eyes glared down at me. It opened its 
mouth. I stared helplessly at its long fang, chipped on the end. 

You don’t need a tooth like that for eating fruit ! I thought. 

The beast stretched to its full height. It raised a furry paw high above us. 
Ready to strike. 

Nat huddled closer to me. I could practically feel his heart beating through 
his T-shirt. Or maybe it was my own heart that was pounding. 

The creature growled and swung. 

I squeezed my eyes shut. 

I felt a slap on my shoulder—so hard it knocked me backwards. 

“You’re It!” the creature bellowed. 



8 


Huh? My mouth dropped open in astonishment. 

“You’re It,” the beast repeated. 

I gaped at Nat. His eyes bulged in surprise. 

“It... it talked!” Nat stammered to me. “In our language.” 

The creature scowled at Nat. “I talk in many languages,” he growled. “We 
have a universal language adaptor.” 

“Oh,” Nat said weakly. He and I exchanged stunned glances. 

The creature growled again and took a step closer to me. “Did you hear 
me?” he growled. “You’re It!” 

His marble eyes glared into mine. He tapped a paw impatiently on the 
ground. 

“What do you mean?” I asked. 

The creature grunted. “You’re the Beast from the East,” he said. 

“What are you talking about? I’m not a beast. I’m a girl!” I declared. 
“Ginger Wald.” 

“I am Fleg,” the beast replied, pounding himself on the chest. He waved a 
paw at the creature beside him, a beast with one eye missing. “This is Spork,” 
Fleg announced. Fleg pounded the other beast on the back. 

Spork grunted at Nat and me. I stared at his dark, empty eye socket. And I 
spotted a deep black scar on the side of Spork’s nose. 

An eye missing and a scar. The big creature had been in a pretty nasty fight. 
I hoped it wasn’t a fight with a human. Because if Spork was the winner, I would 
hate to see the loser! 

Nat gaped at Spork. 

“Uh, this is my brother Nat,” I said quickly. 

Spork growled in reply. 

“Have you seen our mom and dad?” I asked Fleg. “See, we’re all here 
camping, and we got separated. But we’re trying to get back together and go 
home. So, we’d better go—” 

“There are others?” Fleg glanced sharply around the clearing. “Where?” 

“That’s the problem,” Nat answered. “We can’t find them.” 



Fleg grunted. “If you can’t find them, they can’t play.” 

“Right. That’s the rule,” Spork agreed. He scratched at the insects that 
climbed around in his fur. 

“Now start moving,” Fleg demanded. “It’s getting late. And you’re It.” 

I stared at Nat. This was too weird. What did he mean —they can’t play ? 
And why did he keep saying I was It? Did they want to play tag or something? 

The circle of beasts began stomping their paws, shaking the forest ground. 
“Play... play...” they chanted. 

“Play what?” I demanded. “Is this really some kind of game?” 

Spork’s eye bulged and a big smile spread under his ugly, pink snout. “The 
best game,” he said. “But you are too slow to win.” 

Spork rubbed his paws together. He ran his tongue over the tops of his 
teeth. “You should run.” He grunted. 

“Yes, run,” Fleg ordered. “Before I count to trel.” 

“Hold on,” I protested. “What if we don’t want to play?” 

“Yeah—why should we?” Nat demanded. 

“You have to play,” Fleg replied. “Read that sign over there.” 

He pointed to a cardboard sign tacked to one of the gourd trees. The sign 
read: GAME IN SEASON. 

Fleg stared down at me. His eyes narrowed menacingly. His wet nose 
flared. 

He grinned. Not a friendly grin. 

“Game in season?” Nat read the sign in a trembling voice. 

“You have to tell us how to play,” I declared. “I mean, we can’t play a game 
without knowing what it is.” 

Spork growled deep in his throat and moved closer to me. So close I could 
smell his fur. What a sour stench! 

Fleg reached out a paw and held Spork back. 

“It’s a good game,” Fleg told us. “It’s very exciting.” 

“Uh... why is it so exciting?” I asked. 

His eyes narrowed. “It’s a game of survival !” he replied with a grin. 



9 


Survival? 

Oh, no! No way I wanted to play! 

“You have until the sun sinks behind the Gulla Willow,” Fleg declared. 
“What’s a Gulla Willow?” Nat asked. 

“And where is it?” I wanted to know. 

“At the edge of the woods,” Fleg replied. He waved a paw to the trees. 
“Which edge? Where? How will we know which tree?” I demanded. 

Fleg flashed Spork a grin. They both made weird choking sounds in their 
throats. 

I could tell they were laughing. All the other creatures started laughing, too. 
Such an ugly sound. More like gagging than laughing. 

“We can’t play the game unless we know more,” I shouted. 

The laughter stopped. 

Spork scratched the bugs on his chest. “It’s simple. If you’re It when the 
sun goes down, you lose,” he told me. 

The others grunted in agreement. 

“And what happens to the losers?” I asked in a trembling voice. 

“We nibble on them,” Fleg replied. 

“Excuse me?” I asked. “You nibble?” 

“Yes, we nibble on them. Until dinnertime. Then we eat them.” 



10 


The creatures around us exploded into more laughter. The sick gagging sound 
made me feel like puking. 

“It’s not funny!” Nat shrieked. 

Fleg narrowed his eyes at us. “It’s our favorite game.” 

“Well, I don’t like your game!” Nat cried. 

“We’re not going to play. We don’t want to,” I added. 

Spork’s eye lit up. “You mean you surrender? You give up?” He smacked 
his lips hungrily. 

“NO!” I shouted. Nat and I jumped back. “We’ll play. But by the rules. You 
have to tell us the rules. All of them.” 

A cloud rolled overhead. It cast a shadow over the clearing. I shivered. 

Were they going to attack us because we didn’t want to play? 

“Made in the Shade!” Spork cried suddenly. 

“Made in the Shade,” Fleg repeated. 

Huh? 

“What’s going on?” I demanded. 

The cloud slowly passed. 

“No time to explain,” Fleg said. He waved a paw at the other creatures. 
“Let’s go,” he insisted. “This time-out has been too long.” 

“This isn’t fair!” Nat protested. “Please. We need to know the rules.” 

“Okay,” Fleg said as he turned to go. “Gling—you must always attack from 
the east.” 

“The east,” I mumbled. I raised a hand to shade my eyes as I scanned the 
clearing. 

East. North. South. West. I pictured a map. East was to my right. West to 
my left. But which direction was east out here in the woods? Why hadn’t I 
listened at that outdoors camp? 

“Proo—the brown squares are Free Lunch squares,” Fleg continued. 

“You mean they’re for resting? They’re safe?” I asked. I liked that rule. 
Maybe we could find a brown square and stay there until sunset. 

Fleg snorted. 



“No. Free Lunch. It means anyone can eat you!” He glared down at me. 
“Rule Zee,” he announced. “You must be three feet tall to play.” 

I glanced at the beasts. They were at least ten feet tall! So much for Fleg’s 
rules. 

“Well, thanks for explaining,” I said, shaking my head. “But we really can’t 
play this game. We have to find our parents and—” 

“You must play,” Fleg growled. “You’re It. You’re the Beast from the East. 
Play—or surrender.” 

“The sun will be down soon,” Spork added, licking his fang. 

“You have until the sun goes down behind the Gulla Willow tree,” Fleg 
said. “Then, the Beast from the East is the loser.” 

Spork made a choking sound, his ugly laugh. “You will make a delicious 
loser. I’m thinking maybe a sweet-and-sour sauce. Or perhaps you’d go better 
with something a little more spicy.” 

The creatures all gagged and choked. They thought Spork was a riot. 

Fleg turned to the woods. He stopped. “Oh,” he added with an evil grin. 
“Good luck.” 

“Good luck,” Spork repeated. He poked a finger into his open eye socket 
and scratched inside it. Then he turned and lumbered after Fleg. 

The other creatures followed. The earth trembled under their heavy feet. In 
a few moments, the clearing stood empty again. 

I gaped at Nat. 

This wasn’t a game! These evil monsters searched the woods for lost kids. 
And then they— 

“What are we going to do?” Nat cried. “Maybe they already ate Pat. Maybe 
they found him on a brown Free Lunch square.” 

“And Mom and Dad, too,” I murmured. 

He let out a frightened gasp. 

“There has to be someplace safe!” I told him. “The way we use the porch at 
home when we play tag.” 

Nat swallowed nervously. “What’s safe here?” 

I shrugged. “I don’t know,” I admitted. 

“We can call time-out,” Nat suggested. “You’re always allowed a time-out 
in every game.” 

“This is different. This is for our lives,” I said softly. 

The leaves rustled in the trees above us. The wind made the gourds whistle. 



I heard a low growl. Then a creature laughed. That ugly gagging sound. 
Twigs crackled. Bushes swayed. I heard low grunts. 

“We’d better start playing,” Nat urged. “They sound hungry.” 



11 


“How can we play?” I cried. “There’s no way we can win. There are too many of 
them. And we don’t even know where that Gulla tree is.” 

“So what?” Nat demanded. “We don’t have a choice—do we?” 

The leaves in a tree branch over our heads rustled. The branch started 
thrashing around. 

Thud. 

I shrieked and leaped back. 

Something small and brown hit the ground at my feet. 

One of those small, brown animals we had seen earlier. It rubbed up against 
my leg, and made a gurgling sound. 

“At least these little guys aren’t mean,” Nat said. He reached down to pet it. 

The animal snapped at Nat’s hand, clamping four rows of tiny, sharp teeth. 

“Whooa!” Nat jerked his hand away and leaped back. The animal scurried 
into the underbrush. 

Nat swallowed hard. “Weird,” he murmured. “What kind of forest is this? 
How come there aren’t any normal animals?” 

“Shhh!” I placed my finger over my lips and scowled. “Listen.” 

“I don’t hear anything,” Nat complained. 

“Exactly,” I answered. 

The grunts and growls and choking laughter had vanished. The woods were 
quiet. Really quiet. 

“Now’s our chance!” I cried. “Let’s run for it.” I grabbed his hand. 

“Wait!” Nat cried. “Which way?” 

I squinted around the clearing. “Back to the stream,” I declared. “We’ll try 
to follow it back to Mom and Dad. Maybe we’ll hear their voices along the 
water.” 

“Okay,” Nat agreed. 

We raced across the clearing. We plunged into the woods and pushed 
through the thick line of trees. 

I peered ahead into the forest. “This way!” I shouted, pointing to my left. 

“Why?” Nat asked. 



“Because,” I said impatiently. “I see light through the trees up ahead. That 
means the woods thin out. There were fewer trees near the stream, remember?” 

I hurried on. Nat followed. We ran silently for a while. The trees did begin 
to thin out. Soon, scraggly bushes dotted the ground. 

“There!” I stopped. Nat nearly crashed into me. “Up ahead.” 

“The stream!” Nat exclaimed. He slapped me a high five. 

Excited now. we began to run. We reached the water at about the same time. 

“Now what?” Nat asked. 

“Let’s head left again,” I suggested. “The sun was in our eyes when we 
started. So now we want it on our backs.” 

Yes! I thought. We were definitely headed back the way we came. All we 
had to do now was follow the stream back to the right clearing. Back to our 
parents. 

“Stay low,” I told Nat. “Try not to make any noise, just in case.” In case the 
beasts were following us. “And keep an eye out for Pat,” I added. 

I had no idea if Pat was still in the woods or not. I hoped he had made it 
back to our camp. But he could be anywhere. Maybe hiding someplace nearby, 
alone and scared. 

Thinking about how scared Pat might be made me feel braver. We had to 
stay calm so we could help Pat. 

Nat and I crouched down. We scooted along the stream, pushing through 
the umbrella bushes that grew close to the water’s edge. 

I could still see the silvery-blue fish circling below the surface of the water. 

Gazing at the fish, I stumbled. I grabbed at a leaf on an umbrella bush to 
steady myself. The leaf shredded in my hand. Blue sap smeared over my fingers. 

Not again! Another color. Yellow. Red. And now blue. “Ginger! Come 
here!” 

Nat’s cry startled me. I rushed to his side. 

Nat pointed to the ground. 

I glanced down, afraid of what I would see. 

“A footprint,” I said, frowning. Then I let out a loud whoop. 

Nat’s boot rested inside the footprint perfectly. It was exactly the same size 
as his. 

“Pat!” we said together. 

“He has been here!” Nat cried joyfully. 

“Yes!” I shouted. Pat had found his way back to the stream. 



“Maybe he already made it back to camp,” Nat said excitedly. “We can 
follow his footprints.” 

We started out eagerly. With each step I pictured Mom and Dad and Pat’s 
smiling faces when Nat and I showed up at camp. 

Pat’s footprints marched along the stream for a while. Then they veered into 
the woods. 

We followed them through the trees and found ourselves on a narrow path. 
The trees grew closer together here. 

Overhead, the sun disappeared from view. 

The air grew damp and cold. 

I heard a familiar growl. 

Right behind us. 

The ground shook. 

“Beasts!” I screamed. “Run!” 

I pushed Nat forward. We sprinted down the path. It curved to the right and 
then back to the left. I had no idea which direction we were going now. 

Branches of trees whipped our faces. I struggled to shove them aside. The 
trees swayed and shook above our heads. Gourds hit the ground all around us. 

Something warm and wet tangled itself around my arm. I yanked free. 
Another wet thing grabbed me. 

Vines. 

Thick yellow vines. 

Some draped over the branches of the trees, dangling onto the forest floor. 
Others sprouted from the tree trunks. They wrapped around each other, weaving 
thick nets from tree to tree. 

Some vines stretched across the path. Nat and I had to jump and twist, 
leaping over the vines in our way. 

It was hard work. I could hear Nat breathing hard. 

My side ached. My breath came in short, sharp bursts. 

I longed to rest. But we couldn’t rest. The ground was shaking under our 
feet. The woods echoed with thunderous cries. 

The beasts were coming. And they were gaining on us. 

“Watch out!” Nat warned. 

I spotted a tangled web of vines strung across the path. 

Nat jumped the web. He cleared it. I gathered myself and leaped. I jumped 

high. 



But not high enough. 

Vines wrapped around my ankles. I fell to the ground. 

More thick yellow vines twisted around my legs. Frantically, I grabbed at 
them and tried to pull them off. 

The vines tugged back. 

Hard. 

“Nat!” I shrieked. “Help!” 

“I’m stuck!” he cried. His voice cracked. “Help me, Ginger!” 

I couldn’t help him. I couldn’t move. 

I glanced down at my legs. The vines were tugging tighter and tighter. 
Another vine inched around my waist. 

I gaped down at it. 

What were those shiny things? 

Eyes? 

“Eyes!” I cried out. 

Vines don’t have eyes! 

And then I realized what I was staring at. 

The vines weren’t vines. 

They were snakes. 



12 


I screamed. 

“Ginger!” Nat cried behind me. “These aren’t vines. They’re—snakes!” 
“Tell me something I don’t know!” I groaned. 

The snake around my waist uncoiled and slithered onto my right arm. It was 
covered with thick scales that felt rough against my bare skin. 

I took a deep breath. Then I wrapped my left hand around the snake’s body. 
It was warm. 

I yanked hard. Tried to pull it off. 

No way. 

The snake coiled tighter around my arm. Its hard, cold eyes stared up at me. 
Its tongue flicked in and out. 

I felt something brush against my thigh. I glanced down. 

Another snake climbed up my body. 

Sweat ran down my forehead. 

“Ginger! Help!” Nat wailed. “They’re climbing all over me.” 

“M-me, too!” I stammered. I glanced at my brother. His eyes bulged in 
terror. He twisted and squirmed, trying to free himself. 

The snake around my thigh pulled back its head. And stared at me with 
those piercing eyes. 

The snake around my arm wound tighter and tighter—until my fingers 
turned numb. It hissed. A long, slow hiss. As if it had all the time in the world. 
“They’re going to attack!” Nat cried in a strangled voice. 

I didn’t answer. I felt a wiry tongue flick against my neck. 

Cold. 

Their tongues were cold. 

And prickly. 

I squeezed my eyes shut and held my breath. 

Don’t bite. Please don’t bite, I prayed. 

A growl disturbed the bushes around us. 

“Grrouggghl” 

Fleg jumped out of the bushes. He stared at Nat and me, his mouth open. 



I gasped. 

I saw Fleg’s eyes bulge in surprise as he spotted the snakes. “Double Snake 
Eyes!” he called out. 

My entire body trembling, I gaped at him in horror. 

Double Snake Eyes? 

Was that good—or bad? 



13 


“Congratulations! Double Snake Eyes!” Fleg cried. He shook his head in 
wonder. “And you said you never played this game before!” 

The snakes tightened around me. 

I stared at him. “What are you talking about?” I choked out. 

“Twenty points—that’s what I’m talking about.” The Huge beast grunted. 
“I’d better play harder. Or you’re going to win!” 

“Who cares about winning!” I screamed. “I can’t breathe! Get these snakes 

off!” 

Fleg grinned. “Off!” he screamed with laughter. The folds of skin under his 
jaw flapped up and down. “That’s a good one.” 

“We mean it,” Nat pleaded. “Get them off us!” 

Fleg seemed confused. “Why?” He asked. “They might bite you.” 

“We know!” I screamed. “Help us—please!” 

The snakes flicked their tongues against my cheek. My stomach lurched. 

Fleg grinned. “If they bite you, you could be awarded a Triple Hisser,” he 
explained. “Worth sixty points.” 

Points for getting bitten. Some game! 

“Forget the points!” I shrieked. “Get—them—off. Now!” 

Fleg shrugged. “Okay.” 

He stepped up to me. Then he pushed a claw under the snake that was 
coiled around my arm. “You need claws to do this right,” he bragged. 

Fleg scratched his claw along the snake’s skin. 

I could feel the snake loosen its grip. 

“They’re ticklish,” Fleg explained. He yanked the snake away and tossed it 
into the woods. 

He tickled the other snake, then pulled it from around my leg. Then he 
turned to Nat and repeated the same motions, tickling the snakes and prying 
them loose. 

When Fleg was done, he leaped toward the edge of the woods. 

I struggled to my feet and rubbed my arms and legs. My whole body itched 
and tingled. I knew I’d see those snakes in my dreams! 



Fleg stuck his furry head out from behind a tree. 

“You could have tagged me,” he called. “Too bad!” 

He opened his mouth in a gagging laugh. Then he plunged into the woods 
and disappeared. 

My mouth dropped open. I stared after him in disbelief. 

“Tag!” Nat cried. “Now I get it. It’s just like tag. The rules are easy, 
Ginger.” He turned to face me. “Touch one of the beasts, and you won’t be It 
anymore. You won’t be the Beast from the East!” 

Nat took off, running after Fleg. 

“Wait, Nat!” I started after him. I stepped on something hard. I heard a 
crunch. 

Another crunch. I glanced down. 

“Nat! Stop!” I screamed. I spotted an orange rock at my feet. I picked it up 
and hurled it after Nat. “Hey—stop!” 

I glanced down at my hand. Orange. My fingers had turned orange where 
they had grasped the rock. 

The rock smacked into a tree trunk. Nat stopped. Whirled around. “What 
did you do that for?” he cried. 

“To stop you,” I answered. 

“Listen, Ginger,” Nat urged. “You have to tag one of the beasts. It’s the only 
way to win the game. To stay alive.” 

“I don’t think so,” I said as calmly as I could. 

Nat scowled. “What’s your problem? It’s just like tag.” 

“No,” I said. “This is not just like tag. Not the game that we used to play.” 

I pointed at the ground. 

Nat stepped closer. He gazed down to where I was pointing. 

He gasped. “What is that?” he asked. 



14 


“Bones,” I murmured. “A pile of animal bones.” 

Nat and I stared. The bones gleamed coldly in the sunlight. Picked clean. 

“Notice anything else?” I pointed to the ground beside the bones. 

“What?” Nat frowned. 

“It’s brown,” I said. “The grass under the bones. It’s a square brown patch.” 

Free Lunch. 

Nat swallowed hard. 

“A beast ate it,” he murmured. “Whatever it was.” 

I wrapped my arms around my chest. “This is not like tag, Nat,” I told him 
solemnly. I couldn’t take my eyes off the poor animal’s bones. “This game is 
deadly.” 

“Only if we lose,” Nat said. “Ginger, we just saw Fleg. He helped us.” 

“So?” I asked. 

“So, we’ll make him help us again.” 

“How can we do that?” 

Nat grinned. “Easy. We’ll trick him. Pretend to need help. Pretend you have 
another snake on you or something.” 

“Right,” I replied, rolling my eyes. Like I was really going to let Fleg near 
me again. 

Nat grabbed my arm. “It’ll work. You scream for help. Fleg gets close. You 
jump out and tag him. Easy.” Nat snapped his fingers. 

I shook my head. “Forget it. I’m going to find the stream again and get out 
of here.” 

“Why are you so stubborn?” Nat cried. 

“Because I’m It!” I screamed. “I’m the one they’re going to eat!” 

“I-I know we can win if we try,” Nat stammered. 

I took a few deep breaths and tried to get rid of the panic in my chest. 

“Okay,” I said finally. “Okay. Okay. I’ll try it. What should I do?” 



15 


Nat beamed at me. “First I’ll climb a tree,” he said. “I can spot the beasts’ hiding 
places from up there.” 

I gazed up at the tall, leafy trees around us. 

I thought about it. All we needed was to tag one beast. Any beast. 

“Do it,” I told Nat. “But don’t stay up there too long.” 

Nat searched the woods for the best tree. “That one,” he said finally. 

The tree was tall. Dozens of sturdy branches sprang from its sides. In the 
center of each branch was a big, strong knot. Tiny golden leaves covered the 
branches. The tree looked strong, strong enough to hold Nat. 

“This is a cinch,” he assured me. “As easy as climbing a ladder. I’ll be able 
to see everything from up there.” 

I waited near the base of the tree. 

Nat placed his foot on the lowest branch and hoisted himself up. 

He climbed slowly. Steadily. 

“See anything yet?” I called anxiously. 

“I see a weird nest,” he shouted down. “With big eggs.” 

“What about the beasts?” I yelled. “Do you see them?” 

“Not yet.” Nat climbed higher. A few seconds later, he disappeared from 

view. 

“Nat! Can you hear me?” I called. I cupped my hands around my mouth. 
“Nat! Where are you? Answer me!” 

I rushed around the tree, peering up through the branches. I spotted Nat 
near the very top. 

Nat was moving carefully. He let go of one branch and pulled himself onto 
the next highest branch. The top of the tree swayed dangerously. 

I caught my breath. 

Maybe this wasn’t such a good idea. 

Not if I had to climb up and rescue him. 

“Nat!” My throat hurt from shouting so loud. “Be careful!” 

The trunk swayed back and forth. Slowly at first. Then faster. 

Bits of loose bark broke off and fell in slow spirals toward the ground. 



The thick branches swished back and forth. Each branch started to bend in 
the middle. 

At the knots. 

I stared. The branches reminded me of something. Something familiar. 

Arms, I thought. The knots were like elbows. And the branches were like 
big arms, reaching... 

I blinked. Was I seeing things? 

The branches were reaching. 

They were reaching for Nat. 

“Nat!” I screamed. 

High above me, I saw him grasp onto a slender branch. 

“Nat!” I ran frantically around the base of the tree, pounding my fists on the 
trunk. “Nat! Come down!” I yelled. “The tree is alive!” 



16 


Nat peered down at me from the top of the tree. “What’s wrong?” he called 
down. 

“Come down!” I screamed. “The branches—” 

I was too late. 

The upper branches grabbed at Nat’s arms. Pinned them to his side. I saw 
him gasp in shock. 

Other branches lashed out, slapping at him. 

Slapping him. Whipping him. 

“Ginger!” Nat screamed. “Help me!” 

What could I do? 

I gazed up in horror as two lower branches reached up toward Nat. The top 
branches passed him down to the lower branches. 

The branches wrapped around him, hugging tight. 

This isn’t happening! I told myself. This can’t be happening! 

Nat’s feet dangled in the air. He kicked furiously at the tree. “Let me go! 
Let me gooooo!” 

More branches lashed out. Some held him tight. Others swiped at him, 
slapping at him. 

The branches passed Nat down. 

They were carrying him lower, down to the center of the tree. 

Where the branches were the thickest. 

Where the tree’s arms were strongest. 

Nat cried out. He kicked out again and again. The branches wrapped around 
his legs. 

No way to climb up to him. Every branch was thrashing wildly. Even the 
little thin ones that couldn’t reach Nat were clawing upwards. Straining to take a 
swipe at him. 

As I watched helplessly, the thickest branches pulled Nat into the center. 

He disappeared. 

“Help!” His muffled cry drifted down to me. “Ginger—it’s going to 
swallow me!” 



I had to do something. Had to pull him away somehow. Had to free him 
from the living tree. 

But how? 

We had gotten rid of the snakes. We had to get rid of the branches, too. If 
only... 

That’s it! 

I had a crazy idea. But maybe, just maybe it would work. 

If the tree is alive, maybe it has feelings, I thought. 

And if it has feelings, maybe it’s ticklish—just as the snakes were! 

“Ginger! Help!” Nat’s cries grew weaker. 

I knew I didn’t have much time. 

I leaped at the tree. A branch dipped down and slapped at me. 

I jumped back and scrambled around the trunk. I ducked as a thick branch 
swung at me. 

The tree was trying to keep me away while it swallowed up my brother. But 
I ducked beneath the slapping limbs and branches. 

Reached out. And began to tickle the rough bark. 

Tickled it with one hand. Then with both. 

Was that a shiver? Did the tree actually shiver? 

Or did I imagine it? 

Please! I silently begged. Please, please, let go of my brother. 

I tickled furiously with both hands. “Nat!” I called. “Nat! Can you hear 
me?” 

Silence. 

“Nat? Nat?” 

No answer. 



17 


I didn’t give up. I tickled harder. 

The trunk started to jiggle. 

Bunches of leaves shook free and floated down. They landed in my hair and 
covered my arms as I jabbed and scratched at the tree tmnk. 

I tickled harder. The branches shook and swayed. The trunk wriggled. 

Yes! I thought excitedly. It’s working! I think it is ticklish! 

I’ll make this tree collapse with laughter! 

I tickled harder. The trunk squirmed under my fingertips. 

I glanced up. Nat’s boots poked through the leaves. 

Then his legs. His arms. His face. 

The branches were shaking. Quivering and shaking. 

Nat swung free. He leaped from branch to branch. His tree-climbing skills 
were finally coming in handy! 

“Hurry!” I shouted up to him. “I can’t keep this up much longer. Jump!” 

Nat wriggled down the tree trunk. 

“Here goes!” Nat cried. He let go of the trunk and leaped into the air. 

He landed in a crouched position at my feet. “Whoa! Good job, Ginger!” 

I grabbed his hand and we hurtled away from the tree. 

Nat brushed twigs and leaves from his hair. “I saw some beasts!” 

I bit my lip. In all the excitement over the living tree, I had forgotten we 
were playing a deadly game. 

“I saw three of them,” Nat reported. “Fleg, Spork, and another one with a 
smashed tail. That way.” He pointed to the right. 

“What were they doing?” I asked. 

“They are all hiding behind a big, gray boulder. You can sneak up on them, 
easy.” 

“Right.” I rolled my eyes. “Piece of cake.” 

“You can do it.” Nat’s dark eyes locked on mine. “I know you can, Ginger.” 

Nat led the way. We crept slowly through the woods toward the boulder. 

The sky dimmed overhead and the air grew cooler. I knew that it was nearly 
evening. Soon the sun would disappear behind the Gulla Willow tree. 



I hoped I had enough time. 

“There’s the rock!” Nat whispered. 

I saw a small clearing in the trees. In the middle of the clearing a craggy, 
gray boulder rose up from the flat ground. 

It was big enough to hide a dozen beasts. 

My heartbeat quickened. 

“I’ll hide behind this cabbage plant,” Nat said. 

He ducked behind the plant. I followed. I wasn’t quite ready to face the 
beasts alone. 

I bent down and tightened my bootlace, trying to ignore the fluttering in my 
stomach. 

“Just sneak up on them,” Nat whispered. 

“Come with me,” I begged. 

Nat shook his head. “Too noisy if we both go,” he said. “It’s safer if you go 
alone.” 

I knew he was right. 

Besides, I told myself, it was pretty easy. The beasts behind the big rock 
had no idea I was coming. All I had to do was tag one of them. 

I felt a thrill of excitement. I could do it. 

And the game would be over. We’d be safe. 

I took a deep breath. “Ready or not, here I come,” I whispered. 

I crept toward the boulder. I glanced back. Nat poked his head from behind 
the cabbage and flashed me a thumbs-up sign. 

A few more steps and I’d be at the rock. I held my breath. 

The gray rock rose up in front of me. 

I reached out. My fingers were trembling with excitement. I leaped behind 
the rock. “Gotcha,” I cried. “You’re It!” 



18 


“Huh?” 

My hand swiped empty air. 

They were gone! 

No beasts. Only a pile of broken gourds scattered over the ground. 

I blinked in surprise. And scrambled to the front of the rock. 

No beasts. They had moved on. 

“Nat!” I called. “Nat!” 

My brother came jogging to the boulder. “What happened?” 

“Nothing happened. They’re gone,” I told him. “Now what?” 

“Hey,” Nat snapped. “It’s not my fault.” 

I stared at him, feeling totally disappointed. And afraid. 

A sharp gust of wind kicked up. I glanced at the sky. Shades of pink 
streaked overhead. The sun was setting. 

My chest tightened in despair. 

“It’s hopeless,” I muttered. 

Nat shook his head. “Do you know what we need?” he asked. 

“No. What?” I replied. 

“We need another plan.” 

I had to laugh. Nat was such a jerk! 

He leaned against the boulder and wrinkled his nose. “What kind of rock is 
this anyway?” he asked. 

“A creepy one,” I answered. 

Nat peered at the huge rock. “Something’s growing on it,” he said. 

“Well, don’t touch anything,” I warned. 

But telling Nat not to do something only makes him want to do it more. 

Nat stuck his finger into a hole in the boulder. 

The big rock trembled. 

A crack appeared at its top and spread quickly. 

Nat pulled his finger away. 

“What’s happening?” I yelled. 

A cloud of gray smoke shot up from inside the boulder. 



KERPLOOM! 

Nat and I ducked, clapping our hands over our ears. 

The explosion roared like a million firecrackers going off at once. 

More gray smoke billowed out of the boulder. 

I could barely see Nat. I started to cough. My eyes burned. 

The smoke filled the clearing around us and drifted above the treetops. A 
few seconds later, it faded away. 

And I saw Fleg standing in the clearing. 

Spork appeared behind him, scratching at his open eye socket. 

Another beast followed. And then another. They stared at Nat and me. 

“You touched the Penalty Rock!” Fleg cried. 

Nat took a step closer to me. “Huh?” 

Fleg nodded to the beast with the smashed tail. “Get him, Gleeb,” Fleg 
growled. 

Gleeb’s snout tensed. His eyes bulged. He reached out for Nat’s arm. 

“Wait! Stop,” I yelled. “Nat didn’t know it was a penalty.” 

“No fair! No fair!” Nat cried. 

The beasts ignored us. 

Gleeb scooped Nat up and lifted him high in the air. “Let’s go,” Gleeb 
gmnted. 

Gleeb balanced Nat on both paws. Then he pretended to drop him. 

Nat shrieked. 

Gleeb and the other beasts snorted their ugly laughter, clapping their hairy 
paws together. 

“Stop it!” I screamed. “Let him go!” 

“Yes, go,” the beasts echoed. They clapped their paws again. “Let’s go! 
Let’s go!” they chanted. 

I glared at Fleg. “Tell him to put my brother down.” 

“He touched the Penalty Rock,” Fleg explained. “He must have his 
penalty.” 

“But we didn’t know about it!” I protested. “We don’t know any of your 
dumb rules. That isn’t fair.” 

I tried to grab Nat’s dangling legs. 

“Let me see your hand,” Fleg demanded. He snatched at my arm and lifted 
my hand up to his eyes. He studied my palm. 

“Nubloff colors!” he exclaimed. He studied me. “That’s fifty points. You 



can’t trick me. You’ve played this game before. You already know the rules.” 

I stared at my hand. Yellow sap from the stick. Blue from the leaf of the 
umbrella plant. Orange from the rock. Nubloff colors? 

“But... but...” I stammered. “I didn’t get these colors on purpose. They just 
happened.” 

Fleg and Spork exchanged glances. 

“Come,” Fleg ordered, waving to Gleeb. 

Gleeb tossed Nat over his shoulder and followed Fleg to the woods. The 
others stomped after them. 

“Ginger!” Nat wailed as the beast carried him away. 

I ran after them, feeling totally helpless. 

“Stop! Where are you taking him?” I shrieked. “What are you going to do 
to him?” 



19 


I chased after them. Down a wide path lined with more giant rocks. 

More penalty boulders? 

I stayed in the center of the path, afraid to touch them. 

The beasts stopped at the entrance to a tunnel. It was carved into the side of 
the largest rock I had seen. They ducked their heads and hurried inside. 

I followed behind, my heart pounding. 

“Ginger!” Nat’s cry echoed off the tunnel walls. 

The beasts growled and grunted, jabbering in excitement. Some pounded 
their paws on the ceiling as they moved. 

Everything shook. The walls. The ceiling. The ground. 

“Nat!” I cried. I couldn’t hear my own voice over the noise. 

I followed the beasts out of the tunnel and into another large clearing. 

“What’s that?” I gasped. 

In the center of the clearing, a large wooden box hung from a tree. It looked 
like an enormous bird house. I saw a tiny door on one side. 

A sign above the door read: PENALTY CAGE. 

Gleeb raised Nat high in the air. He held him up for all the beasts to see and 
spun him around and around. 

Nat screamed. 

Spork and the other beasts stomped and clapped. 

“NO!” I shouted. “You can’t do this!” 

“He must go in the box,” Fleg declared. “He touched the Penalty Rock. It’s 
in the rules.” 

Gleeb tossed Nat inside the Penalty Cage. He slammed the door. Fleg 
dropped a large twig into the rough wooden latch to lock the door. 

Nat reached through the slats. “Ginger,” he cried. “Get me out of here.” The 
penalty box swung in the air. 

“Don’t worry, Nat,” I called. “I’ll get you out.” I shivered. He seemed so 
small and helpless. 

“You can’t keep him in there forever,” I told Fleg. “When does he get out?” 

“When we eat him,” Fleg replied softly. 



20 


“But I’m the Beast from the East!” I protested. “You said you would eat me.” I 
took a step closer to him. 

“Players in the Penalty Cage get eaten, too.” Fleg snorted in disgust. “Don’t 
pretend you forgot. Everyone knows that. It’s a basic rule.” 

“There must be another way to get him out,” I said, edging closer. 

“Only if he eats a Free Escape Tarantula,” Fleg explained. He scratched the 
flab under his chin. 

“Huh? He has to eat a tarantula?” I demanded, taking another step toward 
the beast. 

Fleg narrowed his eyes. “Don’t pretend you don’t know that,” he said, 
beginning to turn away. 

I hurled myself at Fleg’s hairy chest. 

I slapped him hard. 

“You’re It!” I screamed. I lifted both fists in triumph. “You’re It! I tagged 
you!” 

Fleg raised an eyebrow. “Sorry,” he said calmly. “I paused the game. It 
doesn’t count.” 

“No!” I shrieked. “You can’t! You can’t keep changing the rules!” 

“I didn’t. Rules are rules.” Fleg reached over me and checked the lock on 
Nat’s cage. It held fast. 

“Try again,” Spork grunted. “You can always try again.” 

The rest of the beasts nodded in agreement, grinning and snorting in 
excitement. They were enjoying themselves. They rumbled away from the 
clearing. 

“Ginger!” Nat cried. He pounded on the box. “Get me out of here!” 

I gazed at him in despair. No way could I reach him up there. 

He stared down at me through the slats. His brown hair fell into his eyes. 
“Do something,” he pleaded. 

“I’ll try again,” I said. 

It was the only thing to do. 

“Can you see them?” I called up to him. “Which way did they go?” 



Nat pointed. “I see a few beasts hiding over there.” 

“I’ll be back,” I promised. “After I tag one of them.” 

I tried to sound as if it was a sure thing. I wished I could believe my own 
words. 

“Hurry!” Nat called after me. 

A strong wind blew through the clearing, rocking the cage from side to side. 
Nat hunched down, hugging his knees. 

I gave him one last look and took off. 

Long shadows fell across the ground. I gazed at the sky. The orange was 
turning into deep pink. Almost sundown. 

I plunged into the darkening woods. 

All around me I could hear small animals skittering through the carpet of 
leaves on the forest floor. As if hurrying home before sunset. 

Home. Where they were safe. 

The wind howled loudly through the trees. I stumbled and almost fell over a 
rotted tree stump. 

The woods were closing in on me. Time was closing in on me. 

And then I saw a beast hiding behind an umbrella bush. His shoulders 
slumped forward. His head bobbed gently up and down. 

He was sound asleep. 

Here’s my chance, I thought. 

I moved slowly toward him. The beast shifted position. 

I stopped. Held my breath. 

He quieted down again. He must have moved in his sleep. 

This is it, I thought. My chance. In a second, he’ll be the Beast from the 

East. 

I rushed forward. 

And gasped. 

The earth dropped away. 

Nothing under me. 

Nothing but air. 

I fell quickly. Sank straight down. 

Down... down... down... 

Screaming all the way. 



21 


I hit solid ground. 

Hard. 

The air burst from my lungs. 

My shoulder jammed against a sharp rock. 

I cried out. Rubbed my arm. 

Struggling to catch my breath, I pulled myself up and stared around me. 

Too dark. I couldn’t see a thing. 

It’s over, I thought. The game is over. 

“Hey—is anyone up there?” I called. “Can anyone hear me?” 

I stopped and listened for an answer. Any answer. 

Silence. 

I forced myself to my feet. My shoulder ached. I rolled it back and forth a 
couple of times to keep it from getting stiff. 

I reached out and patted the walls around me. Solid dirt. I was in some sort 
of deep pit. The kind people dig to trap animals. 

Now I was the trapped animal. 

I ran my hands quickly over the walls. Maybe I could find something to 
hold onto. Some way to climb out. 

Yuck! What was that? 

My hand touched something cold sticking out of the side of the pit. 

I clenched my teeth and forced myself to touch it again. It stayed firm under 
my fingers. A root, I thought excitedly. 

It’s not alive. 

I ran my hand further up the wall. The roots were everywhere. As high up 
as I could feel. Perfect! 

I raised my foot and stepped onto the lowest root. It held. 

Footholds! I could climb out of the pit. 

My hands grabbed the highest root I could reach. I pulled myself up. I heard 
a crumbling of loose dirt. 

I pressed myself against the wall as more dirt sifted down the side of the pit, 
spraying my face. 



I squeezed my eyes shut. Waited for the dirt to stop falling. Then I found 
the next root and began climbing again. 

How much time did I have left? How much time before the sun went down? 
My shoulder ached. But I had a long way to go. I rested briefly against the 
wall. Then I continued climbing. 

Snap! 

The root shattered under my right foot. My leg dangled in the air. 

Snap! 

The root under my right hand popped loose. 

“Hey!” I cried out as I felt myself fall. 

I landed hard on the floor of the pit. I lay still for a moment, trying to catch 
my breath. 

I gazed up. A last bit of pink sky glowed over the mouth of the pit. 

In the fading light, I looked around. I saw the useless roots on the sides of 
the deep hole. I glanced down. 

Oh, no. 

There was just enough sunlight to see the ground beneath me. 

It was brown. 

And square. 

A Free Lunch square. 

I was trapped. Trapped on a Free Lunch square. The beasts could eat me— 
anytime they wanted. 

I froze in panic. And heard rumbling footsteps above me. 

I huddled in a corner of the pit. Pressed my back against the dirt. 

“This way!” I heard Fleg shout. “She’s down here!” 



22 


Fleg appeared in the opening above me. His flabby chin hung down. His eyes 
locked onto mine. 

“Found you!” he cried. 

Spork slid next to Fleg. He grinned down at me and drooled yellow drool. It 
splattered beside my boot. 

“Something down there smells delicious!” Spork cried. “I’m soooo 
hungry!” 

Gleeb shoved his furry face between Fleg’s and Spork’s. 

He smacked his lips. I heard his stomach growl. 

“Finally!” Spork grunted. “Pull her out! Let’s eat!” 

I covered my face with my hands. “Please. Don’t hurt me,” I cried. “I 
haven’t done anything to you.” 

Fleg shrugged. “You play the game. Sometimes you win. Sometimes you 
lose.” 

Spork and Gleeb reached down into the pit. Their big paws swiped at me. 

I pressed my back tighter against the wall. “Please,” I begged. “Please go 
away and leave me alone. You win, okay? You can have all my points.” 

“Points can’t be given away,” Fleg scolded. “You know that.” 

The others grunted in agreement. They reached down for me. 

My eyes searched the pit. 

I needed a weapon. 

The roots? 

I yanked a fat one out of the dirt. 

“Stay back!” I shouted, whipping the root at their paws. 

The beasts slapped each other on the back and laughed their ugly laugh. 
“You’ll be sorry,” I threatened. 

Who was I kidding? This stupid root couldn’t hurt them. And they knew it. 
I was the Beast from the East. I was dinner. 

Fleg leaned into the pit and snarled. His claws were only inches from my 

face. 


I ducked. 



His paw brushed against the back of my neck. I felt claws scratch my skin. 

I jerked away. The hair on my arms stood straight up. 

If only I could burrow into the earth like an animal, I thought. 

Fleg’s paw swiped the air in front of my face. 

“Stop ducking away,” he shouted. “You’re just making me hungrier.” 

“This isn’t fair!” I screamed. 

He turned to Spork and Gleeb. “I’m tired of this,” he complained. “Enough 
stalling.” 

His round eyes gleamed down hungrily at me. 

“Get her!” he bellowed. 

Spork leaned down and grabbed my arm. I felt his claws dig into my skin. 
He pulled me up and yanked me to my feet. 

It’s all over, I thought sadly. The game is over. 



23 


A cloud passed overhead, throwing the pit into deep shadow. 

Fleg howled. He slapped his broad forehead. “Made in the Shade!” he 
cried. 

Spork opened his paw and let go of my arm. 

I dropped to the ground. Fell to my knees. 

“Made in the Shade!” Spork cried. 

“Made in the Shade!” Gleeb echoed. 

I climbed to my feet. The angry voices of the beasts made my head throb. 

They stomped their feet loudly. 

“What’s going on?” I demanded. 

“You’re safe,” Spork replied, sneering in disgust. “This time.” 

Safe? I breathed a sigh of relief. 

“But... why?” I asked, amazed. 

“You’re Made in the Shade,” Fleg explained. 

“We can’t touch you. It’s a free pass. But you can only use it once.” 

Once was enough, I hoped. I didn’t plan to play this game forever. 

“We have to let you go this time,” Fleg growled. “But you’re still the Beast 
from the East.” 

“You still have to tag someone before sundown,” Spork agreed. 

Gleeb sighed. The three beasts turned to the woods. “We’ll go now,” Fleg 
announced. 

“Wait!” I scrambled to my feet. “How do I get out of here? How can I tag 
someone if I’m stuck in this pit?” 

Fleg rolled his eyes. He reached down and pressed one paw against a purple 
rock on the ground near the edge of the pit. 

The pit floor creaked and groaned. 

Then it rose up. Higher and higher. 

Finally it jerked to a halt a few feet below the ground. 

I was close enough to stare at the beasts’ ankles. I could see shiny black 
bugs crawling in their fur. I swallowed nervously. Was this some kind of trick? 
Or was I really safe? 



“I still need help to climb out of here,” I told Fleg. 

Fleg pounded on the purple rock again. 

The floor started moving. This time it stopped level with the ground. 

I hopped off the Free Lunch square. The beasts circled me. 

“The sun is almost down,” Fleg warned. “The game is almost over.” 

“You don’t have much time,” Spork added. 

Fleg snorted. Then he turned and lumbered away. 

“Good luck,” Spork cried as he hurried after Fleg. Gleeb followed. They 
raced back toward the stone tunnel. 

“Wait!” I yelled. I ran after them as fast as I could. 

I raced into the rock tunnel. I could hear the beasts up ahead of me. They 
growled and grunted, scraping their claws across the walls and ceiling again. 
Making a racket. 

I saw them burst through the other side of the tunnel. They split up, running 
in different directions. 

Which way should I go? I knew I couldn’t waste time. 

I followed Fleg. 

He wove in and out between the trees. He leaped over some scraggly 
bushes. 

I panted, straining to keep up. 

Fleg picked up the pace. 

Faster and faster. 

I could barely keep up now. I was gasping for air. 

“Wait!” I shouted desperately. “Wait!” 

Fleg glanced once over his shoulder. He disappeared into the trees. I 
stopped running after him. 

Overhead, the sky turned to purple. Soon it would be completely dark. 

I spun around, searching desperately for a beast to tag. 

“Yoo-hoo! Over here!” I heard a call. 

I whirled around. 

Spork. He waved to me from between two tall trees. 

I raced toward him. 

Spork lumbered down a twisting path. I followed him. 

What else could I do? 

Suddenly, my foot caught on a rock. I sprawled into the dirt. 



I forced myself to get up. The woods were quiet around me. 

No beasts. 

I wanted to scream! So I did. 

“Fleg! Spork! Gleeb! Where are you?” I shouted. How could I tag them? I 
couldn’t even find them. 

My eyes scanned the area. 

What was that? I squinted harder. 

Yes! A blue furry head! It popped up behind a bush. 

My last chance. 

I gathered my energy and sprinted toward the bush. My hand reached out. 
“Tag!” I yelled. “You’re—” 



24 


“Gurraughl” The tiny beast pawed the air. 

The baby beast! The only beast under three feet tall. Too short to play the 
game. 

No fair! I thought. 

My hopes were crushed. Again. 

I picked up a rock and heaved it angrily into the woods. 

“Where is everyone?” I screamed. “Come out and play!” 

The little beast patted its claws together and gurgled happily. 

I stared at it. Why was it here all alone? 

Then it hit me. Of course. 

There must be another beast nearby. A grownup beast to watch the kid. One 
over three feet tall. 

One I could tag. 

I checked out the area. Trees and large rocks. I would have to search behind 
every one of them. 

Taking a deep breath, I tiptoed silently through the trees. Stopped to peer 
behind each rock. 

Crunch. My foot cracked a pile of twigs. 

I stood completely still. And waited. 

Silence. 

I moved forward. 

I listened carefully. 

Silence. 

I crept forward. A beast had to be here somewhere. 

But where? 

Then I heard a noise. 

Mumbling. 

I crept behind a bush and inched closer to the sound. It came from behind a 
tall, jagged rock. 

I peeked out. 

Spork! 



Yes! Spork stood behind the rock, talking to himself. He scratched the 
lumpy scar on his nose. 

I could easily tag him. 

But was this another penalty rock? 

Would it go up in smoke? 

I didn’t want to end up in a cage dangling above the ground. 

Like Nat. Poor Nat. 

I took another deep breath and inched closer to Spork. 

Spork turned and searched the woods behind him. “Little beast,” he called 
out. “Is that you?” 

I dropped to the ground and waited. 

My heart pounded in my ears. I forced myself to stay quiet. 

Spork didn’t move from his spot. He sighed and started mumbling again. 
Three more steps and I could tag him. 

Two more. 

I wiped my forehead. One more. 

It was too good to be true. Spork had no idea I was behind him. 

I smacked him hard. “You’re It!” I shrieked. 

Spork gasped in surprise. His big paws shot up into the air. I thought he was 
about to faint! 

“I’ve done it! I’ve done it!” I cried happily. 

I was free! 

Nat was free! 

Spork grunted and raised himself up. He towered over me. He didn’t seem 
the least bit upset. But he had just lost the game. 

“You’re It!” I repeated. “You’re the Beast from the East!” 

Spork raised a paw lazily and scratched his open eye socket. 

I felt a chill of fear. What if Spork refused to obey the rules? 

“Sorry,” Spork said softly. “Not this time.” 

“Hey—!” I shouted angrily. “You have to obey the rules! I tagged you, fair 
and square!” 

Spork stared at me as if I were being very funny. Something was wrong. 
But what? What was it? Why didn’t he say something? Spork’s lips curled into a 
nasty grin. 



25 


“You tagged me from the west,” Spork whispered. “It doesn’t count.” 

I could feel the blood msh to my face. “No fair! I tagged you! I tagged 
you!” I wailed. 

Spork shrugged. 

“You have to tag me from the east. Remember?” Spork’s little eyes nearly 
disappeared as his face crumpled in laughter. “You’re still the Beast from the 
East!” 

I groaned. 

How could I have forgotten? That was the most important rule of all. 

How was I supposed to know which way was east? I couldn’t even see the 
sun anymore! 

My head throbbed. My whole body ached. I was sore and hungry. 

Spork stood there, shaking with silent laughter. 

I glanced at the darkening sky. 

Wait a minute! 

I climbed up on the boulder. The sun was setting behind me. That was the 
west. In front of me was east. 

I studied Spork. Without Fleg around, the big beast seemed less menacing. 
Harmless almost. 

After all, he was supposed to be baby-sitting. And what had happened? 
He’d lost the little beast. 

And now he was so busy laughing at my mistake, he had practically 
forgotten about me. 

“Hey, Spork,” I called. “Do you want to play one of my games now?” 

“But we’re still playing this one.” Spork blinked in surprise. 

“I’ll pause it. It’s kind of boring anyway, isn’t it?” I asked. “My game is lots 
more fun.” 

Spork scratched the hole where his eye used to be. He pulled a big, black 
bug out of it, and tossed the bug away. “What’s your game called?” 

“Freeze Frame,” I answered quickly. 

Nat and Pat loved to play this game. 



“We spin around and when I say stop, we freeze—and see if one of us can 
keep our balance and not fall over.” 

“Sounds fun,” Spork agreed. “Why not?” 

“Okay then,” I said. “Let’s try it. Spin!” I shouted. 

We both started to spin. 

I peeked at Spork. His arms swung out as he whirled around. 

“Faster!” I called out. “Much faster.” 

Spork whirled faster and faster as he turned around in circles. 

His tail swished against the bushes. I jumped out of the way. 

Spork started to wobble. 

“Game— unpausedl” I shouted. 

Spork didn’t seem to hear me. He teetered and stumbled into a tree. 
“Freeze!” I shouted. 

Spork froze in place. 

I leaped at him and tagged him. Hard. 

From the east. 

“You’re It!” I shouted. I backed away. “I tagged you from the east! This 
time you’re really It!” 

Spork placed both paws against his head and closed his eyes. I could tell he 
was still dizzy. He spread his legs and balanced himself against the tree. 

He bopped himself in the face with his paw. “You did it,” he agreed. He ran 
his bumpy tongue over his lips. He exhaled a deep breath. “I’m It,” he admitted. 
“Yes. Yes. Yes!” I cried. I jumped up in excitement. 

Spork plopped down against the boulder. 

“I’m free!” I shrieked. “The game is over.” I clenched my hand into a fist 
and pumped my arm. 

“I’m going to rescue Nat,” I said. “Which way is he?” 

Spork pointed his clawed finger to my right. 

“We’re outta here!” I shouted. 

I’d never been so happy in all my life. 

“Well, Spork old pal,” I said, beaming at him. “This is good-bye. See you!” 
“Not so quick,” Spork said. “I’m afraid you can’t leave.” 



26 


“Forget it,” I said. “You can’t change the rules again! No way.” 

“You can’t leave,” he repeated. “The game continues until sunset.” He 
glared at me stubbornly. 

I gazed at the sky. The purple was fading to gray. Not much time left. But 
enough. 

I wasn’t going to be It again. 

I could hide until dark. But where? 

“Don’t just stand there,” Spork warned. “You could be tagged again.” 
“Never,” I insisted. “I won’t let that happen.” 

Before I could move, Fleg stomped from behind a tree. The flabby skin 
under his chin swung from side to side. 

Gleeb crept behind him. 

“She tagged me!” Spork told them. 

“I knew it!” Fleg stared at me. “I knew you played this game before.” 

I balled my hands into fists. I was angry. I’d had enough. 

They forced me to play their stupid game. But I wasn’t going to lose now. 
Fleg waved me away. “You have until I count to trel,” he said. “Then we’re 
allowed to come after you again.” 

He turned his back and covered his eyes. “Gling... proo... zee... freen... 
trel,” he counted. 

I had no choice. I ran. 

Don’t stop, I told myself. Don’t think about anything. Run. Find a place to 

hide. 

“Ready or not—here we come!” I heard Fleg cry. 

Behind me, the beasts growled and grunted in excitement. 

I hurled myself off the path and pushed through the tall, scratchy grass 
between the trees. I jumped over a clump of cabbage plants. 

My legs ached. My feet burned. 

But I couldn’t stop. 

Not until I reached a hiding place. 

I skidded to a stop when I heard rushing water. I nearly fell into the stream. 



A large blue fish leaped out of the water and snapped at my ankles. 

This was no place to hide. I turned back into the woods. 

A cold wind blew in my face. The gourds whistled their strange melody. 

“Here I come!” Spork shouted off to my left. 

I pushed myself faster. No way he was going to tag me. 

I glanced around. Which way? 

The rock tunnel! I saw it only a few feet away. 

I darted into the darkness. Without the beasts yelling and shouting, it was 
eerily quiet inside. I slowed down and tiptoed through the tunnel. 

When I reached the other side, I crept into the dense trees. I slumped 
against a tree and waited, trying to keep quiet. I was breathing so hard I was 
afraid the beasts could hear me! 

A moment passed. 

I felt the trembling that meant the beasts were approaching. 

I held my breath and ducked beneath an umbrella plant. 

Seconds later, Fleg, Spork, and Gleeb burst out of the tunnel and raced 
down the path. Four more beasts followed behind them. They passed the bush 
where I hid. Crashed into the woods. And kept going. 

I waited to make sure they were gone. 

Silence. 

I breathed a sigh of relief. 

I scrambled to my feet and stretched. 

Something rushed at me from behind. 

“No!” I cried in terror. 

Two arms wrapped around my waist. And a creature threw me to the 
ground. 



27 


I thrashed and kicked wildly. 

“Stop it. Cut it out!” a familiar voice demanded. 

“Nat!” I screamed. I whirled around. “Nat! You’re safe! How did you get 
out of the cage?” 

“Cage? What cage?” My brother squinted at me. 

“The penalty cage,” I declared. “Nat—how did you escape? Did they let 
you go?” 

“I’m not Nat. It’s me. Pat.” 

“Pat?” I stared at him in confusion. Then I threw my arms around his neck. 
I’d never been so happy to see him. 

“Where have you been?” I demanded. 

“Where have / been?” Pat cried. “Where have you been? I’ve been 
searching everywhere for you guys. These woods are creepy.” 

He glanced around. “Where’s Nat, anyway?” 

“Trapped.” I started to explain. “See, the beasts got him. After you ran into 
the woods, we had to play this game and...” 

“A game?” Pat cried. He shook his head in disbelief. “I was lost in the 
woods—and you two are playing a game?” 

“It’s not what you think,” I said. 

I checked the trees around us for any sign of the creatures. 

“They forced us to play,” I told Pat, lowering my voice to a whisper. “It’s 
like tag—only they play for keeps. I was the Beast from the East and—” 

“Right.” Pat rolled his eyes. 

“Really,” I insisted. “This game is deadly. You have to believe me.” 

“Why?” Pat shrugged. “You never believe me. Why should I believe you?” 

“Because if we lose, they’ll eat us!” I told him. 

Pat burst out laughing. 

“I’m serious!” I grabbed Pat’s shoulders and shook him hard. “I’m telling 
the truth! It’s dangerous here. Fleg and Spork are after me, right now.” 

Pat twisted out of my grasp. “Right. Fleg and Spork. Woof woof!” Pat 
barked. 



“Shhh,” I hissed. “Keep quiet!” I pulled him behind an umbrella plant. “Pat, 
you have to believe me. They’re all around us. They could get us if we’re not 
careful.” 

“And I suppose this game was their idea?” he asked. 

“Yes,” I answered. 

“And I suppose they can talk,” Pat went on. “In English.” 

“Yes. Yes. Yes,” I insisted. 

“You’re weirder than I thought,” Pat said, shaking his head. “So where’s 
Nat? For real?” 

“ Grrravghl ” 

A deep growl echoed off the nearby rocks. “This way!” A beast bellowed. 
“Near the tunnel!” 

Heavy footsteps pounded closer. The ground shook under our feet. 

Pat’s eyes widened in shock. He reached for my arm. 

“It’s them!” I exclaimed. “Now do you believe me?” 

Pat swallowed hard and nodded his head. “Yes. I believe you,” he choked 

out. 

“She’s over here!” a beast shouted. 

“He heard us,” I whispered in Pat’s ear. “Run!” 

Pat and I took off. 

We raced through the woods, leaping over fallen logs, pushing sharp 
branches out of our faces. 

“This way!” I called. I grabbed Pat’s hand. “Stay low.” 

We ducked into a thick clump of trees. 

Spork thudded past us. 

I could hear him sniffing the air. 

“Can he smell us?” Pat asked in a whisper. 

“Sshh!” I pressed my finger to my lips. 

We crept between the bushy plants. 

Fleg appeared, stomping in our direction. 

I dropped to my hands and knees. I pulled Pat down beside me. 

Fleg thudded past us. 

I knew we weren’t safe. More beasts would follow. And one of them might 
find us. 

I motioned for Pat to follow me. 



We scrambled deeper into the woods. 

The trees were close together here. The bushes were so thick I couldn’t see 
between them. I flung out an arm, feeling my way. 

My hand brushed against something. 

Something big. 

And warm. 

And furry. 



28 


I leaped back. Crashed into Pat. 

What had I touched? 

The bushes parted and a strange creature bounced out. 

I had never seen anything like it. 

It had the body of a dog, as big as a German shepherd, and the face of a 
squirrel. 

I don’t believe this! I thought. 

It could talk, too. “In here! Quick!” the creature urged in a scratchy, 
squeaky voice. 

Its squirrel-nose twitched. Its bushy dog tail thrashed from side to side. 

Could we trust it? 

“In here!” it squeaked. 

It waved a paw in the air. Pointed to a bush of big orange leaves. 

Pat held back, but I crept forward. I spotted the entrance to a cave hidden 
behind the leaves. 

“It’s a good hiding place,” I told Pat. 

“It’s the Hiding Cave,” the squirrel-dog announced. “The Hiding Cave is 
the place to hide. Quick!” The animal held the leaves aside for us. 

The ground shook. I turned and saw furry blue beasts in the distance. They 
were moving quickly toward us. 

“Better do it, Pat,” I said. 

Pat hesitated. 

I yanked his hand and pulled him after me. I bent down to enter the Hiding 
Cave. 

I suddenly remembered what happened when Nat touched the penalty rock. 
The thought made me shiver. Would we really be safe in the Hiding Cave? 

Thump. Thump. 

The beasts drew closer. 

Pat hesitated and held back. 

“Where are they?” a beast shouted. I recognized Fleg’s voice. 

“They must be nearby,” Spork answered. 



The squirrel-dog stayed outside. It let go of the orange leaves. They sprang 
back into place, hiding the entrance to the cave. 

Pat and I crouched inside, hidden from view. 

We huddled close together. The air felt damp inside. It had a sour smell that 
I tried to ignore. 

I slumped against the wall of the cave and wiped the sweat off my forehead. 
I tucked my feet under me. “Try to get comfortable,” I whispered to Pat. “We 
might be here for a long time.” 

Something tickled my neck. I reached to scratch it. 

Something tickled my ear. 

I shivered. 

I brushed my hand against my ear and felt something crawl onto my cheek. 

“Ow!” I cried out as I felt a sharp bite on my shoulder. 

I turned to Pat. He was slapping at his ears and neck. 

Something buzzed past my ear. 

Something skittered through my hair. I shook my head hard. 

My whole body itched and tingled. Every inch of me! 

Beside me, Pat squirmed, and wriggled, scratched and slapped at himself. 

I leaped to my feet. “Help!” I cried. “What is happening? What is going on 
in here?” 



29 


“Help!” I cried, scratching desperately. “Help us!” 

The squirrel-dog’s face poked into the entrance. 

“What is happening to us?” I cried, squirming and scratching. 

“I forgot to tell you,” the strange creature whispered. “The Hiding Cave is 
also a hiding place for bugs!” 

Bugs! 

“Ohhh!” Pat let out a low moan. He rubbed his back against the cave wall. 
Scratched his hair. 

The bugs were everywhere. Crawling on the walls. Flying through the air. 
Buzzing. Whistling. Clicking. 

They crawled up and down my legs and arms. Over my face. In my hair. 

I picked some kind of worm off my cheek. I dragged my hand down my 
arms and my bare legs, brushing bugs onto the cave floor. 

Pat squirmed next to me. “Get them off me, Ginger,” he wailed. “Helllp!” 

“Sshhh!” The squirrel-dog stuck his nose back into the cave. “Quiet! Here 
comes the Beast from the East. Don’t make a sound or he’ll find you!” 

Pat and I drew closer together. 

I held my breath and tried not to move. 

I counted to ten. Silently. I pretended there were no bugs on me. 

I shut my eyes and pictured my bedroom. The posters on the wall. My 
comfortable canopy bed. I thought of being under the covers. Going to sleep. 

And then I thought about bedbugs! 

I couldn’t ignore the insects crawling over me. It was impossible not to 
think about them. 

I couldn’t stand it. I needed to scratch. I needed to screaml 

I couldn’t sit there another second. 

I heard a beast stomp close to the cave opening. 

I recognized Spork’s voice. “Hey—!” he snarled at the squirrel-dog. “Have 
you seen strangers here?” 

Did Spork know this creature? 

Were they friends? 



“Answer me,” Spork demanded. 

I waited for the squirrel-dog’s answer. Please don’t tell them we’re hiding in 
here, I prayed. Please. 

A fat, wet bug landed on my face. I picked at it with my fingers. It clung to 
my cheek. I pulled harder. I couldn’t tug it loose. 

I felt a scream building up inside me. 

I couldn’t take it another second. 

My mouth opened. 

I had to scream. I had to! 



30 


“Ah—” 

I clamped my hand over my mouth. 

I let out a tiny squeak. 

The orange leaves rustled. Fleg’s paw pushed into the cave entrance. 

I froze. I heard Pat gasp. 

“What’s in there?” I heard Fleg ask the squirrel-dog. 

“Bugs,” the squirrel-dog replied. “Thousands of them.” 

Millions! I thought bitterly. The bugs crawled over my face, my arms, my 
legs. They buzzed in my ears. 

Fleg pushed his nose into the cave. 

I stopped breathing. 

Fleg sniffed. “What’s that awful smell?” he complained. 

“Insects,” I heard the squirrel-dog answer. 

“They stink!” Fleg muttered. He let go of the leaves and they snapped back 
into place. “Only bugs in there,” Fleg reported to Spork. “No humans.” 

“Of course not,” the squirrel-dog said calmly. “The humans went the other 
way.” 

“Why didn’t you say so?” Fleg exploded. 

Spork shouted to the other beasts. “They’re not here! The other way, quick! 
Only trel minutes left to play.” 

“I’ll find her,” I heard Spork tell the others. “I have to tag her back! No 
human is going to make me Beast from the East!” 

I heard their footsteps pound in the other direction. 

Only trel minutes! I didn’t exactly know what trel meant. But I knew the 
game was nearly over. If Spork didn’t tag me back, my brothers and I would be 
free! 

But I couldn’t take another second in this bug-infested cave. 

I moved to the entrance on trembling legs. I itched so badly, I could barely 
control my muscles! 

I peered out of the cave. “Are they all gone?” I whispered to the squirrel- 

dog. 



“For now,” he answered. 

“Let’s get out of here!” I called back to Pat. I sprang out of the cave. He 
jumped out after me. 

We frantically brushed bugs off our skin and clothes. I scratched my head 
and rubbed my back up against a tree. 

Pat stomped his feet. “They’re even in my boots!” he wailed. He untied his 
laces and pulled off his boot. He shook it upside down. A hundred black bugs 
poured onto the ground and scurried away. 

“I’m never going to stop itching!” I wailed. “I’m going to itch for the rest of 
my life!” 

“You’d better hide,” the squirrel-dog warned. “They could be back. And 
you’re only allowed to use the Hiding Cave once a game.” 

Pat and I thanked the strange creature. Then we plunged back into the 
woods. 

I hadn’t been in this part of the forest before. Pat and I pushed our way past 
a row of high bushes. I stopped. 

A giant willow tree stood up ahead. Its branches spread low, sweeping 
against the ground. 

The Gulla Willow? 

It had to be. 

I glanced around, searching for a hiding place. A long, low rock stretched 
beyond the tree. 

Only a few minutes left. 

“Quick,” I whispered, grabbing Pat. I pulled him behind the rock. 

“That must be the Gulla Willow,” I told him. “When the sun sets behind it, 
we’ll be safe.” 

Pat nodded but didn’t reply. He was breathing hard. He scratched his 
cheeks. Still itchy. We were both still itchy. 

“Stay down,” I warned him. “And don’t touch the rock.” 

We crouched together in silence. 

And waited. 

My heart slammed against my chest. My skin tingled. I huddled beside my 
brother—and listened. 

Silence. 

The whisper of the wind through the trees. No other sound. 

“Are we safe now?” Pat asked in a trembling whisper. 



“Not yet,” I answered. I raised my eyes to the charcoal gray sky. A last ray 
of purple light spread over the top of the willow. 

Hurry! I urged the sun. Go down! What are you waiting for? 

The sky darkened. The purple light faded behind the Gulla Willow. 

Only gray sky now. Night sky. 

The sun was down. 

“We’re safe!” I cried, jumping to my feet. I turned and hugged Pat. “We’re 
safe! We made it.” 

I stepped out from behind the rock. 

A heavy hand slapped me hard. On the shoulder. 

“You’re It!” Spork bellowed. “You’re the Beast from the East!” 



31 


“Huh?” 

I gasped in shock. I could still feel the beast’s stinging slap on my shoulder. 

“No fair!” Pat cried. “No fair!” He stared as the beasts circled us. Pat had 
never seen them close-up before. 

“It’s dark! The sun is down!” I protested. “You can’t tag me now!” 

“Game Over! Game Over!” Fleg shouted. He stepped out of the woods and 
hurried toward the circle of beasts. 

I pointed angrily at the Gulla Willow. “The sun set behind the tree. You 
can’t tag me!” 

“The game hadn’t been called yet,” Spork said calmly. “You know the rule. 
Fleg has to shout out ‘Game Over’ before the game can end.” 

The beasts all murmured agreement. 

I clenched my fists. “But... but...” I stammered. I lowered my head in 
defeat. I knew they wouldn’t listen to me. 

Pat gulped. “What will they do now, Ginger?” he whispered softly. “Will 
they hurt us?” 

“I already told you,” I whispered back. “They’re going to eat us.” 

Pat let out a cry. He started to say something. But there wasn’t time. 

Fleg stepped forward and grabbed me by the waist. He tossed me over his 
shoulder. 

The blood rushed to my head and I felt dizzy. The ground was so far away! 

Spork hoisted Pat over his shoulder. 

“Hey—whoa!” I protested. “Put my brother down!” 

“He was your Helper,” Spork replied. “We always eat the Helper, too!” 

“Put me down!” Pat shrieked. “Let me go.” 

But the huge beast ignored him. 

They carried us both into a small clearing. 

A large stone pit sat in the center. A raging fire burned inside the pit. Yellow 
and blue flames leaped at the sky. 

Fleg lowered me onto a tree stump. Spork set Pat down beside me. 

The beasts circled around us. Drooling. Licking their lips. 



I thought I heard thunder. But I soon realized it was the sound of their 
stomachs growling. 

“It’s Flelday,” Spork said, smiling. “On Flelday we always barbecue.” 

I swallowed hard. And stared at the flames leaping against the sky. I 
wrapped my arms around my chest and hugged myself. 

Spork poked at the fire with a long metal rod. 

He pointed the rod at me. “Yum yum.” He grinned, rubbing his stomach. 

I felt sick. 

Gleeb lugged a huge pot over to the fire. He set it down in the middle of the 
flames. 

Fleg pulled some gourds off the nearby trees. He cracked them open and 
poured their yellow juice into the pot. He collected sticks and leaves and tossed 
them in, too. 

Gleeb stirred and stirred. A sour, rotting stench rose up from the pot. 

“The broth is ready,” Gleeb announced. 

I turned to Pat. “I’m sorry,” I said in a trembling voice. “Sorry I lost the 
game.” 

“I’m sorry, too,” he whispered, his eyes on the flames. 

The beasts began chanting. “Flelday. Flelday. Flelday.” 

“Who brought the barbecue sauce?” Spork asked. “I’m starving!” 

Fleg lifted me in his arms. And carried me toward the cooking pot. 



32 


“Whoa! Wait! Stop!” 

A familiar voice shouted across the clearing. 

I jerked my head around. “Nat!” I screamed. 

“Ginger!” Nat cried. He ran toward us, waving his arms. “What’s going on? 
What are they doing?” 

Fleg lowered me to the ground. “Nat—!” I screamed. “Run! Find help! 
Hurry!” 

He stopped halfway across the clearing. “But, Ginger—” 

“They’ll eat you, too,” I shrieked. “Run!” 

“Capture him!” Spork shouted to the other beasts. 

Gleeb and several others took off after Nat. 

Nat spun around. He darted for the woods and disappeared into the trees. 

I watched helplessly as the beasts plunged into the woods after him. 

Don’t find him, I prayed, crossing my fingers. All ten of them! 

Nat will escape, I told myself. He’ll climb a tree. He’ll get away from them. 
Then he’ll run and find help. 

Pat and I stared at the dark trees. And waited. 

“Oh, nooo!” I uttered a long wail when the beasts returned from the woods. 
And one of them carried Nat over his shoulder. 

Nat kicked and punched. But he couldn’t free himself. 

The beast dumped Nat beside Pat and me. Nat landed hard, face-down on 
the ground. 

Now they had all three of us. A feast! 

Spork and Fleg gazed at us hungrily. Gleeb ran his tongue over his long 

fang. 

I dropped down beside Nat. “How did you get out?” I asked him. “How did 
you get out of that cage?” 

Nat rolled over and sat up. “It wasn’t that hard,” he said, groaning. “The 
boards were weak. I worked and worked—until I pushed enough boards out. 
Then I broke out.” 

“You should have stayed away,” I told him. “You should have run. Now 



they’re going to eat you, too.” 

Nat raised his eyes to the cook pot and the blazing fire. “I—I don’t want to 
play anymore,” he stammered. 

“Nat,” I whispered sadly, “I’m afraid the game is just about over.” 



33 


“Quiet!” Fleg demanded. “Dinner—stop talking!” He stared at Nat. 

Fleg’s eyes narrowed. He tilted his head. He whispered to Spork and Gleeb. 

The other beasts moved closer. They were all moving their eyes from Pat to 
Nat. They began murmuring to each other, shaking their big, furry heads. Their 
snouts waved up and down as they talked. 

“You doubled!” Spork said to Pat. “You did a Classic Clone!” 

I stared at the beasts. Studied their startled expressions. Hadn’t they ever 
seen twins before? 

“You doubled yourselves!” Fleg declared. “That’s a Classic Clone. Why 
didn’t you tell us?” 

“Uh... tell you what?” I asked. 

Fleg glared at me. “Why didn’t you tell us that you are Level Three 
players?” 

My brothers and I exchanged confused glances. 

“You’re in the wrong game,” Spork announced, shaking his head. 

“If you can double yourselves, that means you belong in Level Three,” Fleg 
said. He slapped his furry forehead. “I’m so embarrassed! Why didn’t you tell us 
sooner?” 

“Well, I told you we didn’t want to play,” I replied sharply. “But you 
wouldn’t listen.” 

“I’m so sorry,” Fleg apologized. “We’re only Level One players. We’re just 
beginners. We’re not experts like you.” 

“Experts?” Pat muttered. He turned to me and rolled his eyes. 

“That’s why we have to play in the daytime,” Fleg explained. “We’re not 
ready to play at night.” 

All around us, the beasts were muttering and shaking their heads. 

“Of course, we’ll have to let you go now,” Fleg said. He scratched at his 
flabby chin. 

“Well, of course,” I cried. I wanted to jump up and down and shout for joy. 
But somehow I kept myself in control. 

“That’s it?” Nat cried to Fleg. “We’re free?” 

“Yes. Good-bye.” Fleg scowled. He rubbed his belly. I heard it growl. 



“Don’t ask again,” I told Nat. “Let’s just get out of here!” 

“Good-bye,” Fleg repeated. He waved his paws as if he were trying to shoo 
us away. 

I jumped to my feet. I didn’t feel tired or scared or itchy or dirty anymore. 

This time the game was really over! 

“How do we find our parents?” I asked. 

“That’s easy,” Fleg replied. “Follow that path.” He pointed. “Follow it 
through the trees. It leads back to your world.” 

We shouted good-bye—and took off. The narrow dirt path twisted through 
the trees. Silvery moonlight danced over the ground. 

“I am so glad you guys are twins!” I exclaimed. 

I had never said that before! But I really meant it. They had saved our lives! 

The trees thinned out. I could see a full moon climbing up over the dark 
treetops. I felt as if we were running to it, running into its warm, white light. 

“Mom and Dad will never believe this story,” I said. I planned to tell them 
every gory detail. 

“They have to believe us,” Pat declared. “It’s all true.” 

I put on a burst of speed. My brothers ran harder to keep up with me. 

I couldn’t wait to get back. Mom and Dad must be so worried. 

“Oh!” I gasped and skidded to a stop. 

Pat and Nat stumbled into me. All three of us struggled to stay on our feet. 

A huge beast had stepped out from behind a tree, blocking the path. 

He crossed his furry arms over his enormous chest. His snout flared as he 
stared down at us with cold marble eyes. He opened his lips and growled, 
exposing his long fang. 

I wasn’t afraid. Not this time. 

“Step aside,” I ordered him. “You have to let us go by. My brothers and I 
are Level Three players.” 

“You’re Level Three? Hey—that’s great! So am I!” the beast exclaimed. 
“Tag! You’re It.” 





SAY CHEESE AND 
DIE—AGAIN! 


1 


“Greg Banks!” 

A shiver ran down the back of my neck as Mr. Saur called my name. I had been 

slumping low in my seat in the last row of the classroom. I tried to hide behind 
Brian 

Webb, the big gorilla of a kid who sits in front of me. 

And I folded my hands and prayed that Mr. Saur wouldn’t call on me to give my 
report next. 

“Greg Banks!” he called. 

I felt another cold shiver. Then my legs started to shake as I climbed to my feet. 
Then my throat tightened until I could barely breathe. 

I hate giving reports in front of the whole class. 

Especially when I haven’t had much time to practice. Especially when we’re not 

allowed to have notes. Especially when half of our grade in English depends on 
how 

we do on this report. 

I cleared my throat and made my way up to the front of the classroom. I was 
halfway there when Donny Greene stuck his big white sneaker into the aisle and 
tripped me. 

I stumbled—but didn’t fall. The whole class exploded in laughter, anyway. 

Mr. Saur frowned at Donny. “Donny, do you have to trip every person who walks 



by you?” he demanded. 

“Yes,” Donny replied with a straight face. 

And once again, the whole class burst out laughing. 

Everyone thinks Donny is a riot. Everyone but Mr. Saur. 

Mr. Saur doesn’t think anyone is funny. That’s why we call him Sourball Saur. 

He probably wouldn’t think that was funny, either! 

Mr. Saur is tall and thin and nearly bald. He never kids around. He never smiles. 
His mouth is always puckered, as if he’s just bitten into a lemon. 

Sourball Saur. 

He’s sort of a legend at Pitts Landing Middle School. Everyone tries not to get 

him. My best friends—Michael, Bird, and Shari—were lucky. They’re in Miss 

Folsom’s class. I was the only one who got stuck with the Sourball. 

I stepped up beside his desk and cleared my throat again. I wondered if everyone 

could see my knees shaking. My face felt burning hot. My hands were cold as 
ice. 

Does everyone get this nervous when they stand in front of the class? 

Mr. Saur folded his pale, skinny hands on his desk and cracked his knuckles. 
“Okay, Greg, let’s hear your true story,” he said. 

I cleared my throat for the thousandth time. I took a deep breath. Then I started 
to 

tell the story of what happened to my friends and me last summer.... 



2 


“I was hanging out with my friends. Bird, Michael, and Shari. We had nothing to 

do, and we were kind of bored. So we dared each other to do something exciting. 
We 

dared each other to sneak into the Coffman house.” 

Mr. Saur raised a hand to interrupt me. He frowned his sour frown. “What’s the 
Coffman house?” 

“It’s a haunted house!” Donny Greene called out. 

“It’s where Donny lives!” Brian Webb mumbled, loud enough for everyone to 
hear. It got a big laugh. 

Mr. Saur raised both hands for quiet and gave everyone his lemon expression. 

“It’s a deserted, old house in my neighborhood,” I told him. “We went inside. 

Down to the basement. And we found an old camera. And that’s what my true 
story 

is about. Because the camera had evil powers.” 

Mr. Saur groaned and rolled his eyes. Some kids laughed. But I took another 
deep 

breath and continued my story. 

“It was an instant camera. The picture popped right out. But it was never the 
picture we snapped. It always showed something terrible happening. 

“I took the old camera home. I snapped a photo of my dad’s new station wagon. 
The photo slid out. In the photo, the station wagon was totaled. Completely 



wrecked. 


And then, a few days later, my dad was in a terrible accident. The photo came 
true.” 

I glanced around the room to see how my story was going over. A few kids were 
laughing. Others were staring at me hard. Trying to decide if I was for real. 

Brian Webb tried to make me lose it. He stuck his two pointer fingers into his 
nostrils and twirled them around. He thinks he’s funny, but he’s just gross. 

“I took a snapshot of my friend Bird Arthur,” I continued. “At his Little League 
game. Bird smiled and posed for the camera. But the photo showed him lying 
unconscious on the ground. 

“Then, a few minutes later, a kid hit a line drive. It smacked Bird in the head. 

And Bird fell unconscious on the ground. Just like in the photo.” 

I heard some nervous giggles from the back of the room. I glanced up to see 

puzzled expressions on a lot of faces. Brian still had his fingers in his nose. I 
turned 

away. No way was I going to laugh at that. 

Mr. Saur had his elbows on the desk and his round, bald head buried in his 
hands. 

His face was hidden. So I couldn’t tell if he liked my report or not. 

“Then something even more scary happened,” I continued. “I brought the 
camera 

to Shari Walker’s birthday party. I snapped Shari’s picture, standing next to a 
tree. 



“When the photo popped out, it showed the tree—but no Shari. It was like she 
was invisible or something. And then, a few minutes later, Shari disappeared.” 

A few kids gasped. Some others laughed. Mr. Saur still had his face buried in his 
hands. 

“A couple of days later, Shari came back,” I told them. “But now we were too 

frightened to keep the camera. So we took it back to the Coffman house. And we 
met 

this strange guy, dressed all in black. He was the inventor of the camera. He told 
us 

that the camera had a curse on it, and—” 

To my surprise, Mr. Saur jumped to his feet. “That will be enough,” he snapped. 
“Excuse me?” I wasn’t sure I heard him correctly. 

3 

The room went silent. 

Mr. Saur shook his head. Then he narrowed his watery brown eyes at me. 
“Greg,” 

he said, “I have some very bad news for you.” 


4 



2 


The lunch bell rang. 

“We’ll hear more reports tomorrow,” Mr. Saur announced. “Class dismissed.” 
Chairs scraped the floor as everyone stood up. I watched the other kids gather up 
their books and backpacks and head for the door. Freedom. 

I had an urge to run after them. But Mr. Saur kept his eyes locked on me, holding 
me in place with those cold eyes. 

I waited until the classroom had emptied out. Then I turned to the lemon-faced 
teacher. “What’s the bad news?” I gritted my teeth. 

“I’m giving you an F,” Sourball said. 

“Huh?” 

“I’m failing you on that report, Greg.” 

I felt my knees give. I had to grab the chalk tray to keep myself from collapsing 
in a quivering heap on the floor. “B—but—but— why?” I choked out. 

He crossed his bony arms over the front of his yellow alligator-shirt. I wished the 
alligator would reach up and bite him. 

“You didn’t do the assignment,” he said. 

“But—but—but—” I still gripped the chalk tray. My legs were shaking too hard 
to stand up. 

“Greg, you were supposed to share a true story,” Mr. Saur scolded. “Instead, you 



came in here with that wild tale. It was completely silly. I don’t know what you 
were 

thinking!” 

“But it’s true!” I wailed. “The camera—” 

He waved a hand in my face. “Silly,” he repeated. “You came in here with a 
wild, 

silly story. Something you probably read in a comic book.” 

“Mr. Saur—!” I started. I let go of the chalk tray and balled my hands into tight 

fists. “You have to believe me. The camera is real. I didn’t make up the story.” 

I took a deep breath. Then I struggled to keep my voice low and calm. “You can 

ask my friends,” I told him. “They’re in Miss Folsom’s class. They’ll tell you it 
really 

happened.” 

“I’m sure they will.” He smirked at me. “I’m sure your friends will tell me 
whatever you want them to tell me.” 

“No. Really—!” I protested. 

Mr. Saur shook his head. “You didn’t take the assignment seriously, Greg. You 
treated it like a big joke. So I have to give you an F.” 

I raised my fists and let out a loud groan. 

Greg, get control, I warned myself. Get control. 

5 

But how could I get control? The grade was so unfair. And it meant so much to 



me. 


It was a matter of life or death! 

“Mr. Saur—you can’t give me an F!” I wailed. I felt like dropping to my knees 
and begging for mercy. “You will ruin my life!” 

He stared coldly at me. He didn’t say a word. 

“If I don’t get better grades, I can’t visit my cousins this summer,” I explained. 

“You see, my cousins live near Yosemite. In California. And my parents said that 
if I 

get a better grade in your English class, I can spend the summer with them.” 

He didn’t move. His cold frown didn’t budge. His eyes didn’t blink. 

“If you give me an F, I’ll be stuck all summer in Pitts Landing!” I cried. 

Finally, Mr. Saur moved. An unpleasant smile spread over his face. His wet 

brown eyes flashed. “Then you’ll have plenty of time to make up more crazy 
stories,” 

he said. 

He turned away from me and started scribbling notes in his black grade book. 
“Mr. Saur—please!” I begged. “You’ve got to believe me. My story is true. I 
didn’t make it up. Please—” 

He raised his eyes from the grade book. “Okay. Prove it.” 

My mouth dropped open. “Huh?” 

“Bring in the camera,” he said. “Bring it in and prove that it’s evil. Prove that 



your story is true—or else I have to fail you.” 

I stared at him, studying his face. Was he serious? 

He stared back for a moment, daring me with his eyes. Then he shooed me away 

with both hands. “Go to lunch, Greg. Maybe next time you’ll take my 
assignment 

seriously.” 

I gathered up my backpack and slung it over my shoulder. Then I slumped out of 
the room, thinking hard. 

Could I go back to that creepy old house and dig out that camera? 

No. No way. 

The camera was too dangerous. Too frightening. Too evil. 

But I needed a good grade. I needed it desperately. 

What should I do? 


6 



3 


I found my friends at our usual table in the corner of the lunchroom. I dropped 
my 

tray down with a sigh, and spilled half my drink. 

“Greg—what’s your problem?” Bird looked up from his sandwich. He had egg 
salad all over his chin and cheeks. 

“Are you eating that sandwich or wearing it?” Shari asked him. 

“Excuse me?” Bird didn’t understand. 

Michael inflated his brown paper sandwich bag and popped it between his 
hands. 

Then he crushed his chocolate milk carton flat. He always gulps his milk down 
first, 

then crushes the carton. We’re not sure why. 

Michael is a little weird. 

I dropped into my chair. I didn’t start to eat. I didn’t even look at my food tray. I 
just stared at the wall until the tiles became a green blur. 

“What’s your problem?” Bird repeated. Now he had egg salad on his forehead, 
too! I don’t know how he does it. 

Bird’s real name is Doug Arthur. But he looks so much like a bird, everyone 
calls 

him Bird. Even his parents. 

He has small, birdlike brown eyes, close together over a long, beak-shaped nose. 



And he has a short tuft of feathery brown hair on top of his head. He’s tall and 
thin 

and sort of bobs up and down like a flamingo when he walks. 

Michael poked a finger through his sandwich. He always makes a hole in the 
center of his sandwich and eats it inside out. “Bad day, Greg?” 

“For sure,” I muttered. I sighed again. 

Shari wore a pale blue T-shirt over faded jeans. She tossed back her black hair. 

She was busy pulling the bright red pepperoni off her pizza slice. “Come on, 
Greg. 

Spill,” she urged without looking up. 

I took a deep breath. Then I told them what had happened to me in English class. 
Bird dropped his sandwich onto the table. “Sourball didn’t believe you?” he 
cried. He slapped his forehead. When he pulled his hand away, his fingers were 
smeared with egg salad. 

“Well, we could all go tell him it’s true,” Shari suggested. 

I shook my head. “He won’t believe you, either,” I moaned. 

“But we all saw it!” Michael protested. “We all know it’s true.” 

“Yeah. It’s four against one,” Bird added. He was wiping egg salad off the front 
of his shirt. “He’ll have to believe us.” 

“He won’t,” I sighed. “You know Sourball. He said I have to bring in the camera 


and prove to him that it’s evil.” 



“But you can ’t!” Michael and Shari cried together. 

7 

I glanced over their shoulders. Brian and Donny were grinning at me from the 

next table. Brian and Donny are the two biggest guys at Pitts Landing Middle 
School. 

We call them Sumo One and Sumo Two—because they’re both shaped a little 
like 

sumo wrestlers. 

Of course, no one has ever called them Sumo One or Sumo Two to their faces. 

When Donny and Brian get angry, they sit on kids and squash them like bugs. 

And now, they had followed me from Mr. Saur’s class and were grinning at me 

from the next table. When they saw me watching, they formed little square 
cameras 

with their fingers and raised them in front of their eyes. 

“Click! Click!” Brian called. “I’ve got an evil camera here!” 

“Say cheese!” Donny shouted. “Say cheese—and die! Ha-ha-ha!” 

“Click. Click. Click.” They clicked their air cameras. 

“Watch the birdie!” Donny cried. 

“Watch the birdbrain!” Brian yelled. 

They both tossed back their heads and laughed like lunatics, slapping each other 
high fives. 

“Funny, guys,” I said, rolling my eyes. “Real funny.” 



“You two should do stand-up,” Michael told them. “You should stand up in the 
corner!” 

No one laughed. No one ever laughs at Michael’s jokes. His jokes are never 
funny. In fact, they are embarrassing. 

Michael has short red hair, blue eyes, and a face full of freckles. He isn’t exactly 
fat—but no one would ever call him skinny. 

One of these days, he’s going to surprise us and make a joke that isn’t totally 
lame. 

But I was in no mood for jokes, anyway. My summer was about to be ruined. 
My 

three friends all had plans to go away. No way I wanted to be left all alone in 
Pitts 

Landing with nothing to do for three months! 

If I had to bring in that camera to prove to Mr. Saur that I was telling the truth... 
I’d do it! 

Shari must have read my thoughts. She reached across the table and grabbed my 
arm. “Greg—you can’t,” she said. “That camera is too dangerous.” 

Bird agreed. “I’m not going back to that weird house,” he said, shaking his head. 
“Never again.” 

“Hey—what about your brother?” Michael asked me. 

I turned to him, confused. “What about my brother?” 



“Isn’t he working in a camera store?” Michael demanded. 

I nodded. My older brother, Terry, was working at Kramer’s Photo Store after 
school. “Yeah. He’s at Kramer’s. He works in the developing lab. So what?” 
“Maybe Terry could borrow an old camera from the store,” Michael suggested. 
“You can bring it in and tell Mr. Saur it’s the evil camera.” 

“Just one problem,” I told Michael. “I have to prove the camera is evil. How do I 
do that?” 

Michael thought about it. And thought. 

8 

“It won’t work,” I sighed. “We have to go get the real camera.” I glanced around 
the table. “Who will go with me?” 

No one answered. Bird concentrated on getting the egg salad out from under his 

fingernails. Shari twisted a lock of black hair around one finger. Michael stared 
at the 

floor. 

“Don’t all volunteer at once,” I grumbled. 

They still didn’t move. 

“I just need the camera for one day,” I added. “Then we’ll return it and never 
take 

it out again.” 

No one replied. Bird raised his beady little eyes to the ceiling and started 



whistling to himself. 

I sneered at them. “Okay, wimps. I’ll go by myself.” 

“Don’t do it,” Shari warned again. “Not even for a day. Something horrible will 
happen. I know it will.” 

If only I had listened to her. 

9 



4 


The rest of the afternoon, I barely heard a word anyone said. I think I had a 
spelling 

quiz. I think we played volleyball in gym. I think someone slammed the ball 
onto my 

head. 

Did it hurt? Did I have to leave the game for a while? 

I really don’t remember. 

In music class, Miss Jakes caught me staring out the window, a dazed look on 
my 

face. She thought it was because of the volleyball accident. She wanted to send 
me to 

the nurse. 

But I explained that I was okay. I told her I wasn’t hurt—I was only 
daydreaming. 

I didn’t explain that I was thinking hard. Thinking about that evil camera hidden 
away in the Coffman house. 

Thinking about how I was going to sneak out after dinner. Ride my bike up the 
hill to the deserted old house. Creep down to the basement—and pull the camera 
from its hiding place in the wall. 

I’m going to prove the camera is evil, Sourball. I’m going to prove you’re wrong 
and unfair! I thought bitterly. 



I’m going to prove it to Brian and Donny and all the other kids who laughed at 
my story. 

I’m going to get an A for my report. Not an F. 

I thought about all that. And I thought about Shari, Michael, and Bird. 

I didn’t blame my friends for being scared. I was scared, too. I promised myself 
I’d be really careful. 

I’ll bring it to school. But I won’t take anyone’s picture with it, I decided. 

Then how would I prove to Mr. Saur that the camera is evil? 

I thought hard. I’ll take a snapshot of the empty classroom, I decided. Or maybe 
the lunchroom or the gym when no one is there. 

As soon as Mr. Saur changes my grade to an A, I’ll return the camera, I promised 
myself. I’ll shove it back into its hiding place. And I’ll never take it out again. 
After school, I searched for Shari. She lives next door, so we usually walk home 
together. But I didn’t see her anywhere. 

I crossed the street, kicking a bottle cap I found at the curb. Thinking about my 
plan. Thinking about the camera. 

I had walked about half a block when I heard voices behind me. “Greg! Hey— 
Greg!” 

Two hands grabbed my shoulders and spun me around hard. 


Brian Webb! 



10 


“Greg—Donny and I went to the Coffman house!” he exclaimed, grinning, 
holding me in place. “We found the evil camera!” 

“Say cheese!” Donny cried. 

He pointed the camera and flashed it in my face. 

11 



5 


I uttered a hoarse cry. 

And shut my eyes against the white flash. 

Something horrible is going to happen to me now, I realized. 

The picture is going to show me in pain. In agony. In terrible trouble. And then 
it’s going to come true! 

When I opened my eyes, Brian and Donny were laughing. They slapped each 
other a high five. 

I stared at the camera in Donny’s hand. 

A yellow cardboard camera. One of those cheap throwaway cameras. 

Not the evil camera. Not the old camera from the Coffman house. 

“Good joke, guys!” I said sarcastically. I blinked several times, trying to make 
the 

yellow dots disappear. “You guys are a riot.” 

“You’re the funny one!” Brian shot back. “That was such a funny story you told 
in class!” 

“Yeah. It had us all laughing,” Donny chimed in. 

I stared angrily at them. My heart thumped loudly. Sumo One and Sumo Two. 
They were so big, they nearly blocked out the sunlight! 

I knew they wanted to keep on teasing me. Have some more laughs at my 



expense. Maybe get into a fight. 

But I didn’t have time to fight with them. 

“Maybe you won’t be laughing tomorrow,” I murmured. Then I turned, jogged 
across the street, and headed for home. 

At dinner, I stared down at my plate. I was too nervous to eat. My stomach felt 
as if it 

were tied in a tight knot. 

“Pass the potatoes,” my brother, Terry, said with a mouth full of chicken. 

“It’s not potatoes. It’s turnips,” Mom corrected him. 

Terry shrugged. “Whatever.” He scooped a pile onto his plate and began 
spooning them quickly into his mouth. 

“Slow down, Terry,” Dad scolded. “You’re eating so fast, you don’t know what 
you’re eating!” 

“Sure, I do,” Terry protested. “I’m eating dinner!” 

Mom and Dad laughed. 

Terry looks a lot like me—blond hair, green eyes, kind of a goofy smile. We 
could almost be twins, except that he’s sixteen, four years older than me. 

“Why are you in such a hurry?” Mom asked him. 

12 

Terry burped. “Excuse me.” He licked chicken grease off his fingers. “I have to 
get back to work. A lot of special orders came in today. So I promised Mr. 



Kramer 


I’d put in a few extra hours in the developing lab.” 

“You’re learning a lot about photography—aren’t you?” Dad said. 

“Yeah. A lot.” 

Oh, please! I thought. Please don’t talk about photography! 

I knew that soon after dinner, I’d be sneaking out to that creepy old deserted 
house. I didn’t want to think about cameras or photography. 

Terry’s chair scraped the floor as he jumped to his feet. He tossed his greasy 
napkin onto the table. “Got to run. See you later.” He loped to the door. 

“Don’t you have any homework tonight?” Mom called after him. 

“No,” he shouted from the front hall. “They don’t give homework in high 
school!” The front door slammed behind him. 

“What a comedian,” Dad muttered, shaking his head. 

They both suddenly remembered that I was at the table, too. “Greg—you haven’t 
touched your chicken!” Mom said, staring at my full plate. 

“I ate too much junk after school,” I lied. “I’m not too hungry.” 

“Your mom and I are going over to Alana’s after dinner,” Dad told me. Alana is 
Mom’s sister. “Alana still isn’t feeling well. Do you want to come with us?” 
“Uh... no,” I replied, thinking hard. “I’ve got too much homework. I’m going to 


be studying all night.” 



I don’t like to lie to Mom and Dad—if I can help it. 

Tonight I couldn’t help it. 

“How are your grades this semester?” Mom asked. 

“Yes, how are they?” Dad repeated, leaning closer. “Pete and Alice out in 

Yosemite called me this afternoon. They asked if you are coming to visit them 
this 

summer. I told them we’d know as soon as your next report card arrives.” 

“Uh... I’m doing real well,” I told them, staring down at my chicken and turnips. 
I’ll be doing real well after tomorrow, I thought. My stomach knotted even 
tighter. 

Mom and Dad stood up to clear the table. “Pete and Alice said to be sure to bring 
a camera,” Dad said. “It’s such beautiful country out there.” 

“Maybe Terry can get you a good camera at the store,” Mom suggested. 

Please stop talking about cameras! I thought, gritting my teeth. “Maybe he can,” 
I said. 

I waited till Mom and Dad drove off for Alana’s house. Then I waited ten 
minutes 

more. Sometimes they forget something, turn around, and come back home. 

I peered out the window. Under the white moonlight, the bare trees were bending 
and shaking. A breezy night. Still cold even though spring was only a few weeks 


away. 



I pulled a long-sleeved flannel shirt over my T-shirt. Tucked a pocket flashlight 
into my jeans. And headed out to the garage to get my bike. 

The swirling wind felt heavy and wet. I glanced up at the sky, hoping it wasn’t 
getting ready to rain. A pale half-moon floated over the quivering trees. 

13 

The front tire on my bike was a little low. But I guessed I could make it up the 

hill to the Coffman house. I walked the bike out of the garage, then climbed on. 

I’d left all the lights on in the house. From the driveway, it looked so bright and 

warm and safe. For a moment, I was tempted to go back inside and forget about 
the 

evil camera. 

But my mind was made up. I desperately wanted to visit my cousins this 
summer. 

No way I could do that if I got an F from Mr. Saur on my report. 

I took a deep breath. Clicked on the bike headlight. And pedaled down to the 
street. 

It was lucky that Mom and Dad had to go away, I told myself. At least I didn’t 
have to sneak out of the house. 

“That’s it, Greg,” I said out loud, pedaling harder. “Look on the bright side.” 

The street seemed darker than usual. Glancing up, I saw that two streetlights 
were 


out. 



The wind swept toward me. On both sides, the trees appeared to be shivering. I 

swerved to miss a sheet of old newspaper fluttering across the street. 

I shifted gears as the street sloped uphill. I pictured the ramshackle old Coffman 

house. Hidden behind ancient oak trees at the top of a weed-choked lawn. 

I remembered that it stood three stories tall, gray shingle, with a wraparound 

screened porch, a sloping red roof, and tall chimneys on either end. 

Many years ago, it must have been a really fancy house. But no one had lived in 

it for dozens of years. And the house had crumbled and decayed until it looked 
like a 

wreck. 

I crossed a street, pedaling smoothly and steadily uphill. Familiar houses rolled 
past in the darkness. And then a small wooded area. 

I felt my throat tighten. And my hands grow cold. 

The house—the Coffman house—stood just beyond the woods. 

The tree branches swayed, glowing gray—the color of bone—under the cold 
moonlight. 

I squeezed the brake as I rolled past the woods. 

Past the sloping lawn. Past the ancient oak trees. 

Up to the old house—and gasped in shock. 


14 



6 


The house was gone. 

I jumped off my bike and let it fall to the sidewalk. I uttered a low cry of 
surprise. 

Then I blinked several times. Tried to make the big, old house appear where it 
belonged behind the oak trees. 

But no. 

The trees rose up over the lawn, silvery-gray in the moonlight. Now they 
protected only scattered piles of boards and shingles. 

The house had been torn down. 

Totaled. 

Dazed, I stood at the curb, staring up to where the house should be. Staring hard. 
Trying to force it to come back. 

A minute or two later, I felt a stab of pain—and slapped a mosquito on my 

forehead. It’s too early in the spring for mosquitoes, I thought. I felt wet blood 
on my 

forehead. 

Rubbing the bite, I turned to the gravel driveway. And saw a stenciled sign near 
the street: SOLD. 

So the Coffman house had been sold. 

And the new owner tore it down. 



I rubbed the mosquito bite, thinking hard. The house was gone. But what about 
the basement? 

What about the basement workshop? I remembered it so well. I remembered the 
worktable. And I remembered the hiding place in the wall above it. The small 
compartment where the camera lay hidden away. 

What about the basement? 

Before I even realized it, my feet were carrying me up the hill. My sneakers slid 
over the slick, tall grass. I inhaled the fresh dew. I kept my eyes locked on the 
trembling silver trees. 

I stepped around a pile of rusted nails and bolts. Jumped over a low stack of 

rotted shingles. Shingles that had been pulled off the house. 

Halfway up the lawn, I could see what else was left of the house. Wooden doors 

stacked in a high pile. Broken glass over the ground. Window frames leaning 
against 

a wall of rotting boards. Cracked shingles everywhere. A white sink on its side 
against a tree. An old washtub resting beside it. 

But what about the basement? 

I crept closer. My legs suddenly felt heavy. My whole body felt heavy—as if 
some invisible force were pushing me back, pushing me away. 

15 

A deep shadow ran along the ground behind the round, old oaks. At first glance, 



I 

thought I was staring at a pool of water. A small lake. 

But as I made my way closer, I saw that the deep shadow was a hole. A huge, 
square pit in the ground. 

The basement. 

Nothing but a hole now. 

I stopped at the edge, my body feeling even heavier. Heavy with disappointment. 
I stopped and stared down into the deep hole. 

The trees shut out most of the moonlight. With a trembling hand, I pulled out my 

pocket flashlight and clicked it on. I aimed the narrow beam of yellow light into 
the 

hole. 

Empty down there. The light slid over the dirt. On one side, thick tree roots 
poked 

into the open square. 

I ran the light over the pit walls. Tangles of roots spread over the smooth, black 
dirt. 

Nothing left. The basement had been completely cleared out. Even the concrete 
floor had been broken up and carted away. 

And where was the camera? 


Where? 



Had someone found it? Pulled it out and kept it? 

Or had it been crushed when the workers smashed the concrete? Crushed and 
destroyed forever? 

I moved the beam of light back and forth along the far wall. I’m not sure what I 
expected to see. 

Did I think I’d find the camera hidden in its square hole in the pit wall? Did I 
think I would see it in a corner of the muddy floor? 

The light swept over dirt and knots of tree roots. 

Nothing else. 

I clicked off the flashlight and shoved it into my pocket. 

I turned away from the hole, side-stepping a pile of broken shingles. 

A strong gust of wind made the old trees groan and creak. I barely noticed the 
eerie sounds. 

I’m going to get an F, I thought unhappily. 

The camera is gone forever, and I’m going to get an F. 

My summer is ruined. And the other kids in class will never believe me. They 
will laugh at me and click cameras at me forever. 

I let out a long, glum sigh. 

Angrily, I kicked a broken board out of my path and started down the lawn to my 


bike. 



I had taken four or five steps when a shrill voice yelled, “Caught you! You’re not 


going anywhere!” 
16 



7 


The high voice in the night air startled me. Without thinking, I started to run. 
Then 

stopped. 

I spun around, my heart heaving against my chest. 

And saw a boy. About my age. He had picked up a board from the ground and 
held it high, as if ready to swing it. 

He wore a black sweatshirt over faded jeans, holes in both knees. His dark hair 
was cut very short. He glared at me with dark, tense eyes. 

“Dad—I caught him!” he shouted. He had a high, shrill voice that made him 
sound like a little kid. 

“Whoa. What do you mean?” I cried. “Caught me?” 

“Don’t move,” he ordered me, raising the board higher. He took a step closer. 
Then another. His eyes burned hard into mine. 

“I wasn’t doing anything!” I told him. “I—I was just looking.” 

As he stepped up to me, I saw his expression change. The anger faded from his 
eyes. His mouth slid open. 

“You—you’re not him!” he stammered. 

“Huh? Who?” I cried. “I’m not who?” 

“Hey—I’m sorry,” he said, shaking his head. “I thought you were someone 
else.” 



“Well... I’m not someone else!” I replied. “I’m me.” 

“There’s a kid who lives down the block,” the boy explained, scratching his dark 

crew cut. “He’s been sneaking over here at night and stealing stuff from the 
yard.” 

My eyes wandered over the cluttered lawn. “What was he stealing? There isn’t 
much left.” 

The boy nodded. He tossed away the board he planned to use as a weapon. It 
clattered against a pile of boards beside me. “He was taking lumber and stuff. I 
thought you were him.” 

“Did your family buy the Coffman house?” I asked. Even though it was such a 

cool, windy night, my forehead was all sweaty. I reached up and mopped the 
sweat 

with the back of my hand. 

“Yeah. We bought it,” he replied. “But Dad said the house was too wrecked to 
fix 

up. So he had it torn down. We’re going to build a new house.” 

The wind made the trees creak again. I glanced down to the street and saw the 
back wheel of my bike spinning. 

“People told us the Coffman house was haunted,” the boy said. “So I’m glad 
Dad 

tore it down.” He kicked at a shingle on the ground. “My name is Jon. What’s 
yours?” 



“Greg. I—I live down at the bottom of the hill. A few blocks past the school.” 

17 

I gazed to where the house had stood. “My friends and I used to sneak into the 
old house,” I told him. “You know. Just for fun. For excitement. I think it was 
haunted. Really.” 

He narrowed his eyes at me, studying me. “What were you doing here?” he 
demanded. “Why did you come up here tonight?” 

I decided to tell him the truth. “I was looking for something,” I said. “A camera.” 
He scratched his short hair again. “An old camera?” 

“Yes!” I cried excitedly. “An old camera. It was hidden down in the basement. 
Did you see it?” 

“Yeah,” Jon replied. “The men dug it up when they pulled out the basement.” 
“Oh, wow!” I cried. I couldn’t hide my excitement. “Where is it, Jon? I mean— 
what did they do with it? Do you know where it is?” 

He pointed over my shoulder toward the street. “Probably over there,” he said. “I 
don’t think they emptied it yet.” 

I spun around and saw a big Dumpster on the other side of the driveway. “They 
threw it in there?” I demanded. 

I didn’t wait for him to answer. I started running full speed through the tall 
weeds 

to the street. I stopped in front of the big steel Dumpster. I could see all kinds of 



junk 

piled over the top. 

“Is it okay to look for it?” I called back to Jon. 

He came walking slowly down to me, hands shoved in his pockets. “Sure. Go 
ahead. Why do you want a stupid old camera, anyway?” 

I didn’t answer him. No time for answering questions. 

I lifted both hands to the top of the Dumpster. It was pretty high. It took me three 
tries to pull myself up and in. 

A street lamp across the street cast a glow of dim yellow light over the 
Dumpster. 

My eyes wandered quickly over the trash. All stuff from the basement, I 
realized. 

I saw rusted old tools from the workshop. Part of an ancient vacuum cleaner. The 
spin cylinder from a dryer. Old clothes. Torn suitcases. 

Is it here? I asked myself. Is the camera in here? 

I pulled away a broken suitcase and tossed it aside. I grabbed stacks of old 
magazines and shoved them out of the way. 

I’m going to search every inch of this Dumpster till I find it, I told myself. 

I pulled away a torn section of a garden hose. Then I pawed through a pile of old 
clothes. 


Where is it? Where? 



I dropped onto my hands and knees and dug deeper into the garbage. The stale 

odor of dust and decay floated up to me, swept over me. I held my breath and 
kept 

pawing away. 

I had to find it. I had to. 

I didn’t stop until I saw the two eyes staring up at me. 

Two eyes. Yellow in the pale light. 

Staring up at me from the trash. Staring up at me without blinking. 

I’m not alone in here! I realized. 

And then I opened my mouth in a shrill, terrified scream. 

18 


19 



8 


The eyes stared up at me without blinking. Yellow and cold. 

A chill tightened the back of my neck. 

I stared down at them, waiting for them to move. Waiting for something to jump 
up at me. 

“What’s wrong? Did you find the camera?” Jon called from the sidewalk. 

“No. I—uh—I—” 

I reached my hand down toward the glassy yellow eyes. And felt bristly fur. 

My heart pounding, I pushed some junk aside. 

And without thinking, I picked up the staring creature. 

Felt its body, stiff and hard beneath bristly brown and black fur. 

A dead raccoon. 

Its sour odor reached my nostrils. “Oooooh, yuck!” I let out a groan—and 
heaved 

the smelly creature out of the Dumpster. 

“Hey, Greg—” Jon called up to me. 

“I found a dead raccoon,” I told him, holding my nose. “It smelled so bad, I—” 

I stopped when I saw the camera. 

It had been hidden beneath the raccoon’s body. The glow from the street lamp 

spilled over it. The glass of the camera lens reflected the light like a single, 
shining 



eye. 


I grabbed it. Pulled it up from the trash. 

Then I climbed to my feet. Leaning over the Dumpster, I held it up to Jon. “I 
found it!” I cried happily. “Here it is. I can’t believe I found it!” 

Jon wrinkled his face up at me. “Great,” he said, without enthusiasm. 

I strapped the camera around my neck. Then, holding on to the top of the 
Dumpster, I lowered myself to the ground. 

My shirt and jeans were covered with dust and sticky grease. But I didn’t care. I 
had the camera in my hands. 

“What’s so great about it?” Jon demanded. He squinted down at it. Rubbed a 
hand over the top. “Does it work?” 

I didn’t want to tell him the story of the camera. I knew he wouldn’t believe it, 

anyway. I didn’t want to scare him. And mainly, I wanted to get home with it as 
fast 

as I could. 

“Yeah. It works,” I replied, dusting off the back with my hand. “It takes pretty 
good pictures.” 

“But why do you want it so much?” Jon asked, studying it as I worked to clean 
the dust off. 

20 

“Oh... well. I promised to show it to someone. In school,” I told him. “I kind of 



need it for a project.” 

Jon scratched his short, dark hair. “Maybe I should show the camera to my dad,” 
he said, motioning behind him. “He might not want you to take it.” 

“But you threw it in the trash!” I cried. I held the camera tightly in both hands, 
afraid he was going to try to grab it away. 

“But we didn’t know it works,” Jon replied in his high, shrill voice. “Is it 
valuable? Maybe it’s valuable. An antique or something.” 

“No way. It’s not valuable,” I insisted. “Please, Jon. I—” 

“We’d better show it to Dad,” Jon said. He reached for the camera. 

I pulled away. 

I grabbed the camera tighter. 

Heard a click. 

A white flash of light startled us both. 

“Oh, noooo!” I let out a cry, realizing I had pushed the shutter. 

And snapped a picture of Jon. 


21 



9 


“Hey—why did you do that?” Jon demanded. 

“It—it was an accident,” I stammered. I pulled the picture from the slot at the 
bottom of the camera. “I didn’t mean to. Really.” 

Jon and I both blinked several times, trying to get the flashing lights to fade from 

our eyes. “It’s an instant camera?” Jon demanded. “It looks too old to be an 
instant 

camera.” 

“Yeah. I know,” I replied. I held up the photo to watch it develop. Silently, I 

prayed that the photo wouldn’t show anything terrible. 

Please, please—let Jon be okay in the snapshot, I pleaded. 

With my free hand, I pulled the little flashlight from my pocket. I beamed it 
down 

on the photo as it slowly developed. 

As I stared at the small, square snapshot, I could see Jon’s face come into view. 
His eyes were closed. His mouth was open, twisted in a strange expression. 
Before I could really see what was going on, Jon grabbed the photo away from 
me. He raised it close to his face and studied it. 

“Hey—what’s with this camera?” he demanded. 

I stepped up behind him to see the snapshot. “Oh, nooooo,” I groaned. 

The photo came out very clear and bright. It showed Jon howling in pain. His 



eyes shut. His mouth open in a scream. 

His leg was raised. He was holding on to his sneaker with both hands. 

He was holding on to his sneaker because a huge nail was sticking up from the 

top. An enormous carpenter’s nail—nearly as big as a pencil—shoved up 
through the 

center of Jon’s foot! 

Jon laughed. He turned to me. “What is this? Some kind of joke camera?” 

I swallowed hard. I knew it wasn’t a joke. 

The horrifying photos always came true. 

How could I keep Jon from having a nail jammed in his foot? What could I do? 

I decided I had to warn him. I had to tell him the truth about the camera. 

“This is cool!” Jon exclaimed, studying the photo. “It really looks like me. I 
wonder how it works.” 

“It—it isn’t cool,” I stammered. “It’s really kind of scary, Jon. The camera is 
evil. 

It has a curse on it. The photos always come true.” 

He laughed. “For sure!” 

I knew he wouldn’t believe me. 

“Well, just be careful—okay?” I insisted. “The photo isn’t a joke.” 

He laughed again. 


22 



A gust of wind sent the tall weeds swaying. Snakes of black cloud slithered over 
the moon. Darkness swept over us. 

“I need to borrow the camera,” I told Jon. “Just for one day.” 

“It’s such a cool camera,” he replied. “I don’t know. Maybe I should take it 
home.” 

“I’ll bring it back tomorrow afternoon,” I promised. “I just have to take it to 
school.” 

He twisted his mouth, thinking hard. “I’d better ask my dad.” He pointed to a 

wall of lumber under the trees. “He’s back there with the architect, talking about 
the 

new house.” 

“No. Wait!” I cried. 

But Jon took off, running up the hill through the swaying weeds. 

I started after him—but stopped when I heard a shrill bleat. And then Jon’s 
horrifying roar of pain soared out over the lawn. 


23 



10 


My breath caught in my chest. I stumbled forward through the weeds. 

And saw Jon holding his sneaker, his face twisted in pain. 

Even in the dim moonlight, I could see the huge nail pushing up through his 
foot. 

“Jon!” I shouted. “I’ll get your dad!” 

I didn’t need to find him. Two men—one tall and thin, the other chubby and 

short—rushed out from behind the lumber pile. I guessed they were the architect 
and 

Jon’s dad. 

“Jon? What’s wrong?” the chubby one—Jon’s dad—called. 

Jon tossed back his head in another scream of pain. 

“He’s got a nail in his foot!” I shouted, running up to them, pointing frantically. 

Both men ran past me. “Oh, good heavens!” Jon’s dad moaned. 

They grabbed Jon under the arms. The tall man held Jon’s injured foot above the 

ground. “Into my car,” he urged. “I have a towel. We can wrap the foot. He’s 
losing a 

lot of blood.” 

“Should we pull out the nail?” Jon’s dad asked in a quivering voice. 

“No. Too dangerous,” the other man replied. 

“Don’t pull it out! Don’t!” Jon pleaded. “It’ll hurt too much!” 



“We can’t even take off the sneaker!” Jon’s dad cried. 


“The hospital is that way,” the architect said, pointing. “Only a few minutes 
away.” 

“Owwww. It hurts! It hurrrrts!” Jon wailed. 

The two men lifted him off the ground. And half-walking, half-running, they 

carried him down to a car parked across from the Dumpster. 

I watched from the weeds as they gently lowered Jon into the backseat. I saw 

them struggle with a long white towel. Finally, they had it tightly wrapped 
around the 

foot and sneaker. 

They closed Jon’s car door. Then they quickly slid into the front. A few seconds 
later, the car roared off into the darkness. 

I stood in the middle of the yard, feeling the swaying weeds brush against my 
jeans legs. I swallowed hard. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. 

“Poor Jon,” I murmured out loud. 

The camera was as evil as ever. Tonight it had found another victim. 

It’s all my fault, I thought sadly. It was an accident. I didn’t mean to press the 
shutter. But I pressed it. 

The two men hadn’t even looked at me. They were so upset about Jon, I don’t 
think they saw me. 


24 



I glanced down and realized that I still gripped the camera in my hands. I had a 

strong urge to heave it to the ground. To stomp on it again and again until I 
smashed 

it forever. 

My eye caught something fluttering in the tall grass. I bent and picked it up. The 
snapshot. 

I squinted once again at Jon, holding his foot, shrieking in pain. 

I tucked the snapshot into the pocket of my flannel shirt. I’ll bring it in to Mr. 
Saur, I decided. I’ll bring in the camera and the photo of Jon. I’ll tell him exactly 
what happened to Jon tonight. 

I won’t have to snap a picture in school. 

I have this picture as proof. 

So it won’t be dangerous. It won’t be dangerous at all. 


25 



11 


The next morning, I gulped down my breakfast. Then I pulled on my backpack, 
strapped the camera around my neck, and hurried out the door. 

I left the house fifteen minutes early. I didn’t want to run into Shari, or Michael, 
or Bird. 

I stepped out into a warm day. The air smelled fresh and sweet. I saw a row of 
tulips poking up through the ground along the side of the house. First flowers of 
spring. 

I loped down the driveway and turned at the sidewalk. The camera felt heavy 
against my chest. I reached up to adjust the strap—and heard a voice calling me. 
“Greg! Hey, Greg—wait up!” 

Shari. 

I spun the camera behind me and tried to hide it under my arm. 

Too late. She had already spotted it. 

“I don’t believe you!” Shari cried, running up beside me. “You’re unreal! You 

pulled that thing from the Coffman house?” She stared at the camera, shaking 
her 

head. 

“Well... not exactly,” I replied. “How come you’re so early, Shari?” 

“I was watching out the window for you,” she confessed. “I wanted to see if you 



were crazy enough to get that camera.” 

I frowned at her. “You were spying on me? Why?” 

“Because I’m not letting you take that evil thing to school.” She stepped in front 
of me, blocking my way. 

I snickered. “Who made you queen of the world?” I sneered. “It’s a free country, 
you know.” 

She crossed her arms over the front of her plaid vest. “I’m serious, Greg. You 
can’t take it. I won’t let you.” 

I faked to the left and tried to edge past her on the right. 

But she stayed in front of me. I bumped into her—then backed up a step. 

“I’m serious,” she repeated. “Take the camera home.” 

“Shari, you’re being a real jerk,” I muttered. “You can’t tell me what to do.” 

Her expression changed. She uncrossed her arms and tugged her black hair back 

over her shoulders. “Don’t you remember how dangerous that camera is? Don’t 
you 

remember all the horrible things it did to us?” 

I gripped the camera in both hands. It suddenly felt very heavy. The metal felt 
cold against the front of my T-shirt. 

26 

“Don’t you remember, Greg?” Shari pleaded. “I disappeared because of that 
camera. Disappeared into thin air! You don’t want that to happen to someone 



else— 


do you? Think how terrible you’d feel.” 

I swallowed hard, remembering the night before. 

The camera had already injured someone. 

“I’m not going to take any pictures,” I told her. “Really. I’m just going to show it 
to Mr. Saur so he’ll change my grade.” 

“Why will seeing an old camera make him change your grade?” Shari 
demanded. 

“Because I have a photo to show him, too,” I declared. I pulled the snapshot of 
Jon out of my pocket and flashed it in front of her face. 

“Oooh—gross!” she cried, shoving the photo away with both hands. “That is 
sick!” 

“I know,” I agreed, sliding the photo back in my pocket. “The poor kid. I took 
this picture. Then, a minute later, it really happened to him.” 

“So I’m right!” Shari declared, her eyes narrowed at the camera in my hands. 
“You just proved my point—didn’t you, Greg! I’m right!” 

A car rumbled past, filled with kids on their way to school. A small brown dog 
stuck its head out the back window and barked at us. 

I glanced at my watch. If we stayed here arguing another few minutes, Shari and 

I 


would be late for school. 



“We’ve got to go,” I told her. I started walking, taking long strides. But she 
hurried to block my way. 

“No, Greg. I can’t let you. I can’t.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Shari, give me a break.” 

“It’s too dangerous,” she insisted. “I know I’m right. I know it will get you into 
big trouble.” 

“Get out of my way, Shari.” 

“Give me the camera.” 

“No way!” I cried. 

She grabbed for it with both hands. And yanked it off my shoulder. 

I grabbed it back. 

And the camera flashed in Shari’s face. 


27 



12 


Shari blinked. Her hands shot away from the camera. She let out a startled cry. 
“Oh! Sorry!” I cried, backing away. “Sorry! Really! I’m sorry! I didn’t mean to 


The camera felt warm in my hands. I reached for the square photo that slid from 
the slot. 

“Give me that!” Shari demanded. She swiped the snapshot away from me. 
“What 

have you done to me?” 

“It was an accident!” I shouted. “You know I didn’t mean to snap it.” 

Shari stared down at the square as it started to develop. “What have you done? 

What have you done?” she repeated. Her voice trembled more each time she said 
it. I 

saw that her hand was shaking. 

“I told you not to bring out the camera,” Shari cried. “I begged you to leave it at 
home.” 

“Shari, I’m sorry,” I apologized again. “Maybe it won’t be so bad. Maybe—” 

She swallowed hard. “Maybe I’ll disappear again, Greg. Maybe I’ll disappear 
forever.” 


“No!” I cried. “Don’t say that. Please 



We both stared down at the photo. It developed so slowly. First, the yellow 
darkened over the white square. I began to see Shari’s face. 

Was she screaming? Was she howling in pain? 

I couldn’t tell. 

The blue tint filled in over the yellow. I could see Shari’s face outlined in green. 
“You look okay,” I told her. “I think you’re okay.” 

“Wait,” she said softly. She bit her lower lip. She didn’t blink. Her eyes squinted 
hard as the red and blue tints spread. 

The picture darkened. Darkened to black. 

I could see Shari’s face clearly now. She wasn’t smiling. She didn’t look happy. 
But she wasn’t screaming, either. 

Darker. 

“Hey!” Shari cried. “It’s a negative.” 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand. 

“It’s not a photo,” Shari replied, holding the square up to me. “It’s a negative. 

The photo didn’t come out. It’s all reversed.” 

I stared at it. She was right. Everything was reversed. 

“Maybe the camera is broken,” I said. I let out a long sigh of relief. “You’re 
okay, 

Shari. The camera doesn’t work.” 


28 



“Maybe,” she said. She handed me the negative. I slid it into my pocket. When I 
looked up, she had a strange smile on her face. 

An evil smile. 

“Shari—what’s your problem?” I asked. 

I should have known. I should have guessed what she planned to do. I should 
have moved faster. 

She grabbed the camera with both hands. Spun it around. Pointed it in my face. 
And flashed a picture. 

“Hey!” I tried to duck away from the lens. 

Too late. She caught me. 

“Shari—that’s not funny!” I cried. 

“It won’t hurt you,” she replied. “The camera is broken—remember?” 

I pulled the square from the slot in front of the camera. 

My throat suddenly felt dry. Is it broken? I wondered. Will this one be a 
negative, 

too? 

Or will it show me howling in pain with a nail through my foot—or something 
even worse? 

As I stared at the small square, my imagination ran wild. I pictured my body 

stretched out like a rubber band. I pictured myself tugging at an arrow through 
my 



chest. I pictured myself lying mashed under a huge steamroller. 

“Shari—how could you do this to me?” I groaned, watching the colors darken. 

Her dark eyes flashed. “You’re really scared,” she said. “Admit it, Greg. You’re 

really scared. Now maybe you get it. Maybe you see why I didn’t want you to 
bring 

the camera to school.” 

My hand trembled. I gripped the snapshot with both hands. 

The colors darkened. 

“It’s not a negative,” I said. 

Shari stepped up behind me and stared down at the photo. 

“Oh, noooo!” we both cried at the same time. 

Shari started to laugh. 

“I don’t believe this!” I wailed. 


29 



13 

“This is horrible !” I shrieked. 

I recognized my face. But I didn’t recognize my body. 

At first, I thought my head was resting on top of a giant balloon. Then I realized 
that the giant balloon was me. 

In the photo, I weighed about four hundred pounds! 

No joke. Four hundred pounds! 

I gaped at the photo, studying my round face and my even rounder body. I had 

about eight chins. My cheeks were puffed way out. The collar of my T-shirt was 

hidden under one of my flabby chins. The shirt was stretched tight over my chest 
and 

only came down to my belly, which bulged nearly to the ground. 

I looked like a really gross mountain of pudding! 

“Stop laughing!” I snapped at Shari. “It isn’t funny!” 

“It’s very funny,” she insisted. She grabbed the photo, raised it to her face, and 

started laughing all over again. “You’re bigger than Sumo One and Sumo Two!” 
she 

exclaimed. 

I grabbed the photo back. I stared at the folds of flab hanging down from my 
cheeks. My face was so huge and puffy, my eyes looked like tiny pig eyes. 

And my stomach! My stomach hung down over my fat knees! 



“Are you still going to bring the camera to school?” Shari asked. “You won’t 
change your mind?” 

“I have to show it to Mr. Saur,” I told her. “I’m just going to show him the 
camera. And the picture of Jon.” 

“And the picture of you?” she asked, grinning. 

“No way.” I shoved it into my jeans pocket. “I don’t want anyone to see it. 
Ever.” 

Shari glanced at her watch. “Come on,” she said. “We’d better hurry! We’re 
late.” 

She started to run down the sidewalk, and I followed her. 

All the way to school, I kept picturing my photo. Kept picturing my flabby face, 
my enormous four-hundred-pound body. 

Don’t worry about it, I told myself. 

The camera is broken. There’s nothing to worry about. 

Nothing to worry about. 

But guess what? I was worried. 

The halls were nearly empty when Shari and I arrived at school. The first bell 
had 

already rung. 

30 

I hid the camera under a bunch of stuff on the floor of my locker. I didn’t have 



Mr. Saur’s English class until just before lunch. And I didn’t want to take a 
chance of 

Brian or Donny or somebody else grabbing the camera and messing around with 
it. 

I slammed the locker shut and locked it. Then I waved to Bird and Michael, who 
were hurrying into their classroom. 

I wanted to tell them I had the camera. And I wanted to tell them about Jon and 
the nail in his foot. 

But I decided I’d better keep quiet. 

Michael and Bird agreed with Shari. They didn’t want me to take the camera out 
again. They were too afraid of it. 

And, they were probably right. 

I slid into class just as the final bell rang. I ducked low in my seat, trying not to 

be noticed. I had a long time to wait until Mr. Saur’s class. 

Today was the first day ever that I couldn’t wait for Sourball’s class to begin! 

Once again, I didn’t hear a word my other teachers said. In social studies, Mrs. 

Wackman was rattling on about bauxite production in South America. I wanted 
to 

raise my hand and ask her what bauxite is! I’ve always wondered about bauxite. 

I 

think it’s some kind of South American car. But I’m not sure. 

Her voice faded into the background. My mind was busy practicing my speech 
to 



Mr. Saur. 


“Mr. Saur,” I planned to say, “you made a terrible mistake yesterday. But I’m not 
going to hold it against you. I know you will be fair and change the grade on my 
report as soon as I show you this.” 

Whoa. 

That’s too stiff, I told myself. That doesn’t sound like me at all. I’ll never be able 
to get those words out. 

I tried a different approach. “Here’s the evil camera, Mr. Saur. And here’s a 

picture it took of a boy I met. A minute later, the picture came true. You asked 
me to 

bring in proof—and here it is.” 

That’s better, I decided. It’s straight to the point. 

Will he believe me? 

He’ll have to, I thought. Photos don’t lie. 

He’ll have to change my grade. 

I stared at the wall clock over the chalkboard. Why was it moving so slowly? 
Why? 

Finally, the bell rang. I jumped up, ran out the door, and dove for my locker. Bird 
called to me from down the hall. But I pretended I didn’t hear him. 

I pulled the camera from its hiding place and slammed the locker door shut. I 
tucked it carefully under my arm, protecting it. 



I saw Sumo One and Sumo Two across the hall. They were shoving a fifth 
grader 

up against a locker. Making him bounce back like a yo-yo. That’s their hobby. 
Making kids bounce. 

And guess who is one of their favorite bouncers? 

That’s right. Me. 

31 

I spun around and hurried the other way. I didn’t feel like bouncing today. And I 
didn’t want Brian and Donny to set their eyes on the camera. 

I took the long way around to Mr. Saur’s class, jogging the whole way. I held the 
camera snugly and practiced my speech. 

A group of kids were talking in front of the classroom, blocking the door. “Make 

way!” I cried, pushing through them. I wanted to see Mr. Saur before the bell 
rang. 

I stepped into the room. Blinked against the bright sunlight streaming through 
the 

windows. 

I turned and ran breathlessly toward Mr. Saur’s desk. 

But I stopped halfway there. 

My heart skipped a beat. And I let out a cry of dismay. 


32 



14 


“May I help you?” asked the young woman sitting behind Mr. Saur’s desk. “Are 
you 

okay?” 

I stared at her with my mouth hanging open to my knees. I didn’t answer her 
questions. I gripped the camera tightly in both hands, afraid I might drop it. 
“Where—where’s Mr. Saur?” I finally managed to choke out. 

“He’s not feeling well,” she replied, studying me. “I’m Ms. Rose. I’m 
substituting today.” 

“He—he’s not here?” I stammered in a high, shrill voice. 

She nodded. “I’ll be teaching the class today. Is there anything I can help you 
with?” 

I glanced down at the camera. “No,” I muttered unhappily. “No. You can’t help 
me.” 

The room was never this noisy when Mr. Saur sat behind the desk. Kids were 

shouting and laughing. Someone tossed a balled-up piece of paper at me. It 
bounced 

off my shoulder and onto Ms. Rose’s desk. I heard loud laughter from the back 
of the 

room. 

We always give substitutes a really hard time. 



When a teacher doesn’t show up, it’s always time to celebrate. But I didn’t feel 
like celebrating today. I was so disappointed. 

I started to my seat—then turned back to Ms. Rose. “Can I put this in my 
locker?” I asked, holding up the camera. “It will only take a second. My locker is 
right out there.” I pointed to the hall. 

The final bell rang. She held her hands over her ears. The bell was on the ceiling 
right over her desk. 

“Okay,” she said when the clanging stopped. “But hurry back. I’m going to be 
talking about the subjunctive tense today. And you don’t want to miss that.” 
Thrills and chills, huh? 

I thanked her and hurried to the door. The long hall stood empty. Everyone was 
in class. 

My sneakers thudded loudly on the hard floor. My mind was racing. Thinking 

about Mr. Saur. And about the camera. I’ll have to leave it in my locker until he 
gets 

back, I decided. 

I promised Jon I’d keep it only for one day. 

But what choice did I have? 

I turned the corner—and bumped into Brian and Donny. 

“Hey—” Brian grunted. 

“Hey—” Donny greeted. 



33 


They say “Hey” a lot. I think it’s their favorite word. 

“You guys are late,” I said, trying to hurry past them. 

But they blocked my way with their big, wide bodies. 

“Sourball isn’t here,” Donny said, grinning. “He’s sick or something. So we’ve 
got a substitute.” 

“Tell me something I don’t know,” I muttered. 

“So we’re in no hurry,” Brian said. “Why should we hurry for a substitute?” 

I tried to slip between them. But they were too quick for me. They squeezed 
together, and I bounced back off them. 

“We’re going to switch places.” Brian grinned. “I’m going to tell her I’m Donny. 
And Donny is going to say he’s me.” 

“Good joke,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “Very original. Now, can I get by?” 

“No way,” Donny said, puffing up his big chest and leaning over me menacingly. 
“You have to pay a toll if you want to pass,” Brian demanded. He stuck out his 
big paw for money. 

“How much is the toll?” I sighed. 

“How much have you got?” Brian shot back. 

They both guffawed and slapped high fives. They really think they’re funny. 
“I’ve got to get to my locker,” I insisted. 



I tried once again to push past them—and Brian grabbed the camera. 

“Hey!” I reached for it with both hands. But Brian raised it high over his head. 
“Look—Greg brought his magic camera to school,” he told Donny. 

“Oooh—I’m scared!” Donny replied sarcastically. He pretended to shiver and 
shake. 

“But the camera is bad!” Brian exclaimed, holding it out of my frantic reach. 
“It’s 

cursed, Donny! You remember Greg’s report.” 

Donny’s ugly grin grew wider. “You mean the report he got an F on?” 

They both had another good laugh. 

“Let’s check it out,” Brian declared. “Say cheese, Greg.” 

He lowered the camera to his eye and aimed it at me. 

“No—please!” I pleaded. I made another grab for the camera. 

But Donny grabbed me and pinned my arms behind my back. “Go ahead. Snap 
it,” he told Brian. “Let’s put a curse on Greg. Snap his picture.” 


34 



15 


“No—please!” I begged. 

Donny wrapped his huge paws tightly around me and pinned my arms against 
my 

back. 

“The camera really is cursed!” I protested. “You don’t know what you’re doing! 
Stop!” 

Brian ignored me, of course. He held the camera to his eye—and raised his 
finger 

over the shutter button. 

“Brian—please!” I wailed. 

I saw his finger lower over the button. 

Then a loud voice called, “What’s going on here, guys?” 

Brian cried out and nearly dropped the camera. Donny dropped my arms and 
stumbled back against the wall. 

“Mr. Grand!” I exclaimed. 

He’s the principal of Pitts Landing Middle School. Mr. Grand is young and has 

blond wavy hair and a really good tan. He looks more like a surfer than a 
principal. 

The girls in our school all have crushes on him. 

For once, I was glad to see him. 



“Where should you guys be right now?” he asked, glancing up at the clock on 
the 

wall. 

“Uh... we’re going to Mr. Saur’s class,” Donny replied, turning bright red. 

“We were just helping Greg with his camera,” Brian added. He handed the 
camera back to me. 

“That looks like a valuable old camera,” Mr. Grand said to me. “You should be 
careful with that, Greg.” 

“I’m trying,” I said. “I’m going to lock it in my locker right now.” 

I pushed past Sumo One and Sumo Two and hurried down the hall. As I reached 

my locker, I heard Mr. Grand scold them: “Get to class, guys. And don’t give 
your 

substitute a hard time—okay?” 

“Okay,” Brian promised. 

“No problem,” Donny agreed. 

I met Shari after school, and we walked home together. “What’s up?” I asked. 

“I got an A on my math test,” she announced. 

“Big surprise. You always get As in math,” I reminded her. 

“So? Maybe I like to brag.” 

I felt a little strange. Tired. Kind of weak. I stopped about half a block from my 
house and tugged off my backpack. 



35 


“What’s your problem?” Shari demanded. “Why do you keep fiddling with that 
backpack?” 

“I think someone messed with it,” I said, loosening the straps. “I had it just right. 
And now it’s too tight.” 

“Why would anyone mess with your backpack?” Shari demanded. She blew a 
bubble-gum bubble nearly as big as her head. 

I stuck out a finger and popped it. 

“Yuck!” she cried out as it stuck all over her face. “Are you impressed? That was 

my biggest one ever,” she declared. “Wish I had a picture of it.” 

“Don’t say picture,” I grumbled. “Don’t say the words picture or camera.” I had 

already told her at lunch about Mr. Saur not showing. 

“Where is the camera?” she asked, pulling gum from her hair. 

“Locked up safe in my locker,” I said. I turned and saw Michael and Bird 
mnning 

down the sidewalk toward us. 

“Did you tell Michael and Bird I have the camera?” I asked Shari. 

She shook her head. “No. They’d be too upset. After all the horrible things it did 

last summer, they never want to see that camera again. And neither do I,” she 
added, 


glaring at me. 



“Hey—what’s up?” Bird called. He slapped me on the back so hard, I stumbled 
off the curb. 

Michael laughed. “You guys doing anything?” 

“Not much,” I replied, straightening my backpack. I still couldn’t get it 
comfortable. 

“Get your bikes,” Michael urged. “Come on. It’s a great day to ride around.” 
“Sounds good,” I agreed. Anything to get my mind off Mr. Saur and that stupid 
camera. 

“Let’s meet at my house,” Shari suggested. “I have to ask my mom first.” 
Michael and Bird jogged toward their houses. Shari and I crossed the street and 
headed to our homes, which are side by side. 

Mom and Dad were at work. Terry wasn’t home from high school yet. I dropped 

the backpack in the front hall. Pulled a box of juice from the refrigerator and 
drank it 

in two long sips from the straw. 

I still felt weak. Kind of lifeless. I thought maybe a long bike ride would help get 
my energy back. 

My jeans felt uncomfortable. A little tight. I ran to my room and pulled on my 

pair of really baggy shorts. Mom and Dad always teased me about these shorts. 
They 

say there’s room enough for a friend inside them. 



But I like them. I think they’re cool. And they’re really comfortable. I usually 
don’t wear them when I ride my bike. They’re so long and baggy, sometimes the 
cuffs get caught in the chain. 

I hurried outside and found Shari, Michael, and Bird waiting for me on their 

bikes. “Let’s go, Greg,” Bird urged. “It’s starting to get cloudy.” 

I pulled open the garage door and stepped inside, careful to walk around the 
black 

oil stains on the concrete floor. I took my bike from against the wall and walked 
it 

out onto the driveway. 

36 

Then, I did my high-flying circus riding trick. It’s my favorite way of getting on 

my bike. I lean on the handlebars and heave myself up in the air. Then I come 
flying 

down on the seat. 

Up I went. Pushed my body into the air. 

Swung my legs in the air. Dropped onto the seat. 

And both tires popped. 

I heard the explosion and then a whoosh of air as the tires flattened against the 
drive. 

“Hey—what’s going on?” I cried. 


37 



16 

“Whoa!” Shari cried. 

Michael and Bird burst out laughing. 

“Nice tires,” Michael said. 

“Maybe you should go on a diet!” Bird exclaimed. 

“Huh? A diet?” I repeated, swallowing hard. I knew that Bird was only joking. 
But his words sent a chill down my back. 

The snapshot flashed into my mind. The ugly snapshot from the evil camera. 

I saw myself all bloated and huge. Like an enormous saggy water balloon. 

I felt my face go hot and knew that I was blushing. I saw my friends staring at 
me. I climbed off my bike. “Guess I jumped too hard,” I murmured. 

“Maybe you need a tricycle,” Michael cracked. 

No one laughed. Michael’s jokes never make any sense. 

I squatted down and examined the tires. I ran my hands along the rubber—and 
found two big holes. Two blowouts. And they were new tires, too. 

I dragged the bike back into the garage. “I’ll take Terry’s old bike,” I told my 
friends. 

I actually like my brother’s bike better than mine. It’s a twelve-speed, and mine 
is 

only ten. He hardly ever rides it now that he’s got his driver’s license. But he 
doesn’t 



like me riding it. 

“Better not sit on it!” Bird suggested. “Maybe you should just walk it!” He and 

Michael laughed and slapped each other’s hands. 

“Ha-ha,” I said. “You guys are as funny as a flat tire.” 

“No. We’re as funny as two flat tires!” Michael joked. 

“Maybe you need a mountain bike,” Bird said. “Something sturdy.” 

“Maybe you need a sturdy punch in the face,” I threatened. 

“Just don’t sit on me!” Michael exclaimed, raising both hands in front of him as 
if 

to shield himself from me. 

“Are we going to ride or not?” Shari demanded, sighing. She glanced up at the 
graying sky. “If we don’t hurry, we’re going to get caught in the rain.” 

I eased myself carefully onto Terry’s bike. Then I followed them down the 
driveway and into the street. 

We rode aimlessly around town. When we reached the long, narrow park a few 
blocks from school, we bumped onto the grass and raced as fast as we could. 

Bird has the best bike and the longest legs. So he always wins our races. 

After about an hour, it started to drizzle, so we turned for home. I was glad. My 
legs felt heavy. My muscles ached. 

As we pedaled through the raindrops, I caught Shari watching me. Studying me. 


38 



Despite the sweat rolling down my forehead, I suddenly felt cold all over. Why 
is 

she staring at me like that? I wondered. 

Why? 

The next morning, I woke up with two words on my lips: Mr. Saur. 

Today is the day I show him the camera, I told myself, stretching and yawning. 
And today is the day I get my grade changed. 

I stood up, still yawning. Rubbed my eyes. And saw that my pillow had fallen to 
the floor during the night. 

When I bent over to pick it up, I felt a tug on the front of my pajama shirt. The 
buttons all popped off and scattered over the floor. 

“Huh?” I opened my mouth in surprise—and heard a long rrrrrrip. It took a few 
seconds to realize that my pajama bottoms had ripped right up the back. 

“Oh, nooooo.” I opened my mouth in a long, low moan. 

The collar of the pajama shirt dug tightly into my neck. I tried to loosen it—and 
both sleeves ripped at the shoulder! 

My heart pounding, I straightened up and crossed the room to the mirror. 

My whole body was trembling as I stepped up to the mirror. 

I shut my eyes. I couldn’t bear to look. 

But I had no choice. I had to see. I had to know. 

Slowly, slowly, I opened one eye, then the other. I took a deep breath and gazed 



at my reflection. 

Had the snapshot come true? Did I weigh four hundred pounds? 
39 



17 


I leaned into the mirror and stared at myself. 

No. Not four hundred pounds. 

I didn’t look too different. A little puffy. My cheeks were a little rounder. My 
shoulders were broader. 

I stepped back to check out the rest of my body—and Mom came walking into 
the room. “Greg, what are you doing? You’re going to be late for school.” 

I spun away from the mirror. “Mom—I grew last night!” I blurted out. “I—I 
ripped my pajamas.” 

She narrowed her eyes at the torn pajama top. “Greg, you didn’t grow 
overnight,” 

she said calmly. “Those pajamas always were a little small on you.” 

I turned back to the mirror. “They were?” 

Maybe Mom was right. Maybe I wasn’t growing huge. Maybe it was all in my 
imagination. 

I turned back to her. “How do I look?” 

She shrugged. “You look fine.” 

“I mean, do I look fatter to you?” 

She studied me for a moment. “Well, actually...” Her voice trailed off. 

“Actually what?” I demanded. 



“Maybe I’ll put skim milk on your cereal this morning,” she replied. 

“Hi, Greg. Putting on a little weight?” 

That’s how Mr. Saur greeted me when I hurried up to his desk before English 
class. 

His words sent a cold shiver down the back of my neck. But I ignored them. I 
held up the camera. “Mr. Saur, I want to show you something.” 

He lowered his eyes to the camera and frowned at it. “You want to take my 
picture? I already had my photo taken for the yearbook, Greg.” 

“No,” I replied. “This is the camera, Mr. Saur. This is the camera that—” 

He raised a hand to tell me to stop talking. “Not right now, Greg,” he said, 
climbing up from his desk chair. 

“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. 

He was gazing over my shoulder. I turned and saw Mr. Grand standing in the 
classroom doorway. Mr. Saur hurried over to talk to him. 

They talked until the bell rang. Then Mr. Saur returned to the front of the room 
to 

begin class. “I’m sorry I wasn’t here yesterday,” he announced. “I understand 
you 

had a wonderful time learning the subjunctive tense.” 

40 

I was still standing beside his desk, the camera in my hands. He stepped up to 
the 



chalkboard, turned, and saw me. 

“Greg, take your seat, please,” he said. “We have a lot to do today.” 

“But, Mr. Saur—” I protested. I raised the camera. 

“Take your seat,” he insisted. 

I had no choice. I sighed and trudged to my chair near the back of the room. 

How can I prove that my report was true if he won’t even listen to me? I asked 
myself unhappily. 

“Today, we’re going to hear more of your reports about true things that happened 

to you,” Mr. Saur told the class. He turned to a girl in the front row. “Marci, I 
believe 

it is your turn. What is your report about?” 

Marci Ryder stood up. “It’s about my cat, Waffles. It’s about all the funny things 
Waffles does around the house.” 

I groaned. Bor-ring! I thought. A few other kids groaned, too. 

But Mr. Saur actually smiled. The first time ever! 

He practically purred! “I like cats,” he told Marci. “I have six of them myself.” 
Oh, yuck! I thought. Six cats! 

I can’t sit through a boring report about a boring cat! I told myself. 

I shot my hand into the air and waved it frantically. “Mr. Saur? Mr. Saur?” 

The teacher’s smile faded. “Greg—now what?” he demanded. 

“Uh... before Marci starts,” I said, “can I show you the camera? You know. The 



one from my report? You said if I brought it in and proved that it’s evil, you’d 
change my grade.” 

Mr. Saur rubbed his chin and frowned at me. “It’s Marci’s turn,” he replied 
coldly. “I know we all want to hear about Waffles.” 

“But, Mr. Saur—you promised!” I cried. 

A few kids snickered. My voice was so high, only dogs could hear it. 

“Greg, you’re not going to change my mind,” Mr. Saur insisted. 

“But I can prove it!” I pleaded. “I can prove the camera is evil.” 

A few more kids snickered. 

“Greg is evil!” Donny shouted. 

It got a big laugh. 

“Greg is baaaaad! ” some other kid shouted. 

Another big laugh. 

Mr. Saur slammed the chalkboard with his wooden pointer. “Quiet, everyone.” 

He sighed and motioned me forward. “Okay, Greg. One minute. It isn’t fair to 
the 

others to give you extra time. But I’ll give you one minute to show off your 
camera.” 

One minute! 

I knew that’s all I needed. 

I felt my shirt pocket to make sure I had the snapshot of Jon inside. I knew that 



once Sourball saw that photo and heard what happened to Jon that night, he’d 
believe 

me. 

“Come on, Greg,” the teacher urged. “Get up here. One minute.” 

“Coming,” I said. I eagerly tried to stand up. 

41 

Tried again. 

Again. 

We have those chairs with the desk attached to the front. 

And I was stuck in the chair. Too fat to get out! 

42 



18 


What is happening to me? I wondered, feeling panic creep up from my stomach. 
My 

big blobby stomach. 

I climbed into this chair without any problem. That was less than an hour ago. 

And now I’m stuck in here. I must have put on a hundred pounds while I was 
sitting 

here! 

“Greg, we’re waiting.” Mr. Saur rolled his eyes and tapped the chalkboard 
impatiently with the pointer. 

On the fourth try, I finally managed to slide out of the seat. Carrying the camera 
carefully, I tromped up to the front of the room. 

“This is the camera,” I told Mr. Saur. “My friends and I found it in a deserted 
house. Just as I said in my report. The camera has a curse on it, and—” 

He took the camera from my hands and examined it. He rolled it over and over. 
He brought it up close to his face. He raised the viewfinder to his eye. 

“No—don’t!” I shrieked. “Don’t take a picture!” 

He lowered the camera. “If I don’t take a picture, how will I know if the camera 
is evil or not?” 

I reached into my shirt pocket. “I brought a photo,” I told him. “This will prove 
I’m telling the truth.” 



My fingers were so fat, I had trouble poking them into the pocket. My hands felt 
like squishy balls of dough. They were too blobby to make a fist! 

I nearly pulled the pocket off as I struggled to take out the snapshot of Jon. 
Finally, I pulled it out and shoved it in Mr. Saur’s face. “Here. Look!” 

He took the snapshot and studied it. 

“That boy is named Jon,” I told him. “I took his picture two nights ago. He was 

perfectly okay. But the photo showed him with a nail through his foot. Two 
minutes 

later, it came true. Jon got a nail in his foot, and his dad had to rush him to the 
hospital.” 

Mr. Saur burst out laughing. 

Another first. The first time he’d ever laughed in class! 

“It’s not funny,” I insisted. “Poor Jon was in so much pain. He—” 

“I’ve seen those trick nails,” Mr. Saur said, his eyes on the photo. 

“Huh?” I didn’t understand him. 

He handed the photo back to me. “I used to have a fake arrow,” he said. “When I 
slid it on, it looked as if I had an arrow going straight through my head. So I 
understand how you made it appear that this boy has a nail through his foot.” 
“No! It’s real! It’s real!” I cried. “Look how much pain Jon is in! Look at his 
face!” 


43 



“Your friend is a good actor,” Mr. Saur replied. 

“No!” I shrieked. “He isn’t my friend! I don’t even know him! You’ve got to 
believe me! You’ve got to!” 

Mr. Saur glanced up at the clock. “Your minute is up.” 

“But you promised—!” I cried. 

“Greg, go sit down,” he ordered. “You’re not going to fool me with an old 
camera and a joke snapshot.” 

“You lose, Greg!” Donny shouted. 

“You’re evil, Greg!” Brian chimed in. 

Everyone laughed. I could feel my face growing hot. I knew I must be beet-red. 

I felt ready to explode. I was embarrassed and hurt and angry—all at the same 
time. 

“I’d give you an A for effort,” Mr. Saur said cruelly. “But I’m still giving you an 
F for your report. F for fake! ” 

Everyone laughed again. 

I couldn’t take it anymore. 

I let out a cry of fury—and went running for the door. 

At least, I tried to run. But I was too heavy to move fast. I could only waddle. 
“Greg—where are you going?” I heard Mr. Saur call. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him and lumbered to the door. I had the camera tucked 



under one flabby arm. I pulled the door open with the other. 

And bounced out into the silent, empty hall. 

I could hear Mr. Saur calling me from the classroom. And I could hear the kids 
laughing and talking excitedly. 

I slammed the door shut behind me and kept moving. 

I didn’t know where I was going. I didn’t have a plan. I was so angry. I wanted 
to 

scream and cry and punch the walls. 

I turned the corner—and saw Shari down the hall. 

“Greg!” she called, surprised to see me. “What’s going on?” 

She was wearing a short black skirt over blue tights. She started to run down the 
hall toward me. 

She took about four steps—and then cried out as her skirt fell down! 


44 



19 

“I don’t believe this!” Shari wailed. 

We both stared down at her skirt, which had fallen around her ankles. 

She dropped her books and bent to pull it up. 

Normally, I would have burst out laughing. But she seemed so upset, I just stood 
there. 

“I—I’m losing weight,” she stammered, straightening the skirt around her waist. 
“I weighed myself this morning. I’ve lost eight pounds!” 

“Oh, wow!” I shook my head. Why was she losing weight? 

I tried to cheer her up. “Uh... eight pounds isn’t so much,” I said. I knew it was 
lame. But I couldn’t think of anything else. 

“Greg—I only weighed ninety to start!” she replied sharply. “Now I’m down to 
eighty-two. I can’t keep my skirt up. All my clothes hang on me!” 

“Maybe if you eat a really big lunch...” I started. 

“You’re no help!” she snapped. 

“Look at me!” I cried, holding my arms out so she could see my big stomach. “I 

think I put on two hundred pounds overnight! A few minutes ago, I couldn’t get 
out 

of my chair!” 

Her eyes checked me out. She was so upset about being skinny, she hadn’t even 



looked at me. 


She squinted hard at me. Then she burst out laughing. “Oh, gross. You look 
really 

weird!” 

“Thanks a bunch,” I sighed. 

“What are we going to do?” she demanded. “Why is this happening to us?” 

I started to answer—but I heard footsteps approaching from down the hall. 

Shari heard them, too. “Let’s go,” she urged. “Quick—help me pick up my 
books.” 

I bent to pick up the books—and the back of my jeans burst open with a loud 
rrrrrrip. 

After school, Bird and Michael and some other kids started up a softball game 
on the 

diamond behind school. I didn’t want to play. I didn’t want them to see how 
huge I 

was getting. 

But they pulled me onto the diamond and forced me to play first base. 

Maybe they won’t notice anything different, I thought. I crossed my fingers and 
hoped. Maybe they won’t notice that I’ve filled out a bit—since this morning! 

My T-shirt was stretched against my bulging stomach. The shirt was so tight, I 
could barely move my arms. My ripped jeans fit over my legs like tights. 


45 



Maybe they won’t notice, I told myself as I tried to trot out to first base. Maybe 
they won’t notice. 

“Hey, Greg—” Bird called from the pitcher’s mound. “Have you been super¬ 
sizing all your meals?” 

Everyone whooped and laughed. A few guys rolled around on the grass, giggling 
like hyenas. 

Michael pointed at me. “Hey—it’s Sumo Three!” he yelled. 

“It’s Sumo Three and Four!” someone else called out. 

More loud whooping and laughing. 

“Give me a break,” I muttered angrily. 

“Give him a lunch break!” Michael called. 

It wasn’t funny. But everyone laughed, anyway. 

They gathered around me in a wide circle. They shook their heads. “Weird,” 
Bird 

muttered. “How did you put on two hundred pounds since yesterday?” 

I didn’t want to talk about it. “Are we going to play ball or what?” I demanded. 

I had a strong urge to tell Bird and Michael why I was ballooning up so fast. I 
wanted to tell them that I had taken out the evil camera. That Shari had taken my 
picture. That it showed me weighing at least four hundred pounds. 

And now it was coming true. 

But I didn’t dare tell them. They had warned me not to go back to the Coffman 



house. And they had begged me not to take out the camera. 

If I told them the truth, they’d think I was a total jerk. 

So I kept my mouth shut and tried to concentrate on the game. 

I did pretty well until I went to bat in the third inning. I hit the ball over the 

second baseman’s head and trotted to first base with a single. 

I was totally out of breath by the time I reached the base. But the ball was still 

rolling around in the outfield. “Keep running!” my teammates shouted. “Greg— 
go to 

second!” 

So, huffing and puffing, I lifted my heavy legs and made my way to second. 
“Slide! Slide!” everyone was shouting. 

So I slid into second. Safe! 

And then I couldn’t get off my back. 

I wasn’t strong enough to pick up my heavy body. I must look like Humpty- 
Dumpty! I realized. 

I tried rolling. I tried rocking back and forth. 

And then I tried calling my friends for help. 

* * * 

I was exhausted by the time I pulled my huge body to my house. Sweat poured 
off 

my forehead and rolled down my round cheeks and chins. 



My clothes were stretched so tight, I could barely breathe. My jeans were ripped. 
My shirt pressed against my skin. Even my sneakers pinched my feet! 

This is horrible! I’ve got to get into something comfortable, I decided. 

46 

I remembered my huge, baggy shorts. The ones I wore to go bike riding the 
other 

day. 

I carried my bulky body over to the dresser. Bent over with a groan and pulled 
out the big shorts. 

I tugged them on, eager to get comfortable. 

Tugged. Tugged harder. Then gasped in horror. 

The huge, baggy shorts were skintight! 


47 



20 


I put on nearly three hundred pounds that day. By evening, I could barely walk. 
“It’s an allergic reaction,” Mom said. 

I stared at her. “Excuse me? What’s that?” 

“You ate something you’re allergic to,” she answered. “A person doesn’t swell 
up 

like a balloon overnight.” 

Dad squinted at me. He was trying to look calm, but I could see how worried he 
was. “Do you eat a lot of candy bars after school?” he asked. 

Mom shook her head at Dad. “He could eat a thousand candy bars a day! They 
wouldn’t make him this huge!” she declared. 

“We’d better take him to an allergy doctor,” Dad murmured, rubbing his chin. 
“We’ll take him to Dr. Weiss first,” Mom argued. “Dr. Weiss can tell us what 
kind of doctor to take him to.” 

They started to argue about what kind of doctor I needed. 

I waddled out of the room. It took all my strength just to raise my enormous legs. 
My chins sagged down over my neck. My big stomach bounced out of the room 
ahead of me. 

I knew that no doctor could help me. I knew I didn’t have an allergy. And I knew 
I didn’t become a blimp because of candy bars. 



The snapshot from the evil camera made me look as big as a mountain. And the 
snapshot had come true. 

No doctor could slim me down. No diet would work. 

Later, I begged Mom and Dad to let me stay home. “Please don’t make me go to 
school tomorrow like this,” I pleaded. “The kids will laugh at me. I’ll be so 
embarrassed.” 

“You can’t miss school,” Dad insisted. “What if it takes weeks and weeks to get 
you back to normal?” 

“The kids won’t laugh at you,” Mom added. “Your friends will understand that 
you’re sick.” 

I begged and whined. I even got down on my fat knees to plead with them. 

But would they listen? No. 

“Don’t be embarrassed,” Dad said as I waddled out the door to go to school the 
next 

morning. 

Don’t be embarrassed? 

I wore one of his baggy running suits—and it was tight on me! 

48 

I felt embarrassed just walking down the street. When cars drove past, I knew 
the 

people inside were staring at me. Laughing at the big mound of Jell-0 bouncing 



along the sidewalk. 

I didn’t want to walk to school. But my parents have a Honda Civic—and I 
didn’t 

fit in the car! 

Kids were staring as I squeezed through the front door of Pitts Landing Middle 

School. But everyone was kind. No one made jokes. In fact, no one said a word 
to 

me. 

I think they were afraid to come up to me. Afraid I might fall on them! I really 
did look like one of the balloons in the Thanksgiving Day parade! 

The morning went pretty well. I kept to myself and tried to hide in corners. It 
wasn’t easy to hide. But everyone left me alone. 

Until I stepped into Mr. Saur’s class. 

He was as sour as ever. And he embarrassed me in front of the whole class. 
“Greg, I don’t think you’ll fit into a chair,” he said, rolling his wooden pointer 
between his hands. “Why don’t you just stand by the window.” 

I didn’t say anything. I waddled over to the side of the room. 

The room fell silent. The other kids didn’t laugh. They could see that there was 
something seriously wrong with me. 

But Mr. Saur insisted on giving me a hard time. 

“Greg, forget the window,” he said. “If you stand there, I’m afraid you’ll block 



out all the sunlight.” Then he smiled. 

Again, no one laughed. I think the other kids felt sorry for me. Even Donny and 
Brian weren’t cracking jokes. 

“Greg, I want you to go see the nurse,” Mr. Saur ordered. “I want her to discuss 
the four food groups with you. I think you’ve been eating too much of all four!” 

I think that was supposed to be a cruel joke. But no one laughed. 

I turned my bulk around and stared at him. Was he serious? Was he really 
sending me to the nurse? 

“Get going,” he said, pointing to the door. 

I turned and shuffled heavily out of the classroom. I expected Donny to stick out 

his big foot and try to trip me, the way he always does. 

But he stared straight ahead, as silent and still as everyone else in the class. 

I was glad. If he tripped me, I knew I’d never be able to get up. 

I pulled myself down the hall, thinking angry thoughts about Mr. Saur. Why did 

he make fun of me in front of everyone? Why was he so cruel? 

I couldn’t answer my questions. Besides, I felt too angry to think clearly. I’ll pay 

him back some day. That’s what I told myself. I’ll do something mean to him. 
I’ll 

embarrass old Sourball in front of everyone. 

My angry thoughts followed me to the nurse’s office. But I instantly forgot them 
when I saw the girl huddled in the chair in the waiting room. I stopped outside 



the 


door and gaped at her in shock. 

Shari! 

It took me a few seconds to recognize her. 

49 

Her jeans and T-shirt appeared to be about ten sizes too big! Her arms were as 

thin as toothpicks. Her face was pale and puckered. Her head had shrunk. It 
looked 

like a tiny lemon on her frail, noodlelike body. 

“Greg,” she whispered weakly. “Is that you in that big body?” 

“Shari!” I cried. “How much weight have you lost?” 

“I—I don’t know,” she stammered. “Look at me! I’m shrinking away. I’m so 

light. It took me hours to walk to school this morning because the wind kept 
pushing 

me back!” 

“Are you sick?” I cried. 

She frowned at me. “I’m not sick, and neither are you,” she replied in a tiny, frail 

voice. “I’m shrinking away, and you’re bloating up—and it’s because of those 
photos 

we took.” 

I sighed and lifted my huge stomach with both hands so that I could get through 
the doorway. “What are we going to do, Shari?” I whispered. “It’s those photos. 



You’re right. But what are we going to do?” 
50 



21 


Dad picked me up after school. He had rented a van since I couldn’t fit into the 
car. 

Dad helped me squeeze through the door. My body took up the entire backseat. 
The seat belt wouldn’t stretch over my stomach. So we had to forget about it. 
“I’m sure Dr. Weiss will have you back to normal in no time,” Dad said. He was 
trying to be cheerful. But I could tell he was really upset and worried. 

He drove slowly to Dr. Weiss’ office across town. The van couldn’t pick up 
speed because of all the weight it carried—me! 

Dr. Weiss is a nice elderly man with bright blue eyes and a long mane of white 

hair. He talks to all the kids as if they’re two years old. He still gives me a 
lollipop 

after each visit, even though I’m twelve! 

But I didn’t think he’d give me a lollipop today. 

He tsk-tsked as I climbed on the scale. But he couldn’t get my weight. The scale 
didn’t go high enough! 

He had trouble listening to my heartbeat. His stethoscope got stuck in the folds 
of 

flab over my chest. 

He took all kinds of tests, his expression tense and thoughtful. “We’ll send the 
blood samples to the lab,” he told me. “We should have some answers in a few 



days.” 

He shook his head and frowned. His blue eyes appeared to fade. “I’ve never seen 
anything like it, Greg,” he said softly. “I’m completely stumped.” 

I wasn’t stumped. I knew exactly what the problem was. 

As soon as I got home, I lumbered to my room and grabbed the phone. It took all 
my strength to raise my huge, flabby arm and hold the receiver up to the bulging 
flesh of my face. 

I punched in Shari’s number. It took three tries. My finger was so fat, it kept 
hitting two numbers at once. 

She answered on the third ring. “Hello?” Her voice floated out so tiny and weak, 
I could barely hear her. 

“I’m coming over,” I announced. “And I’m bringing the camera.” 

“You don’t have to shout!” she squeaked. And then she added, “Hurry, Greg. 
I’ve 

lost five more pounds. I’m so light, I’m afraid I’m going to float away.” 

“I’ll be right there,” I told her. “We’ll figure out a way to save ourselves.” 

I hung up the phone. Then I carefully dug the camera out from its hiding place in 

my underwear drawer. I had to bend over to reach into the drawer. I was huffing 
and 

puffing, gasping for breath. 

If I get any fatter, I’ll explode, I thought unhappily. 



51 


Carefully gripping the camera, I lowered my bulk down the stairs. “I’m going to 
Shari’s,” I called to my parents. 

They were in the den, discussing what Dr. Weiss had told Dad. 

“It started to rain,” Mom called. “Take an umbrella.” 

“I’m only going next door!” I shouted back. 

Besides, an umbrella wouldn’t cover all of me. 

I peeked outside. It was only drizzling. Not much of a rain at all. 

I tucked the camera under the folds of my arm, pulled open the front door, and 
started to step out. But I stopped when I saw the dark-haired boy walking up the 
driveway. 

Jon! 

“Oh, no!” I murmured. I knew why he had come. He wanted his camera back. 
But I couldn’t give it back. I needed it to save Shari and me. 

I watched him walking slowly, his head down because of the rain. 

What am I going to do? I asked myself. I can’t let him take back his camera. I 
can’t! 

I’ll duck back inside and hide, I decided. 

I tried to back up. Tried to back my heavy bulk into the house. 


Too late. 



Jon saw me. 


52 



22 


He waved to me and started jogging toward the house. 

I had the camera in my hand. I carefully lowered it to the porch and stepped in 

front of it. I knew it would be hidden behind my enormous body. 

But what was I going to say to Jon? How could I convince him to let me keep 
the 

camera for a while longer? 

“Hi!” he called. 

“Hi,” I answered, my voice muffled by the thick folds of flab around my face. 

“I’m looking for a boy who lives around here,” Jon said, stepping up to the 
porch. 

“His name is Greg, and he’s blond, and he’s about my age. Do you know him? 
He 

has a camera of mine.” 

I stared at him. My mouth dropped open. I could feel my chins drop onto my 
chest. 

“What’s his name?” I choked out. 

“Greg,” Jon repeated. “I don’t know his last name. Does he live around here?” 

He doesn’t recognize me! I realized. I’m so huge, he doesn’t know that I’m me! 
“Uh... yeah. I think I know who you mean,” I told him. “There’s a kid named 
Greg who lives over there.” I pointed up the street. 



“Do you know which house?” Jon asked, turning to where I pointed. 

“It’s about four blocks that way,” I lied. “A big redbrick house. You can’t miss it. 
It’s the only brick house on the block.” 

“Hey, thanks,” Jon said. The rain started to come down harder. He turned quickly 
and jogged down the driveway. 

A close call, I thought. 

I felt bad about lying to Jon. But I had to lie. I couldn’t give him back the 
camera—ever. It was too dangerous. 

I watched him until he disappeared behind some hedges. Then, I reached my 
flabby hand down, picked up the camera, and bounced across the front yard to 
Shari’s house. 

Shari greeted me at her front door. I could see the shock in her eyes when she 
saw 

how huge I had become. 

I was shocked, too. I cried out in surprise. She was starting to look like a stick 
figure! 

As she led the way to her room, she kept tripping over the cuffs of her jeans, 
which sagged down over her feet. She had tied a knot in the belt around her tiny 
waist, an attempt to keep the jeans from falling off. 

“If I get any smaller, I’ll have to wear doll clothes!” she wailed. 


53 



“Did your parents take you to a doctor?” I asked, huffing and puffing as I tried to 
drag my weight after her. 

“Of course,” she replied in her tiny, weak voice. “The doctor said to make me 
drink milk shakes five times a day!” 

“I wish my doctor said that.” I sighed. 

I lowered myself carefully onto her bed. I didn’t want the bed to collapse under 
me. But as soon as I sat down, I heard a crunching sound. The sound of wood 
splintering. 

And the bed crashed loudly to the floor. 

“Don’t worry about it,” Shari said softly. “I don’t have the strength to climb up 
to 

bed, anyway.” 

“If I get any bigger,” I moaned, “I won’t be able to get out of the house. I really 
won’t fit through the door.” 

She folded her hands in front of her. Her fingers were so skinny, they looked like 
bird claws. With her black hair hanging down from her tiny, round head, and her 
straight pole of a body, she looked more like a mop than a person! 

“What are we going to do?” she wailed. 

I patted the camera with a fat, spongy hand. “I brought this,” I said. “I thought 
maybe—” 

“What good will that stupid camera do?” Shari cried. “I wish I’d never seen it! 



Never! Never!” 


“I have an idea,” I told her. I flicked a fly off one of my chins. 

She hugged herself, wrapping her skinny arms around her toothpick body. “What 
kind of an idea?” 

“Let’s take new pictures of ourselves,” I said. “Maybe the new pictures will 
show 

us looking normal. Maybe the new pictures will change us back to the way we 
were 

before.” 

She raised her eyes to mine. I could see her thinking about it, thinking hard. “It’s 
kind of risky—isn’t it?” she said finally. 

“Do you have a better idea?” I asked. 

She thought hard again. Then she lowered her eyes to the camera. “Okay,” she 
agreed. “Let’s do it.” 


54 



23 


I struggled to climb to my feet. But my arms and legs were barely strong enough 
to 

push up my huge body. 

Before I could move, Shari flew across the room. She grabbed the camera from 
my lap. 

“Oh!” she cried out as she nearly dropped it. “It feels so heavy!” 

“That’s because you’re so light,” I told her. I tried again to lift my bulk off the 
bed. And failed again. 

“Sit still,” Shari ordered. “I’ll take your picture first.” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I hope the new photo shows me skinny.” I tried to cross my 
fingers. But they were too fat to cross! 

“Say cheese,” Shari said, aiming the camera at me. 

“Don’t be funny,” I snapped. “Just take the picture.” 

She stared through the viewfinder. Raised her finger over the shutter button. 

Then she lowered the camera with a sigh. “It—it’s too dangerous,” she 
stammered. 

“Shari—take my picture!” I insisted. “Look at us! We couldn’t be any worse 
off—could we?” 

She nodded in agreement. Then, with a sigh, she raised the camera to her eye 



again. It felt so heavy in her skinny arms, she had to hold it up with both hands. 
“Here goes,” she said softly. “I hope it shows you normal again, Greg.” 

She snapped the picture. The flash made me blink. 

A second later, the white square slid out from the front of the camera. She 
carried 

it over to the bed and dropped lightly down beside me. 

“Let’s see it!” I cried, eagerly grabbing for it. 

“Careful!” Shari warned. “If you fall over, you’ll crush me!” 

I gasped. She was right. Sitting next to me could be extremely dangerous. 
“Maybe you’d better stand up,” I suggested. 

She climbed to her feet, swaying because she wasn’t used to being so light. “It’s 
starting to develop,” she announced. 

She held the snapshot in front of me so we could both watch it. The yellow filled 
in first. I squinted to see if I could make out my face. 

Was it fat in the photo? Or back to normal? 

The yellow was too pale. I couldn’t see my face at all. 

Shari and I both were frozen there, staring at the small square. Not moving a 
muscle. Not blinking. Watching it darken. 

And suddenly, I could see myself. 

My huge blobby face. My round, balloon body. 


55 



Still enormous. Still enormously fat. 

“Noooooooo!” I let out a long cry of horror. “Noooooooo! I want to be changed 
back!” 

Shari was shaking her tiny head sadly, still staring at the darkening photo. 
“What’s that on your face?” she cried. “Yuck!” 

I grabbed the snapshot from her and held it close. “Oh, no!” I groaned. “My 
skin—it’s all scaly. I look like an alligator or something!” 

Shari grabbed back the photo and studied it. “The scaly stuff is on your arms, 
too,” she said. “It looks like reptile skin or something.” 

And as she said that, I started to itch. 

I glanced down and saw red scales covering my arms. Itchy red patches. I started 
to scratch. But the scratching made the scales itch even more. 

My skin flaked off under my fingernails. 

“Oh, yuck!” I moaned. “It itches so bad!” 

I scratched my arms. Then I scratched my face. More dry skin peeled off as I 
scratched. Chunks of skin. 

Shari took a step back. She let the new photo fall to the carpet. “Oh, this is so 

horrible!” she declared. “You’re still huge—and now all your skin is cracking 
off!” 

“Ohh! My back itches so bad!” I wailed. “But I can’t reach it.” 

“I’m not going to scratch it for you!” Shari declared. “It—it’s too gross!” 



I pulled a chunk of scaly, red skin off the back of my hand. “Do you want me to 
take a new picture of you?” I asked Shari. “Maybe you’ll have better luck.” 

“No! No way!” she cried. She took another few steps back. “No new picture. It 
will only make things worse.” 

Her face twisted in disgust. She swallowed hard. “I’m sorry, Greg,” she choked 
out. “But you look so gross, I think I’m going to be sick.” 

I tried to scratch the back of my neck. But my arms were too fat. I couldn’t reach 
back there. 

I rubbed my forehead. A big chunk of skin dropped off and bounced on the 
carpet. 

“Let’s just rip up the photos!” Shari declared. 

“Huh?” I gaped at her. 

She bent to pick up the scaly new picture of me. “Let’s rip them all up,” she 
urged. “I’ll bet as soon as we rip them up, our bodies will return to normal.” 

I stopped my frantic scratching for a moment. “Do you think so? Do you think 
that’s all we have to do?” 

“Maybe,” Shari replied. “It’s worth a try—don’t you think?” 

I pulled the first two photos from my pocket. The negative of Shari and the first 
fat photo of me. 

“I’ll rip these two up,” I said. “You tear that one. We’ll see what happens.” 



We both held the photos up. I started to tear mine—then stopped. 

“Maybe if we rip them up, we’ll disappear completely!” I exclaimed. 

Shari and I stared at each other. Our hands stayed in the air, ready to tear the 
snapshots to pieces. 

56 

Should we do it? 

57 



24 


“No!” Shari cried. “Don’t do it!” 

We both lowered the snapshots. 

“You’re right,” I said. My whole body was shaking. “It’s too dangerous.” 

“If we tear the photos to pieces, we might be torn to pieces, too,” Shari said. “Or 
we might disappear completely and never come back.” 

I shuddered. “Let’s not talk about what might happen to us,” I moaned. “Look at 
us. What could be worse?” 

“A lot of things,” Shari sighed. “We’ll think of something to save ourselves, 

Greg. We just have to think positive.” 

I stared at her. “What did you say?” 

“I said, think positive,” she repeated. 

Think positive. 

“Shari—you just gave me a really good idea!” 

I cried. 

* * * 

We carried the snapshots to Kramer’s, the photo store where my brother works. 

It wasn’t easy to walk there. I had to stop to catch my breath every few steps. 

And I had to scratch my scaly, peeling skin. And I had to hold on to Shari to 
keep the 



wind from blowing her away. 

The walk was only about eight blocks. But it took us more than an hour. 

When we finally stepped inside the store, my heart sank to my knees. I didn’t see 
Terry. 

“He’s in the developing lab,” Mr. Kramer told me. He kept staring at Shari and 

me. I guess we looked pretty weird. A stick figure and an elephant. 

I pulled Shari to the lab in the back of the store and knocked on the door. You 

can’t just open the door and walk into the developing lab. If you let in the light, 
you 

destroy the film in there. 

We waited about five minutes. Then Terry came out. At first, he didn’t recognize 
me. I think he forgot that I had put on four hundred pounds in the past few days. 
“Yuck. What happened to your skin, Greg?” he demanded, making a disgusted 
face. “Have you got a rash or something?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied glumly. “Can you do me a favor, Terry?” 

He shrugged. “What’s the favor?” 

I held up the first two snapshots. The negative of Shari, and the positive of me 
weighing a ton. “Can you reverse these for us?” I asked. 

58 

He squinted at the two squares for a long while. “I don’t get you,” he said finally. 
I sighed. “Can you take the negative and make a positive of it? And can you take 



the positive and make a negative?” 

Shari let out a sharp cry. She realized what my plan was. 

Maybe if we reversed the pictures, it would reverse our bodies. 

Terry would make a positive of Shari’s negative, and she’d grow back to her 

normal size. Then he’d make a negative of my picture, and I’d shrink the way 
Shari 

had. 

It seemed to make sense. Was it worth a try? 

Definitely. 

Terry took the two snapshots. He studied them closely. He scratched his head. “I 

guess I could do it,” he said. “But I’m really busy in there. When do you need 
it?” 

“NOW!” Shari and I both cried. 

Terry stared at us, then down at the two photos. 

I scratched the back of my neck. My arms were so fat, I could barely lift them 

that high. In a few hours, I knew, I’d be too heavy to walk. Someone would have 
to 

wheel me around in a wheelbarrow. No—make that two wheelbarrows! 

“Please!” I begged. 

“I just don’t have time,” Terry said. 

“I’ll give you my allowance for the next two months!” I cried. 

“Okay. I guess I can find the time. It’s a deal,” Terry replied. “Wait out here.” 



He disappeared into the lab. We stood outside the door and waited. 

And waited. 

And waited. 

The longest half hour of my life. 

Mr. Kramer kept staring back at us from the front counter. Shari and I tried to 
ignore him. 

I wanted to sit down. Carrying so much weight made my feet hurt. But I was 

afraid if I took a seat, I’d break it. And I wouldn’t be able to get back up. 

So Shari and I stood outside the door to the lab. And thought about this new 
plan. 

Would it work? Would reversing the photos reverse us ? 

Finally, the door swung open and Terry stepped out. “Here,” he grunted. He 
handed me the new prints. “Don’t forget what you said about your allowance.” 

“I won’t,” I promised. “Thanks, Terry.” 

I gazed at the new prints. Terry had done it right. A positive of Shari, smiling 
into 

the camera. A negative of me, weighing four hundred pounds. 

“Now, get lost,” Terry said, glancing up to the front desk. “Go ahead. Beat it. 
Before you make me lose my job.” 

I took Shari’s hand and started to pull her to the front of the store. 

Poor Shari. She really did feel light as a feather. She looked even paler and 



skinnier than when we came into the store. Her hand felt like brittle bones. 

We stepped out of the store and stopped on the corner. I held the new prints up 
so 

we both could see them. 

“Is it working?” I asked her. “Do you feel any different?” 

59 

“Not yet,” she replied softly. 

“Neither do I,” I moaned. 

We stared at the new prints. And waited. 

We stood on that corner for at least half an hour. Staring and waiting. 

Waiting to feel different. Waiting for our bodies to change. 

But nothing happened. 

We didn’t change at all. 

“We’re doomed,” I murmured sadly. “Doomed.” 

A chunk of skin peeled off my forehead and dropped to the sidewalk. 


60 



25 


The next morning, I woke up early, before my alarm. I stretched and yawned. 
Then I 

turned and struggled to pull my huge body out of bed. 

“Heave-ho!” I cried, straining every muscle. 

And I went flying across the room! 

“Oww!” I groaned as I hit the wall. I bounced off. Dropped to the floor. Bounced 
up again. 

“What’s going on?” I cried out loud. 

And scrambled to the mirror. And stared at the reflection of my old face. My old 
body. 

No folds of sagging flesh. No puffed-out cheeks or bulging balloon of a belly. 
Me! 

I was back! 

I squeezed my arms. I mbbed my face. I pulled my hair. 

I felt so happy to see myself! 

I leaped onto the bed and started jumping up and down, tossing up my arms, and 
whooping and cheering at the top of my lungs. 

“It worked! It worked!” 

Reversing the photo had reversed me! 



“Yaaaaay!” I let out a cheer for myself. 

Mom and Dad burst into the room, still in their bathrobes. Frightened 
expressions 

on their faces. “Greg—what’s wrong?” 

And then they both froze with bulging eyes and opened mouths. 

Mom uttered a squeak of surprise. Dad goggled at me in shocked silence. 

“You—you’re you again!” Mom stammered finally. 

“You—you—you—” Dad struggled to say something, but he couldn’t. He 
pointed a finger at me and stuttered. 

And then they both rushed over and wrapped me in a tight hug. 

“I knew it was something you ate,” Mom said happily. “Some kind of food 
poisoning.” 

“Just an allergic reaction,” Dad added, finally able to speak. “I knew you’d be 
fine in a day or two.” 

“We knew you’d be fine,” Mom declared. 

“Yeah. Me, too,” I said. 

What a lie! 

“You were very good during all this trouble, Greg,” Mom said, wiping away a 
tear from her eye with the back of her hand. “You had such a good attitude.” 

61 

“Yeah. Well... I always try to think positive,” I told her. 



I gobbled down my breakfast and hurried next door to Shari’s house. As I ran up 
to 

the back door, she stepped out, grinning, waving her arms in the air in triumph. 
“It worked! It worked, Greg!” she cried happily. 

She came running toward me, her black hair flying behind her head, laughing 
and 

cheering. Back to normal. 

Back to normal! 

Whooping and shouting, the two of us did a wild “Back to Normal” dance in her 
backyard. 

When we stopped to catch our breath, Shari turned to me. “We’d better hurry. 

We’re going to be late for school. I can’t wait to show everyone that I’m me 
again.” 

“Me, too!” I cried. “But wait right here. I have to get something in my room. I’ll 
be right back.” 

I turned and started jogging quickly across the grass to my house. 

“What are you getting?” Shari called, following me. 

“The camera,” I shouted back. 

She ran faster. Caught up with me. Grabbed my shoulders and pulled me to a 

stop. “Greg—the camera? Why do you need the camera?” 

I narrowed my eyes at her. My expression turned serious. I lowered my voice to 
a 



whisper. 


“For revenge,” I replied. 
62 



26 


“Greg—don’t!” Shari pleaded. 

I ignored her. I knew what I wanted to do. I knew what I had to do. 

I ran into the house. Took the stairs two at a time up to my room. Pulled the 
camera from its hiding place. And hurried back outside. 

Shari was waiting for me on the sidewalk. “Greg—this is crazy,” she insisted. 
“What are you going to do?” 

I couldn’t stop an evil smile from spreading across my face. “I’m going to take 
Mr. Saur’s picture,” I told her. 

“NO!” she gasped. “Greg—you can’t!” 

“Watch me,” I replied, still grinning. 

“But—but—but—” she sputtered. 

I started walking toward school, taking long strides. I gripped the camera tightly 
in both hands. 

“Greg—something terrible will happen!” Shari protested. 

“I know,” I said, unable to stop grinning. “Old Sourball deserves it.” 

“But, Greg—” She tried to stop me. But I jogged faster, moving away from her. 

“He deserves it,” I repeated. “He refused to believe a true story. He called me a 

liar in front of the whole class. And he gave me an F. An F for a really good 
report.” 



“But, Greg—” Shari started. 

I didn’t let her get a word in. I was too worked up. The closer we came to school, 
the more excited I got about my revenge plan. 

“He’s going to ruin my whole summer,” I continued. “And he’s wrong, wrong, 

wrong! And then, when I got so huge, Sourball was really cruel. He made jokes 
about 

me in front of everyone. He embarrassed me, Shari. He totally embarrassed me.” 
“Greg—” 

“He wanted to hurt my feelings,” I declared. I could see our school through the 

trees in the next block. “He wanted to embarrass me in front of the whole class. 
He 

deserves what he’s going to get.” 

“So what are you going to do?” she demanded breathlessly. 

I stopped at the corner. “He dared me to prove that the camera is evil. So I’m 

going to prove it—and get my revenge at the same time.” 

* * * 

I slipped into class just as the final bell rang. The other kids were already in their 
seats, just getting quiet. 

Mr. Saur had his back turned. He was writing something on the chalkboard. 


63 




I stepped up behind him. And waited for him to turn around. 

My heart thudded in my chest. My hands were shaking so much, I could barely 
hold the camera. 

I took a deep breath and held it. 

This was my big moment. My big chance. 

“Mr. Saur—?” I called softly. 

He spun around, as if I had shouted. “Greg!” he cried. “You’re looking very 
slender.” 

I ignored his words. I raised the camera to my eye. 

Time for revenge, I thought. 

“I brought the camera,” I told him. My voice came out high and shrill. 

“Remember? The camera from my report? You asked me to prove that it’s evil. 
So 

here goes!” 

I centered his startled face in the viewfinder. 

I raised my finger over the shutter button. 

He grabbed the camera from my hands. 

“Oh, yes! The evil camera!” he declared, staring down at it. “Don’t waste it on 



me. Let’s take everyone’s picture!” 

“No!” I cried. 

He waved his hand. “Donny and Brian—move in closer.” Then he shoved me in 
front of him. “Get in the shot, Greg.” 

“No!” I pleaded. “Mr. Saur—no!” 

“Say cheese, everyone!” 

The camera flashed. 

The white square photo slid out. 

Mr. Saur smiled at me. “I think I got everyone in class in the shot,” he said. 
“Now 

what’s going to happen?” 

I swallowed hard. “Uh... we’ll see,” I replied. “We’ll see.” 










GHOST CAMP 

1 


“You know I get bus sick, Harry,” Alex groaned. 

“Alex, give me a break.” I shoved my brother against the window. “We’re 
almost there. Don’t start thinking about getting bus sick now!” 

The bus rumbled over the narrow road. I held onto the seat in front of me. I 
gazed out the window. 

Nothing but pine trees. They whirred past in a blur of green. Sunlight 
bounced off the dusty glass of the window. 

We’re almost to Camp Spirit Moon, I thought happily. 

I couldn’t wait to get off the bus. My brother, Alex, and I were the only 
passengers. It was kind of creepy. 

The driver was hidden in front of a green curtain. I had glimpsed him as 
Alex and I climbed on board. He had a nice smile, a great suntan, curly blond 
hair, and a silver earring in one ear. 

“Welcome, dudes!” he greeted us. 

Once the long bus ride began, we didn’t see him or hear from him again. 
Creepy. 

Luckily, Alex and I get along okay. He’s a year younger than me. He’s 
eleven. But he’s as tall as I am. Some people call us the Altman twins, even 
though we’re not twins. 

We both have straight black hair, dark brown eyes, and serious faces. Our 
parents are always telling us to cheer up—even when we’re in really good 
moods! 

“I feel a little bus sick, Harry,” Alex complained. 

I turned away from the window. Alex suddenly looked very yellow. His 
chin trembled. A bad sign. 

“Alex, pretend you’re not on a bus,” I told him. “Pretend you’re in a car.” 

“But I get carsick, too,” he groaned. 

“Forget the car,” I said. Bad idea. Alex can get carsick when Mom backs 
down the driveway! 

It’s really a bad-news habit of his. His face turns a sick yellow. He starts to 
shake. And then it gets kind of messy. 

“You’ve got to hold on,” I told him. “We’ll be at camp soon. And then 



you’ll be fine.” 

He swallowed hard. 

The bus bounced over a deep hole in the road. Alex and I bounced with it. 

“I really feel sick,” Alex moaned. 

“I know!” I cried. “Sing a song. That always cures you. Sing a song, Alex. 
Sing it really loud. No one will hear. We’re the only ones on the bus.” 

Alex loves to sing. He has a beautiful voice. 

The music teacher at school says that Alex has perfect pitch. I’m not sure 
what that means. But I know it’s a good thing. 

Alex is serious about his singing. He’s in the chorus at school. Dad says 
he’s going to find a voice teacher for Alex this fall. 

I stared at my brother as the bus bounced again. His face was about as 
yellow as a banana skin. Not a good sign. 

“Go ahead—sing,” I urged him. 

Alex’s chin trembled. He cleared his throat. Then he began to sing a Beatles 
song we both really like. 

His voice bounced every time the bus bumped. But he started to look better 
as soon as he started to sing. 

Pretty smart idea, Harry, I congratulated myself. 

I watched the pine trees whir past in the sunlight and listened to Alex’s 
song. He really does have an awesome voice. 

Am I jealous? 

Maybe a little. 

But he can’t hit a tennis ball the way I can. And I can beat him in a swim 
race every time. So it evens out. 

Alex stopped singing. He shook his head unhappily. “I wish Mom and Dad 
signed me up for the music camp.” He sighed. 

“Alex, the summer is half over,” I reminded him. “How many times do we 
have to go over this? Mom and Dad waited too long. It was too late.” 

“I know,” Alex said, frowning. “But I wish—” 

“Camp Spirit Moon was the only camp we could get into this late in the 
summer,” I said. “Hey, look—!” 

I spotted two deer outside the window, a tall one and a little baby one. They 
were just standing there, staring at the bus as it sped by. 

“Yeah. Cool. Deer,” Alex muttered. He rolled his eyes. 

“Hey—lighten up,” I told him. My brother is so moody. Sometimes I just 



want to shake him. “Camp Spirit Moon may be the coolest camp on earth,” I 
said. 

“Or it may be a dump,” Alex replied. He picked at some stuffing that poked 
up from a hole in the bus seat. 

“The music camp is so great.” He sighed. “They put on two musicals each 
summer. That would have been so awesome!” 

“Alex, forget about it,” I told him. “Let’s enjoy Camp Spirit Moon. We only 
have a few weeks.” 

The bus suddenly screeched to a stop. 

Startled, I bounced forward, then back. I turned to the window, expecting to 
see a camp out there. But all I could see were pine trees. And more pine trees. 

“Camp Spirit Moon! Everybody out!” the driver called. 

Everybody? It was just Alex and me! 

The driver poked his blond head out from behind the curtain. He grinned at 
us. “How was the ride, dudes?” he asked. 

“Great,” I replied, stepping into the aisle. Alex didn’t say anything. 

The driver climbed out. We followed him around to the side of the bus. 
Bright sunlight made the tall grass sparkle all around us. 

He leaned into a compartment and pulled out our bags and sleeping bags. 
He set everything down on the grass. 

“Uh... where’s the camp?” Alex asked. 

I shielded my eyes with my hand and searched around. The narrow road 
curved through a forest of pine trees as far as I could see. 

“Right through there, dudes,” the driver said. He pointed to a dirt path that 
cut through the trees. “It’s a real short walk. You can’t miss it.” 

The driver shut the baggage compartment. He climbed back onto the bus. 
“Have a great time!” he called. 

The door shut. The bus roared away. 

Alex and I squinted through the bright sunlight at the dirt path. I swung my 
duffel bag over my shoulder. Then I tucked my sleeping bag under one arm. 

“Shouldn’t the camp send someone out here to greet us?” Alex asked. 

I shrugged. “You heard the driver. He said it’s a very short walk.” 

“But still,” Alex argued. “Shouldn’t they send a counselor to meet us out 
here on the road?” 

“It’s not the first day of camp,” I reminded him. “It’s the middle of the 
summer. Stop complaining about everything, Alex. Pick up your stuff, and let’s 



get going. It’s hot out here!” 

Sometimes I just have to be the big brother and order him around. 
Otherwise, we won’t get anywhere! 

He picked up his stuff, and I led the way to the path. Our sneakers crunched 
over the dry red dirt as we made our way through the trees. 

The driver hadn’t lied. We’d walked only two or three minutes when we 
came to a small, grassy clearing. A wooden sign with red painted letters 
proclaimed camp spirit moon. An arrow pointed to the right. 

“See? We’re here!” I declared cheerfully. 

We followed a short path up a low, sloping hill. Two brown rabbits scurried 
past, nearly in front of our feet. Red and yellow wildflowers swayed along the 
side of the hill. 

When we reached the top, we could see the camp. 

“It looks like a real camp!” I exclaimed. 

I could see rows of little white cabins stretching in front of a round blue 
lake. Several canoes were tied to a wooden dock that stuck out into the lake. 

A large stone building stood off to the side. Probably the mess hall or the 
meeting lodge. A round dirt area near the woods had benches around it. For 
campfires, I guessed. 

“Hey, Harry—they have a baseball diamond and a soccer field,” Alex said, 
pointing. 

“Excellent!” I cried. 

I saw a row of round red-and-white targets at the edge of the trees. “Wow! 
They have archery, too,” I told Alex. I love archery. I’m pretty good at it. 

I shifted the heavy duffel bag on my shoulder. We started down the hill to 
the camp. 

We both stopped halfway down the hill. And stared at each other. 

“Do you notice anything weird?” Alex asked. 

I nodded. “Yeah. I do.” 

I noticed something very weird. Something that made my throat tighten and 
my stomach suddenly feel heavy with dread. 

The camp was empty. 

No one there. 



2 


“Where is everyone?” I asked, moving my eyes from cabin to cabin. No one in 
sight. 

I squinted at the lake behind the cabins. Two small, dark birds glided low 
over the sparkling water. No one swimming there. 

I turned to the woods that surrounded the camp. The afternoon sun had 
begun to lower itself over the pine trees. No sign of any campers in the woods. 

“Maybe we’re in the wrong place,” Alex said softly. 

“Huh? Wrong place?” I pointed to the sign. “How can we be in the wrong 
place? It says Camp Spirit Moon—doesn’t it?” 

“Maybe they all went on a field trip or something,” Alex suggested. 

I rolled my eyes. “Don’t you know anything about camp?” I snapped. “You 
don’t go on field trips. There’s nowhere to go!” 

“You don’t have to shoutl” Alex whined. 

“Then stop saying such stupid things!” I replied angrily. “We’re all alone in 
the woods in an empty camp. We’ve got to think clearly.” 

“Maybe they’re all in that big stone building over there,” Alex suggested. 
“Let’s go check it out.” 

I didn’t see any signs of life there. Nothing moved. The whole camp was as 
still as a photograph. 

“Yeah. Come on,” I told Alex. “We might as well check it out.” 

We were still about halfway down the hill, following the path through the 
tangles of pine trees—when a loud cry made us both stop and gasp in surprise. 

“Yo! Hey! Wait up!” 

A red-haired boy, in white tennis shorts and a white T-shirt, appeared beside 
us. I guessed he was sixteen or seventeen. 

“Hey—where did you come from?” I cried. He really startled me. One 
second Alex and I were alone. The next second this red-haired guy was standing 
there, grinning at us. 

He pointed to the woods. “I was gathering firewood,” he explained. “I lost 
track of the time.” 

“Are you a counselor?” I asked. 

He wiped sweat off his forehead with the front of his T-shirt. “Yes. My 



name is Chris. You’re Harry and you’re Alex—right?” 

Alex and I nodded. 

“I’m sorry I’m late,” Chris apologized. “You weren’t worried, were you?” 

“Of course not,” I replied quickly. 

“Harry was a little scared. But I wasn’t,” Alex said. Sometimes Alex can 
really be a pain. 

“Where is everyone?” I asked Chris. “We didn’t see any campers, or 
counselors, or anyone.” 

“They all left,” Chris replied. He shook his head sadly. When he turned 
back to Alex and me, I saw the frightened expression on his face. 

“The three of us—we’re all alone out here,” he said in a trembling voice. 



3 


“Huh? They left?” Alex cried shrilly. “But—but—where did they go?” 

“We can’t be all alone!” I cried. “The woods—” 

A smile spread over Chris’ freckled face. Then he burst out laughing. 
“Sorry, guys. I can’t keep a straight face.” He put his arms around our shoulders 
and led us toward the camp. “I’m just joking.” 

“Excuse me? That was a joke?” I demanded. I was feeling very confused. 

“It’s a Camp Spirit Moon joke,” Chris explained, still grinning. “We play it 
on all the new campers. Everyone hides in the woods when the new campers 
arrive at camp. Then a counselor tells them that the campers all ran away. That 
they’re all alone.” 

“Ha-ha. Very funny joke,” I said sarcastically. 

“You always try to scare the new campers?” Alex asked. 

Chris nodded. “Yeah. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. We have a lot of 
great traditions here. You’ll see. Tonight at the campfire—” 

He stopped when a big black-haired man—also dressed in white—came 
lumbering across the grass toward us. “Yo!” the man called in a booming, deep 
voice. 

“This is Uncle Marv,” Chris whispered. “He runs the camp.” 

“Yo!” Uncle Marv repeated as he stepped up to us. “Harry, what’s up?” He 
slapped me a high five that nearly knocked me into the trees. 

Uncle Marv grinned down at Alex and me. He was so huge —he reminded 
me of a big grizzly bear at the zoo back home. 

He had long, greasy black hair that fell wildly over his face. Tiny, round 
blue eyes—like marbles—under bushy black eyebrows. 

His arms bulged out from under his T-shirt. Powerful arms like a wrestler’s. 
His neck was as wide as a tree trunk! 

He reached down and shook Alex’s hand. I heard a loud crunch and saw 
Alex gasp in pain. 

“Good firm handshake, son,” Uncle Marv told Alex. He turned to me. “Did 
Chris play our little 'Alone in the Woods’ joke on you guys?” His voice boomed 
so loud, I wanted to cover my ears. 

Does Uncle Marv ever whisper? I wondered. 



“Yeah. He fooled us,” I confessed. “I really thought there was no one here.” 

Uncle Marv’s tiny blue eyes sparkled. “It’s one of our oldest traditions,” he 
said, grinning. What a grin! It looked to me as if he had at least six rows of teeth! 

“Before I take you to your cabin, I want to teach you the Camp Spirit Moon 
greeting,” Uncle Marv said. “Chris and I will show it to you.” 

They stood facing each other. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Uncle Marv bellowed. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Chris boomed back. 

Then they gave each other a left-handed salute, placing the hand on the 
nose, then swinging it straight out in the air. 

“That’s how Camp Spirit Moon campers greet each other,” Uncle Marv told 
us. He pushed Alex and me together. “You two try it.” 

I don’t know about you, but this kind of thing embarrasses me. I don’t like 
funny greetings and salutes. It makes me feel like a jerk. 

But I had just arrived at camp. And I didn’t want Uncle Marv to think I was 
a bad sport. So I stood in front of my brother. “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” I shouted. 
And I gave Alex a sharp nose salute. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” Alex showed a lot more enthusiasm than I did. He 
likes this kind of thing. He flashed me a sharp salute. 

Uncle Marv tossed back his head in a loud, bellowing laugh. “Very good, 
guys! I think you’re both going to be great Camp Spirit Moon campers.” 

He winked at Chris. “Of course, the campfire tonight is the real test.” 

Chris nodded, grinning. 

“The campfire tonight?” I asked. “A test?” 

Uncle Marv patted my shoulder. “Don’t worry about it, Harry.” 

Something about the way he said that made me worry a lot. 

“All new campers come to a Welcoming Camp-fire,” Chris explained. “It’s 
a chance to learn our Camp Spirit Moon traditions.” 

“Don’t tell them any more about it,” Uncle Marv told Chris sharply. “We 
want them to be surprised—don’t we?” 

“Surprised—?” I choked out. 

Why did I suddenly have such a bad feeling? Why did my throat tighten up 
again? Why did I have a fluttering feeling in my chest? 

“Do we sing camp songs at the Welcoming Campfire?” Alex asked. “I’m 
really into singing. I take voice lessons back home and—” 

“Don’t worry. You’ll sing. Plenty,” Uncle Marv interrupted in a low, almost 



menacing voice. 

I caught the cold look in his tiny eyes—cold as blue ice. And I felt a shiver 
roll down my back. 

He’s trying to scare us, I thought. It’s all a joke. He’s having fun with us. He 
always tries to scare new campers. It’s a Camp Spirit Moon tradition. 

“I think you boys will enjoy the campfire tonight,” Uncle Marv boomed. “If 
you survive it!” 

He and Chris shared a laugh. 

“Catch you later,” Chris said. He gave Alex and me a nose salute and 
vanished into the woods. 

“This will be your bunk,” Uncle Marv announced. He pulled open the 
screen door of a tiny white cabin. “Whoa!” He nearly pulled the door off its 
hinges. 

Alex and I dragged our duffels and sleeping bags into the cabin. I saw bunk 
beds against three of the walls. Narrow wooden chests of drawers. Cubbyholes 
for storing things. 

The walls were white. A light dangling from the ceiling cast a bright glow. 
The afternoon sun sent orange rays through a small window above one of the 
bunk beds. 

Not bad, I thought. 

“That bunk is free,” Uncle Marv told us, pointing to the bed against the 
window. “You can decide who gets the top and who gets the bottom.” 

“I need the bottom,” Alex said quickly. “I toss and turn a lot at night.” 

“And he sings in his sleep,” I told Uncle Marv. “Do you believe it? Alex is 
so into singing, he doesn’t even stop when he’s sleeping!” 

“You will have to try out for the talent show,” Uncle Marv told Alex. And 
then he repeated in a low voice, “If you survive tonight.” He laughed. 

Why did he keep saying that? 

He’s kidding, I reminded myself. Uncle Marv is just kidding. 

“The boys’ cabins are on the left,” Uncle Marv told us. “And the girls’ 
cabins are on the right. We all use the lodge and mess hall. It’s that big stone 
building near the woods.” 

“Should we unpack now?” Alex asked. 

Uncle Marv pushed back his greasy black hair. “Yes. Use any cubbies that 
are empty. You’d better hurry, guys. The rest of the campers will be back from 
the woods soon with firewood. It will be time for our campfire.” 



He gave us a “Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” and a sharp nose salute. 

Then he turned and lumbered away. The screen door slammed hard behind 

him. 

“Fun guy,” I muttered. 

“He’s kind of scary,” Alex admitted. 

“He’s just joking,” I said. “All summer camps try to terrify the new 
campers. I think.” I dragged my duffel bag over to the bed. 

“But it’s all in fun. There’s nothing to be scared about, Alex,” I told my 
brother. “Nothing at all.” 

I tossed my sleeping bag into the corner. Then I started toward the low 
dresser to see if I could find an empty drawer. 

“Whoa—!” I cried out as my sneaker stuck on something. 

I peered down. 

A blue puddle. 

My sneaker had landed in a sticky blue puddle. 

“Hey—” I tugged my sneaker out. The blue liquid was thick. It stuck to the 
bottom and sides of my shoe. 

I glanced around the room. 

And saw more blue puddles. A sticky blue puddle in front of every bed. 
“What’s going on here? What is this stuff?” I cried. 



4 


Alex had his bag open and was pulling stuff out and spreading it on the bottom 
bed. “What’s your problem, Harry?” he called without turning around. 

“It’s some kind of blue slime,” I replied. “Check it out. There are puddles 
all over the floor.” 

“Big deal,” Alex muttered. He turned and glanced at the blue liquid stuck to 
my sneaker. “It’s probably a camp tradition,” he joked. 

I didn’t think it was funny. “Yuck!” I exclaimed. I reached down and poked 
my finger into the tiny, round puddle. 

So cold! 

The blue slime felt freezing cold. 

Startled, I pulled my hand away. The cold swept up my arm. I shook my 
hand hard. Then I rubbed it, trying to warm it. 

“Weird,” I muttered. 

Of course, everything got a lot weirder. In a hurry. 

“Campfire time!” 

Uncle Marv’s cry through the screen door shook our cabin. 

Alex and I spun to face the door. It had taken us forever to unpack our stuff. 
To my surprise, the sun had lowered. The sky outside the door was evening gray. 

“Everyone is waiting,” Uncle Marv announced. A gleeful smile spread over 
his face. His tiny eyes practically disappeared in the smile. “We all love the 
Welcoming Campfire.” 

Alex and I followed him outside. I took a deep breath. The air smelled fresh 
and piney. 

“Wow!” Alex cried out. 

The campfire was already blazing. Orange and yellow flames leaped up to 
the gray sky. 

We followed Uncle Marv to the round clearing where the fire had been 
built. And saw the other campers and counselors for the first time. 

They sat around the fire, all facing us. Watching us. 

“They’re all dressed alike!” I exclaimed. 

“The camp uniform,” Uncle Marv said. “I’ll get you and Alex your camp 



uniforms tonight after the campfire.” 

As Alex and I neared the circle, the campers and counselors rose to their 
feet. A deafening “YOHHHHHHHHHH, SPIRITS!” shook the trees. Then a 
hundred left-handed nose salutes greeted us. 

Alex and I returned the greeting. 

Chris, the red-haired counselor, appeared beside us. “Welcome, guys,” he 
said. “We’re going to roast hot dogs on the fire before the campfire activities 
begin. So grab a stick and a hot dog, and join in.” 

The other kids were lining up in front of a long food table. I saw a huge 
platter of raw hot dogs in the center of the table. 

As I hurried to get in line, several kids said hi to me. 

“You’re in my cabin,” a tall boy with curly blond hair said. “It’s the best 
cabin!” 

“Cabin number seven rules!” a girl shouted. 

“This is an awesome camp,” the kid in front of me turned to say. “You’re 
going to have a great time, Harry.” 

They seemed to be really nice kids. Up ahead, a boy and a girl were having 
a playful shoving match, trying to knock each other out of line. Other kids began 
cheering them on. 

The fire crackled behind me. The orange light from its flames danced over 
everyone’s white shorts and shirts. 

I felt a little weird, not being dressed in white. 

I was wearing an olive-green T-shirt and faded denim cutoffs. I wondered if 
Alex felt weird, too. 

I turned and searched for him in the line. He was behind me, talking 
excitedly to a short blond boy. I felt glad that Alex had found a friend so fast. 

Two counselors handed out the hot dogs. I suddenly realized I was starving. 
Mom had packed sandwiches for Alex and me to eat on the bus. But we were too 
excited and nervous to eat them. 

I took the hot dog and turned to the crackling fire. Several kids were 
already huddled around the fire, poking their hot dogs on long sticks into the 
flames. 

Where do I get a stick? I asked myself, glancing around. 

“The sticks are over there,” a girl’s voice called from behind me—as if she 
had read my mind. 

I turned and saw a girl about my age, dressed in white, of course. She was 



very pretty, with dark eyes and shiny black hair, pulled back in a ponytail that 
fell down her back. Her skin was so pale, her dark eyes appeared to glow. 

She smiled at me. “New kids never know where to find the sticks,” she 
said. She led the way to a pile of sticks leaning against a tall pine tree. She 
picked up two of them and handed one to me. 

“Your name is Harry, right?” she asked. She had a deep, husky voice for a 
girl. Like she was whispering all the time. 

“Yeah. Harry Altman,” I told her. 

I suddenly felt very shy. I don’t know why. I turned away from her and 
shoved the hot dog onto the end of the stick. 

“My name is Lucy,” she said, making her way to the circle of kids around 
the fire. 

I followed her. The kids’ faces were all flickering orange and yellow in the 
firelight. The aroma of roasting hot dogs made me feel even hungrier. 

Four girls were huddled together, laughing about something. I saw a boy 
eating his roasted hot dog right off the stick. 

“Gross,” Lucy said, making a disgusted face. “Let’s go over here.” 

She led me to the other side of the campfire. Something popped in the fire. 
It sounded like a firecracker exploding. We both jumped. Lucy laughed. 

We sat down on the grass, raised the long sticks, and poked our hot dogs 
into the flames. The fire was roaring now. I could feel its heat on my face. 

“I like mine really black,” Lucy said. She turned her stick and pushed it 
deeper into the flames. “I just love that burnt taste. How about you?” 

I opened my mouth to answer her—but my hot dog fell off the stick. “Oh 
no!” I cried. I watched it fall into the sizzling, red-hot blanket of flames. 

I turned to Lucy. And to my surprise—to my horror —she leaned forward. 

Stuck her hand deep into the fire. 

Grabbed my hot dog from the burning embers and lifted it out. 



5 


I jumped to my feet. “Your hand!” I shrieked. 

Yellow flames leaped over her hand and up her arm. 

She handed me the hot dog. “Here,” she said calmly. 

“But your hand!” I cried again, gaping in horror. 

The flames slowly burned low on her skin. She glanced down at her hand. 
Confused. As if she didn’t know why I was in such a panic. 

“Oh! Hey—!” she finally cried. Her dark eyes grew wide. “Ow! That was 
hot!” she exclaimed. 

She shook her hand hard. Shook it until the flames went out. 

Then she laughed. “At least I rescued your poor hot dog. Hope you like 
yours burned!” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. I stared at her hand and arm. The flames 
had spread all over her skin. But I couldn’t see any burns. Not a mark. 

“The buns are over there,” she said. “You want some potato chips?” 

I kept staring at her hand. “Should we find the nurse?” I asked. 

She rubbed her arm and wrist. “No. I’m fine. Really.” She wiggled her 
fingers. “See?” 

“But the fire—” 

“Come on, Harry.” She pulled me back to the food table. “It’s almost time 
for the campfire activities to start.” 

I ran into Alex at the food table. He was still hanging out with the short 
blond boy. 

“I made a friend already,” Alex told me. He had a mouthful of potato chips. 
“His name is Elvis. Do you believe it? Elvis McGraw. He’s in our cabin.” 

“Cool,” I muttered. I was still thinking about the flames rolling up and 
down Lucy’s arm. 

“This is a great camp,” Alex declared. “Elvis and I are going to try out for 
the talent show and the musical.” 

“Cool,” I repeated. 

I grabbed a hot dog bun and tossed some potato chips on my plate. Then I 
searched for Lucy. I saw her talking to a group of girls by the fire. 



“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” a deep voice bellowed. No way anyone could 
mistake that cry. It had to be Uncle Marv. 

“Places around the council fire, everyone!” he ordered. “Hurry—places, 
everyone!” 

Holding plates and cans of soda, everyone scurried to form a circle around 
the fire. The girls all sat together and the boys all sat together. I guessed each 
cabin had its own place. 

Uncle Marv led Alex and me to a spot in the middle. 

“Yohhhhhhhh, Spirits!” he cried again, so loud the fire trembled! 

Everyone repeated the cry and gave the salute. 

“We’ll begin by singing our camp song,” Uncle Marv announced. 

Everyone stood up. Uncle Marv started singing, and everyone joined in. 

I tried to sing along. But of course I didn’t know the words. Or the tune. 

The song kept repeating the line, “We have the spirit—and the spirit has 

us.” 

I didn’t really understand it. But I thought it was pretty cool. 

It was a long song. It had a lot of verses. And it always came back to: “We 
have the spirit—and the spirit has us.” 

Alex was singing at the top of his lungs. What a show-off! He didn’t know 
the words, either. But he was faking it. And singing as loud as he could. 

Alex is so crazy about his beautiful singing voice and his perfect pitch. He 
has to show it off whenever he can. 

I gazed past my brother. His new friend, Elvis, had his head tossed back and 
his mouth wide open. He was singing at the top of his lungs, too. 

I think Alex and Elvis were having some kind of contest. Seeing who could 
sing the leaves off the trees! 

The only problem? Elvis was a terrible singer! 

He had a high, whiny voice. And his notes were all coming out sour. 

As my dad would say, “He couldn’t carry a tune in a wheelbarrow!” 

I wanted to cover my ears. But I was trying to sing along, too. 

It wasn’t easy with the two of them beside me. Alex sang so loud, I could 
see the veins in his neck pulsing. Elvis tried to drown him out with his sour, off- 
key wails. 

My face felt hot. 

At first, I thought it was the heat from the blazing campfire. But then I 
realized I was blushing. 



I felt so embarrassed by Alex. Showing off like that on his first night at 
camp. 

Uncle Marv wasn’t watching. He had wandered over to the girls’ side of the 
fire, singing as he walked. 

I slipped back, away from the fire. 

I felt too embarrassed to stay there. I’ll sneak back into place as soon as the 
song is over, I decided. 

I just couldn’t sit there and watch my brother act like a total jerk. 

The camp song continued. “We have the spirit—and the spirit has us,” 
everyone sang. 

Doesn’t the song ever end? I wondered. I backed away, into the trees. It felt 
a lot cooler as soon as I moved away from the fire. 

Even back here, I could hear Alex singing his heart out. 

I’ve got to talk to him, I told myself. I’ve got to tell him it isn’t cool to 
show off like that. 

“Ohh!” I let out a sharp cry as I felt a tap on my shoulder. 

Someone grabbed me from behind. 

“Hey—!” I spun around to face the trees. Squinted into the darkness. 

“Lucy! What are you doing back here?” I gasped. 

“Help me, Harry,” she pleaded in a whisper. “You’ve got to help me.” 



6 


A chill ran down my back. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered. 

She opened her mouth to reply. But Uncle Marv’s booming voice 
interrupted. 

“Hey, you two!” the camp director shouted. “Harry! Lucy! No sneaking off 
into the woods!” 

The campers all burst out laughing. I could feel my face turning hot again. 
I’m one of those kids who blushes very easily. I hate it—but what can I do? 

Everyone stared at Lucy and me as we made our way back to the fire. Alex 
and Elvis were slapping high fives and laughing at us. 

Uncle Marv kept his eyes on me as I trudged back. “I’m glad you make 
friends so easily, Harry,” he boomed. And all the campers started laughing at 
Lucy and me again. 

I felt so embarrassed, I wanted to shrivel up and disappear. 

But I was also worried about Lucy. 

Had she followed me to the woods? Why? 

Why did she ask me to help her? 

I sat down between Lucy and Elvis. “Lucy—what’s wrong?” I whispered. 

She just shook her head. She didn’t look at me. 

“Now I’m going to tell the two ghost stories,” Uncle Marv announced. 

To my surprise, some kids gasped. Everyone suddenly became silent. 

The crackling of the fire seemed to get louder. Behind the pop and crack of 
the darting flames, I heard the steady whisper of wind through the pine trees. 

I felt a chill on the back of my neck. 

Just a cool breeze, I told myself. 

Why did everyone suddenly look so solemn? So frightened? 

“The two ghost stories of Camp Spirit Moon have been told from 
generation to generation,” Uncle Marv began. “They are tales that will be told 
for all time, for as long as dark legends are told.” 

Across the fire, I saw a couple of kids shiver. 

Everyone stared into the fire. Their faces were set. Grim. Frightened. 

It’s only a ghost story, I told myself. Why is everyone acting so weird? 



The campers must have heard these ghost stories already this summer. So 
why do they look so terrified? 

I snickered. 

How can anyone be afraid of a silly camp ghost story? 

I turned to Lucy. “What’s up with these kids?” I asked. 

She narrowed her dark eyes at me. “Aren’t you afraid of ghosts?” she 
whispered. 

“Ghosts?” I snickered again. “Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts,” I told her. 
“And ghost stories never scare us. Never!” 

She leaned close to me. And whispered in my ear: “You might change your 
mind—after tonight.” 



7 


The flames flickered, crackling up to the dark, starry sky. Uncle Marv leaned 
into the orange firelight. His tiny, round eyes sparkled. 

The woods suddenly became quiet. Even the wind stopped whispering. 

The air felt cold on my back. I scooted closer to the campfire. I saw others 
move closer, too. No one talked. All eyes were on Uncle Marv’s smiling face. 

Then, in a low voice, he told the first ghost story.... 

A group of campers went into the woods for an overnight. They carried tents and 
sleeping bags. They walked single file along a narrow dirt path that twisted 
through the trees. 

Their counselor’s name was John. He led them deeper and deeper into the 
woods. 

Dark clouds floated overhead. When the clouds covered the full moon, the 
darkness swept over the campers. They walked close together, trying to see the 
curving path. 

Sometimes the clouds moved away, and the moonlight poured down on 
them. The trees glowed, silvery and cold, like ghosts standing in the forest. 

They sang songs at first. But as they moved deeper into the woods, their 
voices became tiny and shrill, muffled by the trees. 

They stopped singing and listened to the scrape of their footsteps and the 
soft rustlings of night animals scampering through the weeds. 

“When are we going to stop and set up camp?” a girl asked John. 

“We have to go deeper into the woods,” John replied. 

They kept walking. The air became colder. The trees bent and shivered 
around them in a swirling breeze. 

“Can we set up camp now, John?” a boy asked. 

“No. Deeper,” John replied. “Deeper into the forest.” 

The path ended. The campers had to make their way through the trees, 
around thorny bushes, over a deep carpet of crackling dead leaves. 

Owls hooted overhead. The campers heard the flutter of bat wings. 
Creatures scratched and slithered around their feet. 

“We’re really tired, John,” a boy complained. “Can we stop and set up the 



tents?” 

“Deeper into the woods,” John insisted. “An overnight is no fun unless you 
are deep, deep in the woods.” 

So they kept walking. Listening to the low hoots and moans of the night 
animals. Watching the old trees bend and sway all around them. 

Finally they stepped out into a smooth, wide clearing. 

“Can we set up camp now, John?” the campers begged. 

“Yes,” John agreed. “We are deep in the woods now. This is the perfect 
place.” 

The campers dropped all the bags and supplies in the middle of the clearing. 
Silvery moonlight spilled all around them, making the smooth ground shimmer. 
They pulled out the tents and started to unfold them. 

But a strange sound made them all stop their work. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“What was that?” a camper cried. 

John shook his head. “Probably just the wind.” 

They went back to the tents. They pushed tent poles into the soft, smooth 
ground. They started to unfold the tents. 

But the strange sound made them stop again. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

A chill of fear swept over the campers. 

“What is that sound?” they asked. 

“Maybe it’s some kind of animal,” John replied. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“But it sounds so close!” a boy cried. 

“It’s coming from right above us,” another boy said. “Or maybe beneath 

us!” 

“It’s just a noise,” John told them. “Don’t worry about it.” 

So they set up the tents. And they spread sleeping bags inside the tents. 
Ka-thump ka-thump. 

They tried to ignore the sound. But it was so close. So close. 

And such a strange—but familiar—sound. 

What could it be? the campers wondered. What on earth makes a sound like 

that? 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 



The campers couldn’t sleep. The noise was too loud, too frightening—too 

near. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

They burrowed deep into their sleeping bags. They zipped themselves in 
tight. They covered their ears. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

It didn’t help. They couldn’t escape the sound. 

“John, we can’t sleep,” they complained. 

“I can’t sleep, either,” John replied. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

“What should we do?” the campers asked the counselor. 

John didn’t get a chance to answer. 

They heard another Ka-thump ka-thump. 

And then a deep voice growled: “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY 
HEART?” 

The ground shook. 

The campers suddenly realized what the frightening sound was. And as the 
ground rose up, they realized—too late—they had camped on the smooth skin of 
a hideous monster. 

“I guess we went too deep into the woods!” John cried. 

His last words. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. 

The monster’s heartbeat. 

And then its huge, hairy head lifted up. Its mouth pulled open. And it 
swallowed John and the campers without even chewing. 

And as they slid down the monster’s throat, the sound of the heartbeat grew 
louder and louder. 

Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-thump ka-thump. Ka-THUMP! 

Uncle Marv shouted the last Ka-thump at the top of his lungs. 

Some campers screamed. Some gazed at Uncle Marv in silence, their faces 
tight with fear. Beside me, Lucy hugged herself, biting her bottom lip. 

Uncle Marv smiled, his face flickering in the dancing orange flames. 
Laughing, I turned to Elvis. “That’s a funny story!” I exclaimed. 

Elvis narrowed his eyes at me. “Huh? Funny?” 

“Yeah. It’s a very funny story,” I repeated. 



Elvis stared hard at me. “But it’s true!” he said softly. 



8 


I laughed. “Yeah. For sure,” I said, rolling my eyes. 

I expected Elvis to laugh. But he didn’t. The firelight flickered in his pale 
blue eyes as he stared at me. Then he turned to talk to my brother. 

A chill ran down my back. Why was he acting so weird? 

Did he really think I’d believe a crazy story like that was true? 

I’m twelve years old. I stopped believing in things like the Easter Bunny 
and the Tooth Fairy a long time ago. 

I turned to Lucy. She was still hugging herself, staring intently into the fire. 

“Do you believe him?” I asked, motioning to Elvis. “Is he weird or what?” 

Lucy stared straight ahead. She seemed so deep in thought, I don’t think she 
heard me. 

Finally she raised her head. She blinked. “What?” 

“My brother’s new friend,” I said, pointing to Elvis again. “He said that 
Uncle Marv’s story was true.” 

Lucy nodded, but didn’t reply. 

“I thought it was a funny story,” I said. 

She picked up a twig and tossed it on the fire. I waited for her to say 
something. But she seemed lost in thought again. 

The flames of the campfire had died down. Sparkling red embers and 
chunks of burning wood spread over the ground. Chris and another counselor 
carried fresh logs into the meeting circle. 

I watched them rebuild the fire. They piled armfuls of twigs and sticks onto 
the burning embers. When the sticks burst into flames, the two counselors 
lowered logs over them. 

Then they stepped back, and Uncle Marv took his place in front of the fire. 
He stood with his hands in the pockets of his white shorts. The full moon floated 
behind his head, making his long black hair shine. 

He smiled. “And now I will tell the second traditional story of Camp Spirit 
Moon,” he announced. 

Once again, the circle of campers grew silent. I leaned back, trying to get 
my brother’s attention. But Alex was staring across the fire at Uncle Marv. 

Alex probably thought the first ghost story was kind of dumb, I knew. He 



hates ghost stories even more than I do. He thinks they’re silly baby stuff. And 
so do I. 

So what was Elvis’ problem? 

Was he goofing? Just teasing me? Or was he trying to scare me? 

Unde Marv’s booming voice interrupted my thoughts. “This is a story we 
tell every year at Camp Spirit Moon,” he said. “It’s the story of the Ghost 
Camp.” 

He lowered his deep voice nearly to a whisper, so that we all had to lean 
closer to hear him. And in hushed tones, he told us the story of the Ghost Camp. 

The story takes place at a camp very much like Camp Spirit Moon. On a warm 
summer night, the campers and counselors met around a blazing council fire. 

They roasted hot dogs and toasted marshmallows. They sang the camp 
songs. One of the counselors played a guitar, and he led them in singing song 
after song. 

When they were tired of singing, the counselors took turns telling ghost 
stories. And telling the legends of the camp, legends that had been passed on 
from camper to camper for nearly a hundred years. 

The evening grew late. The campfire had died low. The moon floated high 
in the sky, a pale full moon. 

The camp director stepped forward to end the council meeting. 

Suddenly, darkness swept over the circle of campers. 

They all looked up—and saw that the moon had been covered by a heavy 
blanket of black clouds. 

And swirls of fog came drifting over the camp. A cold, wet fog. Cloudy 
gray at first. Then darkening. 

And thickening. 

Until the fog swept over the camp, billowing like black smoke. 

Tumbling and swirling, the cold wet fog rolled over the dying campfire. 
Rolled over the campers and counselors. Over the cabins and the lake and the 
trees. 

A choking fog, so thick and dark the campers couldn’t see each other. 
Couldn’t see the fire. Or the ground. Or the moon in the sky. 

The fog lingered for a short while, swirling and tossing, low over the 
ground. Wet, so wet and silent. 

It moved on just as silently. 



Like smoke blown away. 

The moonlight shone through. The grass sparkled as if a heavy dew had 
settled. 

The fire was out. Dark purple embers sizzled over the ground. 

The fog swirled away. Swept over the trees. And vanished. 

And the campers sat around the dead campfire. Their eyes blank. Their 
arms limp at their sides. 

Not moving. Not moving. Not moving. 

Because they were no longer alive. 

The fog had left a ghost camp in its wake. 

The campers, the counselors, the camp director—they were all ghosts now. 
All spirits. All ghosts. Every last one of them. 

They climbed to their feet. And returned to their bunks. 

They knew the ghost camp was their home now— forever! 

With a smile, Uncle Marv stepped back from the fire. 

I glanced around the circle. The faces were so solemn. No one smiled or 
laughed. 

It’s a pretty good story, I thought. Kind of scary. 

But it doesn’t have much of an ending. 

I turned to see what Alex thought. 

And gasped when I saw the terrified expression on his face. “Alex—what?” 
I cried, my voice cutting through the silence of the circle. “What’s wrong?” 

He didn’t reply. His eyes were raised to the sky. He pointed up. 

I gazed up too—and let out a cry of horror. 

As a black, swirling fog came sweeping over the camp. 



9 


My mouth dropped open as I watched the fog roll closer. It darkened the ground 
as it moved steadily toward us. 

Darkened the trees. Darkened the sky. 

This is crazy, I told myself. 

This is impossible ! 

I scooted next to Alex. “It’s just a coincidence,” I told him. 

He didn’t seem to hear me. He jumped to his feet. His whole body 
trembled. 

I stood up beside him. “It’s only fog,” I said, trying to sound calm. “It gets 
foggy out here in the woods all the time.” 

“Really?” Alex asked in a tiny voice. 

The black smoky fog swirled over us. 

“Of course,” I replied. “Hey—we don’t believe in ghosts, remember? We 
don’t think ghost stories are scary.” 

“But—but—” Alex stuttered. “Why is everyone staring at us?” he finally 
choked out. 

I turned and squinted through the thick fog. 

Alex was right. All around the circle, the other campers had their eyes on 
Alex and me. Their faces appeared to dim behind the curtain of dark mist. 

“I—I don’t know why they’re watching us,” I whispered to my brother. 

Fog billowed around us. I shivered. It felt cold against my skin. 

“Harry—I don’t like this,” Alex whispered. 

The fog was so thick now, I could barely see him, even though he stood 
close beside me. 

“I know we don’t believe in ghosts,” Alex said. “But I don’t like this. It— 
it’s too creepy.” 

From the other side of the circle, Uncle Marv’s voice broke the silence. “It’s 
a beautiful fog tonight,” he said. “Let’s all stand up and sing the Camp Spirit 
Moon song.” 

Alex and I were already standing. The other campers and counselors 
obediently climbed to their feet. 



Their pale faces shimmered in and out of the fog. 

I rubbed my arms. Cold and wet. I dried my face with the front of my T- 

shirt. 

The fog grew even heavier and darker as Uncle Marv began to sing. 
Everyone joined in. Beside me, Alex began to sing, quieter this time. 

Our voices were muffled by the heavy mist. Even Uncle Marv’s booming 
voice sounded smaller and far away. 

I tried to sing too. But I didn’t know the words. And my own voice came 
out choked and small. 

As I stared into the swirling fog, the voices faded. Everyone sang, but the 
sound sank into the fog. 

The voices vanished. All of them. All except for Alex’s. 

He seemed to be the only one still singing, his voice pure and soft beside 
me in the dark mist. 

And then Alex stopped singing, too. 

The fog swept on. The darkness lifted. 

Silvery moonlight washed down on us once again. 

Alex and I gazed around in surprise. 

No one else remained. 

Alex and I were all alone. All alone in front of the dying fire. 



10 


I blinked. And blinked again. 

I don’t know what I expected. Did I think they would all appear again? 

Alex and I gazed across the circle in stunned silence. 

They had vanished with the fog. The campers. The counselors. Uncle Marv. 

A chill ran down my back. My skin still felt damp and cold from the heavy 

mist. 

“Wh-where—?” Alex choked out. 

I swallowed hard. 

A burned log crumbled into the purple embers. The soft thud startled me. 

I jumped. 

And then I started to laugh. 

Alex squinted at me, studying me. “Harry—?” 

“Don’t you see?” I told him. “It’s a joke.” 

He squinted at me harder. “Huh?” 

“It’s a camp joke,” I explained. “It’s a joke they probably always play on 
new campers here.” 

Alex twisted up his whole face. He was thinking about it. But I don’t think 
he believed me. 

“They all ran off into the woods,” I told him. “They hid behind the fog and 
ran away. They were all in on the joke. I’ll bet they do it to every new kid.” 

“But—the fog—” Alex choked out. 

“I’ll bet the fog was a fake!” I exclaimed. “They probably have some kind 
of smoke machine. To help them with the joke.” 

Alex rubbed his chin. I could still see the fear in his eyes. 

“They probably do this all the time,” I assured him. “Uncle Marv tells the 
story. Then somebody turns on the smoke machine. The black smoke rolls over 
the campfire circle. And everyone runs and hides.” 

Alex turned and stared into the woods. “I don’t see anyone hiding back 
there,” he said softly. “I don’t see anyone watching us.” 

“I’ll bet they’re all back at the cabins,” I told him. “I’ll bet they’re waiting 
for us. Waiting to see the looks on our faces.” 



“Waiting to laugh at us for falling for their dumb joke,” Alex added. 

“Let’s go!” I cried. I slapped him on the shoulder. Then I started running 
across the wet grass toward the row of cabins. 

Alex ran close behind. The moon sent a silvery path across the grass in 
front of us. 

Sure enough—as we came near the cabins, the campers all came running 
out. They were laughing and hooting. Slapping each other high fives. 

Enjoying their joke. A joke they play on new campers when the fog rolls in, 
they told us. 

I saw Lucy laughing along with a bunch of girls. 

Elvis grabbed Alex and wrestled him playfully to the ground. 

Everyone teased us and told us how scared we looked. 

“We weren’t scared even for a second,” I lied. “Alex and I figured it out 
before the fog cleared.” 

That made everyone start laughing and cheering all over again. 

“Owoooooooh!” 

Some of the kids cupped their hands around their mouths and made ghost 
howls. 

“Owoooooooh!” 

That led to more laughing and joking. 

I didn’t mind the teasing. Not a bit. 

I felt so relieved. My heart was still pounding like crazy. And my knees felt 
kind of weak. 

But I felt so happy that it was all a joke. 

Every summer camp has its jokes, I told myself. And this is a pretty good 

one. 

But it didn’t fool me. Not for long, anyway. 

“Lights Out in five minutes,” Uncle Marv’s booming command stopped the 
fun. “Lights Out, campers!” 

The kids all turned and scurried to their bunks. 

I stared down the row of cabins, suddenly confused. Which one was ours? 

“This way, Harry,” Alex said. He tugged me toward the third cabin down 
the path. Alex has a better memory than I do for things like that. 

Elvis and two other guys were already in the cabin when Alex and I came 
in. They were getting changed for bed. The other guys introduced themselves. 
Sam and Joey. 



I made my way to the bunk bed and started to undress. 

“Owoooooooh!” A ghostly howl made me jump. 

I spun around and saw Joey grinning at me. 

Everyone laughed. Me, too. 

I like camp jokes, I thought. They’re mean. But they’re kind of fun. 

I felt something soft and gooey under my bare foot. Yuck! I glanced down. 
And saw that I had stepped in a fresh puddle of blue slime. 

The cabin lights went out. But before they did, I saw blue puddles—fresh 
blue puddles—all over the floor. 

The cold blue stuff stuck to the bottom of my foot. I stumbled through the 
dark cabin and found a towel to wipe it off. 

What are these blue puddles? I asked myself as I climbed up to my top 
bunk. 

I glimpsed Joey and Sam in the bunk against the wall. 

I gasped. 

They stared back at me, their eyes shining like flashlights! 

What is going on here? I wondered. 

What are the sticky blue puddles all over the floor? 

And why do Sam and Joey’s eyes glow like that in the dark? 

I turned my face to the wall. I tried not to think about anything. 

I had almost drifted to sleep—when I felt a cold, slimy hand sliding down 
my arm. 



11 


“Huh?” 

I shot straight up. Still feeling the cold, wet touch on my skin. 

I stared at my brother. “Alex—you scared me to death!” I whispered. “What 
do you want?” 

He stood on his mattress, his dark eyes staring at me. “I can’t sleep,” he 
moaned. 

“Keep trying,” I told him sharply. “Why are your hands so cold?” 

“I don’t know,” he replied. “It’s cold in here, I guess.” 

“You’ll get used to it,” I said. “You always have trouble sleeping in new 
places.” 

I yawned. I waited for him to drop back onto the bottom bunk. But he didn’t 
move. 

“Harry, you don’t believe in ghosts—do you?” he whispered. 

“Of course not,” I told him. “Don’t let a couple of silly stories creep you 

out.” 

“Yeah. Right,” he agreed. “Good night.” 

I said good night. He disappeared back to his bed. I heard him tossing 
around down there. He had a very squeaky mattress. 

Poor guy, I thought. That dumb Ghost Camp joke with the fog really 
messed him up. 

He’ll be fine in the morning, I decided. 

I turned and gazed across the dark cabin toward Joey and Sam’s bunk. Were 
their eyes still glowing so strangely? 

No. 

Darkness there. 

I started to turn away—then stopped. 

And stared hard. 

“Oh no!” I murmured out loud. 

In the dim light, I could see Joey. Stretched out. Asleep. 

Floating two feet above his mattress! 



12 


I scrambled to climb out of bed. My legs tangled in the blanket, and I nearly fell 
on my head! 

“Hey—what’s up?” I heard Alex whisper below me. 

I ignored him. I swung myself around, and leaped to the floor. 

“Ow!” I landed hard, twisting my ankle. 

Pain shot up my leg. But I ignored it and hobbled to the door. I remembered 
the light switch was somewhere over there. 

I had to turn on the light. 

I had to see for sure that I was right. That Joey slept floating in the air 
above his bed. 

“Harry—what’s wrong?” Alex called after me. 

“What’s up? What time is it?” I heard Elvis groan sleepily from the bunk 
against the other wall. 

I pulled myself across the cabin. My hand fumbled against the wall until I 
found the light switch. 

I pushed it up. 

The overhead light flashed on, flooding the tiny cabin in white light. 

I raised my eyes to Joey’s bunk. 

He lifted his head from the pillow and squinted down at me. “Harry— 
what’s your problem?” he asked. He was sprawled on his stomach, on top of his 
blanket. 

Not floating in the air. Not floating. 

Resting his head in his hands, yawning and staring down at me. 

“Turn off the light!” Sam barked. “If Uncle Marv catches us with the light 
on...” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Turn it off\ ” Elvis and Sam both insisted. 

I clicked off the light. 

“Sorry,” I muttered. “I thought I saw something.” 

I felt like a jerk. Why did I think I saw Joey floating in the air? 

I must be as creeped out as Alex, I decided. Now I’m seeing things! 



I scolded myself and told myself to calm down. 

You’re just nervous because it’s your first day in a new camp, I decided. 

I started slowly across the cabin to my bed. Halfway there, I stepped in a 
cold, sticky puddle of goo. 

The next morning, Alex and I found our white Camp Spirit Moon uniforms— 
white shorts and T-shirts—waiting for us at the foot of our beds. 

Now we won’t stand out like sore thumbs, I thought happily. 

Now we can really be part of Camp Spirit Moon. 

I quickly forgot about my fears from the night before. I couldn’t wait for the 
camp day to get started. 

That afternoon, Alex tried out for the Camp Spirit Moon talent show. 

I had to be at the soccer field. A bunch of us were supposed to practice 
putting up tents. We were getting ready for an overnight in the woods. 

But I stopped in front of the outdoor stage at the side of the lodge to listen 
to Alex sing. 

A counselor named Veronica, with long, copper-colored hair all the way 
down her back, was in charge of the tryouts. I leaned against a tree and watched. 

A lot of kids were trying out. I saw two guitar players, a boy with a 
harmonica, a tap dancer, and two baton twirlers. 

Veronica played a small upright piano at the front of the stage. She called 
Alex up and asked him what song he wanted to sing. 

He picked a Beatles song he likes. My brother doesn’t listen to any new 
groups. He likes the Beatles and the Beach Boys—all the groups from the 
sixties. 

He’s the only eleven-year-old I know who listens to the oldies station. I feel 
kind of sorry for him. It’s like he was born in the wrong time or something. 

Veronica played a few notes on the piano, and Alex started to sing. 

What a voice! 

The other kids had all been laughing and talking and messing around. But 
after Alex sang for a few seconds, they got real quiet. They huddled close to the 
stage and listened. 

He really sounded like a pro! I mean, he could probably sing with a band 
and make a CD. 

Even Veronica was amazed. I could see her lips form the word “Wow!” as 
she played the piano for Alex. 



When Alex finished singing, the kids all clapped and cheered. Elvis slapped 
Alex a high five as he hopped off the small stage. 

Veronica called Elvis up next. He told her he wanted to sing an Elvis song, 
since he was named after Elvis Presley. 

He cleared his throat and started to sing a song called “Heartbreak Hotel.” 

Well... it really was a heartbreak—because Elvis couldn’t sing a single note 
on key! 

Veronica tried to play along with him. But I could see that she was having 
trouble. I think she probably wanted to stop playing the piano and cover her 
ears! 

Elvis had a high, scratchy voice. And the notes came out really sour. Sour 
enough to make your whole face pucker up. 

The kids around the stage started grumbling and walking away. 

Elvis had his eyes shut. He was so wrapped up in his song, he didn’t even 
see them! 

Doesn’t he know how bad he is? I wondered. Why does he want to enter a 
talent show when he sounds like a squealing dog? 

Elvis started to repeat the chorus. I decided I had to get away from there 
before my eardrums popped. 

I flashed Alex a thumbs-up and hurried to the soccer field. 

Sam, Joey, and a bunch of other kids were already unfolding tents, getting 
ready for tent-raising practice. Chris, the counselor, was in charge. 

He waved to me. “Harry—unroll that tent over there,” he instructed. “Let’s 
see how fast you can put it up.” 

I picked up the tent. It was bundled tightly, no bigger than a backpack. I 
turned it over in my hands. I’d never set up a tent before. I wasn’t even sure how 
to unwrap it. 

Chris saw me puzzling over it and walked over. “It’s easy,” he said. 

He pulled two straps, and the nylon tent started to unfold. “See? Here are 
the poles. Just stretch it out and prop it up.” 

He handed the bundle back to me. 

“Yeah. Easy,” I repeated. 

“What’s that noise?” Joey asked, looking up from his tent. 

I listened hard. “It’s Elvis singing,” I told them. 

The sour notes floated over the soccer field from the stage. 

Sam shook his head. “It sounds like an animal caught in a trap,” he said. 



We all laughed. 

Joey and Sam took off their sneakers and went barefoot. I took mine off, 
too. The warm grass felt good under my feet. 

I unfolded the tent and spread it out on the grass. I piled the tent poles to the 

side. 

The sun felt hot on the back of my neck. I slapped a mosquito on my arm. 

I heard a shout and glanced up to see Sam and Joey wrestling around. They 
weren’t fighting. They were just goofing. 

They both picked up tent poles and started dueling with them, having a wild 
sword fight. They were laughing and having fun. 

But then Sam tripped over a tent. 

He lost his balance. Stumbled forward. Fell hard. 

I let out a scream as the tent pole went right through his foot. 



13 


My stomach lurched. I felt sick. 

The pointed pole had pierced the top of Sam’s foot, nailing his foot to the 
ground. 

Joey gaped, openmouthed, his eyes wide with surprise. 

With a gasp, I searched for Chris. I knew Sam needed help. 

Where had Chris wandered off to? 

“Sam—” I choked out. ‘Til get help. Til—” 

But Sam didn’t cry out. He didn’t react at all. Didn’t even grimace. 

He calmly reached down with both hands—and pulled the pole from his 

foot. 

I let out a groan. My foot ached! In sympathy, I guess. 

Sam tossed the pole aside. 

I stared down at his foot. No cut. No blood. 

It wasn’t bleeding! 

“Sam!” I cried. “Your foot. It’s not bleeding!” 

He turned and shrugged. “It missed my toes,” he explained. 

He dropped onto his knees and started propping up the tent. 

I swallowed hard, waiting for my stomach to stop churning. 

Missed his toes? I thought. Missed his toes? 

I saw the pole sink right into his foot! 

Or was I seeing things again? 

For the rest of the afternoon, I tried not to think about it. I worked on the tent. 
Once I got it spread out, it was easy to set up. 

Chris had us fold and unfold them a few times. Then we had a race to see 
who could set up a tent the fastest. 

I won easily. 

Sam said it was beginner’s luck. 

Chris said I was definitely ready for the overnight. 

“Where do we go for the overnight?” I asked. 

“Deep, deep into the woods,” Chris replied. He winked at Sam and Joey. 



I felt a chill, thinking about Uncle Marv’s ghost story. 

I shook the chill away. No way I was going to let myself get scared by a 
silly camp story. 

We had instructional swim at the waterfront. The lake was clear and cold. 
I’m up to Junior Lifesaver. Joey and I took turns rescuing each other. 

I didn’t think about Sam driving the pole through his foot. I forced it from 
my mind. 

After the swim, I returned to the bunk to get changed for dinner. There were 
fresh puddles of blue goo on the cabin floor. 

Nobody made a big deal about them. I didn’t want to, either. So I tried hard 
not to think about them. 

Alex came in, very excited. “I’m going to be the first act in the talent 
show!” he announced. “And Veronica liked my singing so much, she wants me 
to star in the camp musical.” 

“Way to go!” I cried. I slapped him a high five. Then I asked, “What about 
Elvis?” 

“He’s going to be in the show, too,” Alex replied. “He’s going to be stage 
manager.” 

I pulled on my white Camp Spirit Moon shorts and T-shirt and headed to 
the mess hall for dinner. 

I saw a group of girls come out of the cabins on the other side. I searched 
for Lucy, but didn’t see her. 

I was feeling pretty good. 

Not thinking about the strange things I’d seen. 

Not thinking about the blue puddles of slime. The mysterious black fog. 

Not thinking about the ghost story that Elvis said was tme. 

Not thinking about Lucy sticking her hand into the fire and pulling out my 
flaming hot dog. 

Not thinking about Joey floating above his bed. Or Sam jamming a thick 
pole through his foot. 

And not bleeding. Not crying out. 

So totally calm about it. As if he couldn’t feel it, couldn’t feel any pain. 

I was starving. Looking forward to dinner. Not thinking about any of these 
puzzling things. 

Leeling really good. 

But then Joey ruined my good mood at dinner. And forced all the scary 



thoughts back into my mind. 

The food had just been served. Chicken in some kind of creamy sauce, 
spinach, and lumpy mashed potatoes. 

I didn’t care what it was. I was so hungry, I could eat anything! 

But before I had a chance to eat, Joey called out to me from across the 
table. “Hey, Harry—look!” 

I glanced up from my plate. 

He picked up his fork—and jammed it deep into his neck! 



14 


“Ohhh.” I let out a groan. My fork fell from my hand and clattered to the floor. 

Joey grinned at me. The fork bobbed up and down, stuck in his neck. 

I felt sick. My heart started to pound. 

He pulled the fork out with a hard tug. His grin didn’t fade. “You try it!” he 
called. 

“Joey—stop it!” Elvis cried from across the table. 

“Yeah. Give us a break,” Sam agreed. 

I stared at Joey’s neck. No cut. No fork marks. No blood. 

“How—how did you do that?” I finally stammered. 

Joey’s grin grew wider. “It’s just a trick,” he replied. 

I glimpsed Alex at the end of the table. Had he seen Joey’s “trick”? 

Yes. Alex looked green. His mouth had dropped open in horror. 

“Here. I’ll show you how to do it,” Joey offered. 

He raised the fork again—but stopped when he saw Uncle Marv leaning 
over his shoulder. 

“What’s going on, Joey?” Uncle Marv demanded sharply. 

Joey lowered the fork to the table. “Just kidding around,” he replied, 
avoiding the camp director’s hard stare. 

“Well, let’s eat our dinner, guys,” Uncle Marv said sternly. “Without 
kidding around.” His stubby fingers tightened over Joey’s shoulders. “We have a 
night soccer game, you know. Boys against the girls.” 

Uncle Marv loosened his grip on Joey’s shoulders and moved on to the next 
table. A food fight had broken out there. And the mashed potatoes were flying. 

Joey mumbled something under his breath. I couldn’t hear him over all the 
noise. 

I turned to see how Alex was doing at the end of the table. He had his fork 
in his hand, but he wasn’t eating. He was staring hard at Joey. My brother had a 
very thoughtful expression on his face. 

I knew he was wondering exactly the same thing I was. 

What is going on here? 

Joey said the fork-stabbing was just a trick. But how did he do it? Why 



didn’t it hurt? Why didn’t he bleed? 

“Night soccer games are cool!” Elvis declared. He was stuffing chicken into 
his mouth. The cream sauce ran down his chin. 

“Especially boys against the girls,” Sam agreed. “We’ll kill them! They’re 
pitiful.” 

I glanced at the girls’ table across the room. They were chattering noisily. 
Probably about the soccer game. 

I saw Lucy in the shadows near the wall. She didn’t seem to be talking to 
anyone. She had a solemn expression on her face. 

Did she keep looking over at me? 

I couldn’t really tell. 

I ate my dinner. But my appetite had disappeared. 

“How did you do that fork thing?” I asked Joey. 

“I told you. It’s just a trick,” he replied. He turned away from me to talk to 

Sam. 

Dessert was little squares of red, yellow, and green Jell-O. It was okay. But 
it needed some whipped cream. 

As I was finishing my dessert, I heard some squeals from the front of the 
big room. I turned toward the cries—and saw a bat swooping wildly back and 
forth over the mess hall. 

Some of the younger kids were screaming. But everyone stayed calm at my 
table. 

The bat fluttered noisily, swooping and diving, darting from one end of the 
hall to the other. 

Uncle Marv followed it with a broom. And after only a minute or two, he 
gently pinned the bat to the wall with the straw broom head. 

Then he lifted the bat off the wall, carrying it in one hand. 

It was so tiny! No bigger than a mouse. 

He carried it out the door and let it go. 

Everyone cheered. 

“That happens all the time,” Sam said to me. “It’s because there aren’t any 
screens on the mess hall doors.” 

“And the woods are full of bats,” Joey added. “Killer bats that land in your 
hair and suck the blood out of your head.” 

Sam laughed. “Yeah. Right.” He grinned at me. “That’s what happened to 
Joey. That’s why he acts so weird now.” 



I laughed along with everyone else. 

But I wondered if Sam was really joking. 

I mean, Joey did act weird. 

“Soccer field, everyone!” Uncle Marv boomed from the mess hall door. 
“Check with the sports counselors. Alissa and Mark will set up the teams.” 

Chairs scraped over the stone floor as everyone jumped up. 

I saw Lucy waving to me. But Sam and Joey pulled me away. 

Into a cool, cloudy night. The full moon hidden behind low clouds. The 
grass already wet with a heavy dew. 

The counselors divided up the teams. Alex and I were on the second team. 
That meant we didn’t play the first period. Our job was to stand on the sidelines 
and cheer on the boys’ first team. 

Two floodlights on tall poles sent down wide triangles of white light over 
the field. It wasn’t really enough light. Long shadows spread over the field. 

But that was part of the fun. 

Alex stood close beside me as the game began. The girls’ team scored a 
goal in less than a minute. 

Girls on the sidelines went wild. 

The players on the boys’ team stood around, scratching their heads and 
muttering unhappily. 

“Lucky break! Lucky break!” yelled Mark, a tall, lanky boys’ counselor. 
“Go get them, guys!” 

The game started up again. 

The light from the floodlights appeared to dim. I raised my eyes to the sky 
—and saw fog rolling in. 

Another swirling fog. 

Mark jogged past us, looking like a big stork. “Going to be another foggy 
night,” he said to Alex and me. “Night games are more fun in the fog.” He 
shouted instructions to the boys’ team. 

The thick fog swept over us quickly, driven by a gusting wind. 

Alex huddled close to me. I turned and caught his worried expression. 

“Did you see what Joey did at dinner?” he asked softly. 

I nodded. “He said it was a trick.” 

Alex thought about that for a moment. “Harry,” he said, keeping his eyes on 
the game. “Don’t you think some of these kids are a little weird?” 

“Yeah. A little,” I replied. I thought about the tent pole going through Sam’s 



foot. 

“Something happened at the waterfront,” Alex continued. “I can’t stop 
thinking about it.” 

I watched the game, squinting into the drifting fog. It was getting hard to 
see the players. 

Cheers rang out from the girls’ side. I guessed they had scored another goal. 
Layers of heavy fog blocked my view. 

I shivered. “What happened?” I asked my brother. 

“I had free swim. After tryouts for the show,” he said. “There was my group 
and a couple of girls’ groups. Younger girls, mostly.” 

“The lake is nice,” I commented. “It’s so clear and clean. And not too cold.” 

“Yeah. It’s good,” Alex agreed. He frowned. “But something strange 
happened. I mean—I think it was strange.” 

He took a deep breath. I could see he was really upset. 

“Let’s go, guys! Go, go, go!” Mark shouted to the team. 

The glow from the floodlights twisted and bent in the fog, sending strange 
shadows over the playing field. The fog was so thick now, I had trouble telling 
the players from the shadows. 

“I was floating on top of the water,” Alex continued, wrapping his arms 
around his chest. “Sort of taking it easy. Moving slowly. Stroke... stroke... very 
slow. 

“It was free swim. So we could do what we wanted. Some of the guys were 
having a back-floating race near the shore. But I floated out by myself. 

“The water was so clear. I put my face in the water, and I stared down to the 
bottom. And—and I saw something down there.” 

He swallowed hard. 

“What was it? What did you see?” I asked. 

“A girl,” Alex replied with a shudder. “One of the girls from the younger 
group. I don’t know her name. She has short, curly black hair.” 

“She was under the water?” I demanded. “You mean, swimming 
underwater?” 

“No.” Alex shook his head. “She wasn’t swimming. She wasn’t moving. 
She was way underwater. I mean, near the bottom of the lake.” 

“She dove down?” I asked. 

Alex shrugged. “I got so scared!” he cried over the shouts of the two teams. 
“She wasn’t moving. I didn’t think she was breathing. Her arms floated up and 



down. And her eyes—her eyes stared out blankly into the water.” 

“She drowned ?” I cried. 

“That’s what I thought,” Alex said. “I panicked. I mean, I didn’t know what 
to do. I couldn’t think. I didn’t think. I just dove down.” 

“You dove down to the bottom to get her?” I asked. 

“Yeah. I didn’t really know if I was too late. Or if I should get a counselor. 
Or what,” Alex said, shuddering again. 

“I swam down. I grabbed her arms. Then I gripped her under the shoulders. 
I pulled her up. She floated up easily. Like she was weightless or something. 

“I pulled her up to the surface. Then I started to drag her to the shore. I was 
gasping for breath. Mostly from panic, I think. My chest felt about to burst. I 
was so scared. 

“And then I heard laughing. She laughed at me. I was still holding her 
under the shoulders. She turned—and spit water in my face!” 

“Oh, wow!” I gasped. “Wow, Alex. You mean she was okay?” 

“Yeah,” Alex replied, shaking his head. “She was perfectly okay. She was 
laughing at me. She thought it was really funny. 

“I just stared at her. I couldn’t believe it. I mean, she had been way down at 
the bottom. For a long, long time. 

“I let go of her. She floated away from me, still laughing. 

“I said, ‘How did you do that?’ That’s what I asked her. I asked, ‘How long 
can you hold your breath?’ 

“And that made her laugh even harder. ‘How long?’ I asked. 

“And she said, ‘Along, long time.’ 

“And then she swam back to the other girls.” 

“And what did you do?” I asked Alex. 

“I had to get out of the water,” he replied. “I was shaking all over. I couldn’t 
stop shaking. I—I thought...” His voice trailed off. 

“At least she was okay,” he murmured after a while. “But don’t you think 
that was weird, Harry? And then at dinner, when Joey stuck that fork in his neck 

“It’s weird, Alex,” I said softly. “But it may just be jokes.” 

“Jokes?” he asked. His dark eyes stared hard into mine. 

“Kids always play jokes on new campers,” I told him. “It’s a camp 
tradition. You know. Terrify the new kids. It’s probably just jokes. That’s all.” 

He chewed his bottom lip, thinking about it. Even though he was standing 



so close to me, the swirling black fog made him appear far away. 

I turned back to the game. The boys were moving across the grass toward 
the goal. Passing the ball, kicking it from player to player. They looked unreal, 
moving in and out of the swirling shadows. 

Jokes, I thought. 

All jokes. 

I squinted into the fog. And saw something that couldn’t be a joke. 

A boy kicked the ball to the net. The girls’ goalie moved to block the shot. 
She wasn’t fast enough. Or she stumbled. 

The ball hit her smack in the forehead. 

It made a sickening thud. 

The ball bounced onto the ground. 

And her head bounced beside it. 



15 


I gasped. And started to run. 

Through the thick wisps of black fog. 

The swirling, dark mist seemed to float up from the ground and sweep 
down from the trees. It felt cold and wet on my face as I hurtled toward the girl. 

Squinting into the heavy darkness, I could see her sprawled on her stomach 
on the ground. 

And her head... 

Her head... 

I bent down and grabbed it. I don’t know what I was thinking. 

Did I plan to plop it back on her shoulders? 

In a total panic, trembling with horror, I bent into the swirling mist—and 
picked up the head with both hands. 

It felt surprisingly hard. Inhumanly hard. 

I raised it. Raised it close to my face. 

And saw that I held a soccer ball. 

Not a head. Not a girl’s head. 

I heard a groan. And gazed down to see the girl climb to her knees. She 
muttered something under her breath and shook her head. 

Her head. The head on her shoulders. 

She stood and frowned at me. 

I stared at her face, her head. My whole body was still shaking. 

“Your head—” I choked out. 

She tossed back her straight blond hair. Brushed dirt off her white shorts. 
Then she reached for the ball. 

“Harry—you’re not on the first team!” I heard a boy call. 

“Get off the field!” another boy demanded. 

I turned and saw that the players had all gathered around. 

“But I saw her head fall off!” I blurted out. 

I instantly regretted it. I knew I shouldn’t have said it. 

Everyone laughed. They tossed back their heads and laughed at me. 
Someone slapped me on the back. 



Their grinning, laughing faces floated all around me. For a moment, it 
looked to me as if all their heads had come off. I was surrounded by laughing 
heads, bobbing in the eerie, shadowy light from the floodlights. 

The girl raised her hands to the sides of her head and tugged up. “See, 
Harry?” she cried. “See? It’s still glued on!” 

“Someone better check Harry’s head!” a boy cried. 

Everyone laughed some more. 

A kid came up, grabbed my head, and tugged it. 

“Ow!” I screamed. 

More wild laughter. 

I tossed the goalie the soccer ball. Then I slunk off the field. 

What is wrong with me? I wondered. Why am I so messed up? 

Why do I keep seeing things? 

Am I just nervous because I’m in a new camp? Or am I totally losing it? 

I trudged to the sidelines and kept walking. I didn’t know where I was 
going. I just knew I wanted to get away from the laughing kids, away from the 
soccer game. 

The heavy fog had settled over the field. I glanced back. I could hear the 
players’ shouts and cheers. But I could barely see them. 

I turned and started toward the row of cabins. The dew on the tall grass 
tickled my legs as I walked. 

I was halfway to the cabins when I realized I was being followed. 



16 


I spun around. 

A face floated out of the darkness. 

“Alex!” I cried. In all the excitement over the soccer ball and the goalie’s 
head, I had forgotten all about him. 

He stepped close to me, so close I could see beads of sweat on his upper lip. 
“I saw it, too,” Alex whispered. 

“Huh?” I gasped. I didn’t understand. “You saw what?” 

“The girl’s head,” Alex said sharply. He turned back to the soccer field. To 
see if anyone had followed him, I guess. 

Then he turned back to me and tugged my T-shirt sleeve. “I saw her head 
fall off, too. I saw it bounce on the ground.” 

I swallowed hard. “You did? Really?” 

He nodded. “I thought I was going to puke. It—it was so gross.” 

“But—it didn’t fall off!” I cried. “Didn’t you see? When I ran onto the 
field? I picked up the ball. Not her head.” 

“But I saw it, Harry,” Alex insisted. “At first I thought it was just the fog. 
You know. My eyes playing tricks on me because of the heavy fog. But—” 

“It had to be the fog,” I replied quietly. “That girl—she was perfectly okay.” 

“But if we both saw it...” Alex started. He stopped and sighed. “This camp 
—it’s so weird.” 

“That’s for sure,” I agreed. 

Alex shoved his hands into the pockets of his shorts. He shook his head 
unhappily. “Elvis says the ghost stories are true,” he said. 

I put my hands on Alex’s shoulders. I could feel him trembling. We don’t 
believe in ghosts—remember?” I told him. “Remember?” 

He nodded slowly. 

The first howl made us both jump. 

I turned to the woods. Another eerie howl rose up from the same spot. 

Not an animal howl. Not an animal cry at all. 

A long, mournful howl. A human howl. 

“Owwoooooooooooooo. ” 



Another deeper cry made me gasp. 

Alex grabbed my arm. His hand felt cold as ice. 

“What is that?” he choked out. 

I opened my mouth to reply—but another mournful howl interrupted. 
“Owwoooooooooooo. ” 

I heard two creatures howling. Maybe three. 

Maybe more. 

The eerie wails floated up from behind the trees. Until it sounded as if the 
whole woods were howling. 

Inhuman howls. Ghostly howls. 

“We’re surrounded, Harry,” Alex whispered, still gripping my arm. 
“Whatever it is, it’s got us surrounded.” 



17 


“Owwooooooo. ” 

The frightening wails rose up from the trees. 

“Run!” I whispered to Alex. “To the main lodge. Maybe we can find Uncle 
Marv. Maybe—” 

Heading into the fog, we started running toward the lodge. 

But the howls followed us. And grew louder. 

I heard the heavy thud of footsteps behind us, tromping over the grass. 

We can’t escape, I realized. 

Alex and I both turned at the same time. 

And saw Elvis, Sam, and Joey—grinning as they ran after us. 

Sam cupped his hands around his mouth and let out a long, ghostly howl. 
Laughing, Elvis and Joey tossed back their heads and howled too. 

“You jerks!” I screamed, swinging a fist at them. 

I could feel the blood mshing to my face. 

I felt ready to explode. I wanted to punch those three clowns. And kick 
them. And pound their grinning faces. 

“Gotcha!” Elvis cried. “Gotcha!” He turned to Sam and Joey. “Look at 
them! They’re shaking! Oh, wow! They’re shaking!” 

Sam and Joey laughed gleefully. “Did you think there were wolves in the 
woods?” Sam asked. 

“Or ghosts? Did you think we were ghosts?” Joey demanded. 

“Shut up,” I replied. 

Alex didn’t say a word. He lowered his eyes to the ground. I could see that 
he was as embarrassed as I was. 

“Owwoooooo!” Elvis uttered another high-pitched howl. He threw his arms 
around my brother’s waist and wrestled him to the ground. 

“Get off. Get off!” Alex cried angrily. 

The two of them wrestled around in the wet grass. 

“Did I scare you?” Elvis demanded breathlessly. “Admit it, Alex. You 
thought it was a ghost, right? Right?” 

Alex refused to reply. He let out a groan and heaved Elvis off him. They 



wrestled some more. 

Sam and Joey stepped up beside me, grinning. Very pleased with 
themselves. 

“You guys aren’t funny,” I grumbled. “That was so babyish. Really.” 

Joey slapped Sam a high five. “Babyish?” he cried. “If it was so babyish, 
why did you fall for it?” 

I opened my mouth to reply—but only a choking sound came out. 

Why did I fall for it? I asked myself. 

Why did I let myself get scared by three guys standing behind trees and 
making howling sounds? 

Normally, I would have laughed at such a dumb joke. 

As the five of us walked to the cabin, I thought hard about it. The campers 
and counselors had all been trying to scare Alex and me since we arrived, I 
realized. Even Uncle Marv had tried to scare us with his creepy stories. 

They must have a tradition of trying to scare new campers at Camp Spirit 
Moon, I decided. 

And it works. It really has scared Alex and me. It has made us tense. 
Jumpy. Ready to leap out of our skins at the slightest noise. 

We stepped into the cabin. I clicked the light on. 

Elvis, Sam, and Joey were still laughing, still enjoying their joke. 

Alex and I have got to get it together, I decided. 

We’ve got to shove all the stupid stuff about ghosts out of our heads. 

We don’t believe in ghosts, I told myself. 

We don’t believe in ghosts. We don’t believe in ghosts. 

I repeated that sentence over and over. Like a chant. 

Alex and I don’t believe in ghosts. We’ve never believed in ghosts. 

Never. Never. 

One night later... after a short hike through the woods—I did believe in 
ghosts! 



18 


Alex and I took a lot of teasing the next day. 

Coming out of the mess hall after breakfast, someone tossed a soccer ball at 
me and screamed, “My head! Give me back my head!” 

We had instructional swim in the morning. Joey and Sam and some of the 
other guys started howling like ghosts. Everyone thought it was a riot. 

I saw Lucy hanging out on the shore with some girls from her cabin. The 
other girls were laughing at the ghostly howls. Lucy was the only one who didn’t 
laugh. 

In fact, she had a solemn expression on her face. A thoughtful expression. 

Several times, I caught her staring at me. 

She’s probably thinking about what a total baby I am, I told myself 
unhappily. I’ll bet she feels sorry for me. Because I acted like such a jerk in front 
of everyone on the soccer field last night. 

After instructional swim, I dried myself off. 

Then I wrapped the towel around myself and walked over to Lucy at the 
little boat dock. 

The other girls had wandered away. Lucy stood in her white shorts and T- 
shirt. She had one foot on a plastic canoe, making it bob up and down in the 
shallow water. 

“Hi,” I said. I suddenly realized I didn’t know what to say. 

“Hi,” she replied. 

She didn’t smile. Her dark eyes locked on mine. 

To my surprise, she turned quickly—and ran off. 

“Hey—!” I called. I started to run after her. But stopped when my legs got 
tangled in my towel. “Hey—what’s your problem?” 

She vanished behind the Arts and Crafts cabin. She never looked back. 

I know what her problem is, I told myself sadly. She doesn’t want to be seen 
talking to a total nutcase. To someone who thinks that a girl’s head can roll off. 
And who thinks there are howling ghosts lurking in the woods. 

I wrapped the towel around me. Sam and Joey and some other guys were 
staring at me from the shore. I could see by the grins on their faces that they had 
seen Lucy run away from me. 



“Maybe it’s your breath!” Joey teased. 
They all fell on the ground, howling. 


* * * 


After lunch, we had letter-writing time. The counselors made sure we ah stayed 
in our bunks and wrote letters home to our parents. 

It was a camp rule that we had to write home once a week. “So your parents 
won’t worry about you,” Uncle Marv announced at lunch. “We want them to 
know that you’re having the best summer of your lives—right?” 

“Yohhhhhhhhhh, Spirits!” everyone cheered. 

I wasn’t exactly having the best summer of my life. 

In fact, so far, this was one of the worst. 

But I decided not to write that in my letter home. 

I climbed up to my top bunk and started to think about my letter to Mom 
and Dad. 

Please come and get me, I thought I might write. 

Everyone is weird here. Alex and I are both scared out of our wits. 

No. No way. I couldn’t write that. 

I leaned over the side of the mattress and peered down at my brother. He 
was sitting on his bunk, crouched over his letter. I could see him scribbling 
away. 

“What are you writing?” I called down. 

“I’m telling them about the Camp Spirit Moon talent show,” he replied. 
“How I’m going to be the star. And how I’m going to be in the musical next 
week.” 

“Nice,” I muttered. 

I decided I’d tell my parents only good things, too. Why worry them? Why 
make them think that I’m losing it? 

If Alex isn’t writing about all the weird things, I won’t either, I decided. 

I leaned over my sheet of paper and started my letter: 

Dear Mom and Dad, 

Camp Spirit Moon is a lot more exciting than I ever dreamed.... 

“Tonight’s after-dinner activity is a night hike,” Uncle Marv announced. 

A cheer shook the wooden rafters of the huge mess hah. 



“Where are we going to hike?” someone called out. 

Uncle Marv grinned. “Deep, deep into the woods.” 

Of course, that answer reminded everyone of Uncle Marv’s ghost story. 
Some kids cheered. Others laughed. 

Alex and I exchanged glances. 

But the hike turned out to be fun. A full moon made the woods glow. We 
followed a path that curved around the lake. 

Everyone seemed in a good mood. We sang the camp song so many times, I 
almost learned the words! 

About halfway around the lake, two deer stepped out onto the path. A 
mother and her doe. 

The little one was so cute. It looked just like Bambi. 

The two deer stared at us. They turned up their noses, as if to say, “What are 
you doing in our woods?” 

Then they calmly loped into the trees. 

The path headed through a small, round clearing. As we stepped out of the 
trees, the ground appeared to light up. The moonlight poured down so brightly, I 
felt as if I could see every bush, every weed, every blade of grass. 

It was really awesome. 

I started to relax. Sam, Joey, and I walked along singing, making up funny 
words to songs we knew. We sang “On Top of Spaghetti” about twenty times— 
until kids begged us to stop singing it! 

Why have I been so crazy? I asked myself. 

I’ve made some cool new friends here at Camp Spirit Moon. I’m having an 
excellent time. 

I felt great until we returned to camp. 

The black fog had started to roll in. It greeted us, wrapping its cold, wet 
mists around us, darkening the sky, the ground, the whole camp. 

“Lights Out in ten minutes,” Uncle Marv announced. 

Kids scampered to their cabins. 

But two strong arms held me from behind. Held me back. 

“Hey—!” I cried out. I felt myself being pulled into the trees. 

“Ssshhhhh,” someone whispered in my ear. 

I spun around to find Lucy holding onto me. “What are you doing?” I 
whispered. “We have to go to our bunks. We have to get ready for—” 

“Ssshhhhhh,” she hissed again in my ear. 



Her dark eyes searched my face. Were those tears staining her pale cheeks? 
Clouds of fog rolled around us. 

She loosened her grip on my arms. But her eyes stayed on mine. “Harry, 
you’ve got to help me,” she whispered. 

I swallowed hard. “Lucy, what’s wrong?” 

“I think you know,” she said softly. “It’s all true. What you think. It’s true.” 

I didn’t understand. I stared back at her with my mouth open. 

“We’re ghosts, Harry,” Lucy told me. “We’re all ghosts at this camp.” 

“But, Lucy—” I started. 

“Yes.” She nodded sadly. “Yes. Yes. Yes. I’m a ghost too.” 



19 


The trees disappeared behind the fog. The moonlight made Lucy’s eyes sparkle 
like dark jewels. But the light faded from her eyes as the fog covered the moon. 

I didn’t blink. I didn’t move. I suddenly felt as wooden as the trees hiding 
behind the swirling fog. 

“You—you’re joking, right?” I stammered. “This is one of those great 
Camp Spirit Moon jokes?” 

But I knew the answer. 

I could read the answer in her dark eyes. In her trembling mouth. In her 
pale, pale skin. 

“I’m a ghost,” she repeated sadly. “The stories—they’re true, Harry.” 

But I don’t believe in ghosts! 

That’s what I almost blurted out. 

But how could I not believe in ghosts when one stood right in front of me, 
staring into my face? 

How could I not believe in Lucy? 

“I believe you,” I whispered. 

She sighed. She turned her face away. 

“How did it happen?” I asked. 

“Just as Uncle Marv told in the story,” she replied. “We were sitting around 
the campfire. All of us. Just like the other night. The fog rolled in. Such a dark, 
heavy fog.” 

She sighed again. Even in the darkness, I could see the tears glistening in 
her eyes. 

“When the fog finally floated away,” Lucy continued, “we were all dead. 
All ghosts. We’ve been out here ever since. I can’t explain any more. I don’t 
know any more.” 

“But—when did it happen?” I demanded. “How long... how long have you 
been a ghost, Lucy?” 

She shrugged. “I don’t know. I’ve lost track of time. There is no time when 
you’re a ghost. There’s just one day and then the next. And then the next. 
Forever, I guess.” 

I stared at her without speaking. 



Chill after chill swept down my back. My whole body was shaking. I didn’t 
even try to stop it. 

I reached out and grabbed her hand. 

I guess I wanted to see if she was real or not. One last test to see if she was 
pulling a joke. 

“Oh!” I dropped her hand as its icy cold shot through me. So cold. Her hand 
—as cold as the black fog. 

“You believe me now?” she asked softly. Once again her dark eyes studied 
my face. 

I nodded. “I—I believe you,” I stammered. “I believe you, Lucy.” 

She didn’t reply. 

I could still feel the cold of her hand on my fingers. 

“The blue puddles,” I murmured. “The sticky blue puddles on the cabin 
floor. Do you know what they are?” 

“Yes,” she replied. “Those puddles are drops of protoplasm.” 

“Huh? Protoplasm?” 

She nodded. “The puddles are made when we materialize. When we make 
ourselves visible.” 

She twisted her face into a sorrowful frown. “It takes so much strength to 
make ourselves visible. So much energy. The protoplasm puddles are made when 
we use that energy.” 

I didn’t really understand. 

But I knew when I stepped in them that the slimy blue puddles were 
something strange. Something inhuman. 

Traces of ghosts. 

“And the things Alex and I saw?” I demanded. “Kids floating above their 
bunks? Their eyes glowing like spotlights? Kids stabbing themselves and not 
bleeding? Not crying out in pain?” 

“Some of the kids tried to scare you,” Lucy confessed. “They only wanted a 
little fun, Harry. It isn’t fun being a ghost. Believe me. It isn’t fun spending day 
after day after day out here, knowing you aren’t real anymore. Knowing you will 
never grow. Knowing you will never change.” She uttered a loud sob from deep 
in her chest. “Knowing you will never have a lifel” 

“I—I’m so sorry,” I stammered. 

Her expression changed. 

Her eyes narrowed. Her mouth twisted into an unpleasant sneer. 



I took a step back, suddenly afraid. 

“Help me, Harry,” Lucy whispered. “I can’t stand it anymore. You’ve got to 
help me get away from here.” 

“Get away?” I cried, taking another step back. “How?” 

“You’ve got to let me possess your mind,” Lucy insisted. “You’ve got to let 
me take over your body!” 



20 


“No!” I gasped. 

Panic shot through my body. I felt every muscle tense. The blood throbbed 
at my temples. 

“I need to take over your mind, Harry,” Lucy repeated, stepping toward me. 
“Please. Please help me.” 

“No!” I uttered again. 

I wanted to turn and run. But I couldn’t move. 

My legs felt like Jell-O. My whole body shook. 

I don’t believe in ghosts. 

That thought flashed into my mind. 

But it wasn’t true anymore. 

I stood at the edge of the woods—staring at Lucy. Staring at Lucy’s ghost. 

The fog swept around us. 

Again, I tried to run. But my legs wouldn’t cooperate. 

“Wh-what do you want to do to me?” I finally choked out. “Why do you 
have to take over my mind?” 

“It’s my only way to escape,” Lucy replied. Her eyes locked on mine. “My 
only way.” 

“Why don’t you just run away?” I demanded. 

She sighed. “If I try to leave the camp by myself, I’ll disappear. If I try to 
leave the others, I’ll fade away. I’ll join the mist, be part of the fog.” 

“I—I don’t understand,” I stammered. 

I took a step back. The fog seemed to tighten around me, cold and wet. 

Lucy stood two feet in front of me. But I could barely see her. She seemed 
to shimmer in and out with the fog. 

“I need help.” Her voice floated softly. I had to struggle to hear her. “The 
only way a ghost can escape is to take over the mind of a living person.” 

“But—that’s impossible !” I screeched. 

What a dumb thing to say, I scolded myself. Seeing a ghost is impossible! 
Everything happening to me is impossible. 

But it’s happening. 



“I need to possess the mind and body of a living boy or girl,” Lucy 
explained. “I need to take over your body, Harry. I need you to take me away 
from here.” 

“No!” I screamed again. “I can’t! I mean...” My heart thudded so hard, I 
could barely speak. 

“I can’t let you take over my mind,” I finally managed to say. “If you do 
that, I won’t be me anymore.” 

I started to back away. 

I have to get to the cabin, I decided. I have to get Alex. We have to run 
away from this camp. As fast as we can. 

“Don’t be scared,” Lucy pleaded. She followed me. The fog circled us, as if 
holding us inside. 

“Don’t be scared,” Lucy said. “As soon as we are far away from here, I’ll 
get out. I’ll leave your mind. I’ll leave your body. I promise, Harry. As soon as 
we escape this camp, I’ll go away. You will be yourself again. You will be 
perfectly okay.” 

I stopped backing up. My whole body trembled. The fog washed its cold 
mist over me. 

“Please, Harry,” Lucy begged. “Please. I promise you’ll be okay. I 
promise.” 

I squinted at her through the rising mists. 

Should I do it? 

Should I let Lucy take over my mind? 

Will she give it back? 

Can I believe her? 



21 


Lucy floated in front of me. Her dark eyes pleaded with me. “Please,” she 
whispered. 

“No. I’m sorry. I can’t.” The words escaped my lips almost before I thought 
them. “I can’t, Lucy.” 

She shut her eyes. I could see the muscles in her jaw tighten as she gritted 
her teeth. 

“I’m sorry,” I repeated, backing up. 

“I’m sorry too,” she said coldly. Her eyes narrowed. Her lips formed a 
sneer. “I’m really sorry, Harry. But you don’t have a choice. You have to help 
me!” 

“No! No way!” 

I turned and tried to run. 

But something held me back. The fog. It tightened around me. 

The thick, wet mist. A choking mist. It drew around me, pushing me, 
holding me in place. 

I tried to scream for help. But the fog muffled my cry. 

Lucy vanished behind the black fog. 

And then I felt something cold on the top of my head. 

My hair tingled. 

I reached up with both hands. And felt ice. As if a frost had settled over my 

hair. 

“No!” I screamed. “Lucy—no!” 

The cold sank down. My scalp itched. My face froze. 

I rubbed my cheeks. 

Numb. 

Cold and numb. 

“Lucy—please!” I begged. 

I could feel her—so light, so cold—settling into my body. Sinking into my 
brain. 

I could feel her. And I could feel myself slipping away. 

Slipping... slipping... 



As if drifting into a deep sleep. 

The cold spreading over me. Sweeping down my neck. Down my chest. 
“Nooooo!” I uttered a long howl of protest. 

I shut my eyes tight. I knew I had to concentrate. I had to think hard. I had 
to keep awake. I couldn’t let myself fade away. 

I couldn’t let her take over. 

I couldn’t let her shove my mind aside. And take control. Take control of 
my body. 

I set my jaw hard. And kept my eyes shut. And tightened every muscle. 

No! I thought. No—you can’t do this to me, Lucy! 

You can’t take my mind! 

You can’t take over. You can’t—because I won’t let you! 

The cold settled over me. My skin tingled. I felt numb all over. 

And so sleepy... so sleepy... 



22 


“Nooooo!” I tossed back my head in another long howl. 

If I can keep screaming, I can keep awake, I told myself. 

And I can fight Lucy off. I can force her away. 

“Noooooooo!” I wailed into the spinning, whirling fog. 

“Noooooooo!” 

And I felt the cold start to lift. 

“Noooooo!” 

I squeezed my arms. Rubbed my cheeks. And knew the feeling was 
returning. 

“Noooooo!” 

I suddenly felt lighter. And totally alert. 

I did it! I realized. I fought her off! 

But how long did I have before she tried to take over again? 

I took a deep breath. Then another. 

I’m breathing, I told myself. I’m me—and I’m breathing. 

I felt stronger now. I lowered my head and darted into the fog. 

My sneakers pounded the ground. I made my way to the cabin. 

The lights were out. The other guys were in their bunks. 

I burst inside and let the screen door slam behind me. 

“What’s up?” Sam demanded. 

I didn’t answer him. I ran across the room. Grabbed my brother. Shook him 
hard. “Come on. Hurry,” I ordered. 

“Huh?” Alex squinted up at me sleepily. 

I didn’t say another word. I tossed him his shorts and his sneakers. 

I heard the other guys stirring. Joey sat up in his bed. “Harry—where were 
you?” he asked. 

“Lights Out was ten minutes ago,” Sam said. “You’re going to get us ah in 
trouble.” 

I ignored them. “Alex—hurry!” I whispered. 

As soon as he had his sneakers tied, I grabbed his arm and tugged him to 
the door. “Harry—what’s wrong?” he asked. 



“Where are you two going?” I heard Joey call. 

I pulled Alex outside. The screen door slammed behind us. 

“Run!” I cried. “HI explain later. We have to get out of here—now!” 

“But, Harry—” 

I pulled Alex over the grass. The fog had parted enough to let a trail of 
moonlight slip through. We followed the trail to the woods. 

Our sneakers slipped and slid over the wet grass. The only other sound was 
the chirp of crickets and the rush of wind rattling the pine trees. 

After a minute or two, Alex wanted to stop to catch his breath. 

“No,” I insisted. “Keep moving. They’ll follow us. They’ll find us.” 

“Where are we going?” Alex demanded. 

“Deep into the woods,” I told him. “As far away from that camp as we 

can.” 

“But I can’t keep running, Harry,” Alex cried. “My side hurts and—” 

“They’re all ghosts!” I blurted out. “Alex—I know you won’t believe me— 
but you’ve got to try. The kids. The counselors. Uncle Marv. They’re all ghosts!” 

Alex’s expression grew solemn. “I know,” he replied in a tiny voice. 

“Huh? How do you know?” I demanded. 

We squeezed between two tangled tree trunks. Over the chirp of crickets, I 
could hear the lake washing over the shore just beyond some tall shrubs. 

We’re still too close to the camp, I told myself. 

I pulled my brother in the other direction. Away from the lake. Pushing 
aside tall weeds and shrubs, we made our own path, deeper into the woods. 

“Alex—how do you know?” I repeated. 

“Elvis told me,” he replied, wiping sweat off his forehead with his arm. 

We ducked under a tall thorn bush. Thorns scraped the top of my head. I 
ignored the pain and kept moving. 

“Elvis said the ghost story about the fog was true,” Alex continued. “I 
thought he was just trying to scare me. But then he—he—” Alex’s voice trailed 
off. 

We ran into a small clearing. Moonlight made the grass glow like silver. My 
eyes flashed in one direction, then the other. I couldn’t decide which way to run. 

I swatted a mosquito off my arm. “What did Elvis do?” I asked Alex. 

Alex raked back his dark hair. “He tried to take over my mind,” he told me 
in a trembling voice. “He floated into the fog. And then I started to feel really 
cold.” 



Twigs snapped. Dry leaves crackled. 

Footsteps? 

I shoved Alex back into the trees. Out of the clearing. 

We pressed against a wide tree trunk and listened. 

Silence now. 

“Maybe it was a squirrel, or a chipmunk, or something,” Alex whispered. 
“Maybe,” I replied, listening hard. 

Moonlight trickled through the treetops. It made shadows dance over the 
smooth clearing. 

“We have to keep going,” I said. “We’re still too close to the camp. If the 
ghosts follow us...” 

I didn’t finish my thought. I didn’t want to think about what would happen 
if the ghosts followed us. If they caught us... 

“Which way is the highway?” Alex asked, his eyes searching the trees. “It 
isn’t too far from the camp—right? If we can get to the highway, someone will 
give us a ride.” 

“Good idea,” I said. Why hadn’t I thought of that? 

Now here we were, in the middle of the woods. Far from the highway. 

I didn’t even know which direction to go to find it. 

“It must be back that way,” Alex suggested, pointing. 

“No. That’s the way back to the camp,” I argued. 

Alex started to reply—but a loud thumping sound made him stop. “Did you 
hear that?” he whispered. 

I did. 

And then I heard it again. 

A loud thump. Very close by. 

“Is it an animal?” I cried softly. 

“I—I don’t think so,” Alex stammered. 

KA-THUMP. 

Louder. 

Is it a ghost? I wondered. 

Has one of them found us? 

“Quick—this way!” I urged. I grabbed Alex by the wrist and tugged him 

hard. 

We had to get away from whatever was making that frightening noise. 



KA-THUMP. 

Louder. 

“We’re going the wrong way!” I cried. 

We spun around and darted back into the clearing. 

KA-THUMP. 

“Which way?” Alex screeched. “Which way? It—it’s everywhere !” 
KA-THUMP 

And then—from somewhere just ahead of us—a deep, booming voice 
growled, “WHY ARE YOU STANDING ON MY HEART?” 



23 


The ground tumbled and shook. 

Alex and I both let out terrified cries. 

But our cries were drowned out by a rumbling sound that quickly rose to a 

roar. 

The ground gave way beneath us. 

We both raised our arms high as we toppled over. 

I landed on my hands and knees. Alex fell onto his back. The ground 
trembled and tossed, tumbling us around. 

“It—it’s the monsterl” Alex shrieked. 

But that’s impossible! I thought, struggling to my feet. 

That monster is from a story. A dumb camp ghost story. 

It can’t be here in the woods. 

I helped pull Alex up. But the ground shook again, and we both fell to our 
knees. 

KA-THUMP. KA-THUMP. 

“It can’t be real!” I cried. “It can’t—” 

My mouth dropped open in horror as a huge, hairy head raised itself in front 
of us. Its eyes glowed as red as flames—round, terrifying, glowing eyes set deep 
in an ugly, growling face. The creature glared furiously at us. 

“Th-the monster!” Alex stuttered. 

We were both on our knees, bouncing helplessly on the rolling, tossing 
ground. 

Was it the ground? Or the monster’s chest? 

The creature opened an enormous cavern of a mouth. It flashed rows and 
rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

Slowly it raised its head, moving closer. Closer. 

Opening its hairy jaws wide. Preparing to swallow us as we frantically 
struggled to scramble away. 

“Harry—! Harry—!” Alex shrieked my name. “It’s going to eat us! It’s 
going to swallow us whole!” 

And then—in a flash—I had an idea. 



24 


The huge monster uttered a low growl. 

Its hairy mouth opened wider. An enormous purple tongue rolled out. I 
gasped when I saw that the tongue was covered in prickly burrs. 

“Look out, Alex!” I cried. 

Too late. 

The ground tossed, bouncing us both into the air. We landed with a hard 
plop on the tongue. 

“Owwww!” we both howled. It felt like a cactus! 

Slowly, the prickly purple tongue began to slide, carrying us into the 
creature’s open mouth. 

“We don’t believe in monsters,” I told Alex. 

I had to shout over the bellowing of the hungry monster. The tongue carried 
us closer. Closer to the rows of jagged yellow teeth. 

“We don’t believe in this monster!” I shouted. “It is just made up. Part of a 
story. If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!” 

Alex’s whole body shook. He hunched over, making himself into a tight 
ball. “It looks pretty real!” he choked out. 

The tongue dragged us closer. I could smell the monster’s foul breath. I 
could see black stains on its jagged teeth. 

“Concentrate,” I instructed my brother. “We don’t believe in you. We don’t 
believe in you.” 

Alex and I began chanting those words, over and over. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

The purple tongue carried us into the huge mouth. I tried to grab onto the 
teeth. But they were too slippery. 

My hands slid off. I felt myself being swallowed. 

Down, down. Into sour darkness. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” Alex and I continued to 
chant. 

But our voices were muffled as we slid down the creature’s throbbing 
throat. 



“Harry—it swallowed us!” Alex wailed. 

“Keep chanting,” I ordered him. “If we don’t believe in it, it can’t exist!” 
“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

A glob of thick saliva rolled over me. I gagged as it clung to my clothes, my 
skin—hot and sticky. 

The walls of the throat throbbed harder. 

Pulling us down. Down. 

Down into the vast, churning gurgling pit of a stomach below. 

“Ohhhh.” Alex let out a long, defeated sigh. He sank to his knees. He was 
covered in thick saliva too. 

“Keep chanting! It’s got to work! It’s got to!” I screamed. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

“We don’t believe in you! ” 

Alex and I both opened our mouths in screams of horror as we began to fall. 
Falling, falling, into the churning stomach below. 



25 


I shut my eyes. 

And waited for the splash. Waited for the crash. 

Waited to hit the stomach floor. 

Waited. 

When I opened my eyes, I was standing on the ground. Standing next to 
Alex in a grassy clearing. 

The pine trees shivered in the breeze. A full moon poked out from behind 
wispy clouds. 

“Hey—!” I cried. I was so happy to hear my own voice! 

So happy to see the sky. The ground. So happy to breathe the cool air. 

Alex started spinning. Spinning like a top. Laughing at the top of his lungs. 
“We didn’t believe in you!” he cried gleefully. “We didn’t believe in you—and it 
worked!” 

We were both so thrilled. So excited that the monster had vanished. 

Poof! A puff of imagination. 

I started to spin with Alex. Spinning and laughing. 

We stopped when we realized we were no longer alone. 

I let out a startled cry when I saw the faces all around us. The pale, pale 
faces with their glowing eyes. 

I recognized Sam, and Joe, and Lucy, and Elvis. 

I moved close to Alex as the campers—the ghost campers—moved to form 
a circle around us. To trap us. 

Uncle Marv moved into the circle. His tiny eyes glowed red as fire. He 
narrowed them angrily at Alex and me. 

“Capture them!” he bellowed. “Take them back to camp. No one ever 
escapes Camp Spirit Moon.” 

Several counselors moved quickly to grab us. 

We couldn’t move. There was nowhere to run. 

“What are you going to do to us?” I cried. 



26 


“We need living kids,” Unde Marv boomed. “We cannot allow living kids to 
escape. Unless they carry one of us with them.” 

“Noooo!” Alex wailed. “You can’t take over my mind! You can’t! I won’t 
let you!” 

The ghostly circle tightened. The ghost campers moved in on us. 

I tried to stop my legs from shaking. Tried to slow my pounding heart. 

“Alex—we don’t believe in them, either,” I whispered. 

He stared at me, confused for a moment. Then he understood. 

We made the monster vanish by not believing in him. We could do the same 
thing to the ghost campers. 

“Grab them. Take them back to camp,” Uncle Marv ordered the counselors. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you,” Alex and I started to 
chant. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

I stared hard at the circle of ghostly faces. Waited for them to disappear. 

I chanted with my brother. Chanted faster. Chanted louder. 

“We don’t believe in you. We don’t believe in you.” 

I shut my eyes. Shut them tight. 

And when I opened them... 

The ghosts were still there. 

“You can’t make us disappear, Harry,” Lucy said, stepping into the circle. 
She narrowed her eyes at me. They glittered cold and silvery in the moonlight. 

“You made the monster disappear because it wasn’t real, just one of our 
ghost tricks,” Lucy explained. “We made you see it. But we’re all real! All of us! 
And we’re not going to vanish in a puff of smoke.” 

“We’re not going away,” Elvis added, moving close to my brother. “In fact, 
we’re coming closer. A lot closer.” 

“I’m taking over your mind,” Lucy whispered to me. “I’m going to escape 
Camp Spirit Moon inside your mind and body.” 

“Nooo! No—please!” I protested. 

I tried to back up. But the other ghost campers had me trapped. 



“You can’t! I won’t let you!” I shrieked to Lucy, frozen in terror. 

“Go away!” Alex shouted at Elvis. 

The woods darkened as clouds swept over the moon. All around me, the 
ghostly eyes appeared to glow brighter. 

I saw Elvis reach for my brother. 

And then my view was blocked by Lucy. She floated up. Up off the ground. 
Up over me. 

“No! Stay away! Stay away!” I screamed. 

But I felt my hair tingle. 

I felt the cold sweep down over me. Down, down. 

I felt Lucy’s ghostly cold. Felt her slipping into my mind. 

Slipping down, down. Taking over. 

And I knew I couldn’t escape. 



27 


“Get away, Lucy. I’m going first!” I heard a voice shout. 

“No way!” a boy cried. “Move out of the way. Uncle Marv said I could be 
first!” 

I could feel the cold sweep up from my body. I opened my eyes—and saw 
Lucy back on the ground. 

Other kids tugged her away. 

“Let go of me!” Lucy screamed, pulling back. “I saw him first!” 

“Finders keepers!” another ghostly girl cried. 

They are fighting over me, I realized. 

They pulled Lucy away. And now they’re fighting to see who will take over 
my mind. 

“Hey—let go!” I heard a ghostly girl cry. I saw her wrestling with another 

girl. 

The ghosts were wrestling and fighting, shoving and clawing at each other. 
I saw the counselors join the fight. 

“Stop this! Stop this!” Uncle Marv bellowed. 

He tried to pull the fighting campers apart. 

But they ignored him and continued to battle. 

And as I stared in horror, they began to spin around me. Faster and faster. A 
ghostly circle of wrestling, fighting, shrieking campers. Boys and girls, 
counselors and Uncle Marv, spinning, struggling, clawing. 

Faster. Faster. 

They spun around and around my brother and me. 

Until they became a swirl of white light. 

And then the light faded. Faded to gray smoke. 

Wisps of smoke that floated to the trees. And disappeared in the trembling 
branches. 

Alex and I stood watching until the last wisp of smoke had floated away. 
“They’re gone,” I choked out. “They fought each other. And they’re gone. 
All of them.” 

I shook my head. I drew in a deep breath of fresh air. 



My heart was still pounding. My whole body trembled. 

But I was okay. Alex and I were okay. 

“Are they really gone?” Alex asked in a tiny voice. 

“Yes. Let’s go,” I said, taking his arm. “Come on. Hurry. Let’s get away 
from here.” 

He followed me eagerly. “Where are we going?” 

“To the highway,” I said. “We’ll walk past the camp to the highway. And 
we’ll stop the first car that comes by. We’ll get to a phone. We’ll call Mom and 
Dad.” 

I slapped my brother on the back. “We’ll be okay, Alex!” I cried happily. 
“We’ll be home before you know it!” 

We walked quickly through the woods. Pushing bushes and weeds out of 
the way. Making our own path. 

As we made our way to the highway, Alex started to hum a song to himself. 

“Whoa!” I cried. “Alex, what’s wrong?” 

“Huh?” He stared at me in surprise. 

I stopped and held him in place. “Sing that again,” I ordered. 

He sang a little more. 

Horrible! His singing was horrible. Totally off-key and sour. 

I stared hard into my brother’s eyes. “Elvis—is that you in there?” I cried. 

Elvis’ voice came out of Alex’s mouth. “Please, Harry, don’t tell,” he 
begged. “I swear I’ll never sing again—if you promise not to tell!” 







HOW TO KILL 
A MONSTER 

1 


“Why do we have to go there?” I wailed from the backseat of the car. “Why?” 

“Gretchen, I’ve told you three times why.” Dad sighed. “Your mother and I 
have to go to Atlanta. For work!” 

“I know that,” I replied, leaning over the front seat. “But why can’t we go 
with you? Why do we have to stay with Grandma and Grandpa?” 

“Because we said so,” Mom and Dad declared together. 

Because we said so. Once they said those deadly words, there was no use 
arguing. 

I slumped down in my seat. 

Mom and Dad had some kind of work emergency in Atlanta. They got the 
call this morning. 

It’s not fair, I thought. They get to visit a cool city like Atlanta. And Clark 
—my stepbrother—and I have to go to Mud Town. 

Mud Town. 

Well, it’s not really called Mud Town. But it should be. Because it’s a 
swamp. Grandma Rose and Grandpa Eddie live in southern Georgia—in a 
swamp. 

Can you believe it? 

A swamp. 

I stared out the car window. We’d been riding on highways all day. Now we 
were driving on a narrow road through the swamp. 

It was late afternoon. And the cypress trees began to cast long shadows over 
the marshy grass. 

I stuck my head out the window. A blast of hot, humid air hit my face. I 
ducked back in and turned to Clark. His nose was buried in a comic book. 

Clark is twelve—like me. He’s much shorter than I am. Much shorter. And 
he has curly brown hair, brown eyes, and tons of freckles. He looks exactly like 
Mom. 

I’m kind of tall for my age. I have long, straight blond hair and green eyes. 
I look like Dad. 

My parents divorced when I turned two years old. The same thing happened 
to Clark. My dad and his mom married each other right after our third birthdays, 



and we all moved into a new house together. 

I like my stepmother. And Clark and I get along okay, I guess. He acts like 
a jerk sometimes. Even my friends say so. But I think their brothers act like 
jerks, too. 

I stared at Clark. 

Watched him read. 

His glasses slid down his nose. 

He pushed them up. 

“Clark...” I started. 

“Shhhh.” He waved his hand at me. “I’m at the good part.” 

Clark loves comic books. Scary ones. But he’s not brave—so he’s always 
terrified by the time he finishes. 

I glanced out the window again. 

I stared at the trees. At the branches, all draped in long gray webs. They 
dangled from every tree—curtains of gray. They made the swamp look really 
gloomy. 

Mom told me about the gray webs when we were packing this morning. She 
knows a lot about swamps. She thinks swamps are pretty—in a spooky sort of 
way. 

Mom said the gray webs were actually a swamp plant that grew right on the 
trees. 

A plant that grows on a plant. Weird, I thought. Definitely weird. 

Almost as weird as Grandma and Grandpa. 

“Dad, how come Grandma and Grandpa never visit us?” I asked. “We 
haven’t seen them since we were four.” 

“Well, they’re a little strange.” Dad peered at me through the rearview 
mirror. “They don’t like to travel. They almost never leave their house. And they 
live so far back in the swamp, it’s very hard to visit them.” 

“Oh, wow!” I said. “A sleepover with two strange old hermits.” 

“Smelly, strange old hermits,” Clark mumbled, glancing up from his comic. 

“Clark! Gretchen!” Mom scolded. “Don’t talk about your grandparents that 
way.” 

“They’re not my grandparents. They’re hers.” Clark jerked his head toward 
me. “And they do smell. I can still remember it.” 

I punched my stepbrother in the arm. But he was right. Grandma and 
Grandpa did smell. Like a combination of mildew and mothballs. 



I sank deep into my seat and let out a loud yawn. 

It seemed as if we’d been riding in the car for weeks. And it was really 
crowded back there—with me, Clark, and Charley kind of squished together. 
Charley is our dog—a golden retriever. 

I pushed Charley out of the way and stretched out. 

“Quit shoving him onto me!” Clark complained. His comic book dropped to 
the floor. 

“Sit still, Gretchen,” Mom muttered. “I knew we should have boarded 
Charley.” 

“I tried to find a kennel for him,” Dad said. “But no one could take him at 
the last minute.” 

Clark pushed Charley off his lap and reached down for his comic. But I 
grabbed it first. 

“Oh, brother,” I moaned when I read the title. “Creatures from the Muck? 
How can you read this garbage?” 

“It’s not garbage,” Clark shot back. “It’s really cool. Better than those 
stupid nature magazines you read.” 

“What’s it about?” I asked, flipping through the pages. 

“It’s about some totally gross monsters. Half-human. Half-beast. They set 
traps to catch people. Then they hide under the mud. Near the surface,” Clark 
explained. He grabbed the comic from my hand. 

“Then what happens?” I asked. 

“They wait. They wait as long as it takes—for the humans to fall in their 
traps.” Clark’s voice started to quiver. “Then they force them deep into the 
swamp. And make them their slaves!” 

Clark shuddered. He glanced out the window. Out at the eerie cypress trees 
with their long beards of gray. 

It was growing dark now. The trees’ shadows shifted over the tall grass. 

Clark lowered himself in his seat. He has a wild imagination. He really 
believes the stuff he reads. Then he gets scared—like now. 

“Do they do anything else?” I asked. I wanted Clark to tell me more. He 
was really scaring himself good. 

“Well, at night, the monsters rise up from the mud,” he went on, sliding 
down in his seat some more. “And they drag kids from their beds. They drag 
them into the swamp. They drag them down into the mud. No one ever sees the 
kids again. Ever.” 



Clark was totally freaked now. 

“There really are creatures like that in the swamp. I read about them in 
school,” I lied. “Horrible monsters. Half-alligator, half-human. Covered with 
mud. With spiky scales underneath, hidden. If you just brush against one, the 
scales rip the flesh right off your bones.” 

“Gretchen, stop,” Mom warned. 

Clark hugged Charley close to him. 

“Hey! Clark!” I pointed out the window to an old narrow bridge up ahead. 
Its wooden planks sagged. It looked ready to crumble. “I bet a swamp monster is 
waiting for us under that bridge.” 

Clark gazed out the window at the bridge. He hugged Charley closer to 

him. 

Dad began steering the car over the old wooden planks. They rumbled and 
groaned under the weight. 

I held my breath as we slowly rolled across. This bridge can’t hold us, I 
thought. No way. 

Dad drove very, very slowly. 

It seemed to take forever to ride across. 

Clark clung to Charley. He kept his eyes out the window, glued to the 
bridge. 

When we finally neared the end, I let out a long whoosh of air. 

And then I gasped—as a deafening explosion rocked the car. 

“Nooo!” Clark and I both screamed as the car swerved wildly. 

Skidded out of control. 

It crashed into the side of the old bridge. 

Plowed right through the old wood. 

“We-we’re going down!” Dad cried. 

I shut my eyes as we plunged into the swamp. 



2 


We hit hard, with a loud thud. 

Clark and Charley bounced all over the backseat. When the car finally slid 
to a stop, they were sitting on top of me. 

“Is everyone okay?” Mom asked in a shaky voice. She turned to the back. 
“Uh-huh,” I replied. “I guess.” 

We all sat quietly for a moment. 

Charley broke the silence with a soft whimper. 

“Wh-what happened?” Clark stammered. 

“Flat tire.” Dad sighed. “I hope the spare is okay. There’s no way we’re 
going to get help at night in the middle of a swamp.” 

I leaned out the window to check out the tire. Dad was right. It was totally 

flat. 

Boy, were we lucky, I thought. Lucky this was a low bridge. Otherwise... 
“Okay, everybody out of the car,” Mom interrupted my thoughts. “So Dad 
can change the tire.” 

Clark took a long look out the car window before he opened the door. I 
could tell he was afraid. 

“Better be careful, Clark,” I said as he swung his short, stubby legs out the 
door. “The swamp monster likes low targets.” 

“That’s funny, Gretchen. Really funny. Remind me to laugh.” 

Dad headed for the trunk to find the jack. Mom followed. Clark and I 
stepped into the swamp. 

“Oh, gross!” My brand-new white high-tops sank into the thick black mud. 

I let out a long sigh. 

How could anyone live in a swamp? I wanted to know. It was so gross out 

here. 

The air felt thick and soupy. So hot, it was hard to breathe. 

As I pulled my hair back into a scrunchie, I glanced around. 

I couldn’t see much. The sky had darkened to black. 

Clark and I drifted away from the car. “Let’s explore while Dad fixes the 
tire,” I suggested. 



“I don’t think that’s such a great idea,” Clark murmured. 

“Sure it is,” I urged. “There’s nothing else to do. And it’s better than 
standing around here, waiting. Isn’t it?” 

“I—I guess,” Clark stammered. 

We took a few steps into the swamp. My face began to tingle and itch. 

Mosquitoes! Hundreds of them. 

We ducked and dodged, frantically brushing them off our faces, off our bare 
arms. 

“Yuck! It’s disgusting out here!” Clark cried. “I’m not staying here. I’m 
going to Atlanta!” 

“It’s not this buggy at Grandma’s house,” Mom called out. 

“Oh, sure.” Clark rolled his eyes. “I’m going back to the car.” 

“Come on,” I insisted. “Let’s just see what’s over there.” I pointed to a 
patch of tall grass up ahead. 

I stomped through the mud, glancing over my shoulder—to make sure 
Clark was following me. He was. 

As we reached the grass, we could hear a loud rustling deep in the blades. 
Clark and I peered down, straining to see in the dark. 

“Don’t wander too far,” Dad warned, as he and Mom pulled our luggage 
from the trunk, searching for a flashlight. “There might be snakes out there.” 

“Snakes? Whoa!” Clark jumped away. He started running full speed back to 
the car. 

“Don’t be a baby!” I called after him. “Let’s do some exploring.” 

“No way!” He choked out the words. “And don’t call me a baby.” 

“I’m sorry,” I apologized. “Come on. We’ll walk over to that tree. The one 
that towers over the others. It’s not that far away. Then we’ll come right back,” I 
promised. “Puh-lease.” 

Clark and I started toward the tree. 

We walked slowly. Through the darkness. Through the jungle of cypress 
trees. 

The curtains of gray swayed on the tree branches. They were so thick— 
thick enough to hide behind. 

It would be real easy to get lost in here, I realized. Lost forever. 

I shuddered as the heavy gray curtains brushed against my skin. They felt 
like spiderwebs. Huge, sticky spiderwebs. 

“Come on, Gretchen. Let’s turn back,” Clark pleaded. “It’s gross out here.” 



“Just a little further,” I urged him on. 

We made our way carefully through the trees, sloshing through puddles of 
inky water. 

Tiny bugs buzzed in my ears. Bigger ones bit at my neck. I swatted them 
away. 

I stepped forward—onto a dry, grassy patch of ground. “Whoa!” 

The patch started to move. Started to float across the black water. 

I leaped off—and stumbled on a tree root. No—not a tree root. “Hey, Clark. 
Look at this!” I bent to get a better look. 

“What is that?” Clark kneeled beside me and peered at the knobby form. 
“It’s called a cypress knee,” I explained. “Mom told me about them. They 
grow near the cypress trees. They rise up from the roots.” 

“How come Mom never tells me about these things?” he demanded. 

“I guess she doesn’t want to scare you,” I replied. 

“Yeah, right,” he muttered, pushing up his glasses. “Want to go back now?” 
“We’re almost there. See?” I said, pointing to the tall tree. It stood in a 
small clearing just a few feet away. 

Clark followed me into the clearing. 

The air smelled sour here. 

The night sounds of the swamp echoed in the darkness. We could hear low 
moans. Shrill cries. The moans and cries of swamp creatures, I thought. Hidden 
swamp creatures. 

A shiver ran down my spine. 

I moved deeper into the clearing. The tree with the high branches stood 
right before me. 

Clark stumbled over a log. Stumbled into a black pool of mucky water. 
“That’s it,” he groaned. “I’m outta here.” 

Even in the dark, I could see the frightened expression on Clark’s face. 

It was scary in the swamp. But Clark seemed so petrified that I started to 

giggle. 

And then I heard the footsteps. 

Clark heard them too. 

Heavy, thudding footsteps across the black, misty swamp. 

Charging closer. 

Headed straight for us. 

“Come on!” Clark cried, yanking on my arm. “Time to go!” 



But I didn’t move. I couldn’t move. 

Now I could hear the creature’s breathing. Heavy, rasping breaths. Nearer. 
Nearer. 

It came springing out. From behind the gray-bearded tree limbs. 

A tall black form. A huge swamp creature. Loping toward us. Darker than 
the black swamp mud—with glowing red eyes. 



3 


“Charley—! What are you doing down there?” Mom cried, marching into the 
clearing. “I thought you kids were watching him.” 

Charley? 

I’d forgotten all about Charley. 

Charley was the swamp monster. 

“I’ve been looking all over for you,” Mom snapped angrily. “Didn’t we tell 
you to stay by the car? Dad and I have been searching everywhere.” 

“Sorry, Mom,” I apologized. I couldn’t say any more. Charley leaped on me 
and knocked me down—into the mud. 

“Off! Charley! Off!” I shouted. But he planted his huge paws on my 
shoulders and licked my face. 

I was covered in mud. Totally covered. 

“Come on, boy.” Clark tugged on Charley’s collar. “You were scared, 
Gretchen. You thought Charley was a swamp monster.” Clark laughed. “You 
were really scared.” 

“I—I was not,” I sputtered, wiping the mud from my jeans. “I was just 
trying to scare you.” 

“You were really scared. Just admit it,” Clark insisted. “Just admit it.” 

“I was NOT scared.” My voice started to rise. “Who was the one begging to 
go back?” I reminded him. “You! You! You!” 

“What’s all the fighting about?” Dad demanded. “And what are you two 
doing way out here? Didn’t I tell you to stay near the car?” 

“Um, sorry, Dad,” I apologized. “But we were kind of bored, just waiting 
around.” 

“We! What do you mean we? It was all Gretchen’s idea,” Clark protested. 
“She was the one who wanted to explore the swamp.” 

“That’s enough!” Dad scolded. “Everyone—back to the car.” 

Clark and I argued all the way back. Charley trotted by my side, flinging 
more mud on my jeans. 

The flat was fixed—but now Dad had to get the car back on the road. And it 
wasn’t easy. Every time he stepped on the gas, the tires just spun around and 
around in the thick mud. 



Finally, we all got out and pushed. 

Now Mom and Clark were splattered with mud, too. 

As we drove away, I stared out at the dark, eerie marsh. 

And listened to the night sounds. 

Sharp chitters. 

Low moans. 

Shrill cries. 

I’d heard lots of stories about swamp monsters. And I’d read some ancient 
legends about them. Could they be real? I wondered. Do swamp monsters really 
exist? 

Little did I know that I would soon find out the answer to that question. The 
hard way. 



4 


“Yes. Yes. They do.” 

“No way!” I told Dad. “That can’t be where they live!” 

“That’s their house,” Dad insisted as the car bumped up a narrow sandy 
road. “That’s Grandma and Grandpa’s house.” 

“That can’t be their house.” Clark rubbed his eyes. “It’s a swamp mirage. I 
read about them in Creatures from the Muck. The swamp mud plays tricks on 
your eyes. It makes you see things.” 

See what I mean about Clark? He really does believe the stuff he reads. 

And it was beginning to sound right to me, too. How else could you explain 
Grandma and Grandpa’s house? 

A castle. 

A castle in the middle of a swamp. 

Almost hidden in a grove of dark, towering trees. 

Dad pulled the car up to the front door. I stared at the house in the glow of 
the headlights. 

Three stories high. Built of dark gray stone. A turret rose up on the right 
side. On the left, a sliver of white smoke curled from a blackened chimney. 

“I thought swamp houses were smaller,” I murmured, “and built on stilts.” 

“That’s the way they look in my comic,” Clark agreed. “And what’s with 
the windows?” His voice shook. “Are they vampires or something?” 

I stared at the windows. They were tiny. And I could see only three of them. 
Three tiny windows in the entire house. One on each floor. 

“Come on, kids,” Mom said. “Let’s get your luggage.” 

Mom, Dad, and Clark climbed out of the car and headed for the trunk. I 
stood by the car door with Charley. 

The night air felt cold and damp on my skin. 

I stared up. 

Up at the big dark house. Almost hidden behind the trees. In the middle of 
nowhere. 

And then I heard the howl. A mournful howl. From somewhere deep in the 
swamp. 



A chill swept through me. 

Charley pressed against my leg. I bent to pet him. “What could that be?” I 
whispered to the dog in the dark. “What kind of creature howls like that?” 

“Gretchen. Gretchen.” Mom waved from the front door of the house. 
Everyone else had gone inside. 

“Oh, my,” Grandma said as I stepped into the dim entrance. “This can’t be 
our little Gretchen.” She wrapped her frail arms around me and gave me a big 
hug. 

She smelled just the way I had remembered—musty. I glanced at Clark. He 
rolled his eyes. 

I stepped back and forced a smile. 

“Move aside, Rose,” Grandpa yelled. “Let me get a look at her.” 

“He’s a little hard-of-hearing,” Dad whispered to me. 

Grandpa clasped my hand between his wrinkled fingers. He and Grandma 
seemed so slight. So fragile. 

“We’re really happy you’re here!” Grandma exclaimed. Her blue eyes 
twinkled. “We don’t get many visitors!” 

“For a while, we thought you weren’t coming!” Grandpa shouted. “We 
expected you hours ago.” 

“Flat tire,” Dad explained. 

“Tired?” Grandpa wrapped his arms around Dad. “Well, then come in and 
sit down, son.” 

Clark giggled. Mom shoved an elbow into his side. Grandpa and Grandma 
led us into the living room. 

The room was enormous. Our whole house could probably fit inside it. 

The walls were painted green. Drab green. I stared up at the ceiling. Up at 
an iron chandelier that held twelve candles, in a circle. 

An enormous fireplace took up most of one wall. 

The other walls were covered with black-and-white photographs. Yellowed 
with age. 

Photographs everywhere. Of people I didn’t recognize. Probably dead 
relatives, I thought. 

I glanced through a doorway into the next room. The dining room. It 
appeared to be as big as the living room. Just as dark. Just as dreary. 

Clark and I sat down on a tattered green couch. I felt the old springs sag 
under my weight. Charley groaned and stretched out on the floor at our feet. 



I glanced around the room. At the pictures. At the worn rug. At the shabby 
tables and chairs. The flickering light high above us made our shadows dance on 
the dark walls. 

“This place is creepy,” Clark whispered. “And it really smells bad—worse 
than Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I choked back a laugh. But Clark was right. The room smelled strange. 
Damp and sour. 

Why do two old people want to live like this? I wondered. In this musty, 
dark house. Deep in the swamp. 

“Would anyone like something to drink?” Grandma interrupted my 
thoughts. “How about a nice cup of tea?” 

Clark and I shook our heads no. 

Mom and Dad also said no. They sat opposite us. The stuffing in their 
chairs spilled out the backs. 

“Well, you’re finally here!” Grandpa yelled to us. “It’s just great. So, tell 
me—how come you were late?” 

“Grandpa,” Grandma shouted to him, “no more questions!” Then she turned 
to us. “After such a long trip, you must be starving. Come into the kitchen. I 
made my special chicken pot pie—just for you.” 

We followed Grandma and Grandpa into the kitchen. It looked like all the 
other rooms. Dark and dingy. 

But it didn’t smell as ancient as the other rooms. The tangy aroma of 
chicken pot pie floated through the air. 

Grandma removed eight small pies from the oven. One for each of us—and 
a couple of extras in case we were starving, I guessed. 

Grandma placed one on my plate, and I began to dig right in. I was starving. 

As I lifted the fork to my mouth, Charley sprang up from his place on the 
floor and started to sniff. 

He sniffed our chairs. 

The counter. 

The floor. 

He leaped up to the table and sniffed. 

“Charley, stop!” Dad ordered. “Down!” 

Charley jumped from the table. Then he reared up in front of us—and 
curled his upper lip. 

He let out a growl. 



A low, menacing growl that erupted into loud barking. 

Furious barking. 

“What on earth is wrong with him?” Grandma demanded, frowning at the 

dog. 

“I don’t know,” Dad told her. “He’s never done that before.” 

“What is it, Charley?” I asked. I shoved my chair from the table and 
approached him. 

Charley sniffed the air. 

He barked. 

He sniffed some more. 

A chill of fear washed over me. 

“What is it, boy? What do you smell?” 



5 


I grabbed Charley’s collar. Petted him. Tried to calm him down. But he jerked 
out of my grasp. 

He barked even louder. 

I reached for his collar again and tugged him toward me. His nails scraped 
the floor as he pulled away. 

The more I tugged on his collar, the harder Charley fought. He swung his 
head sharply from side to side. And started to growl. 

“Easy, boy,” I said softly. “Eeea—sy.” 

Nothing worked. 

Finally Clark helped me drag Charley into the living room—where he 
started to settle down. 

“What do you think is wrong with him?” Clark asked as we stroked the 
dog’s head. 

“I don’t know.” I stared down at Charley. Restless now, he turned in circles. 
Then he sat. Then turned in circles. Again and again. 

“I just don’t get it. He’s never done that before. Ever.” 

Clark and I decided to wait in the living room with Charley while Mom and 
Dad finished eating. We weren’t hungry anymore. 

“How’s that dog of yours?” Grandpa came in and sat down next to us. He 
ran his wrinkled fingers through his thinning gray hair. 

“Better,” Clark answered, pushing his glasses up. 

“Pet her?” Grandpa hollered. “Sure! If you think that will help.” 

After dinner, Mom, Dad, Grandma, and Grandpa talked and talked—about 
practically everything that had happened since they last saw each other. Eight 
years ago. 

Clark and I were bored. Really bored. 

“Can we, um, watch television?” Clark finally asked. 

“Oh, sorry, dear,” Grandma apologized. “We don’t have a television.” 

Clark glowered at me—as if it was my fault. 

“Why don’t you call Arnold?” I suggested. Arnold is the biggest nerd in our 
neighborhood. And Clark’s best friend. “Remind him to pick up your new 



comic.” 

“Okay,” Clark grumbled. “Um, where’s the phone?” 

“In town.” Grandma smiled weakly. “We don’t know many people—still 
alive. Doesn’t pay to have a phone. Mr. Donner—at the general store—he takes 
messages for us.” 

“Haven’t seen Donner all week, though,” Grandpa added. “Our car broke 
down. Should be fixed soon. Any day now.” 

No television. 

No phone. 

No car. 

In the middle of a swamp. 

This time it was my turn to glower—at Mom and Dad. 

I put on my angriest face. I was sure they were going to take us to Atlanta 
with them now. Absolutely sure. 

Dad glanced at Mom. He opened his mouth to speak. Then he turned 
toward me. And shrugged an apology. 

“Guess it’s time for bed!” Grandpa checked his watch. “You two have to get 
an early start,” he said to Mom and Dad. 

“Tomorrow you’re going to have so much fun,” Grandma assured Clark and 
me. 

“Yes, indeed,” Grandpa agreed. “This big old house is great to explore. 
You’ll have a real adventure!” 

“And I’m going to bake my famous rhubarb pie!” Grandma exclaimed. 
“You kids can help me. You’ll love it. It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after 
one bite!” 

I heard Clark gulp. 

I groaned—loudly. 

Mom and Dad ignored us. They said good night. And good-bye. They were 
leaving real early in the morning. Probably before we got up. 

We followed Grandma up the dark, creaky old steps and down a long, 
winding hall to our rooms on the second floor. 

Clark’s room was right next to mine. I didn’t have a chance to see what it 
looked like. After Clark went in, Grandma quickly ushered me to my room. 

My room. My gloomy room. 

I set my suitcase down next to the bed and glanced around. The room was 
nearly as big as a gym! And it didn’t have a single window. 



The only light came from a dim yellow bulb in a small lamp next to the 

bed. 

A handmade mg covered the floor. Worn thin in spots, its rings of color 
were dingy with age. 

A warped wooden dresser sat against the wall opposite the bed. It leaned to 
one side. The drawers hung out. 

Abed. A lamp. A dresser. 

Only three pieces of furniture in this huge, windowless room. 

Even the walls were bare. Not a single picture covered the dreary gray 
paint. 

I sat down on the bed. I leaned against the bars of the iron headboard. 

I ran my fingers over the blanket. Scratchy wool. Scratchy wool that 
smelled of mothballs. 

“No way I’m going to use that blanket,” I said out loud. “No way.” But I 
knew I would. The room was cold and damp, and I began to shiver. 

I quickly changed into my pajamas and pulled the smelly old blanket over 
me. 

I twisted and turned. Trying to get comfortable on the lumpy mattress. 

I stared up at the ceiling and listened. Listened to the night sounds of the 
creepy old house. Strange creaking noises that echoed through the old walls. 

Then I heard the howls. 

Frightening animal howls on the other side of the wall. 

The sad howls from the swamp. 

I sat up. 

Were they coming from Clark’s room? 



6 


I listened hard, afraid to move. 

Another long, sad howl. From outside. Not from Clark’s room. 

“Stop it!” I scolded myself. “Clark is the one with the wild imagination. 
Not you!” 

But I couldn’t shut out the eerie howls from the swamp. 

Was it an animal? Was it a swamp monster? 

I pressed the pillows over my face. It took me hours to fall asleep. 

When I woke up, I didn’t know if it was morning—or the middle of the 
night. Without a window, it was impossible to tell. 

I read my watch—8:30. Morning. 

I searched through the suitcase for my new pink T-shirt. I needed something 
to cheer me up—and pink is my favorite color. I pulled on my jeans. Slipped on 
my muddy sneakers. 

I dressed quickly. The room reminded me of a prison cell. I wanted to 
escape fast. 

I opened the bedroom door and peeked into the hall. 

Empty. 

But there, across from my room, I saw a small window. I hadn’t noticed it 
the night before. 

A bright ray of sunshine filtered through the dusty glass. I peered outside— 
into the swamp. 

A heavy mist hung over the red cypress trees, casting a soft, rosy glow over 
the wet land. The glowing mist made the swamp look mysterious and unreal. 

Something purple fluttered on a nearby tree limb. A purple bird. A purple 
bird with a bright orange beak. I’d never seen a bird like that before. 

Then I heard the sounds again. 

The horrible howls. The shrill cries. 

From animals hiding deep in the swamp—all kinds of creatures I’d 
probably never seen before. 

Swamp creatures. 

Swamp monsters. 



I shuddered. Then turned away from the window and headed for Clark’s 
room. 

I knocked on the door. “Clark!” 

No answer. 

“Clark?” 

Silence. 

I burst through the door and let out a cry. 

The sheets on Clark’s bed lay in a tangled mess—as if there had been some 
kind of struggle. 

And now there was nothing left of Clark—nothing but part of his pajamas, 
crumpled on the bed! 



7 


“Noooo!” 

I opened my mouth in a terrified cry. 

“Gretchen—what’s your problem?” 

Clark stepped out from the closet. 

He wore a T-shirt, baseball cap, sneakers, and his pajama bottoms. 

“Uh... n-no problem,” I stammered, my heart still pounding. 

“Then why did you scream?” Clark demanded. “And why do you look so 
weird?” 

“I look weird? You’re the one who looks weird,” I snapped. I pointed to his 
pajama bottoms. “Where are your pants?” 

“I don’t know.” He shook his head. “I think Mom must have packed them 
in your suitcase by mistake.” 

I have to stop letting this big, old house spook me. Clark is the one with the 
wild imagination—not me, I reminded myself again. 

“Come on,” I told my stepbrother. “Let’s go back to my room and look for 
your jeans.” 

On the way down to breakfast, Clark stopped to peer out the hall window. 
The mist had cleared. The dew-covered plants glistened in the sunlight. 

“It looks sort of pretty, doesn’t it?” I murmured. 

“Yeah,” Clark replied. “Pretty. Pretty creepy.” 

The kitchen looked pretty creepy too. It was dark—almost as dark in the 
morning as the night before. But the back door was open and some sun splashed 
on the floor and the walls. 

We could hear the sounds of the swamp through the open door. But I tried 
to ignore them. 

Grandma stood by the stove, a spatula in one hand, a huge plate of 
blueberry pancakes in the other. She set down the spatula and plate and wiped 
her hands on her faded flower apron. Then she gave us each a big good-morning 
hug—smearing Clark with pancake batter. 

I pointed at the stains on his shirt and giggled. Then I glanced down at my 
shirt. My brand-new pink T-shirt. Splotched with blueberry stains. 

I glanced around the kitchen for something to use to clean my shirt. The 



room was a disaster. 

Globs of pancake batter dripped from the stove. Batter covered the 
countertops and stuck to the floor. 

Then I took a good look at Grandma. She was a disaster too. 

Her face was striped—blue and white. Flour and blueberry stains filled the 
creases of her wrinkled cheeks. She had flour streaked across her nose and chin. 

“Did you sleep well?” She smiled, and her blue eyes crinkled. With the 
back of her hand, she wiped a wisp of gray hair from her eyes. Now a glob of 
blueberry batter nested in the thin strands of her hair. 

“I did,” Grandpa answered, as a loud shriek rang out from the swamp. 
“Always do. It’s so quiet and peaceful here.” 

I had to smile. Maybe Grandpa is lucky that he’s hard-of-hearing, I thought. 

Grandpa headed out the door, and Clark and I brushed ourselves off. Then 
we took our seats at the table. 

In the middle of the table sat another plate of blueberry pancakes. This plate 
was even bigger than the one Grandma had been holding. And it was stacked 
high with blueberry pancakes. 

“Grandma must think we eat like pigs,” Clark leaned over and whispered. 
“There’s enough here for fifty people.” 

“I know,” I groaned. “And we’ll have to eat them all. Otherwise, she’ll be 
insulted.” 

“We do?” Clark gulped. 

That’s one of the things I really like about my stepbrother. He believes 
almost everything I tell him. 

“Help yourself,” Grandma chirped, carrying two more plates of pancakes to 
the table. “Don’t be shy.” 

Why did Grandma make all these pancakes? I wondered. There’s no way we 
could eat all of them. No way. 

I placed a few pancakes on my plate. Grandma heaped about ten onto 
Clark’s plate. His face turned green. 

Grandma sat down with us. But her plate remained empty. She didn’t take a 
single pancake. 

All those pancakes and she didn’t even take one. I don’t get it, I thought. / 
just don’t get it. 

“What’s that you’re reading, dear?” She pointed to Clark’s rolled-up comic, 
sticking out of the back pocket of his jeans. 



“Creatures from the Muck, ” he answered between bites. 

“Oh, how interesting,” Grandma replied. “I love to read. So does Grandpa 
Eddie. We read all the time. We love mysteries. ‘There’s nothing like a good 
mystery,’ Grandpa Eddie always says.” 

I jumped up from the table. I just remembered—Grandma and Grandpa’s 
presents were still packed in my suitcase. 

Books! Mysteries! Dad told us they loved them. 

“Be right back!” I excused myself and dashed upstairs. 

I started down the long, winding hall to my room. Then stopped when I 
heard footsteps. 

Who could it be? 

I gazed down the dark hall. I gasped when I spotted a shadow moving 
against the wall. Someone else was up here. Someone was creeping toward me. 



8 


I pressed my back against the wall. Held my breath and listened. 

The shadow slid out of view. 

The footsteps grew softer. 

Still holding my breath, I inched down the dark twisting hallway. I peeked 
around a corner. And saw it. 

The shadow. Nearly shapeless in the dim light. 

It moved slowly along the dark green walls, growing smaller as the 
footsteps faded in the distance. 

I crept swiftly but silently, chasing the shadow through the corridor. 

Whose shadow is it? I wondered. Who else is up here? 

I crept closer. 

The shadow on the wall loomed large again. 

My heartbeat quickened as I chased the mysterious shape. 

The shadow turned another corner. I hurried to the turn as quietly as I could. 
And stopped. 

Whoever it was—stood right there. Just beyond the turn. 

I took a deep breath—and peeked around the corner. 

And saw Grandpa Eddie. 

Grandpa Eddie—carrying a huge platter stacked high with blueberry 
pancakes. 

How did Grandpa get up here? I wondered. I thought I saw him go outside. 

Grandpa came in through another door, I decided. That has to be it. This 
house is huge. It probably has lots of doors and halls and stairways I haven’t 
discovered yet. 

But what was he doing up here carrying an enormous tray of pancakes? 
Where was he taking them? 

What a mystery! 

Grandpa Eddie carefully balanced the big silver tray between his hands as 
he made his way down the hall. 

I have to follow him, I thought. I have to see where he’s going. 

I padded down the hallway. I wasn’t too worried about being quiet now. 



After all, Grandpa didn’t hear too well. 

I walked only a few yards behind him. 

When I heard the sounds, I froze. 

Sniffing. Behind me. Furious sniffing. 

Oh, no! Charley! 

Charley bounded down the hall toward me. Sniffing. Sniffing furiously. 
Then the dog spotted me—and stopped. 

“Good dog,” I whispered, trying to shoo him away. “Go back. Go back.” 

But he broke into a run. Barking his head off. 

I grabbed for his collar as he tried to dodge me—to race down the hall to 
Grandpa. 

I grasped the collar tightly. He barked even louder. 

“Rose?” Grandpa Eddie called out. “Is that you, Rose?” 

“Come on, Charley,” I whispered. “Let’s get out of here.” 

I dragged Charley around the corner—before Grandpa could catch me 
spying on him. Tugging the dog, I ducked into my room. 

I sat down on the scratchy blanket for a second to catch my breath. Then I 
quickly rummaged through my suitcase for Grandma and Grandpa’s mystery 
books. 

Where was Grandpa going with those pancakes? I wondered as I hurried 
down the stairs with the presents. 

Why was he creeping along so silently? 

It was a mystery I had to solve. 

If only I had minded my own business.... 



9 


“Why don’t you two go out and play while I clean up these dishes?” Grandma 
suggested after breakfast. “Then you can help me make my sweet-as-sugar 
rhubarb pie!” 

“Play?” Clark grumbled. “Does she think we’re two years old?” 

“Let’s go out, Clark.” I pulled him through the back door. Hanging out in a 
swamp wasn’t exactly my idea of fun. But anything was better than sitting 
around that creepy old house. 

We stepped into the bright sunlight—and I gasped. The hot, steamy air felt 
like a heavy weight against my skin. I tried to breathe deeply—to shake the 
smothered feeling I had. 

“So what are we going to do?” Clark grumbled, also drawing in a deep 
breath. 

I glanced around and spotted a path. It started at the back of the house and 
trailed into the swamp. 

“Let’s explore a little,” I suggested. 

“I am not walking through a swamp,” Clark declared. “No way.” 

“What are you afraid of? Comic-book monsters?” I teased him. “Creatures 
from the muck?” I laughed. 

“You’re a riot,” Clark muttered, scowling. 

We walked a few steps. The sun filtered through the treetops, casting leafy 
shadows along the trail. 

“Snakes,” Clark admitted. “I’m afraid of snakes.” 

“Don’t worry,” I told him. “I’ll watch out for snakes. You watch out for 
gators.” 

“Gators?” Clark’s eyes opened wide. 

“Yeah, sure,” I replied. “Swamps are filled with man-eating alligators.” 

A voice interrupted us. “Gretchen. Clark. Don’t stray too far.” 

I turned and saw Grandpa. He stood a few yards behind us. 

What was that in his hand? 

A huge saw. Its sharp teeth glinted in the sunlight. 

Grandpa headed toward a small, unfinished shed. It stood a few feet off the 
side of the path, tucked between two tall cypress trees. 



“Okay!” I shouted to Grandpa. “We won’t go far.” 

“Want to help finish the shed?” he yelled, waving the saw. “Building things 
builds confidence, I always say!” 

“Um, maybe later,” I answered. 

“Want to help?” Grandpa shouted again. 

Clark cupped his hands around his mouth and yelled, “LA-TER!” Then he 
turned back toward the path. 

And tripped. 

Over a dark form that rose up quickly, silently from the muddy grass. 



10 


“Gator! Gator!” Clark shrieked. 

Grandpa waved his saw wildly. “Later? Later? Okay!” 

“Help me! Help me! It’s got me!” Clark wailed. 

I peered down. 

Down at the dark shape in the grass. 

And laughed. 

“Cypress knee,” I said calmly. 

Clark turned, his mouth still open in fright. He stared at the knobby form in 
the grass. 

“It’s a cypress limb, poking up from the grass,” I explained. “It’s called a 
cypress knee. I showed you one yesterday. Remember?” 

“I remembered!” he lied. “I just wanted to scare you.” 

I started to crack a joke, but I saw Clark’s whole body trembling as he 
picked himself up. I felt kind of sorry for him. “Let’s go back to the house,” I 
suggested. “Grandma is probably waiting for us. To make her sweet-as-sugar 
rhubarb pie.” 

On the way back, I told Clark about seeing Grandpa upstairs, and the huge 
tray of pancakes he carried. But Clark didn’t think it was all that strange. 

“He probably likes to eat in bed,” he said. “Mom and Dad always like 
breakfast in bed.” 

“Yeah, maybe,” I agreed. But I wasn’t convinced. I wasn’t convinced at all. 

“Well, you two look as if you’ve had fun!” Grandma chirped when we 
walked through the door. 

Clark and I glanced at each other and shrugged. 

“Are you ready to bake?” Grandma smiled. “Everything is ready.” She 
waved at the counter, at the pie ingredients all lined up. 

“Who wants to roll out the dough,” she asked, staring straight at me, “while 
I slice the rhubarb?” 

“I guess I will,” I replied. 

Clark sighed. “Uh, maybe I’ll go into the living room and read my comic,” 
he told Grandma, trying to escape. “Mom says I just get in the way when she 
cooks.” 



“Nonsense!” Grandma replied. “You measure out the sugar. Lots and lots of 
sugar.” 

I rolled out the pie dough. It seemed like an awful lot of dough. But then— 
what did I know? I’m never around when Mom bakes. She says I get in the way 
too. 

When the dough was rolled flat, Grandma took over. “Okay, children. You 
sit down at the table and have a nice glass of milk. I’ll finish up.” 

Clark and I weren’t thirsty. But we didn’t feel like arguing. We drank our 
milk and watched Grandma finish making the pie. 

No—not one pie. Three pies. 

“Grandma, how come you’re making three pies?” I asked. 

“I always like to have a little extra,” she explained. “Just in case company 
drops in.” 

Company? I thought. Company? 

I stared at Grandma. 

Is she totally losing it? 

Who did she think was coming to visit? She lives in the middle of nowhere! 

What is going on around here? I wondered. 

Is Grandma really expecting visitors? 

Why does she make so much extra food? 



11 


“Work builds thirst!” Grandpa announced, banging open the kitchen door. He 
headed for the refrigerator. “See! I’m right!” Grandpa pointed to our empty milk 
glasses. “Are you two ready to help with the shed now?” 

“Eddie, the children didn’t come here to work!” Grandma scolded. “Why 
don’t you two have some fun exploring the house? There are endless rooms. I’m 
sure you’ll find some wonderful treasures.” 

“Great idea!” Grandpa’s face lit up with a smile. But it faded quickly. “Just 
one warning. You’ll find a locked room. At the end of the hall on the third floor. 
Now pay attention, children. Stay away from that room.” 

“Why? What’s in it?” Clark demanded. 

Grandma and Grandpa exchanged worried glances. Grandma’s face turned 
bright pink. 

“It’s a supply room,” Grandpa replied. “We’ve stored away things in there. 
Old things. Fragile things. Things that could easily break. So just stay away.” 

Clark and I took off. We were glad to get away. Grandma Rose and 
Grandpa Eddie were nice—but weird. 

The kitchen, living room, and dining room took up most of the first floor. 
And we’d seen them already. 

There was a library on the first floor too. But the books in there were old 
and dusty. They made me sneeze. Nothing very exciting in there. So Clark and I 
headed upstairs. To the second floor. 

We made our way past our bedrooms. 

Past the little hall window. 

We followed the twists and turns of the dim hallway—until we came to the 
next room. 

Grandma and Grandpa’s bedroom. 

“I don’t think we should go in there,” I told Clark. “I don’t think Grandma 
and Grandpa want us snooping through their things.” 

“Come on!” he urged. “Don’t you want to check it out? For pancake 
crumbs.” He laughed. 

I shoved Clark hard. 

“Hey!” he grumbled. His glasses slid down his nose. “It was just a joke.” 



I left my stepbrother in the hall and opened the door to the next room. The 
door was made of heavy, dark wood. It groaned when I pushed it. 

I fumbled in the dark for the light switch. The room glowed a sickly yellow 
—from a single, dirty bulb, dangling from the ceiling. 

In the dreary light, I could make out cartons. A room full of cartons. Stacks 
and stacks of them. 

“Hey! Maybe there’s some cool stuff in these boxes,” Clark said, pushing 
past me. 

Clark began to pry one open. “Whatever is in here must be pretty big,” he 
said, pointing to the carton’s bulging sides. 

I peered over Clark’s shoulder. The room smelled so musty and sour. I held 
my nose and squinted in the dim light. Waiting for Clark to reveal what was 
inside the box. 

Clark struggled with the cardboard flaps—and finally they sprang open. 

“I don’t believe this!” he exclaimed. 

“What?” I demanded, craning my neck. “What?” 

“Newspapers. Old newspapers,” Clark reported. 

We lifted the top layers of newspapers to reveal—more newspapers. Old, 
yellowed newspapers. 

We opened five more boxes. 

Newspapers. 

All the cartons were stuffed with newspapers. A room filled with cartons 
and cartons of newspapers. Dating way back to before Dad was born. More than 
fifty years of newspapers. 

Why would anyone want to save all this stuff? I wondered. 

“Whoa!” Clark leaned over a box across the room. “You’re not going to 
believe what’s in this one!” 

“What? What’s in it?” 

“Magazines.” Clark grinned. 

My brother was starting to get on my nerves. But I made my way across the 
room. I liked magazines. Old ones and new ones. 

I shoved my hand deep inside the magazine box and lifted out a stack. 

I felt something tickle the palm of my hand. Under the magazines. 

I peeked underneath. 

And screamed. 



12 


Hundreds of cockroaches skittered through my fingers. 

I flung the magazines to the floor. 

I shook my hand hard, trying to shake the ugly brown bugs off. “Help me! ” 
I wailed. “Get them off me!” 

I felt prickly legs scurrying up my arm. 

I struggled to brush them off—but there were dozens of them! 

Clark grabbed a magazine from the floor and tried to swat them off. But as 
he whacked my arm, more roaches flew out from the pages. 

Onto my T-shirt. My neck. My face! 

“Ow! Nooo!” I shrieked. “Help me! Help me!” 

I felt a cockroach skitter across my chin. 

I brushed it off—and slapped one off my cheek. 

Frantic, I grabbed Clark’s comic from his back pocket—and began batting 
at the scurrying cockroaches. Brushing and batting. Brushing and batting. 

“Gretchen! Stop!” I heard Clark scream. “Stop! They’re all off. Stop!” 

Gasping for breath, I peered down. 

He was right. They were gone. 

But my body still itched. I wondered if I would itch forever. 

I went out into the hall and sat on the floor. I had to wait for my heart to 
stop pounding before I could speak. “That was so gross,” I finally moaned. 
“Totally gross.” 

“Tell me about it.” Clark sighed. “Did you have to use my comic?” He held 
it up by a corner. Not sure if it was safe to stuff back in his pocket. 

My skin still felt as if prickly roach legs were crawling all over it. I 
shuddered—and brushed myself off one last time. 

“Okay.” I stood up and peered down the dreary hallway. “Let’s see what’s 
in the next room.” 

“Really?” Clark asked. “You really want to?” 

“Why not?” I told him. “I’m not afraid of little bugs. Are you?” 

Clark hated bugs. I knew he did. Big ones and little ones. But he wouldn’t 
admit it. So he led the way into the next room. 



We pushed open the heavy door—and peered inside. 



13 


“Wow! Look at all this junk!” My stepbrother stood in the middle of the room. 
Spinning round and round. Taking it all in. 

A room filled with toys and games. Really old toys and games. Mountains 
of them. 

In one corner stood a rusty tricycle. The big front tire was missing. 

“I bet this belonged to Dad,” I said. It was hard to imagine Dad as a little 
kid, riding this trike. 

I honked the horn. It still worked. 

Clark pulled out a dusty chess set from a banged-up wooden box. He began 
setting up the board while I hunted through the rest of the junk. 

I found a teddy bear with its head badly twisted out of shape. 

A box that held a single roller skate. 

A stuffed toy monkey with one of its arms yanked off. 

I rummaged through bags and bags of little toy soldiers, their uniforms 
faded, their faces rubbed off. 

Then I spotted an antique toy chest. It had a golden carousel painted on it, 
dulled with age. 

I lifted the dusty lid. A porcelain doll rested face down inside the chest. 

I lifted her gently. And turned her face toward me. 

Fine cracks ran across her delicate cheeks. A small chip marred the tip of 
her nose. 

Then I stared into her eyes—and gasped. 

She had no eyes. 

No eyes at all. 

Just two black holes cut out of the space below her small forehead. Two 
gaping black holes. 

“These are Grandma’s treasures?” I croaked. “It’s all junk!” 

I dropped the doll into the chest. 

And heard a squeak. 

From the other side of the room. Next to the door. 

I turned and saw a rocking horse, rocking back and forth. 



“Clark, did you push that horse?” I demanded. 

“No,” Clark replied, softly, watching the horse rock back and forth. Back 
and forth. Squeaking. 

“Let’s get out of here,” I said. “This room is starting to give me the creeps.” 
“Me, too,” Clark said. “Someone beheaded the queen in the chess set. 
Chewed her head right off.” 

Clark leaped over some boxes and jumped into the hall. 

I turned for one last look before I clicked off the light. Totally creepy. 
“Clark?” 

Where did he go? 

I glanced up and down the long hall. 

No sign of him. But he was just there. Standing in the doorway. 

“Clark? Where are you?” 

I walked down the corridor, following its twists and turns. 

A queasy feeling settled in my stomach. My heart began to race. 

“Clark? This isn’t funny.” 

No answer. 

“Clark? Where are you?” 



14 


“BOOOOOO!” 

I let out a long shrill scream. 

Clark stepped out from behind me, bent over with laughter. “Gotcha!” he 
cried. “Gotcha big-time!” 

“That wasn’t funny, Clark,” I growled at him. “It was just dumb. I wasn’t 
even scared.” 

He rolled his eyes. “Why can’t you just admit it, Gretchen? Admit it—just 
once. You were totally scared.” 

“Not!” I insisted. “You just surprised me. That’s all.” I stuffed my hands in 
my jeans pockets so Clark wouldn’t see them shaking. “You’re a real jerk,” I told 
him. 

“Well, Grandma told us to have fun. And that was fun!” he teased. “So 
where should we go now?” 

“We aren’t going anywhere,” I told him angrily. “I’m going to hide in my 
room and read.” 

“Hey! Great idea!” Clark exclaimed. “Let’s play hide-and-seek!” 

“Play? Did I hear you say play?” I asked sarcastically. “I thought you said 
that only two-year-olds play. ” 

“This is different,” Clark explained. “Hide-and-seek in this house is 
definitely not for babies.” 

“Clark, I am not—” 

He didn’t let me finish. “NOT IT!” he cried. Then he took off, running 
down the hall to hide. 

“I don’t want to be It,” I grumbled. “I don’t want to play hide-and-seek.” 

Okay, I told myself. Get this over with. Find Clark fast. Then you can go to 
your room and read. 

I started to count by fives. 

“Five, ten, fifteen, twenty...” I called out, counting to one hundred. Then I 
started down the dark hall. When I reached the end, the hall turned—revealing 
an old winding staircase that led up to the third floor. 

I started to climb the dusty, wooden stairs. They wound round and round. I 
looked up ahead, but I couldn’t see where the steps led. 



I couldn’t even see my own feet. It was totally black in there. 

The stairs creaked and groaned with every step I took. A thick layer of 
grime coated the banister—but I held onto it anyway. And I groped my way up 
—up the dark, winding staircase. 

Breathing hard, I climbed higher and higher. The dust in the air stuck in my 
throat. It smelled sour and old. 

I finally reached the top of the staircase and peered down the third-floor 
hallway. It looked like the one below—with the same twists and turns. 

The same dark green walls. The same dim shaft of light that entered from a 
single window. 

I slowly moved down the hall and opened the first door I reached. 

It was a huge room. Almost as big as the living room. But totally empty. 

The next room was just as large. Just as empty. 

I moved carefully down the dark hall. 

It was really hot up here. Beads of sweat dripped down the sides of my 
face. I blotted them with the sleeve of my T-shirt. 

The next room I entered was small. Well, not exactly small, but the smallest 
I’d seen so far. Against one wall stood an old player piano. 

If it wasn’t so gross up here, I’d come back to this room, I thought. I’d 
come back and see if the old piano worked. 

But right now all I wanted to do was find Clark in his hiding place. And 
leave. 

I walked a little farther. 

Rounded a corner. 

And choked on a scream—as I started to fall. 

No floor! 

No floor at all beneath my feet! 

My hand shot out in the dark, fumbling for something to grab onto. 

I grabbed something hard—an old banister. 

And held on. Held on. Held on. 

I gripped it tightly with both hands and swung myself back. Back up to the 
solid hallway floor. 

My heart pounding, I stared down into the gaping black hole where I had 
fallen. A hole where an old staircase once stood. Now rotted away with age. 

I let out a long sigh. “I’ll get you for this, Clark,” I cried out loud. “I told 
you I didn’t want to play.” 



I hurried down the hall, searching for my stepbrother. Searching quickly. To 
get this dumb game over with. 

And then I stopped. 

And stared—at the door at the end of the hall. 

A door with a shiny metal lock. 

I moved slowly toward the door. A tarnished silver key rested in the 
keyhole. 

What is inside there? I wondered. Why is it locked? 

I stepped closer. 

Why don’t Grandma and Grandpa want us in that room? 

They said it was a supply room. 

Practically every room in this weird old house is a storage room, I thought. 
Why don’t they want us to open that door? 

I stood in front of the door. 

I reached out my hand. 

And wrapped my fingers around the silver key. 



15 


No. 

I pulled my hand away from the doorknob. 

I have to find Clark, I decided. I’m tired of playing this stupid game. I’m 
tired of being It. 

Then I had a great idea. 

I’ll hide! I’ll trick Clark into being It! 

I’ll hide and Clark will get bored waiting for me to find him. He’ll have to 
look for me! 

Perfect! I thought. Now... where shall I hide? 

I searched the rest of the rooms on the third floor—scouting out a good 
hiding place. But the rooms up here were all empty. Nothing to slip behind. 

Nothing to crawl under. 

I returned to the little room with the player piano. Maybe I can figure out a 
way to hide behind that, I thought. 

I tried to push the piano away from the wall. 

Just enough so I could squeeze behind it. But it was way too heavy. I 
couldn’t budge it. 

I made my way back to the door with the silver key—the locked room. 

I peered up and down the dim hall. Had I searched everywhere? Did I miss 
a room? 

That’s when I spotted it. 

A small door. A door in the wall. 

A door I hadn’t noticed before. 

A door to a dumbwaiter. 

I’d seen dumbwaiters in the movies. In big, old houses like this one. They 
were little elevators that carried food and dishes from one floor to another. Pretty 
cool. 

A dumbwaiter! I thought. A perfect place to hide! I turned and started 
toward it—when I heard a crash. A crash—like the sound of a plate dropping. 

A crash coming from the other side of the door with the silver key. 

I pressed my ear against the door. I heard footsteps. 



So that’s where Clark is hiding! I realized. He is such a cheater! He hid in 
the one place he knew I wouldn’t look! 

He hid in the room Grandma and Grandpa told us to stay out of. 

Well, Clark, I thought. Too bad for you. I found you! 

I slipped my fingers around the key and turned it. The lock sprang open 
with a sharp click. I yanked open the door. 

And stared at a hideous monster. 



16 


I nearly fell into the room. 

I couldn’t move. Couldn’t back away. Couldn’t take my eyes off him. 

A living, breathing monster. At least ten feet tall. 

Standing inside the locked room. 

I gaped at his big, furry body. A body like a gorilla—with leaves and tree 
roots and sand tangled in his fur. His head was scaly, with snapping rows of 
jagged alligator teeth. 

A foul stench filled the room. The putrid smell of decay. The smell of the 
swamp. 

My stomach heaved. 

The creature raised his eyes to me—bulging eyes set into the sides of his 
enormous head. 

He held me in his stare for a moment. Then he glanced down at his hairy 
paws—where he balanced a tall stack of pancakes. 

He began stuffing the pancakes into his mouth. Devouring them. Gnashing 
them with his jagged teeth. 

Still gripping the door handle, I stared at the monster as he ate. He jammed 
another stack of pancakes down his throat. He swallowed them whole and 
gmnted with pleasure. 

His horrible alligator eyes went wide. The thick veins in his neck throbbed 
as he ate. 

I tried to call for help. To scream. But when I opened my mouth, no sound 
came out. 

With one hand the monster shoved pancakes into his mouth—stacks at a 
time. With the other, he scratched at one of his furry legs. 

Scratched and scratched. Until he found a big black beetle, nesting in his 
fur. 

He held the beetle up to the side of his head—to one of his bulging eyes. 

The beetle’s legs waved in the air. 

He glared at the beetle. At the waving legs. 

Then he popped the bug into his mouth—and chomped down on its shiny 
black shell with a sickening crunch. 



Blueberries and beetle juice oozed from his mouth. 

Run! I told myself. Run! But I was too terrified to move. 

The creature reached down for another stack of pancakes. 

I forced myself to take a small step back—into the hall. 

The monster jerked his head up. 

He glared at me. Then he let out a deep growl. 

He let the pancakes slide to the floor and lumbered toward me. 

I ran, screaming for help as I charged into the hall. 

“Gretchen! Gretchen! What’s wrong?” Clark turned the corner at the end of 
the corridor. 

“A monster! In the locked room! Hurry!” I shrieked. “Hurry! Get help!” 

I leaped down the stairs. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. “Amonster!” 

I turned to see if the beast was following me—and realized that Clark 
hadn’t moved. 

“There’s a monster in there!” I wailed. “Get away, Clark! Get away!” 

He snickered. “You must think I’m pretty stupid to fall for that one.” 

Clark headed toward the door of the monster’s room. Grinning. 

“No! Please!” I pleaded. “I’m telling the truth!” 

“You just want to scare me. To get even.” 

“I’m not kidding, Clark! Don’t go in there!” I shrieked. “DON’T!” 

Clark reached the door. “Here I am, swamp monster!” he called out as he 
stepped into the room. “Come and get me!” 



17 


A second later Clark’s terrified screams echoed from the room. 

The creature roared over Clark’s cries. 

Charley bounded up the stairs, barking wildly. 

“Run! Run!” Clark came bursting from the room, waving his arms. “A 
monster! A swamp monster!” 

We tore down the stairs, dragging Charley with us. Charley fought hard. He 
wanted to turn around and charge back up the steps. 

“Charley, come!” I pleaded. “Come!” 

But Charley sat down on a step and howled. He wouldn’t budge. 

A bellow thundered through the hall. 

Oh, no! He’s coming! He’s coming after us! 

“PLEASE, CHARLEY!” I begged, yanking on his collar. “PLEASE!” 

Clark stood on the steps, frozen in fear. 

“Help me, Clark!” I pleaded. “Don’t just stand there. Help me!” 

The swamp monster pounded down the hall. The old stairway quaked under 
our feet. 

“He’s coming to get us,” Clark whispered. He still hadn’t moved. 

I grabbed my stepbrother’s T-shirt and yanked him hard. “Help me, Clark!” 
I screamed. “Push Charley!” 

We struggled down the stairs. I tugged Charley and Clark shoved him from 
behind. 

“Grandma! Grandpa!” I cried out. 

No answer. 

The monster’s roar grew louder. Closer. 

“Lock Charley in the bathroom!” I ordered Clark when we reached the 
second floor. “He’ll be safe there. I’ll find Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I charged down to the kitchen. “Grandma! Grandpa!” I yelled. “Amonster!” 

No one in the kitchen. 

I flew into the living room. “Where are you? Help!” 

Not in the living room. 

I searched the library. Empty. 



I ran back up the stairs. I checked their bedroom and all the other rooms on 
the second floor. 

I couldn’t find them anywhere. 

Where are they? Where could they be? I asked myself. 

Clark stepped out of the bathroom—just in time to hear the monster’s 
footsteps rumbling above us. 

“W-where’s Grandma and Grandpa?” he stammered. 

“I—I don’t know. I can’t find them!” 

“Did you check outside?” His voice came out in a squeak. 

That’s it! I thought. Don’t panic, Gretchen. They must be outside. Probably 
in the back. Grandpa is probably working on the shed. 

We bolted down the stairs and into the kitchen. 

We stopped at the back door. Stared out across the swamp. To the shed. 

No one back there. 

“Where are—?” Clark began. 

“Listen!” I cut Clark off. “Do you hear that?” 

The sound of a car—starting up. 

“Grandpa and Grandma’s car! It’s back! It’s fixed!” I shouted. 

We followed the sound of the engine. It was coming from the front of the 
house. 

We ran to the front door and peered out the window. 

There they were! 

“Huh?” I cried out in shock. 

My grandparents were backing down the driveway. 

They were driving away! 

“No—wait! Wait!” I screamed, turning the lock. 

“They can’t hear you!” Clark shouted. “Open the door! Open it!” 

I yanked on the door. I pulled it as hard as I could. I turned the lock again. 
“Hurry!” Clark shrieked. “They’re leaving us here!” 

I tugged and tugged. And turned the knob frantically. 

Then I realized the horrible truth. 

“It’s bolted from the outside!” I told Clark. “They’ve locked us in!” 



18 


“How could they do this to us?” I wailed. “How could they leave us here? Why 
did they lock us in?” 

The ceiling shook above our heads. Shook hard. Hard enough to send the 
pictures on the living room wall crashing to the floor. 

“What was that?” Clark’s eyebrows shot up. 

“The monster! He’s coming after us!” I croaked. “We have to get out of 
here! We have to find help! ” 

Clark and I ran back to the kitchen. To the kitchen door. 

I twisted the doorknob. Pulled as hard as I could. But this door was also 
jammed shut—barred from the outside. 

We ran through the house. 

We checked all the side doors. 

All stuck. All of them—bolted shut from the other side. 

The monster’s footsteps rumbled above us. 

How could Grandma and Grandpa do this to us? How could they? How 
could they? The question screamed in my head as I charged into the library. To 
the window. 

The only window on the entire first floor. 

Our only escape now. 

I struggled to shove the window up. 

It wouldn’t budge. 

I pounded on the wooden sash with my fists. 

“Look!” Clark choked. He pointed to the grimy pane. “Look!” 

Two rusty nails. Driven into the wooden sash. Nailing the window shut— 
from the outside. 

Nailing us in. 

How could they do this to us? How could they? I chanted silently. How 
could they? 

“We have to break the glass!” I turned to Clark. “It’s the only way out!” 

“Okay!” Clark cried. He leaned forward and began beating his fists against 
the pane. 



“Are you nuts?” I screamed at him. “Find something stronger to—” 

But the rest of my sentence was lost—lost in a deafening crash from above. 
Followed by the thundering clatter of piano keys. 

“Wh-what’s he doing?” Clark stammered. 

“There’s an old piano up there. It sounds as if he’s throwing it across the 
room!” 

The floors, the walls, the library ceiling—everything quaked—as the 
monster hurled the piano across the third-floor room. Over and over again. 

A porcelain vase, a crystal dish, little glass animals flew from a nearby table 
and shattered at our feet. 

I threw my hands over my head as the library books spilled from their 
shelves. 

Clark and I huddled together. On the floor. Waiting for the avalanche of 
books to end. 

Waiting for the monster to stop. 

We huddled there until the house grew silent. 

A final book tumbled from a shelf. It landed on a small table next to me. 

“Hand me that!” I ordered Clark, pointing to a heavy brass candlestick next 
to the book. “Stand back.” 

I turned to the window. I pulled back my arm to swing the heavy 
candlestick—when I heard the whimpering. 

Charley’s whimpering. From upstairs. 

“Oh, no!” I gasped. “The monster—he’s got Charley!” 



19 


I ran for the stairway, clutching the candlestick in one hand, dragging Clark with 
the other. 

I had to save Charley! I had to! 

I raced up the stairs. I stopped when I reached the top. 

My heart pounded in my chest as I peered down the hall. 

The corridor was empty. 

I crept toward the bathroom. Except for Clark’s raspy breathing and the 
thudding of my heart, the house was still. 

As I neared the bathroom, the bathroom door came into view. 

Shut. 

I gripped the doorknob. It slipped in my sweat-drenched hand. 

I opened the door a crack and peeked inside. But I couldn’t see anything. 

I could feel Clark breathing down my neck as I pushed the door open a bit 
more. 

A bit more. 

“Charley!” I cried out with relief. 

Charley sat in the bathtub. Curled up in a corner. Scared—but safe. 

He gazed up at us with his big brown eyes. He wagged his tail weakly. 
Then he began to bark. 

“Shhhh!” I whispered, petting him. “Please, Charley. Don’t let the monster 
hear you. Quiet, boy.” 

Charley barked even louder. 

So loud that we almost didn’t hear the car pull up outside. 

“Shhhh!” I urged Charley. I turned to Clark. “Did you hear that?” 

His mouth dropped open. “A car door!” 

“Yes!” I cried. 

“Grandma and Grandpa are back!” Clark shouted. “I’ll bet they brought 
help!” 

“Stay,” I commanded Charley as we eased out of the bathroom. “Good boy. 
Stay.” 

Clark slammed the door behind us, and we bolted down the stairs. 



“I knew they’d be back! I knew they wouldn’t just leave us!” I flew down 
the steps, two at a time. 

And heard the engine start. 

Heard the car rumble away. 

Heard the tires crunch down the driveway. 

“Noooo!” I shouted as I reached the front door. “Don’t go! Don’t go!” 

I pounded the door with my fists. I kicked it hard. And then I saw the pink 
slip of paper on the floor, slipped under the door. 

A message. I picked it up with a trembling hand. And started to read: 

We’re not coming back. Until next week. Sorry, kids. But work is taking 
much longer than we thought. 

A phone message—from Mom and Dad. 

Grandma and Grandpa didn’t come back, I realized. Mr. Donner, from the 
general store, had driven over to deliver this phone message. 

The roar of the monster tore through my thoughts. 

I spun around. 

Clark was gone. 

“Clark!” I shouted. “Where are you?” 

The monster’s growls grew louder. Meaner. 

“Clark!” I called out again. “Clark!” 

“Gretchen—come quick!” I heard his desperate cry from the kitchen. 



20 


“Gretchen! Gretchen!” 

As I charged through the living room, he shouted my name over and over 
again. Each time his voice grew higher, more excited. 

“I’m coming!” I yelled. “Hold on, Clark. I’m coming!” 

I rounded the couch—and tripped over a footstool. My head hit the floor 

hard. 

Clark continued to cry out my name, but his voice seemed distant now. So 
far away. 

My head throbbed with pain. 

I struggled to stand, and the room spun around me. 

“Gre-tchen! Gre-tchen!” 

He sounded more frantic than ever. 

“I’m coming!” I said through a dizzy haze. 

Then I heard the monster’s bellow. It thundered through the house. 

I have to get to Clark. He’s in trouble! The monster has him! I realized. 

I stumbled through the living room. Toward the kitchen. 

The creature’s roars shook the walls. 

“Hold on, Clark!” I tried to shout, but my voice came out in a moan. “I’m 
coming!” 

I stumbled into the kitchen. 

“Gretchen!” Clark stood next to the refrigerator. 

Alone. 

“Where is he?” I cried. My eyes darted around the room, searching for the 
monster. 

“Wh-where’s who?” Clark stammered. 

“The monster!” I yelled. 

“Upstairs,” Clark replied, puzzled. “What took you so long to get here?” 

Clark didn’t wait for an answer. “Look at this.” He pointed to the 
refrigerator. I turned and saw two letters stuck there with magnets. 

“You were screaming like a maniac to show me that?” I shrieked. “I nearly 
killed myself! I thought the monster had grabbed you!” 



Clark’s hand trembled as he lifted the envelopes from the refrigerator. “It’s 
two letters addressed to us. From Grandma and Grandpa.” 

I stared at the envelopes in Clark’s hand. They were addressed to us, just as 
he said. And they were numbered, one and two. 

“They left us letters?” I couldn’t believe it. 

Clark ripped open the first envelope. The paper shook in his hands as he 
began to read it to himself. 

His eyes scanned the paper. He mumbled as he read. I couldn’t understand 
what he was saying. 

“Let me have that!” I reached out for the letter, but Clark jerked back. He 
held the paper tightly and continued to read. 

“Clark, what does it say?” I demanded. 

He ignored me. He pushed his glasses up on his nose and kept on reading. 
Mumbling. 

I watched Clark as he read. 

I watched his eyes move down the page. 

I watched his eyes grow wide with horror. 



21 


“Clark!” I shouted impatiently. “What does it say?” 

Clark began to read the letter out loud. “'Dear Gretchen and Clark,’” he 
started. The paper fluttered between his trembling fingers. 

“'We’re sorry to do this to you, but we had to leave. A few weeks ago, a 
swamp monster invaded our house. We captured it in the room upstairs. Then we 
didn’t know what to do with it. We didn’t have a car, so we couldn’t get to a 
phone to call for help. 

'“We’ve lived in terror for the past few weeks. We were afraid to let the 
monster out. It’s so loud and angry all the time. We know it would have killed 
us.’” 

My knees started to wobble as Clark continued. 

'“We didn’t want to tell your parents about the creature. If we did, they 
wouldn’t have let you come. We don’t get many visitors here. We wanted so 
much to see you. But I guess we were wrong. You should have gone to Atlanta 
with your mother and father. I guess we were wrong to let you stay.’” 

“They guess they were wrong! They guess!” I shrieked. “Can you believe 
them?” 

Clark peered up from the letter. His face was white. Even his freckles 
seemed to disappear. He shook his head, stunned. 

Then he continued to read our grandparents’ letter. '“We’ve been feeding 
the creature, slipping food through an opening Grandpa sawed in the bottom of 
the door. The monster eats a lot. But we had to feed him. We were afraid not to. 

'“We know it’s unfair to mn off now. But we’re just going for help. We’ll 
be back—as soon as we can find someone. Someone who knows what to do with 
this horrible beast. 

'“Sorry, kids. We really are—but we had to bolt you inside the house. To 
make sure you didn’t wander into the swamp by yourselves. It’s not safe out 
there.’” 

Were they for real?” 

“Not safe out there'.” I cried. “They left us in this house with a killer 
monster—and they say it’s not safe out there! They’re both crazy, Clark. Totally 
crazy!” 



Clark nodded and continued reading. “‘Sorry, kids. We really, really are 
sorry. But just remember one thing: You are perfectly safe as long as...’” 

The monster upstairs let out a loud bellow. And Clark dropped the letter. 

I watched in horror as it sailed through the air. 

Floated down to the floor. 

And slid under the refrigerator. 

“Get it, Clark!” I yelled. “Quick!” 

Clark stretched out on the floor and shoved his fingers under the 
refrigerator. But his fingers only managed to brush the tip of the paper, shoving it 
back. 

“Stop!” I yelled. “You’re pushing it away!” 

But Clark didn’t listen. 

He shoved his hand in deeper. Groping for the paper. 

Pushing it back. Farther and farther. 

Until we couldn’t see it anymore. 

“What did it say?” I hollered. “You read the letter! We’re perfectly safe as 
long as... what?” 

“I—I didn’t get to that part,” Clark stammered. 

I wanted to strangle him. 

I spun around. And frantically searched for something to slip under the 
refrigerator—to ease out the letter. 

But I couldn’t find anything slim enough or long enough. Everything was 
way too big to fit underneath. 

Clark tore open the kitchen cabinets and drawers looking for something we 
could use. 

The monster stomped on the floor above us. 

The ceiling quaked. 

A dish fell off the counter and shattered on the cold gray tiles. Shattered 
into a thousand tiny pieces. 

“Oh, no,” I moaned, staring up at the ceiling, watching the paint crack and 
crumble. “He’s down to the second floor. He’s coming closer.” 

“We’re doomed,” Clark groaned. “He’s going to catch us and—” 

“Clark. We have to move the refrigerator. We have to find out what it says 
in the rest of that letter!” 

Clark and I tugged on the refrigerator. We pushed and tugged with all our 
strength. 



Upstairs, the monster roared an angry roar. 

We tugged harder. 

The refrigerator began to move. 

Clark knelt down and peered underneath it. “Push!” he told me. “Push! I 
can see a corner of the letter! Push—just a little more!” 

I gave the refrigerator one more hard shove—and Clark had it! He grasped 
the corner of the letter between his thumb and index finger. And pulled it out. 

He shook the paper, to free a clump of dust that clung to it. 

“Just read it!” I shouted at him. “Read it!” 

Clark started to read again. ‘“You are perfectly safe as long as...’” 



22 


I held my breath, waiting for Clark to finish the sentence. Waiting to find out 
how we could keep ourselves safe. 

“‘You are perfectly safe,’” Clark read, “‘as long as you do not open the door 
and let the monster out.’” 

“That’s it?” My jaw dropped. “It’s too late for that! It’s too late! Did they 
say anything else? They must have said something else!” 

“There’s a little more.” Clark read on: 

“‘Please. Please stay away from that room. Do not open that door.’” 

“Too late!” I wailed. “It’s too late!” 

‘“If the monster escapes, you will have no choice. You will have to find a 
way to kill it.’” Clark looked up from the letter. “That’s it, Gretchen. That’s all it 
says. You will have to find a way to kill it. ” 

“Quick!” I ordered Clark. “Open the other letter. It’ll probably tell us more. 
It has to!” 

Clark started to tear open the second envelope when we heard the heavy 
footsteps. 

Footsteps downstairs. 

In the next room—the living room. 

“Hurry, Clark! Open it!” 

Clark’s fingers fumbled as he tried to rip through the sealed envelope. But 
he stopped when we heard the creature’s breathing. 

Deep, wheezing breaths. 

Coming nearer. 

My heart thumped wildly as the monster’s wheezing grew louder. 

“He-he’s coming for us!” Clark cried, stuffing the unopened envelope in his 
pocket. 

“The dining room!” I shouted. “Head for the dining room!” 

“What are we going to do? How can we kill it?” Clark cried as we bolted 
from the kitchen. 

“We— owwww!” A sharp pain shot up my leg as I ran smack into the 
dining-room table. 



I clutched my knee. I tried to bend it. But the pain tore through it. 
I spun around. 

And there he stood. 

The swamp monster. 

In the kitchen—lumbering toward us hungrily. 



23 


The monster glared at me with his horrible bulging eyes. I watched the veins in 
his head throb as he let out a long, low growl. 

I stared at those huge, pulsing veins. Stared as they beat against his coarse 
alligator skin. 

“Run, Gretchen!” Clark pulled me from behind. He yanked me out of the 
dining room. We dove toward the stairs. 

“We need a place to hide.” Clark panted as we fled to the second floor. “We 
have to hide until Grandma and Grandpa come back with help.” 

“They’re not coming back!” I screamed at him. “They’re not coming back 
with help!” 

“They said they would,” Clark insisted. “They said so in the letter.” 

“Clark, you are such a jerk.” We reached the top of the stairs. I stopped to 
catch my breath. “Who is going to believe them?” I said, gulping air. “Who’s 
going to believe they have a swamp monster trapped in their house?” 

Clark didn’t reply. 

I answered for him. “No one! That’s who. Everyone they tell the story to 
will think they’re nuts.” 

“Someone might believe them.” Clark’s voice cracked. “Someone might 
want to help.” 

“Yeah, right. ‘Will you help us kill a swamp monster?’ they’ll ask. I’ll bet 
they get loads of volunteers!” I rolled my eyes. 

I stopped yelling at Clark when I heard the monster’s heavy breathing. I 
spun around—and saw the creature. 

He stood at the bottom of the stairs. Eyeing us. Drooling hungrily. 

Clark and I backed slowly away from the top of the stairs. 

The monster followed us with his eyes. 

“We have to kill it,” Clark whispered. “That’s what the letter said. We have 
to kill it. But how?” 

“I have an idea!” I told Clark. “Follow me!” 

We turned and ran. As we charged past the bathroom, we heard Charley 
whimpering. 

“Let’s get Charley!” Clark stopped running. “It’s too dangerous to leave 



him closed up in there. We have to take him with us.” 

“We can’t, Clark,” I replied. “He’ll be okay. Don’t worry.” 

I wasn’t as sure about that as I sounded. But there was no time to stop for 
Charley now—because the monster had reached the second floor. 

There he stood. Looming at the end of the hall. 

He raised his hands up over his head. I saw that he held the wooden 
footstool I had tripped over in the living room. 

His eyes burned with anger. 

He glared at me, then growled a loud, savage growl. A stream of thick 
white drool dribbled down his chin. 

He licked the drool away with a reptile tongue—and smashed the stool 
down across his leg. It splintered into two jagged pieces. 

He raised the pieces and hurled them at us. 

“Let’s go!” Clark shrieked as the footstool bounced off the wall. 

We ran up the stairs. Up to the third floor. 

The monster lumbered after us. The whole house shook with each heavy 
step he took. 

“He’s coming!” Clark cried. “What are we going to do? You said you had 
an idea. What?” 

“There’s a collapsed stairway up here,” I told Clark, running as fast as I 
could through the dark, twisting hall. “It’s totally fallen down. Just a big hole. 
When we turn the corner, grab onto the railing. The monster will chase us around 
the corner—and he’ll fall down the open stairway.” 

The roar of the monster thundered in my ears. I saw him plodding down the 
hall after us. 

“Come on, Clark! Hurry!” 

“What if it doesn’t work?” Clark demanded, very frightened. “What if the 
fall only hurts him? Won’t it make him even more angry?” 

“Don’t ask questions, Clark,” I replied impatiently. “It’s got to work! It’s 
got to!” 

We started to run again. 

The monster howled. Howled with rage. 

“There’s the turn, Clark. Up ahead.” 

The creature roared. Only steps behind us. 

My heart pounded hard. My chest felt as if it were about to explode. “Grab 
the railing, Clark. Or else you’ll drop to the bottom. Here goes!” 



We turned the corner. 

We both threw our hands up. And grabbed the railing. 

Our bodies slammed hard against the wall—then dangled over the black, 
empty hole. 

The creature turned the corner. 

Would my plan work? Would he fall to his death? 

Was this the way to kill a monster? 



24 


The beast whirled around the comer. 

Staggered on the edge of the hole. 

His head jerked to face us. His eyes glowed red. 

He opened his mouth in an ugly growl. He swayed, trying to keep his 
balance. Then he plunged down the open staircase. 

I heard him land with a heavy thud. 

Clark and I hung on to the rotted banister. It creaked under the strain of our 
weight. 

My hands ached. My fingers were numb. I knew I couldn’t hold on much 
longer. 

We listened. 

Silence. 

The creature didn’t move. 

I looked down, but it was too dark to see. 

“My fingers are slipping,” Clark groaned. Then he swung out his foot, 
searching with his sneaker for the hallway floor. 

Hand over hand, he inched his way along the banister to the safety of the 
hall. I followed. 

We peered down into the black hole once more. But it was so black down 
there—we couldn’t make out a thing. Dark and silent. Totally silent. 

“We did it! We’re safe!” I cheered. “We killed the monster!” 

Clark and I jumped up and down in celebration. “We did it! We did it!” 

We ran downstairs. We let Charley out of the bathroom. 

“Everything is okay, Charley.” I hugged my dog. “We did it, boy,” I told 
him. “We killed the swamp monster.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” Clark urged. “We can walk to town. Call Mom and 
Dad from the general store. Tell them to pick us up—now!” 

We were so happy, we practically danced down the steps. The three of us 
headed into the library. “Stand back,” I told Clark. “And hold Charley. I’ll break 
the window, and we’ll get out of here.” 

I glanced around the room, searching for the heavy brass candlestick to 



break the glass. It wasn’t there. 

“Wait here,” I told Clark. “I left the candlestick up in the bathroom. I’ll be 
right back.” 

I sprinted out of the library. 

I couldn’t wait to break out of this creepy place. To leave this horrible 
swamp. And tell Mom and Dad how stupid they were to dump us here in a house 
with a real, live monster inside. 

I ran through the living room—to the stairs. 

I jogged up three steps—and stopped. 

Stopped when I heard the low groan. 

It can’t be, I thought. Maybe it’s Charley. Maybe Charley is growling. 

I listened. 

And heard it again. 

Not a dog growl. Definitely not a dog growl. 

Then I heard the rumbling footsteps, the footsteps of the swamp monster, 
coming from somewhere nearby. 

Closer. 

Closer. 



25 


“Clark!” I staggered back into the library. My legs were shaking. My whole body 
trembled. “He’s not dead!” I cried. “The monster isn’t dead!” 

The library was empty. 

“Clark? Where are you?” I shouted. 

“In the kitchen,” he called. “Feeding Charley.” 

I raced into the kitchen. Clark and Charley sat on the floor. Charley was 
lapping up a bowl of water. 

“The fall didn’t kill him! The monster isn’t dead!” I shrieked. 

Clark gasped in horror. “He must be really angry now. He must be furious. 
What are we going to do?” 

My eyes darted around the kitchen. “Put Charley in there,” I ordered. “In 
that closet. I have another idea.” 

“I hope it’s better than your last idea,” Clark moaned. 

“Do you have an idea?” I yelled at him. “Do you?” 

He didn’t. 

Clark dragged Charley across the kitchen. “Gretchen, this isn’t a closet. It’s 
some kind of room.” 

“I don’t care what it is,” I hollered. “Just put Charley in there.” 

On the counter sat one of Grandma’s rhubarb pies. “The monster hasn’t 
eaten since this morning,” I told Clark. “We’ll put this pie out on the counter 
where he’ll see it.” 

“But that will only slow him down for a second,” Clark whined. He shut 
Charley in the room. “He’ll gobble the pie in one bite. Then he’ll come after us 
again.” 

“No, he won’t,” I insisted. “We’re going to poison the pie. We’ll put stuff in 
it. Enough stuff to kill him!” 

“I don’t know, Gretchen,” Clark argued. “I don’t think that’s going to 
work.” 

Charley whimpered behind the closed door—as if he agreed. 

“We have no choice!” I snapped. “We have to try something!” 

I found a fork and carefully lifted up the pie crust with it. 



Then I searched the cabinet under the kitchen sink. It was filthy under there. 
Damp, with green mold growing on the pipes. 

I found a jar of turpentine sitting on a shelf right in front. The lid was 
screwed on tight. I had to twist it hard to open it. 

I slowly poured the entire jar of turpentine into the pie. 

“Yuck! That stuff stinks,” Clark said, holding his nose. 

I studied the pie. It was wet and runny now. “I think we need something to 
soak up the turpentine,” I told Clark. “This should do it!” I held up a can of drain 
cleaner. 

I sprinkled the blue drain-cleaner crystals over the pie. They made the 
rhubarb bubble and fizz. 

Clark leaped back. “I think that’s enough,” he said. 

I ignored him. 

I stuck my head under the sink and came up with two jars. “Rat poison!” I 
exclaimed, reading the dirty label on one of them. “Excellent.” The other jar was 
filled with ammonia. 

“Hurry!” Clark urged. “I hear the monster. He’s coming.” 

I sprinkled the pie with the rat poison and poured in the ammonia too. 

The monster’s groans came closer. Each time he groaned or growled, I 
jumped. 

I found an old can of orange paint and dumped it into the pie. 

“That’s enough! We have enough!” Clark insisted in a panic. 

“Okay. Okay. I just want to make sure this works.” 

I shoved in a handful of mothballs. 

“Hurry!” Clark urged. “Close it up. He’s coming!” 

The monster’s footsteps pounded the living-room floor. 

“Hurry!” Clark begged. 

I sprayed the top of the pie with bug spray. 

“Gretchen!” Clark pleaded with me. 

I placed the poisoned pie on the counter. 

It’s so sweet, your teeth will fall out after one bite. Grandma’s words came 
back to me. 

It better do more than that! I told myself. It better kill a monster! 

“Here he comes!” Clark cried. 

We ducked under the kitchen table. 

The monster stomped into the kitchen. Peering out from under the table, I 



could see him swing his arms wildly. He knocked over dishes, pots, glasses. 
Everything in sight. 

Then my heart stopped when I saw the big creature turn. 

He hesitated. Then he took a step toward the kitchen table. Another step. 
Another. 

Clark and I huddled together under the table. We were both trembling so 
hard, the table shook. 

The swamp monster sees us under here! I realized. 

We’re trapped. 

What is he going to do? 



26 


Clark and I held on to each other. The monster stepped up to the table—so close 
I could smell the sour odor of his thick fur. 

Clark started to let out soft, whimpering sounds. 

I clapped my hands over his mouth. I shut my eyes. 

Please go away, I prayed. Please, monster, don’t see us. 

I heard the creature sniffing. Like a dog trying to sniff out a bone. 

When I opened my eyes, he had moved away from the table. 

“Whew!” I breathed a long, silent sigh of relief. 

The monster rumbled around the room. 

Sniffing loudly, urgently. 

He sniffed the refrigerator. 

He lumbered over to the stove and sniffed some more. He plodded around 
the room. Sniffing. 

He smells us. He smells Clark and me, I thought. Please, see the pie. See 
the pie. 

The creature stomped back to the stove. 

Sniffing. 

He bent down and peered into the oven. Then he ripped the oven door off 
its hinges and hurled it across the room. 

The door hit the wall with a loud crash. Clark jumped in fright and banged 
his head on the table. He let out a low moan. 

I moaned too. “Look,” I whispered. 

The creature was eating—but he wasn’t eating our pie. There were two pies 
still in the oven. And the creature was stuffing himself with them. 

Oh, no, I thought. He’ll eat those pies. Then he’ll be full. He won’t eat our 
pie! We’re as good as dead. 

The monster hungrily jammed the two pies into his mouth. He practically 
swallowed them whole. Then he lumbered to the center of the room. 

Sniffing. 

Yes! He’s still hungry! I thought. Eat our pie. Eat our pie, I chanted to 
myself. 



I peered out from under the table—and saw the creature, heading toward 
the counter. Yes! 

He stopped. 

And sniffed. 

He saw the pie. 

He eyed it for a moment. Then he lifted it to his mouth and shoved it in. 

Yes! I cheered silently. He’s eating it! He’s eating our pie! 

He chomped away at the pie. Chomped and shoved more into his huge 
mouth. Chomped and shoved. Chomped and shoved. 

He licked his big lips as he ate. 

He licked his paws. 

He rubbed his stomach. 

“Oh, no!” I groaned. “He likes it!” 



27 


I watched the monster shove the last bit of pie into his mouth. 

Then he flicked his reptile tongue in and out, licking up every last crumb 
from the pie tin. 

“It isn’t working,” I moaned to Clark. “He loves it.” 

“Now what are we going to do?” he whispered back. He hugged his knees 
tightly to his chest to keep them from shaking. 

The monster let out a long groan. 

I peered out from under the table. I saw the creature’s eyes bug out. They 
practically popped out of his head! 

A gurgling, choking sound escaped his throat. 

He grasped his neck with his two hairy paws. 

He groaned again. 

His stomach rumbled—a deep rumble. He clutched his stomach and 
doubled over. 

He uttered a weak cry of pain—and surprise. 

Then he dropped dead on the kitchen floor. 

“We did it! We did it!” I cheered. “We killed the swamp monster!” 

I pulled Clark out from under the table. 

I studied the creature from across the room. I was sure he was dead—but I 
still didn’t want to get too close. 

The monster’s scaly eyelids were closed. 

I stared at his chest—to see if it moved. To see if he was breathing. 

His chest remained still. 

I stared at him a few moments longer. 

He didn’t stir. 

Clark peered over my shoulder. “Is—is he really dead?” he stammered. 

“Yes!” I was sure of it now. Totally sure. “We did it!” I cried. I jumped up 
and down joyfully. “We killed the monster! We killed him!” 

Clark reached into his back pocket—for his comic book, Creatures from the 
Muck. He hurled it across the room. It hit the monster in the head and fell to the 
floor. 



“I never want to read about swamp monsters again. Never!” Clark cried. 
“Let’s get out of here!” 

Charley scratched at the door. When we opened it, he leaped out and 
jumped all over us. “It’s okay, boy,” I told him, trying to calm him down. “It’s 
okay.” 

I peered into the room where we had locked Charley. “Hey, Clark, I think 
there’s a door in here,” I said. “A door that leads out!” 

I stepped into the small, dark space—and stumbled over a broom lying on 
the floor. 

I squinted in the darkness. 

Two rusty shovels leaned against the wall to my right. On the left sat a coil 
of old hose. 

In front of me I saw the door. A door with a large glass window. 

I looked out the window—out to the backyard. To the path that ran through 
the swamp. 

Does that path lead through the swamp to town? I wondered. I decided it 
was worth a try. 

“We’re almost out of here!” I declared. “We’re almost free!” 

I turned the doorknob, but the door was locked. Bolted from the other side, 
like all the doors in the house. 

“It’s jammed shut,” I told Clark. “But I’ll break the window and we’ll climb 
out. No problem.” 

The shovels against the wall were big and heavy. I gripped the handle of 
one with both hands and took aim. 

I swung it back—and felt the floor quake. 

I spun around—and heard the roar. 

The roar of the swamp monster. 

He wasn’t dead. 



28 


The creature rumbled into the doorway. 

Clark and I both shrieked as he took a giant step into the room. His hideous 
head made a scraping sound as it brushed against the frame of the door. But he 
didn’t even seem to notice. 

Clark and I pressed against the wall. 

Charley backed into a corner, whimpering. Frightened. 

We were trapped. 

No way out. 

Nowhere to run. 

The monster’s eyes shifted from Charley, to me, to Clark. They rested on 
Clark for a moment. Then the creature lifted his head and wailed. 

“He-he’s going to get me first,” Clark cried. “I—I shouldn’t have thrown 
the comic at him. I shouldn’t have hit him in the head.” 

“He’s going to get us, you jerk!” I shouted at him. “Because we tried to kill 
him!” 

That shut Clark up. 

I have to do something, I thought. I have to do something. But what? What? 

The swamp monster staggered forward. 

He opened his snout with a snap—and bared jagged yellow teeth. 

Sharp yellow teeth, dripping with saliva. 

His eyes glowed red as he moved forward. Clomping closer and closer. 

I glanced down and realized that I still held the shovel. I lifted it with two 
hands—and thrust it forward. Jabbing—jabbing at the air between the creature 
and me. 

“Back!” I screamed. “Get back! Leave us alone!” 

The monster grunted. 

“Get back! Get back!” I swung the shovel wildly. “Go away!” 

I swung at the creature. 

I swung—and hit his stomach with a sickening thwack. 

The room went silent. 

Then the monster tossed back his head and let out a piercing howl. 



He stumbled forward. Swiped the shovel from my hand. And tossed it out 
the door. Tossed it as if it were a toothpick. 

I gasped as it crashed to the kitchen floor. 

I eyed the other shovel leaning against the wall. The monster followed my 

gaze. 

He snatched it up and broke it in half with his bare hands. Then he pitched 
the pieces into the kitchen. 

What can I do? I have to do something! 

And then it came to me! 

The letter. 

The second letter from Grandma and Grandpa—the one we hadn’t opened 

yet! 

“Clark! Quick! The second letter,” I cried. “Maybe it will tell us what to do! 
Read it!” 

Clark stared at me. Frozen. His eyes on the raging monster. 

“Clark!” I said, through clenched teeth. “Open... the... letter. NOW!” 

He reached into his jeans pocket with a trembling hand. He fumbled with 
the flap. 

“Hurry, Clark!” I pleaded. 

He finally managed to tear a hole in the corner of the envelope. 

And then I screamed. 

The monster dove forward. 

He grabbed my arm. He yanked it hard. 

And pulled me toward him. 



29 


The monster pulled me close. 

I stared up into his hideous face—and gasped. 

His eyes were deep, dark pools—with tiny worms swimming in them! 

I twisted my head away—so I wouldn’t have to stare into those horrible, 
wormy eyes. 

The creature gripped me tighter. 

His hot, sour breath swept over my cheeks. 

He opened his jaws wide. 

His mouth was filled with bugs! I saw them crawling up and down his 
tongue. 

I screamed. And struggled against the monster’s hold. But he clutched me 
too tightly. 

“Let me go!” I shrieked. “Please—!” 

The monster bellowed in reply, hitting me with a blast of his hot breath. 

He smells like a swamp, I realized as I fought against his grasp. He is a 
swamp. He’s like a living swamp. 

With my free hand, I pounded on the creature’s arm. I nearly gagged when I 
felt the moss. His whole body was covered with a layer of wet moss! 

“Let me go!” I pleaded. “Please—let me go!” 

Clark leaped forward. He grabbed my arm and tried to tug me away. “Leave 
her alone! ” he shrieked. 

Charley charged out of his corner. His lip curled back and he let out a low 
snarl. Then he sank his teeth into the monster’s hairy leg. 

Startled, the monster jerked away, dragging me along with him. 

But Charley wouldn’t give up. I glanced down to see him dig his teeth deep 
into the monster’s foot. 

With a growl, the beast raised his foot. And with one fierce shake, he hurled 
Charley across the room. 

“Charley!” I cried out. “Charley!” 

I heard Charley whimper on the other side of the room. 

“He’s okay,” Clark said, breathlessly. He tugged harder on my arm, trying 



to wrestle me free. 

With another angry growl, the beast swung at Clark. Shoved him hard 
against the wall. Then the monster leaned down—and pulled me up to his face. 
He opened his mouth. 

His disgusting, bug-infested tongue rolled out. 

And he LICKED me. 

He ran his hot, bumpy tongue up and down my arm. 

Then he lowered his enormous teeth—as he prepared to chew off my hand. 



30 


“Nooooo!” A horrified shriek tore from my throat. 

The monster’s jaw swung down. His mouth gaped open. The bugs swarmed 
over his yellow teeth. He lowered his mouth to my hand. 

Then he stopped. 

And let me go. 

He backed away, staring at me. Staring at my arm, eyes bulging. 

I stared at my arm too. It was covered with disgusting, monster saliva. 

The monster raised his hands and clutched at his throat now. Choking. 
Choking on something. 

He raised his wet eyes to me. 

“You—you human?” he choked out. 

“He can talk\” Clark gasped. 

“You human? You human?” he demanded. 

“Y-yes, I’m a human,” I stammered. 

The monster threw back his head and groaned. “Oh, no. I’m allergic to 
humans.” 

His eyes rolled up. 

He staggered forward and collapsed against the door to the outside. It 
crashed open under his heavy weight. Moonlight streamed in. 

He lay there on his stomach. He didn’t move. 

I rubbed my wet arm and stared down at the swamp monster. 

Was he really dead this time? 



31 


“Gretchen! Let’s go!” Clark yanked me toward the open door. 

We stepped over the monster. I glanced down at the creature one last time. 

His eyes were shut. He didn’t breathe. He didn’t move. 

“Come on, Gretchen!” Clark pleaded. 

Is he really dead? I stared at the swamp monster. I wasn’t totally sure. But I 
did know one thing—I wasn’t going to hang around to find out. 

Clark and I ran out through the broken door. We found Charley already 
there, waiting for us. We bolted down the path—away from the house. Into the 
swamp. 

I was so surprised to find it was dark out. Had we really fought the swamp 
monster all day? 

A pale moon hung over the cypress trees, casting an eerie glow over them. 

The mud rose up over my ankles as we made our way through the marshy 
ground. Through the tall weeds. Through a blanket of heavy mist. 

My shoes plunged into deep pools of water. 

Tripped over upraised roots. 

I swiped at the long beards of gray that hung from the trees. Swiped them 
from my face as we headed deeper and deeper into the swamp. 

When the house was no longer in view, we stopped running. Stopped to 
catch our breath. 

I listened in the darkness for footsteps. 

The swamp monster’s footsteps. 

There weren’t any. 

“We did it! We killed the monster!” My voice rang out in the night. 

“And we escaped!” Clark cheered. “We’re free! We’re okay!” 

“Yes!” I shouted. “We really did it!” 

Now that we had stopped running for our lives, we stepped through the 
swamp carefully. Leaping over the inky puddles and gnarled tree roots. 

The night air echoed with strange sounds. 

Low gurgling. Scampering footsteps. Piercing cries. 

But I didn’t care. 



I had already battled my worst nightmare—the swamp monster. Battled him 
and won. 

“Hey! Clark!” I suddenly remembered the other letter! “We never read 
Grandma and Grandpa’s letter. The second letter!” 

“So what?” Clark replied. “We don’t have to read it. The monster is dead. 
We killed it. Just as they told us to do in the first letter.” 

“Where is it? Where’s the letter?” I demanded. “Take it out, Clark.” I 
stopped walking. “I want to know what it says.” 

Clark pulled the crumpled envelope from his jeans pocket. As he smoothed 
out the wrinkles, a fierce animal cry cut through the swamp. 

“I—I don’t think we should stop now,” Clark said. “We can read it later. 
After we reach town. After we call Mom and Dad.” 

“Read it now,” I insisted. “Come on. Don’t you want to know what it says?” 

“No,” Clark declared. 

“Well, I do,” I told him. 

“Okay. Okay.” Clark ripped open the envelope and slipped out the letter. 

Alight wind began to blow, carrying the sharp animal cries to us. 

The dark trees mstled over our heads. 

Clark began to read slowly, struggling to see in the dim moonlight. “‘Dear 
Gretchen and Clark. We hope you children are safe and well. We forgot one 
word of warning in the first letter. 

“‘If the monster gets out... and you do kill it... and escape from the house 
—stay on the road. Do NOT go into the swamp.’” 

Clark rolled his eyes. He let out a loud groan. 

“Keep reading!” I shouted. “Read!” 

He squinted in the dark and went on. “‘The monster’s brothers and sisters 
live in the swamp—dozens of them. We think they are out there. Waiting for 
him.’” 

My heart started to race as Clark continued. 

“‘We’ve seen the monsters in the swamp. We’ve heard them whistling to 
each other every night. They’re unhappy their brother was captured. They’re 
waiting for him to return. So whatever you do, stay out of the swamp. It’s not 
safe out there. Stay out of the swamp! Good luck! We love you.’” 

Clark’s hands dropped to his sides. The letter fell to the marshy ground. 

I turned slowly, staring out at the shifting shadows. 

“Gretchen.” Clark choked out my name. “Do you hear that? What is that 



sound? What is it?” 


“Uh... it sounds like a whistle.” 

“Th-that’s what I thought,” he whispered. “What do we do now? Any 
ideas?” 

“No, Clark,” I replied softly. “I don’t have any more ideas. How about 
you?” 

